Great sturdy USB key ruined by U3. This is a great sturdy little USB key.Smooth edges will not scuff against clothes or anything else in your pocket.Handy keychain loop spaces out the USB key from the other stuff on your keychain, so it doesn't all bunch up and stick out.The USB connector is protected by a self-contained sheath, which slides easily, and sturdily locks into place when both fully retracted and fully exposed.As advertised, it's nearly uncrushable.  The case is made out of solid metal.  Only the sheath slider is plastic, and that's recessed, so it won't bear the weight of any crush.The USB key itself has a good speed when reading and writing data.The one, fatally bad, mistake that SanDisk made:U3!This piece of feculent malware infects all computers used with the USB key.  It stays around, even after the USB key has been removed.  It gets in the way of simply trying to use the USB key to hold data.  It's known to crash or lock up many computers.  It can't be formatted or deleted by normal means, as U3 appears to the computer as an additional drive letter that is strictly read-only.U3 can't be uninstalled unless fully installed in the first place, which means that it's easy to get stuck in limbo: neither fully installed, nor fully uninstalled, rendering the USB key unusable.  I wouldn't be surprised if they purposely make it difficult to uninstall.  Since U3 has the power to sneakily install software behind your back, whenever it is inserted, there's got to be a temptation for SanDisk to take some cash from a spammer or two.  Who wouldn't want the opportunity to silently install some spyware from an unsuspecting user's USB key?If you want to enjoy having a "computer on a stick", with applications and data entirely contained on the USB key, so you can always carry your favorite programs with you, you can get this right now, for free.  You don't need U3 at all.  It's at PortableApps.com -- enjoy!
didn't work for dell 700m. I bought one of these modules for my dell 700m. Installed it easily but once every few days my system crashes or I get a blue screen. I contacted kingston and they said that this module hasn't been tested on dell machines and is configured to work on generic computers only! I wouldn't recommend this memory for dell 700m users.
Acronis Disk Director 10.0. Works great for partitioning a hard drive but when it comes to adding another operating system. I've been pulling out my hair. The directions are vague and the customer service stinks. Everything is done with email and if you want to talk to someone it will cost you 29.99 for a one time occurance. Check it out at www.acronis.com . Look around before you buy. If I would have I would have never had bought this product.
If you like choppy. The quality of the recording was very bad. Little squares showed up all the time and in dramatic scene changes the whole screen was transitioning little squares, like it could just not keep up with the speed. I would defintely not buy it again.
Nice style, poor function. I love the way this product looked. It was slim and sexy. The reality was that it was a battery hog, the media pad was basically useless, there were frequent bluetooth disconnections, and I actually had to return it once because the keys stopped working (I am not a gorilla typist). I eventually gave up on it. I give it 2 stars b/c it was a nice design, but it just didn't deliver
Didn't work at all. Maybe mine was broken, but I don't think so because I could see a red light at all the cable ends. I connected the splitter to my sound card, a TB Montego DDL, with a 1' cable and then tried both a 6' and 30' cable to my stereo. No signal whatever. Both the 6' and 30' cables delivered great clean signal when plugged directly into the sound card. I even used only the 6' and 30' cables in case the 1' was bad. Still no signal.I think you need to have either a very, very, strong signal from your source to use a passive splitter like this one, or use a powered splitter.
Boo for the SC101. As a computer dork, I wanted to get a little storage device for my home network.  5 hours after I began the "10 minute" process of getting the SC101 up and running...  and all I had to show for it was a lot of frustration and no working "microSan."  If you are dead-set on getting one of these, please make sure to read the netgear support pages thoroughly first as the description on the box seems wildly different than what is actually supported by the device
Memorex (Forget it) Dysfunctional Software. Reads as Audio file (from a fresh disk.)Windows Media Pops up when disk is first inserted. Huh?Mis reads memory (states disk has 1.99 GB's without even being used yet.) What?Does not function for Backup source (Windows Me) Why Me?Does not format ...What?No matter which Memorex you use none of them work. I tried 3 versions of DVD+RWDisk played DVD R's from Verbatim but spit Memorex out like tobacco.This company never ceases to amaze me with the mistakes in their products from CD's to DVD's . You want to know the most popular brand on the shelf? Start by seeing the brand that's missing the most. If the shelf is over-stocked with Memorex, then it's pretty obvious people aren't buying them for a reason. Say your prayers, or buy a tent and camp outside of the store. Waste of money
An expensive disaster. I replaced 4 Novi units which had slowly failed over many years of use with 4 Reporters.  Attracted by the true wirless nature of the reporter, I was willing to spend the extra money over competitve brands.  Unfortunately the quality of the Reporter units is extremely poor as all four units failed after only a little ove one year of light use.  Failure modes ranged from no transmit on two units, no receive on one unit and completely dead on the fourth unit... all with new batteries and resetup per the instructions.  Don't waste your money
Not worth it. As the title, it not worth the money at all even at such a low price. The picture quality is bad, very bad. I'd rather spend this money for other web-cam
Not a quality item. This item worked for a while, but required fiddling (unplugging and replugging repeatedly) with the lighter socket each time I restarted my car.  Eventually, however, it blew out the fuses in both my lighter sockets.  Don't waste your money on this piece of crap
Sound is disappointing. I bought this product to use in my small office knowing that with the size of the speakers the sound would not be suitable for loud playing or large areas. With this in mind I have to say that I found the sound to be poor. Even with the bass turned up and the treble down it still sounded tinny and weak. I did like the fact that it accommodated my older, 1st generation iPod and had several attachments for the various versions of iPods. I bought it because it did accept my older iPod and because of the price, but I sent it back and bought the iM7 which has great sound and accepts my old iPod for a price that is not that much more
P.O.S. I know that everyone else seems to love this, so perhaps my complaint is more about Apple in general. My Ipod Mini (pink)is a lemon. The battery has never worked properly. It takes longer to charge than to discharge, and my current playing time per charge (no changing settings, not backlighting, nothing but hitting play and waiting till the battery dies) is about 2 hours. Apple will gladly sell me a new ($70) battery, but other than that tough. It is apparently my fault thet they're selling shoddy products. I'm not saying don't buy it. There aren't realistically any better choices out there than the Ipod, but buy it when you have a week to sit around and evaluate it and when they get around to opening a store near you. As for me, I think I'm going to dig out my old discman
COBY lacks integrity. The cd payer is made of what feels like a cheap plastic.The cassette adapter was broken after 10 seconds of use. So I called Coby. They said I'd have to PAY THEM to send me a replacement! My advice, don't bother buying COBY
Tuner had major problems. I bought this slick looker for the desk in my office. I had a beat up 20 yo digital clock radio that had poor sound.However its tuner worked ok and I figured with the Tivoli rep I'd get some good listening along with the good looks. My office is inside the facility without windows so reception can be tricky...the tuner for the PA speakers in the rest of the office has to have the antenna just right. I was very frustrated to find that the radio simply couldnt hold a signal. A station would tune in  nice but the fade in and out to barely hearable. I bought an amplified antenna but didnt help. Then I tried it in a windowed room and same problem......I was very disapointed
Poor usb performance. Buggy DVI switching. While it appears I finally have this switch mostly working, I have to say I'm very dissapointed in it's performance. IOGear's USB emulation for keyboard and mouse works very very poorly. With keyboard and mouse plugged into the correct keyboard/mouse usb ports I would continually have a slow/stuck keyboard along with really poor mouse behaviour. I can work around this by plugging my keyboard/mouse into the rear usb ports, thus bypassing the keyboard emulation. This works although you have to wait for all your usb devices to re-enumerate every time you switch computers.While my Mac PowerBook works fine with the DVI switch, my pc quite often has problems recognizing the DVI monitor when switching back to it. Unplugging and reconnecting the LCD's DVI connector into the switch seems to bring it back to life. No idea where the problem is, but I have a Dell 2001FP monitor, Windows XP SP2 with ATI Radeon 9800 (everything running latest drivers/firmware).How IOGear could have shipped a product this broken is beyond me. Unless they release a firmware update that fixes these problems I can only recommend people stay well away from this product
Did not fit product advertised. This did not fit my Second generation ipod as advertised and I did not get any response about returning it, and of course I had to open the thing to find out it didn't fit
Buy the Gamelink 400 instead. By purchasing this cable set, you are limiting your options.   You now must use your A/V receiver for sound whenever you play a game because you loose the analog sound connection you have with the 400 (the analog sound comes out of the same port as the video).  Spend the 10 dollars you save on an inexpensive optical cable and you now have the best of both worlds, you have the option of using the tv for sound OR the A/V receiver with the same quality video.   I will say that the video quality on my 62" HDTV improved dramatically with the addition of the component (red, green, blue) video Gamelink 400 over the composite (one video cable) connection that comes with the PS2.  However if you're the kind of person who thinks the 450 MUST be better because it's a bigger number than the 400, it probably won't matter to you anyway..
2.0 gb??? what are they talking about?. I started adding files to this card to use in my phone, but it has never shown more than 1 gb capacity even though it is printed 2.0 gb on the face. I have contacted Sandisk just earlier tonight to find out what is up with this card. So far I am more confused than pleased
didn't work. so i buy my parents this brand new Canon mini-dvd camcorder for Christmas and look for some mini-dvds on amazon for them to record on.  i figure, what the heck, they don't need RW discs, but why not go for quality ones the first time around (as opposed to mini-dvd+r).  my parents are excited about this gift and we pop in the discs to start recording, but the thing can't read the discs for some reason.  i read the back of the dvd package and it says some formatting may be required.  so i pop the disc into my computer and try to format it, but my computer can't read the discs as well.  i just bought some mini dvd-R's and my parents will be getting it soon.  i'm pretty sure the camcorder itself wasn't the problem, but if it turns out to be the case, i'll re-evaluate this product.  but for now, it's no good.
Awful Product. I picked one of these up from the Apple store and used it that day. Not only does the product not broadcast well (I had to hold it two feet from my radio, it didn't even get a signal in the car on any frequency) but it dosent stay in the dock connector. The transmitter actually will not lock into the bottom of the iPod. The transmitter also appears to turn off after 5 seconds of not touching the buttons. The LCD screen turns off so you cannot see the frequency it is transmitting on. Because it worked so poorly I couldn't tell if it was broadcasting or if it was simply broken. An indicator saying whether the transmitter was on or off would be helpful and not a huge battery drain.If you want a knockoff transmitter that works only when placed perfectly next to your radio than get this. If you want something that works consider the iTrip by Griffin
DO NOT BUY!!!!. These speakers crackle horribly!!!  I sent them back & had new ones sent to me 3 TIMES, and they were ALL like that!!!  It is a cool product, toobad they don't work!!!
2 Way Radio NOT up to 17 mile range. We bought these units specifically to take on a cruise ship.  There was not one minute on any of the many channels that we did not experience interference, pick up other 2-way users, or had no signal at all.  We were so dissatisfied that we returned them to Amazon for refund
Bad Reviews But I Bought It Anyway. I read all the review I could find on this product and most were bad.  A few recent ones were better.  The first problem I encountered was the power on button did not function correctly.  I had to press, press harder, shake the device, and finally turn it upside down while pressing to power it on.  I was never able to power it down with the on/off button.  The wireless AP worked fine but it would not function with an ethernet cable.  I thought it was me (though I've unboxed and setup 25+ wireless, wire only, routers, swithes, etc. without problems.  After several hours of trying different approaches I looked at documentation, knowledge base articles and found one that indicated if the device power light blinked continuously the device was defective.  That was the end of it and I returned it for credit.   I do not recommend this device to anyone.T. Ragan - Cypress, T
Not the Best MP3 Player in the World. I went to Circuit City with my dad to buy this MP3 player after my older sister recieved one for Christmas. When I was researching the quality of this product, some of the reviews were not pleasing, but I'm sorry to say I actually went out and bought it. And I'm also sorry to say this review will not be very pleasing either. The exterior casing of the Creative Zen Nano Plus is merely cheap plastic -- flimsy and pathetic next to the iPod nano 2nd Generation's aluminum casing. Scratch marks and scuff marks show up easily and I'm guessing that the curved part that comes off to allow you to change the battery would also break easily if stepped on, etc. The positively worst part of this MP3 player are the earbuds, which fall out if you barely touch the wiring. In order to keep the earbuds in place I have to stick them into my ears at an odd angle which makes even Sound Level 1 too loud to hear someone speak in an "indoor voice". Sadly, there's more: the backlight doesn't stay on long enough to allow you light to see which song is playing, how long it's been playing, etc. There is a "backlight" section in the "Settings", but the longest it can stay illuminated is only 15 seconds. Also, when skipping tracks, you use the same button to scan within a song, making it much harder to scan within the song than skip tracks. Another disappointment is that two of the CDs I tried to load onto this MP3 player weren't read as "being there", although they work fine when I listen to them on my WalkMan, DVD player, computer, etc. Luckily, I've had this player for about nine months, but it's still going strong, most likely because of the fact that it runs on a single AAA battery. This does get most annoying after awhile though, having to change batteries every two to three weeks, or whatever, depending on how often you listen to this. From the reviews on  this site, I'm most likely going to purchase an iPod nano 2 GB for my next Christmas. So although it's around $90 more, I'm hoping it'll be worth the extra money to have an MP3 player I'm not complaining about all the time
Noise maker. One month in the wall and sounds like a expresso machine. My car's engine sounds better. Don't waste your money. I called Sharp and they say is the fan. Great, maybe I should remove it and use ice cubes
Adapter, but no cable. Note that this product includes only the AC adapter but no additonal cabling to attach to the Zune.  So if you were thinking about having one cable to hook to your PC and another to charge if you are away from you PC, remember to take the Zune cable with you. For $29.95 I expected them to include the 25 cent cable
not worth the money. It made little notable difference or improvement.I would not recommend this product for small scratches and it only makes minor improvements to anything more serious.
These tape cassettes get eaten by the labeller. I have had so many of these cassettes get eaten by the labelmaker that I will not use this machine or these cassettes anymore.  Once the machine starts to eat the tape, there is no repair; the whole cassette is ruined.  I have had new tapes get ruined practically right away.  I am through with Brother labelling products.  This is the second Brother labelmaker that I have had that has done this.  These cassettes are so expensive, and then so many get ruined
TV OK, SERVICE FROM AMAZON BUYER BEWARE!!!!!!. Buyer be ware if you have a problem with delivery or the TV you will be left on your own to sort it out. Amazon may or may not be a big trust worthy company, but they will still leave it to you to sort out there is no personal customer service other then email (run around)!! Bare that in mind before making any large purchase, may be better to pay a little more through a company with a store front at least you will have someone to complain to face to face or take the item back
Don't waste your money!. We purchased this shredder a few months ago for use around the house. With all those unsolicited credit card offers you can never be too careful about protecting yourself from identity theft. At first it worked like a charm, but then it suddenly started to jam up for no reason. We take good care of our electronic stuff so we were very surprised when the shredder stodecided to stop working. Then last week I added 2 sheets of paper and the shredder broke. Useless!!!
Destroyed my CD--I wanna give this product  minus 5 stars. Before the repair process there was one bad track on my CD.  After the "repair" process the entire disk was unplayable.  Took it back for a refund. With billions of CDs in the world, is this the best that the 21st century has to offer?
The APC damaged equipment warrantee is worthless..... I don't own this specific APC product, but I do own other APC products.My home was hit by lightning on July 2, 2004 during a severe lightning storm. Both of my garage door openers were destroyed during the strike and they were on separate NET3 power line surge protectors made by APC.NET3 surge protectors offer the best ($50,000) damaged equipment warranty that APC offers. APC refuses to pay for replacement garage door openers since in their determination, the surge protectors are functioning properly (I had to send the surge protectors at my expense for analysis at their labs).I will never contend that a surge protector can protect any device from a direct lightning strike, but the APC warranty contends that they will replace your equipment in the event this unfortunate event occurs.I now do not recommend APC equipment, since their warranty is worthless
RIP-OFF: Doesn't advertise that you need an AC adaptor. I would like to believe that this hub works well- but I wouldn't know.  I bought it to reduce clutter on my desk from all my devices hooking into my powermac.  I hooked up my printer, ipod and digital camera and nothing happened.  I called Targus and they said I needed an a/c adaptor.  It doesn't come with one and doesn't say anything about one in the manual or instructions, or their website.  They said I could get it at radio shack and gave me the info (5 volt, 2.1 amp, center positive).  I've been to two radio shacks and online- they don't carry it.  I'm upset.  Any advice
This is junk and it doesn't last 9 months. I got this for Christmas last year.  I hardly use the thing and when I have I have been very careful in placing the ipod on and off of it. I can no longer play an ipod on it as there is no sound or too much static - apparently a short of some sort.  I was shocked as it had been used maybe 10 times by my wife and I.  Read all of the reviews I am not the only one who now has an overpriced doorstop.  Save your money and buy something else.Take your time and read through the "cotton candy" 4-5* reviews which bump this up to an artificially high rating of 3* and you will see one consistent pattern, the connection to the ipod is very poor, the alarm doesn't function, and they feel it is overpriced
Out of service for 2 months. I bought this Samsung model in September because of the superior picture and excellent glare reduction.  It went black the day before the Super Bowl.  It is now NCAA playoffs and it has not been repaired or replaced. The service technician has tried 3 times to repair, now having replaced every component.  I am finally on a replacement list with no ETA.  The Samsung Customer Service reps have been unhelpful and unconcerned.  The repair technician is the only person who has apologised and tried to push Samsung - with no success
Short and broken. The retractable mechanism works well and the cable is compact, but this cable is pretty much useless as a travel CAT5 cable.First of all it's too short. In about half of the hotels where I needed to use it, the network jack was at least a couple of feet further away than the reach of this cable.Second (and more importantly) it's not robust enough. After a year or so of light use a wire inside got broken somehow, and today I had to go in search of a regular CAT5 cable. On the outside there seems to be no damage to the wire.In short, it's one of those purchases that I regret enough to write a negative review.
Disappointed. This cartridge does NOT fit my HP 648c as advertised. The color cartridge that accompanied it did, however
There are better KVM solutions. Besides the fact you have to buy the cables separately as others have mentioned, Belkin support is horrible. The automated system consistenly disconnects the call, requiring going through their operator. My 4-port KVM stopped functioning after six months. There's no information on the web to help either. It's as if there IS no way to fix a KVM that doesn't work. Flash upgrading is a joke. I followed the procedure directly from Belkin's website. So I had to RMA replace it. Trust me, Belkin doesn't care about its customers and arrogance will be their downfall. Go with IOGEAR - they include all the cables with the KVM switch for the price of Belkin's without cables
Died after one year- fuser problem. Machine started making loud grinding noises when started or while printing. Showed it to a repair shop, says the fuser is a toast. Replacement cost part and labor $300. Died just after one year so have to bear the expense. Poor design/quality. Beware, i searched the web and looks like i am not the only one with this problem
Disappointed, but keeping it. I am a bit disappointed with this DVD player.  I had a Pioneer DV-C505 standard DVD player (not progressive). I recently purchased a 42" LCD and wanted a player that was progressive and upscaling to 1080i.I connected my old Pioneer (non-progressive) player and watched movies the 1st weekend. DVD's DVD-R's etc.  I was surprised that the newer DVD's in 16:9 looked pretty good.I expected to see an improvement in color or resolution with the Sony DVP-NC85H.  However, I can't see any difference whatsoever in quality of image as displayed on my 42" LCD.I ran the old DVD player with very cheap component cables straight to the LCD TV. I ran the new Sony DVP-NC85H straight to the LCD TV with HDMI. I got the blue HDMI working light and sound and image are transferred to the screen/LCD TV, but the quality is no better than my old Pioneer (non-progressive) player.  Did I do something wrong?  I can't see any color or resolution improvement.I may return this since it also introduced an 'echo' issue that is acknowledged in the Sony manual. The echo issue is between the HDMI sound transferred to the TV and the digital coax sound delivered via my receiver. With the old DVD player, no echo and excellent 5.1 sound from the TV and my receiver (simultaneous). The Sony manual states clearly that if you output via the HDMI, you cannot tune out any echo created by optical or coax digital DTS or Dolby Digital output.  The manual says to output the signal via PCM. However, that still introduces echo that cannot be removed.Maybe I am doing something wrong, but this player is definitely not an improvement over a standard, non-progressive player in my opinion.I thought maybe it was just the new LCD TV, but it displays excellent HD quality via HDMI input from my local cable companies digital tuner/DVR box.What are you guys comparing the supposed good quality on this player to?Update:I went back and tried comparing my old DVD player with this new Sony even more. I was able to change some of the settings in just the right combination on the Sony that improved the image. For the YCaCr/RGB setting, I tried RGB instead which got rid of lots of the red blocky imagery. I set the sharpness to 1 and the BNR on.  These 3 settings improved the image to the level where I will not return this DVD player.I still challenge someone from Sony to look at the image from my non-progressive DVD player (480i) and tell me how the 1080i (upscale) out of this unit is significantly better. Even looking at it 6" from the screen. Honestly, I could pick out the pores on James Bonds face with the non-progressive 480i player, so maybe it is just really good, and the Sony just doesn't shine as much due to that.The echo is better or worse depending on the DVD played. I have been asking friends with HD setups and they commented that echo is a problem with a lot of setups. TV sound is not usually used even as a center, I guess.Reading the comments here helped me a lot.  Especially comments regarding the feedback on the TV for what grade of signal the TV is seeing. Mine display reports 1080i with the Sony connected, 480i with my old DVD player connected, as expected. I hadn't realized I could pull that up.I would give the Sony a 4 for features(Divx playback, SACD, etc)and a 3 for picture output for an average of 3.5, but the 1-5 scale entry above is frozen now in edit mode.Also, I had reservations about non-shuffle, disk-to-disk abilities on this DVD player.  You can shuffle on one DVD/CD, but not between 1-5. I plan on working around that by playing MP3 disks for parties, Xmas, etc where I need the shuffle capability.  Incidentally, I like loading my DVD player up with multiple DVD's for an evenings viewing, or just leave some favorites in. Some movies are 2 disk and I have not tested that it'll shuffle to the next disk when the 1st runs out, but I expect it
Not for everyone. Must have firewire AC wall charger and/or six-pin firewire on computer to charge this unit.  I have neither.Also found 30g vidpod didn't fit properly in plastic sleeves and the dock connector seemed to want to unseat it as well.Returned unit to shop and purchased Belkin 4 x AA battery unit with suction cups.  Much better.  You can use rechargeable batteries or simply buy them when needed
Decks don't like it. I've tried this tape on three different makes of VHS decks, and they all reject it.  Check your manual about cleaning before purchasing a cleaning tape
Far too overpriced for this length!! You shouldn't spend more than $10. Much like the previous reviewer I urge you not to spend lots of money on HDMI cables. HDMI specs state that only one pixel out of every billion can be lost, therefore there is no reason, no matter what the cable is made of, to spend money on HDMI cables.Search the internet, you can find plenty of good 10ft HDMI cables for $10 or less.Digital is zeroes and ones. In HDMI's case, either the cable is connected or it isn't
Battery life isn't all that. The old phone I had was heavy, and the battery life was horrible. You have to put this phone on the charger every night or you won't have a phone in the morning even if you don't use it that much. I thought for the price that it would be the best phone in the world. To my suprise the only great thing is that it's not heavy
Simply does not work. I purchased this card, installed it on a Jetway VT266 motherboard with Windows XP installed. This ruined my installation of Windows XP, and I had to reformat my drive. I thought it was simply because I had a cheap motherboard, so I tried it in my Dell - same thing. I have always purchased Beklin products in the past, but will not go near anything Beklin now. If you buy this card, it's a lucky dip as to whether or not it will work on your system. Please - buyer beware
Satisfactory but too slow. This DVR works ok.  But when it is recording, forget about changing channels.  It is really really slow and takes like forever to even receive any remote clicks.Broadband feature is nice; but USB doesn't come cheap. Its like [...].
I wish we could give zero stars... I hooked this thing up to my dell 1705 laptop tonight so I could use my nice old keyboard on it.  It never worked.  Went to amazon and read the comments - seems alot of people have had the same problem.  Aparently laptops are not the "normal" pc's that you might make from scratch and have "custom" stuff in them from Dell, Compaq, HP, Gateway, Apple, IBM, Lenovo, among others...It DOES NOT WORK - DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY - TELL AMAZON TO DITCH THIS.
Piece of junk. Made very cheaply. The slider won't even hold the batteries in with a good enough contact to charge the batteries once. I tried every available slot and they all give a poor contact.Avoid this charger at all costs
Extremely disappointed. This is all looks and no sound quality at all. Bass is terrible. I wouldn't waste my money on this again.  I listen to hard rock mostly and the bass just sounds muddy and distorted. I have connected it to my Ipod and stereo and the results are similar. Don't waste your money on this. I did like the bag that came with it though. I guess you get what you pay for
Blue Nav Program is a Rip Off. I own a Magellan Meridian Marine unit. Just found out that you can only get 1 access code per program. I purchased 2 64 meg cards in hopes of downloading more than 1 map per card. Not only can I not down load more than 1 map, I cannot get an access code for additional cards. Lost money all the way around.Magellan offered me the opportunity to buy the Blue Nav XL charts at $179.00, but low and behold, they come with the same defect of 1 unlock code per program.I was a believer in Magellan, but switching to Garmin today!David
Fuji CD-R/FVD Slim Jewel Cas. Product arrived damaged.  Company (ANTOnline)was unwilling to exchange for new item.  Would never buy from them again
Nice, small, but EXTREMELY fragile. I own the 2GB version of this drive. It is tiny, but still fits nicely into a USB port, but I have noticed a serious problem. The flash stick itself is actually smaller than the casing it is in (you can see it on the bottom). I have been very careful with how I store my super stick and careful in inserting and removing it from USB ports. Regardless, the plastic shell around the memory stick is breaking across the width at the top, and the bottom corners of the plastic shell (that go into a USB port) have started snapping off in little chunks
Amazon Needs Packing Lessons. What can you say about CD cases? These would be adequate....if they hadn't arrived damaged. Whoever does the packing for Amazon should learn that a single sheet of brown paper will NOT prevent shipping damage. A little bubble wrap may be more expensive, but it would have prevented my returning this order for a refund
I bought 3 for kids presents and have had to return 2!. Two of the three have already broken, and my kids don't play rough with them.  I returned one and am waiting for it to be returned, and now need to return another for another problem and I can't even reach them.  The one time I got through to their customer service I was on hold for 20 minutes
Disappointing. I just received it today, and will be returning it tomorrow.  Here's what I found:1) On my unit, switching channels, pausing a program, or switching unputs caused my TV to lose the HDMI signal for 2-3 seconds.  When the original source was digital or component video, the screen would just be black during this time, but on analog inputs the screen would go bright green, then flash between green & the analog data for a second before finally becoming stable.  Given that we often channel surf using our VCR, this was unacceptable.2) For some reason it messes up the HDMI signal coming in from my Comcast DVR.  When I run the HDMI cable directly from the DVR to my TV, I am able to permanently set my TV to 16:9 aspect ratio when using the HDMI input, and all programs come out looking OK- the TV will put black bars on the side of 4:3 aspect ratio programs on non-HD channels.  However, running the HDMI signal through the receiver meant that ALL shows were displayed in widescreen- the TV was no longer able to figure out which shows should be in 4:3 and which should be in 16:9.3) As others have mentioned, you can only use Zone 2 speakers with analog inputs, which on my system means you can't listen to CD's, since I use a digital input.  And the Zone 2 controls are really difficult to use.
What a piece of junk!. I was tempted by the low price of this item. The only reviewer before me gave it a 5-star rating. Although aware of the unreliability of a single review, I decided to gave it a shot, and paid $10 for shipping--no other way since it's sold through a third party. $28 later, I was holding the biggest $#!* I've seen in a while! The construction feels very cheap, and the instruction manual makes absolutely no sense as if written by a 3-year old. And the worst of all, only one of the two microphones worked. Even the one that works is horrible--the sound out of the speaker is very weak unless you cup your hand around your mouth and the mic. It uses a 9-volt battery in each of the two mics, and that's another 5 bucks out of my pocket. You know what?  I'll probably have to eat the $33, since the seller does not refund any shipping charges and charges a hefty fee for returns. Well, I learned a lesson...things are cheap for a reason
Do Not Stay In Your Ears. When these headphones sit properly in your ears (they need to be pressed into the ear), they sound awesome.  My problem is I can't get them to stay where I put them.  I have tried all the cups provided, but I commute on a bus and any small bump will shift the earphones resulting in inferior sound.  I would not recommend them for this reason.  The comfort factor is also a consideration.  You really need to get used to having an object pressed into your ear
do not buy this brand. Sent item back to the company and got a rejected mail saying, "COMPANY OUT OF BUSINESS, RETURN TO SENDER". The company address on the label is:Recoton Accessories, Inc.2950 Lake Emma RoadLake Mary, FL 32746.Made in Chin
Horrible Customer Service. "The service from this vendor is horrible. My account was charged in May of this year and as of 6/26/06 have not received anything. First they said they need to make a model change. I was fine with the model change but never got the product. I sent many...notes to Nicholas Nasti but he has been unable to fix the problem. Recently I have been unable to contact them with notes or telephone.
Arrived in Pieces. They would be very wonderful jewel cases except they must be very flimsy because more than half of them arrived broken
Great product! For two days!. When this adapter first arrived, I thought it was great. The sound quality was excellent, and free of all the distortion and interference I get from using an FM transmitter-style adapter (there are few open frequencies in the SF Bay Area). The first day, I used it for about 20 minutes total (didn't have far to drive), and it worked great. The second day I had a bit farther to drive. After about 30 minutes, it quit. Hasn't worked again since.I didn't expect it to last forever, but less than an hour?Yes, it has a 1 year warranty: just send the unit back with a money order ($6) to cover the return postage. Of course, then you're spending more in postage than you originally spent for the unit..
Good for carrying iPod if you don't plan to use it. It probably would hold the iPod pretty well, but I returned it before giving it a fair trial in that aspect. For the price -- you don't get a whole lot of protection. There's nothing to secure the top, and the iPod has to be completely removed from the carrying case in order to use the click wheel and view the screen
Does not work. Sony Disc player does not work. It won't recognize disc in player.Currently trying to get it serviced under warranty
Lasted less than a year... Then simply stopped working.  After some additional research LaCie has a reputation for unreliable drives (which I knew ahead of time having bought LaCie drive years ago and then stopped).  Typical failure rates of 40+% in under a year.  Buy drives from anybody else.  Fortunately all I kept on this disk were system backups and I can simply start using another disk
Company Sucks!. II bought one of these devices so I could record guitar through my computer. I set it up according to the instructions but get no sound out. The LED on the device and the VU's on the software interface say it's working but it will not output to the sound card. So I wrote M-Audio and asked for their help.Their answer was that since I was operating XP Media Center Edition operating system, it will not support two sound devices and they could not help me. Unless I get another version of XP, they could not help me at all. They basically told me to bug off because I'm using XP MCE. Nowhere on the box does it say that it is not compatible with XP MCE. In fact, it just says the minimum requirement is XP with service pack 2, period. To me that is false advertising.I tried to take it back where I bought it but they would not take it because it has software and I (of course) opened and installed it! So then, I was stuck with a useless box. I finally did get it to work, sort of. I took the line output from the box and plugged it into the line input of my sound card. However, it has no fidelity, sounds terrible, and the sound effects software that came with the box will not work.One other note. When I tried to take it back to the music store and told them I was using XP Media Center Edition, the guy laughed and waved his arm at the wall of sound devices and said that none of them will work with XP Media Center Edition! He says it is really a licensing issue with Microsoft. Then I found out you cannot upgrade MCE to XP Professional! Thanks to Microsoft, I would have to wipe out my hard drive and do a clean install if I want to put XP Pro on my system! This just keeps getting better and better!
irritating. I have a Mac.I need an external hard drive where I can just drag my files on to the hard drive's icon, eject the icon, and be on my merry way.This hard drive seems unable to do that, or, if it is, the help section is painfully bare.Even if you're looking for a hard drive where you can set it up to automatically back up certain files with the touch of a button, I wouldn't recommend this hard drive to Mac users. I happen to dislike the way PCs are set up; I find the organization very anti-intutive, and that's a big part of my issue with this hard drive.On my way out the door to return it right no
Windows, step down. This OS is worse. More bugs than a jungle. I am incredibly upset with my purchase of the Archos 604. Out of the box, this pseudo-entertainment center rocked and did everything it was supposed to, but about a month into the purchase loomed a very ugly problem. Cut to the chase, this product is horrible. If it's not suffering from one malfunction it will invent another. I've had so many "corrupt files" that I might blow my brains out. For whatever reason, this device likes to shut down in the middle of transferring to and from the computer, making it impossible to get a whole song on, much less a whole album.Ah, but it gets worse. You only think it's working when all of a sudden it just freezes! Why? I have no clue! It takes forever to load all my songs because it uses a hard drive, it takes forever to find a song because the hard drive slows down when you try to file through 3000 songs, and it takes forever to get used to the HORRIBLE buttons on the side. Half the time I press the wrong button and then my song ends and I can't get the hard drive to load it back up! It drives me absolutely crazy!Besides the horrible layout of the buttons, the speaker is next to worthless; if you crank up the volume all the way the speaker fizzles and gives you a horrible mess of a noise.The only good thing is that the clarity of the screen is fantastic. It makes my images look crystal clear and my HD videos look as good as my HDTV. That is, if you can get the confounded thing to actually play my videos. Maybe I got a dud and I haven't tried contacting Archos, but I will asap. I thought I should let everyone know to stay away from this product as I know there are many others out there just like it. I even bought the DVR station (which is cool and would be perfect if the actual Archos would work) but I cannot say I'm pleased in any way with my purchase. I just hope I get some refund for this
DO NOT BUY!!. This is the worst networking product ever! Constantly crashed and VPN does not work. How could they get away with selling this POS
Apple IR Remote for iPod Video (5th Gen). The deficiencies of this Remote with the new iPod Video (5th Gen) are serious. In order to use this Remote you must have or purchase the Universal Dock for an additional $40. Not only is its capability seriously flawed (e.g.  the Menu button is non-functional with the iPod; you can only adjust volume, go forward, go back, pause and resume play). When using it for slideshows and videos, you must do all of the pre-show set-ups first (using the Photo Settings or Video Settings menus, directly on the iPod and even start the slideshow or video. THEN and only THEN, can you assume limited control with the Remote. BUT, if you inadvertently push the Remote's Play/Pause button at the beginning of the show, the iPod will revert to the music playlist function and you will have your slideshow playing, not with the music you selected in the set-up, but with the music from the Music menu playlist last selected. The only recourse is to go to the iPod and reprogram the Photo or Video Settings and restart the show from the beginning. Once the last picture is seen, you must then go back to the iPod to STOP the show (otherwise the music will continue to play and the show will loop and restart). Not only is this a poor purchase choice, at any price, it is the only solution because the ultimate problem lies with the iPod software which can provide no additional functions no matter what brand of Remote you buy. This is a problem that only Apple can fix
Usually like Panasonic... but not this one. Bought this phone a few months ago to replace old cordless Panasonic 2.4 GHz that died.  This is probably the worst phone I've ever owned.Several reasons:1)  The range is WORSE than the 2.4 GHz I had!  I used to be able to get great reception in every room of my large one-level home and in my big yard.  Now I can only venture about 3/4 of the distance I could before... and then the connection starts to break up.  And I've given up taking it outside.2)  The "voice enhancer" is useless.  It doesn't work.  The sound is worse than just leaving it in normal mode.3)  Love the speaker-phone feature in the handset, but it doesn't work when you have it sitting in the recharger/base.  (Dumb!)  It'd be nice when the battery gets really low to be able to use the speaker phone while it charges.  But nope... if you run out of charge, the phone is useless until it recharges again.4)  I still can't figure out the phone's weird caller-ID inconsistency.  Sometimes it doesn't register incoming calls at all... and worse, it doesn't register all missed calls so I can contact people who may not have left a message.  And instead of listing each ID in the order it came in, especially duplicate callers, it'll just put a check mark by a recently called entry... so you know that person called more than once, but you don't know when.  Yeah, if people leave messages every time they call, this wouldn't be a problem... but you know they don't.I'm usually not hard to please, but I'm looking now to replace this phone that is fairly new.
cheap paper. The manufacturer added little "tabs" because these labels are so thin that they tear when you try to remove them from the backing.  The tabs don't help much and they don't tear cleanly from the label.  A solution to a problem that creates yet another problem.  The best solution would be to purchase another brand.
SanDisk SDDR-103 MobileMate - good luck. The reader didn't read my 2G MiniSD. I have another reader that does so I dumped the MobileMate and took the lost
Not what it's cracked up to be. I bought this so I could print wireless from my laptop, it didn't work. I called Hp tech support and after 45 min they couldn't get it to work either and explained I would only be able to print not use bidirectional scanning from the printer to scanner and suggested I return it. I bought it through amazon but it was shipped from Tech Depot an affiliated company of Office Depot and they said since I opened it that I could not return it. How was I supposed to know it wouldn't work without opening, I won't shop from office depot or Tech depot again
Don't Buy if near US/Canada Border. This GPS comes with US map on the SD card and Canada map on the included CD but never the twain shall meet.By car I'm a few hours from Canada and several days from the eastern US but I can't swap out the faraway eastern US part of the map on the TomTom Go 300 for a nearby Canadian map.  It's either all Canada or all contiguous US.  This is a major functional flaw if you live near the US/Canada border or live further away and like to take cross-border trips.Oh, and if you do decide to swap out the US map, be sure to save it on your computer first - TomTom doesn't bother to provide a backup on the CD so if you don't first make your own backup before changing to the Canadian map you can't later get the US map back
BOSE 3-2-1 GS System. This is a great system. The sounds is amazing, the setup is easy and the configuration of the system with it's 2 small but powerful speakers is fantastic. I own a number of BOSE products and needless to say that this piece of equipment very much lived up to my expectations of a BOSE system - for the first 8 weeks!After 8 weeks of blissful enjoyment, the honeymoon was over! First, one of the speakers stopped working. BOSE asked us to return the speaker for replacement - which we did - leaving us with only 1 working speaker for 3 weeks.Following this replacement, another 3 months passed before the second original speaker followed the same fate as the 1st! Again, we were asked to return the faulty speaker for replacement. 4 weeks passed and the replacement speaker arrived - unfornately it was the wrong make and model! BOSE were somewhat apologetic and sent us the correct speaker 2 weeks later.A further 4 months of enjoyment followed before the base unit started to falfunction. BOSE suggested fixing our faulty unit, but after a protracted phone argument, they agreed to replace the entire system at my request! I was asked to pay for the $60 return postage to BOSE for the faulty system and again, another 4 week wait followed awaiting the replacement.The upshot of all of the above is that I have been able to enjoy my system in full working order for 7 months since purchase 10 months ago, I have had to make 3 factory returns for replacement & exchange and the whole ordeal has cost me $60! Genuinely superb customer service.At this point it is worth pointing out that not a single person from BOSE has ever been sympathic with my plight and I have been offered no compensation for my trouble - and why should they - I am a but one small customer whereas they are a huge multinational corporation!?!Having just received my replacement system I am understandably keeping my fingers crossed this time although my confidence levels with the product are at an all time low.Buy at your peril - you have been warned
Nice features but very unreliable. I bought this phone for the great features and because I've had good luck with other Motorola products. The phones and answering machine are easy to set up but that is about the only redeeming quality that they have. The handsets frequently lose connection with the base unit. The only way to get them working again is to unplug and then replug the power to the base unit which loses the answering machine settings. Range on the handsets is only mediocre, I can't talk in the far corners of the house even with the base centrally located. Also, battery life is very limited. Overall the phones are very disappointing and I would definitely recommend not buying them.
Doesn't include everything... This is just a mounting kit...  It needs a 3rd party "cell phone" mount to actually attach to your motorcycle.  Very disappointed that I have to order something *else* in addition to this "kit"After getting a RAM mount (from somewhere else, I don't think Amazon sells them), this did mount easily and quickly to my bike, just be aware, that you need a RAM mount in addition to this kit, which is really just a connection from a RAM mount to the garmin devic
disappointing. Bought the DRX-830U to replace an internal LG burner that gave out after about 6 months of fairly regular use.  Have previously had an IOMagic internal that gave out after about 5 months and a Sony 500-series external that still works fine after over 3 years, albeit at 4x max w/no DL capability.  I chose the new Sony because of the longevity of older one vs my other models, plus I only paid $70 for it at a major electronics store (on sale).Installation went fine.  Plugged in the cables, turned it on and Win XP automatically loaded software for it.  After a required restart I burned by 1st DVD (Sony 16x -R single-layer disk) using Nero Express and was disappointed at the 10+ minute burn time.  Took over 3 minutes for the unit to spin up and down over and over before actually starting to write.  Also noticed that the unit was considerably louder than my previous 3 burners.Went to Sony support site, downloaded latest firmware update (SS22) and installed it (unit came with SS20).  Install went fine, just be warned that it automatically initiates a Windows shutdown upon completion.  No option to delay it.Burned the same data to new disk and was surprised to find that, even though write process started much more quickly, total burn time increased to over 12 minutes.  I immediately tried burning same data one more time.  The burn failed after about 4 minutes with just a 'write error' showing up in the log.  When I ejected the disk, it was very warm to the touch and I caught a faint whiff of burning silicon(!).  I waited a while before trying again, burned the same data one more time, and everything went fine with a burn time of just over 8 minutes.  Immediately went to burn another disk of new data and had another failure after about 4 minutes.  Disk was again very warm.  Tried again immediately afterwards - same result.Upgraded Nero to latest versions, just to be safe.  First burn went ok, a little over 9 minutes, next burn immediately afterwards failed.  Faint smell of burning silicon again.Since then I've burned several disks successfully, but burn times have ranged from 8 to over 15 minutes.  I now always wait at least 30 minutes bt burns to let the unit cool off.Overall, the excessive heat and noise, along with the varied burn times, leaves me disappointed with this unit.Maybe I just got a lemon
Got screwed!!!. This is clearly labeled a "half height" product. I bought it for a gift and was embarassed when it turned out to be a full height burner
It's a No Show for 30 days. Well, I can't give an honest review of this product because I haven't yet received it.  I ordered it on June 15, and it was promised, by Amazon direct, not another seller via Amazon, between June 21 and June 23.  So I'm sitting here on July 15 with no TV.......It really isn't Amazon's fault, it's the shipper, Eagle.  But whatever, I'm less than satisfied with this Amazon.com transaction.  I have seen the TV in stores and it looks good though..................
Piece of Garbage. I'm very surprise as to how poorly this prodcut was made.  Picture quality is horrible, especially when it's an upconvert player to 1080.  When I switch the 480 to 1080, almost no difference.  The response time is unreal, I can finish dinner before the tray opens.  The recording feature is horrible, sometime it accepts disc, but most of the time it has the bad error.  Waste of mone
Teleporting and dissapearing mouse curser... Well, I read the reviews for this mouse, and since it had mostly 5 star raitings, I decided to buy it.I just recieved it today and already it has given me problems. The mouse curser, either clicked on something or while being moved, moves on it's own around the screen and sometimes dissapears.I'm most likely going to return it
Sent me the wrong cable!! Don't buy from this company!!. I was not sent a firewire cable as was advertised.  They sent me a useless USB cable.  When I contacted the seller, they did not send me the proper cable.  Don't buy from this terrible company!
it doesn't work. I bought an ipod nano gen 2 microblaster for my 13-year-old daughter's Christmas present.  When it came, it didn't work.  I sent it back and they replaced it.  The new one worked for 3-1/2 weeks, and then it would no longer work on batteries.  I talked to JLab about it, and they seemed skeptical...I don't know why.  After another week, the thing wouldn't work when plugged into the wall.  Basically, this speaker just doesn't work.I read the other reviews before I bought this product--maybe the gen 1 speakers were better.  But don't waste your money on the gen 2.
Really bad idea. I just lost my synch adapter and it is on back order everywhere.  Unfortunately this is necessary to connect to computer and to charge the player.  Earliest date I can find one is 10/23 due to some shipping problem with creative labs.  I'm at a loss now that the battery is dead.  This is the dumbest idea ever.  Why didn't they design the player so that the cords attached directly to the player?  I agree that you should order a back-up as this thing is so easy to lose and so important
Found A Way To Fix This Phone!. I read most of the reviews of this phone and agree with them.  I would never buy another GE phone.  In fact, I am waiting for my new Uniden cordless phone to arrive from Amazon.  In the meantime, I tried this experiment yesterday.  I took the battery out of the phone, then sprayed the keys and talk button in front with 409 Orange Power.  I really doused it good.  After that, I blasted the phone with steaming hot water, so much so that the screen fogged up.Now, after that I shook the excess water out and duct taped the phone to a fan, with the buttons facing the fan.  Today I hooked the battery back up, put everything back together and tried it.  It worked fine even without a charge.  I didn't have to keep pressing the same number 3 times to get it to register.  It worked similar to when it was new.I've done this with stereo receivers by taking the cover off, putting them in the bathtub, squirting them with a spray cleaner and blasting them with a hot shower.  Then I put them in between two fans for THREE days.  After that, they work fine.  I'm sure I'm not the first person to do this.  Just make sure you don't have the unit plugged in when you do this or you'll get shocking results.  Try it!  What have you got to lose?
Nice phone, but battery died. Nice basic phone. I've used it happily for two years, until the battery died. What's the deal with the batteries on new cordless phones? My 5.8Ghz Toshiba wonder died after less than 2 years, while my trusty AT&T from mid-90s keeps on ticking
These sound terrible. Bottom of the list in independent tests. Consumer Reports placed these at the bottom of the list of one of their recent center channel speaker comparisons, and I COULD NOT AGREE MORE. Lower costing speakers performed far better. In some calculated tests of my own, I found these had far less range and "presence" than other major brand speakers. I have a Yamaha NS-C444 speaker that provides full, lifelike sound, and handles plenty of power.This Bose center channel speaker was a major disappointment, and far from representative of their generally outstanding audio components.
wrong product sent. I did not receive the correct product that I ordered.  I informed the seller and he stated that I would need to resell on ebay myself.  Very disappointed with his service.kell
If you have wireless internet do NOT get this phone!. I guess I'm one of the few people who didn't already know this, but if you use wireless internet and other wireless connections (wireless keyboard, wireless mouse, wireless printer, etc.) you CANNOT use 5.8 GHz phones without having horrible interference on the phone. In fact, even 2.4 GHz phones get "some" static/signal loss around wireless internet connections.Apparently, after calling Uniden customer support I found out that if you want to use a wireless phone around a wireless internet connection you MUST use a "less advanced" 900 MHz phone.I returned this phone and bought a 900 MHz phone that works perfect. Sad that a more advanced, more expensive phone is WORSE than a cheaper, less advanced cordless phone.If you don't have wireless internet (and none of your neighbors have wireless internet) then I'm sure this phone is fine
Purchase something else. The first one I received was defective.  That can happen with anything manufactured.  The replacement(very fast, Thanks Amazon) was not a problem getting it to work, keeping it working was a problem.  Camera would just quit working for no reason - black screen.  Let it set for some time (cool) and it would come back on.  Unit did get very warm, but not to the point it would cause a fire.  Zoom and focus was OK, along with moving the camera.  Forget about wireless!  After hours of attempts, even with a person that works in that field, we could not get it to work unless it was hard wired.  No support from company.  Some have stated it needed a firmware upgrade.  That may be the cause of most of the problems.  Something that cost as much as that camera should do a much better job.I did what I thought was the best action to take, return for refund.  Best thing to do is look at other cameras
Worked great for a couple of days.... I was so excited about how great this product worked when I got it.  I had purchased the FM transmitter for my wife and they do not work so great so I thought since my car had a tape deck I would give this a try.  I was excited that I had all my ipod music with me, BUT after less than a week it the sound  started going down hill to a point where I couldn't listen anymore with it.  It is now in a landfill somewhere.  My guess is I will need a radio in the car that is ipod compatiable cable.  For now just have the radio and CDs I burn
Sony DVD+R 16X are junk!!!. Recently bought a spindle of a 50 pack of Sony DVD+R and all had errors.  I noticed other reviewers are using DVD Identifier to see the real manufacture of black disks.  I downloaded DVD Identifier and scanned a Sony DVD+R 16x and what came up was (Sony Recording Media Co.)  These blank disks are terrible, all the disks had errors and half way through the burn process would produce errors, stay away from these blank disks.  I recommend Fuji disks whick scanned through DVD Identifier is (Taiyo Yuden Co. Ltd.) and burn excellent and Verbatim disks whick scanned through DVD Identifier is (Mitsubishi Chemical Corp.) and these too burn excellently.  Hope all this helps
Low quality, low cost cable. This is a cheap cable in both cost and quality. When connected between my Voodoo3 3000 card and my Mag Innovision DX17F monitor, the picture quality was poor, with severe &quot;ghosting&quot; of the screen.  This cable does not have the cylinders on each end as most monitor cables do.  I assume the  lack of these cylinders is what causes the degradation in signal quality
Wrong Speakers sent to me. I received the wrong speakers.  I ordered the penguin speakers and got the monkey speakers. They were a Christmas gift for my niece who collects Penguins. I e-mailed the company several times with no response back. So, I will never order from this company again, will take my business elsewhere
CD player broke after 1 week. Just a warning, after 1 week of very light use -- the CD player is unable to play any CDs.  The radio still works, but the CD player is not working.  Not impressed with the quality
Very Poor Performance. I bought this product and I wish I had not.  In most cases it is much faster and efficient to copy the text by typing than trying to scan it.  You will only get a headache
Rodney. The concept of the unit is that you can use your house wiring as the carrier for the signal. The problem with the design is that it cannot overcome the physics of electricity. Netgear does not clearly explain that you cannot push the signal past the homes breaker system in their ads and hence the only way this system works is if your router is on the same circuit as the adapter. New homes break up room/equipment loads into smaller circuits for safety virtually stopping the use of a system like this. My complaint for netgear is that this is not put out there as a significant technical consideration. Although I continued to use their router I had to go wireless to make the system work and wasted money and time getting to the solution
Monster Cable is a rape--I mean rip-off. If it's not already obvious, Monster Cable is the carpetbagger of the home entertainment world. With the rapid development of new HD and audio technology, Monster Cable does their best to be the first to provide cables--but not without charging a horrendously inflated premium. In this case, all you're getting for your 20 bucks is an RCA-to-1/8" converter and eight feet in between. Sony makes a great 5-foot cable for less than four dollars, and if the length is what you really need, you can daisychain a couple of those together for still less than half of the price of Monster Cable's offering. It is important to be aware than in the world of electronics, and in fact everywhere, someone will try to rip you off
Poor Quality. This is the third Delphi product I have purchased for use with XM SkyFi2 system. Each Delphi product had to be returned because of problems; sound card problem, antenna connection would not maintain contact with signal, etc. The sound was very good when the systems were working. The purpose of buying the portable units was to use the SkyFi2 outside of the home. I gave up on the portable systems and now have the home kit for SkyFi2 connection to my home stereo system. So far so good. I have had it hooked-up and working one week.
Sandisk 2GB. I just cam from Las Vegas and the sandisk has a disk error that doesn't allow for more photos after only using 40mb. I have tried to format the disk using the camera and through Windows XP. It doesn't allow it to be formatted. Bad investment!!! Would not recommend the product unless there is a way I can get a refund or an exchange
Weak midrange - worse bass. I puchased the LS 100's to get a decent speaker for a great price. I was disappointed. I knew the bass response would not be astonding but it was almost non existant. The midrange and the highs are scratchy.I would not recommend the speakers for anything other than talk radio
Cheap Hunk of Junk. This was the worst purchase of any type of computer hardware that I have ever made. It felt very light and flimsy, the definition of cheap plastic. Not just the construction but the performance was terrible. It would work perfectly for about a half hour and then go on a break and do NOTHING for about 10 minutes. This was very very frustrating. Maybe I was just unlucky and received a defective one, but I wouldn't take that chance again.I wish I could give this device a worse rating, somewhere around -4 would be much more appropriate.
DO NOT BUY!. I bought this hub less than 2 months ago.  It has stopped working!  If I plug it in, it is no longer powered.DO NOT BUY THIS P.O.S.!
Easy to Use, But.... the sound quality is so horrible I'm returning mine... I don't understand why no  company can put out a decent system to do this. Obviously there's a demand for it...
Expensive and hard to find. The suspicious side of me wants to believe that HP did a promo with their Deskjet 612C - i.e. they sold the printer cheap or with big rebates as part of a system deal and decided to make up for their loss leader by limiting production and raising the price on the cartridge replacements.  I would be surprised if there is any difference between the 612C black replacement cartridge C6614 and the much more common cartridge for the 660C other than a little plastic tab on the cartridge case
Out of Date. This would be a great idea if it were not out of date.  This uses the 3rd edition Official Scrablbe Dictionary.  The 4th edition came out in 2006.  It does not have many words, such as "za" or "qi" in it.  If there were an up to date version, I'd buy it
Do NOT Buy This Product. My player worked less than a dozen times (and this was for 30 minute yoga lessons).  If a company gives you only a 90 day warranty, you should know already that the quality is not such that they expect it to last long.  I try to buy from companies I haven't heard of to give them a boost against the big names.  Their service department was completely indifferent so the unit is in the trash and the battery recycled.  Now I have the speaker units i had to buy in order to hear my lessons and no player
Wanted to like it, but... When I first started using this, I loved it.  It worked fine in my car cassette deck and had decent sound.  In fact, I bought a second one for my wife.  Then, after about two weeks, it stopped working.  It would no longer play in my cassette deck, which ejected it as soon as I put it in every time.  I tried contacting Coby's support on the Web, but they were unresponsive.  Luckily, Amazon took it back for a refund.  Note that they no longer sell these directly.  Bet they had too many returns..
Don't Buy. There are no instructions as mentioned before but my biggest complaint is that the card would not fit into the slot in the back of the computer.  The usb ports and firewire ports were made wider than any standard pci card should be.  In order to get it to work I had to squeeze the metal on the top and bottom of each port down until it would fit into the slot.  Very frustrating and just wrong, looking at the other reviews though, maybe I just got a fluke card.  The usb 2.0 ports work fine once installed and I haven't had a chance to try out the firewire ones
It works but not as you would presume it should !!!. There is no problem with the card or capacity. But when I compare my results with Lexar 12X card, there is NO difference in the time it takes to store the image ( once you click the camera ) !!!. Yes, restoring images from the card to computer is very fast compared to my 12x card. But while snapping photos there is no difference in speed. This could be because of the camera or some other reason...but my main reason to buy a 40x card was to snap photos as fast as possible.By the way I am using this card in Nikon 5700 camera. Make sure that your camera supports the Write Acceleration Technology. he CF card will work, **BUT** there was no increase in speed over other cards
Do not buy!. Looks slick, decent sound and great price BUTflimsy attenna and CD player broke after 1 week (on its own - I didn't even open it up after loading in the first group of CDs).  Took it to JVC repair and they couldn't fix it or find out was wrong.  Ruined my impression of JVC.Remember the wisdom "you get what you pay for". . .
not so great. I've had a pair of these for about a while now, they'll last a long time because i don't use them. They are fairly comfortable but not great for long use as the bud which is in close constant contact w/ the inside of your ear is made of hard plastic. The other downside is that they produce very little bass unless you hold them right in side the ear opening, other than that you're only going to hear mids and highs
expensive mistake. I agree with the other bad reviews above.One faviourable reviewer uses it for pool areobics which I assume dosnt involve submurging your head. The other faviourable reviewer who lane swims with it dosnt state his/her sex but I can only assume this reviewer is a woman who swims with her head above water (as many women do to protect their hair).I can only agree with the other reviewers who swim with it. The sound is already muffled and those things you stick in your ear (can be painful as you have to really shove them in)let the water in no matter how hard you try to plug them in your ear so after a few metres the sound is almost completely blocked rendering them useless.I also had the problem with the headphones though when I got a replacement pair with the lubricant there was no mention that I needed to use the lubricant to rectify that particular problem.Another review elsewhere mentioned you could try cutting back the plugs to suit your ears but I really cant see that this would help much.If someone out there does have this product and is using it sucessfully while submurged please write a review here and tell us what the rest of us are doing wrong but until then my advice to anyone wanting this for swimming with your head in the water is ...dont bother
Do not buy this. The screen is terrible when view movies through the iPod.  Picture quality is really bad when compare to the iPod built-in screen.  The DVD feature is OK.  It does not play DivX which is a let down.  If you are thinking of buying this unit for the iPod integration, you will be very dissapointed.  Also, the unit itself is very thick and very hard to handle, though the picture cleverly hides the thickness of the thing.  Great job iLuv's Photographer.  DO NOT BUY
Good idea, design a little weird, and bad sound. When you look at a picture of the Sony MDR-J10 headphones, you probably think "great idea!" I certainly did, and I thought they'd be the answer to my annoyances with earbuds falling out while I run.Well, that's partly true. The over-ear design is ingenious, and there's no slippage whatsoever, which is refreshing. But the design is also its most major flaw: most headphone speakers which project directly into your inner ear, but the placement of the speakers on this set is such that they face forward into the tragus (the projection of cartilage that sticks out from your ear), which means that the sound is inherently distorted. You can adjust the placement somewhat but, to me, it feels like I'm simply choosing the less annoying variation on distorted sound.What's more, the overall sound was a bit tinny and weak for my tastes. I realize these are very inexpensive headphones, but even for running, I can't cope with such thin-sounding music.After trying these, I switched back to the earbuds I already owned and found it less annoying that they fell out occasionally -- after all, they sound great when they do stay in, which is more than I can say for the Sony MDR-J10 headphones.
This is junk and it doesn't last 9 months. I got this for Christmas last year.  I hardly use the thing and when I have I have been very careful in placing the ipod on and off of it. I can no longer play an ipod on it as there is no sound or too much static - apparently a short of some sort.  I was shocked as it had been used maybe 10 times by my wife and I.  Read all of the reviews I am not the only one who now has an overpriced doorstop.  Save your money and buy something else.Take your time and read through the "cotton candy" 4-5* reviews which bump this up to an artificially high rating of 3* and you will see one consistent pattern, the connection to the ipod is very poor, the alarm doesn't function, and they feel it is overpriced
Not a true Access Point. It is likely, if you are looking at an access point rather than a basic broadband router, that you are wanting more versatility in your wireless setup. If this is the case, this D*Link product is a waste of time. Despite being advertised as an Access Point (AP), the DWL-G700AP is not a true AP.There is no client AP mode (allows the AP to be a client to another AP), there is no wireless bridge mode, there is no wireless repeater mode. In fact, everything you would expect to see on an AP is missing. And D*link do not seem to be able to keep track of firmware releases properly either. My AP came with 1.03 which, according to D*Link does not exist.As such, it's virtually useless as anything other than a VERY basic access point. Buy the Linksys WAP54G instead and get a real AP
Poor - kept dropping cell calls. I returned the entire Motorola C51 system. It kept droppong cell phone calls. I then purchased the Panasonic KX-TH111 and it works great
Keep your money in your pocket. This speaker is only slightly louder than the internal speakers in my IBM laptop.
serious drop in quality. I have always been a fan of Sony because they make quality products that are "user-friendly".  That is why I was in a state of complete shock that this little blue cd walkman is made by Sony, because it is on the other end of the spectrum compared to what they usually manufacture.First the bad...the control buttons (sound, changing tracks, pause, etc) are tiny and nearly impossible to read.  I found myself having to hold the cd player up to my face to find the right button, and I do not have any vision problems.  The little lcd screen is hard to read as well.  Next, the sound quality is poor and has a cheap "watered down" feel to it.  Then there are the stock headphones that the product comes with.  These are cheap and don't fit well.I bought a yellow "psyc" sony walkman a couple years ago, and that one is 3 times the product that this one is.  The sound is near-perfect and the buttons are easy to see and use.  The headphones fit well and the whole package has lasted with no issues at all.I wouldn't write sony off simply b/c of this product, but I would definitely do some research prior to purchasing a walkman from them.
Worked OK for about 230 days, then stopped. The drive arrived at the end of December, was quick to get up and running, and worked fine until yesterday.  Then it got the machine equivalent of "lockjaw" and I've been unable to get the tray to release.So, it's a good drive while it operates, but I'll probably make sure I pay for at least a 1-year warranty on my next purchase.As far as my recommendation goes, it depends very much on how inconvenient it is when one's drive fails.  Yesterday, I just went to a backup burner and kept working; if I had NEEDED to get the job done, and I had not previously developed a strategy of always keeping a backup device handy, I'd have been in a seething, hair-pulling rage.  Computer hardware is never 100% reliable, but is it worth the risk to purchase a device that is known to fail in less than a year
Nice GPS receiver, but not user friendly with the map software. I've owned a Magellan Meridian Gold GPS receiver for 3 1/2 years. It worked great until last week when it got wet and stopped working. It is supposed to be waterproof and sealed to IEC-529 IPX7 standards - but apparently it isn't. Magellan charged me $126 to have it repaired.I ordered the Explorist XL as an upgrade and for use as my primary unit with the intention of keeping the Meridian Gold as a backup. But I returned the Explorist after learning how difficult it is to use with the MapSend Direct Route map software. Also, the map software will only work with one Magellan GPS receiver at a time. So, you either have to completely uninstall and reinstall it each time you want to use a different GPS unit - or you have to buy another copy of the software and install it on a different computer. I don't mind paying for a second copy of the software, but who wants to buy another computer!Until Magellan addresses these issues, I recommend buying something else
looks just like a piece of cardboard. I thought that this paper would be similar to the matte finish at local photo places, but it looks and prints just like a piece of cardboard.  Very disappointe
Just take a fullsize mouse. It's worth it just to take a regular size optical mouse with you. This one doesn't save that much space. It works fine, but it's not comfortable to use
Mine broke quickly!  Software is terrible. I agree with all the other feedback saying this product is faulty.  The on/off button is terrible.  It takes 5 tries to turn the unit off.  After 5 months of using this, the unit would no longer "talk" with the satellites.  I sent it back to DeLorme.  It tested bad.  Now I have waited 6 weeks for a replacement that is backordered.  Customer service rep will not refund your purchase after 30 days!  The software claims it will compute driving routes for you...but it will crash your PDA instead.  I had to buy INav IGuidance software (which is outstanding) to get software that will actually compute road routes for me.  I would not recommend this product to anyone.  It has been a complete waste of money for me
INCORRECT DESCRIPTION - NO BATTERY BOX INCLUDED. When you view the technical details for this product, it indicates that a Battery Box is included with the Mic, even shows the weight of the battery box that's supposed to come in the mic.This information is INCORRECT. The battery box only comes with the more expensive models, NOT this one.Please make sure NOT to buy this product unless you have a source that can power this mic, because without the battery box or a source that can power it, the mic is useless
Avery matte CD labels. Although these labels were functional, I was disappointed as the paper is far thinner than for similar labels I had purchased previously, and these tended to tear easily
Anyone for a class action law suit against Kensington?. I can't believe amazon and Kensington are still selling this product.  I just bought mine last week, and when it wouldn't register, I got this email back from Kensington tech support.Dear John:Thank you for contacting Kensington Technical Support.Its unfortunate that you are facing this issue.I suspect that there might be some issue with our database. At this point of time there is noresolution.I would suggest you to go for refund.To initiate the refund process, kindly fax us the purchase receipt to 6502492323.(Include "Ticket# 061221-000059 and Attention: "Vishal" in your fax).This will enable us to process refund for you.I sincerely apologize for any inconvenience this may have caused.Regards,VishalKensington Technical Suppor
Not worth the price tag. the sound isolating is NOT as good as people rave about.yes, it does decrease the amount of outside sound you hear, but it doesn't block it entirely as many people seem to rave.   If you listen to something with a lot going on, like The White Stripes, and play it a little loud, then yes you cannot hear outside sound.  but if you listen to classical, spoken word, alt country, for example, and you do not crank the volume, you will still hear people talking on their cell phones, the sound of the subway, the co-worker on speakerphone 4 cubes away.I wish I hadn't spent $150 on this model and had just gone for the $70 E2 instead.   Plus the cord is such a pain.  the "wear it over your ear" style feels uncomfortable and the cord never stays over my ear and always needs attention and re-arranging.
Not for ski trip. I got them mostly for being very light and small. In the city it worked up to 1/5 of a mile, you can connect a bit more but hear only static. On a ski resort it only worked within the same building/lodge; you cannot connect to another radio even on the same side of the mountain. I'd return them, but as they are so small and sleek, we lost one on the second day
Poor Device. This unit is not worth the money. Unfortunately I gave this unit as a gift to my mom, helping her set this item up was a nightmare, the unit itself is gorgous, and the keys are beatifully back-lit, however the software included is a bit confusing, does not find addresses too well, and to top it off the unit is extremely extremely slow. the processor can not keep up with input selections as well as recalculations of routes, warm up time is deplorable and as other reviewers have noted, can take up to 2-3 minutes to find your position. I have used a Garmin c320 and this unit while more expensive, is far superior to this unit.All in all, even though the price of this unit is very very tempting, save your money and purchase something else. this unit is obsolete and can not handle normal day to day operations
I need more power scotty!. I bought these thinking they were a good deal but now I have to agree with some of the other reviewers. I bought 24 of these and one year later I have four left that will take any sort of charge. The ones that died maybe had six recharges on them each. I also have several high end chargers that don't want anything to do with the ones that died. On the bright side I have several Lenmar DLCRV3 batteries for my digital camera and they have been A+ after 2+ years
Bad product. Horrible product. It's not the seller's fault that it's such a horrible product... it just is. The main selling point for this is that it has video capabilities... well, as much lag as there is even with super low quality video settings and with a lack of support for higher resolutions (above 1024x768) ... it just ruins the selling point. Buy a dock made specifically for your notebook if you're looking for video capabilities. The rest of the ports work fine. No PS/2 ports though for keyboard and mouse, just USB. Not any better than a port replicator.Bria
doesn' work with al products. This product didn't work with my wireless mouse, scanner, and it would mess up my print que and I would have to restart the Keyspan software to get it working again.I returned it
Mine was defective, but warranty service was quick. I used an 880 to hook up my A/V equipment: a TV, DVD player, VCR, amplifier, and an XBox. There was a power outage in my community. After power was restored, the VCR and XBox would not power up. Everything else connected to the 880 worked fine. I had my VCR and XBox checked out and both were fried by the power surge. I submitted a warranty to CyberPower and got a new 880 in the mail immediately. The warranty process was very smooth and very quick. CyberPower paid me 50% of what I originally paid for the VCR and XBox. Their warranty clearly states that they will only pay fair market value of the damaged equipment.On one hand, I can't recommend CyberPower because I got a defective surge suppressor. But on the other hand, the warranty claim process was pretty smooth. I was lucky I kept the receipts for the 880, my VCR, and my XBox. I definitely wouldn't recommend connecting your most valuable electronics with this surge suppressor. You should consider a UPS even if it's just for surge suppression. The circuitry in UPS is much better quality-wise than surge suppressor outlets
If This Is Intended For BitTorrent Purposes, Save Your Money. Ever wonder how many Amazon product reviews are submitted by corporate shills?  In the case of the DGL-4100, I'm ready to guess it's about 85%.Okay, I'm not totally serious serious in that estimate.  I'm just disappointed in the product.I'm not a gamer, and perhaps that's why the DGL-4100 didn't work for me.  I like to download tv programs via BitTorrent.  I download whole seasons at a time, which runs into the multiple Gigabytes.  As you other BitTorrent enthusiasts may know, the average home network router has a tendency to freeze when BT pulls too many connections through it.  I find it very depressing to get up in the morning (or come home from work) and find that my downloads stopped short many hours ago.For some months now I've been in search of an affordable router to avoid this problem.  Considering what I've spent so far, perhaps I would've been better off to buy something expensive and capacious from the start.In any case, it's difficult to derive any sort of consensus about router efficacy from the Web.  There probably are more than a few lying corporate shills floating around cyberspace, but mostly there are well-meaning people who report good or bad results without taking into account operating system, exact router model, broadband type, BitTorrent client, or the size of the torrents they download.I was mildly excited to find so many positive Amazon reviews for the DGL-4100.  Perhaps, I thought, a router built for high-performance gaming would account for connection issues similar to BitTorrent's.  Right about now, the cognescenti reading this little tale of woe are probably laughing their butts off.Let me cut to the chase here.  After I hooked up the DGL-4100 and started two BT downloads (one a mere 1.5 G, the other 22 G), everything looked fine... for about three hours.  Then the silly thing froze on me, as happened with the Linksys and Netgear routers (wired and wireless) I've tried.  I obtained the latest firmware for it (January 11, 2006), installed this, and tried again.  The results were similar, except that now I noticed the router freezing on me even during BT-free Web-surfing.  Regardless of my BitTorrent client (Azureus, uTorrent, BitComet)or its settings, the results didn't improve.If you're a gamer, maybe you'll roll the dice on the DGL-4100.  If you're a BitTorrent enthusiastic such as myself, you should probably keep looking
Not a good Company to Deal with. I ordered two 4 gb mini flash drives. One of them arrived DOA (dead on arrival. I have emailed the person who sold this product with no response.I would say that the seller does not warranty any equipment. If you bought it you own it. Not the way I like to do business
These cost $10.00 with shipping!. No kidding!!  The shipping charge on these batteries was over $6.00.  Amazon doesn't itemize the shipping charges on your order, so if you order multiple items, you won't know that you're being raped by Crutchfield until it is too late!
Low Price, Low Quality, No Technical Support. This Transcend 2GB, 120x has not failed yet, but the Transcend 2GB 80x CF card that I purchased a month earlier failed and I lost some very important images.  I was using it in my Canon 30D.  I tried several different Software Recovery programs to retreive the images and none of them worked.  I have tried to contact Transcend Technical Support through their website but they failed to respond.  I do not recommend Transcend CF cards.  This experience has taught me to pay a little more and stick with the proven brands, Sandisk, Lexar and Kingston
Terrific portable music for a crowd!. This player works quite well in our home. We just pick it up & move to the next room, outdoors or into the van. The sound quality is better then I expected. Glad I purchased it
Lost Button Functions Over Time. I bought this remote to use with my 27" Panasonic CRT TV in the bedroom.  The OEM remote lost button functions over time-just like the previous, more expensive Sony RM-VL900 I bought to replace it.The same thing has happened to this remote!  I'm beginning to wonder if the TV is somehow the cause of this recurring problem.  The main channel Up-Down buttons no longer work, so one cannot scan channels.  The individual channel and PIP button still work, but only one of the PIP scan buttons function.  The only way to surf is to bring up the PIP window, use the lone PIP scan button, then punch in each channel one wants to watch.I have a Universal MX500 for the main TV, and have had no problems whatsoever with it.  Of course, it cost well over $100, and I just don't have that kind of $ nowadays.  I'll just have to hope I can find an inexpensive remote that will maintain button function for more than a few months
Deceptive marketing at its finest. The one and only reason I purchased this label printer was for the highly touted Dymo Stamps feature, supposedly giving you the ability to print your own postage stamps onto thermal postage labels for no monthly fee, only the cost of the printer and the thermal label refills.  According to the Dymo Stamps website, Dymo Stamps gives you the ability to "Print Exactly the Amount of Postage you Need" and "Eliminate the Need for Costly Postal Meters."  What the consumer is not told upfront is that these "precise" amounts of postage can only be in denominations of the Dymo Stamps software's choosing, not any amount you want.  In fact, the only postage denominations that can be printed are those already available in stamp form at the post office, basically just your run-of-the-mill $0.39 stamps, $4.05 Priority Mail stamps, and postcard stamps.  This software also does not give you the capability to print postage for Parcel Post, Media Mail, or Express Mail, and doesn't allow you to add additional postage for services like insurance or certified mail at all.  How this saves you any trouble over buying stamps from the post office is beyond me.  Conveniently, you can only overcome all of these limitations by subscribing to Endicia (Dymo Stamps' backbone provider) for a monthly fee.  Heck, you can't even go to an office supply store to buy the thermal postage label refills that you need to print postage on; they can only be ordered online through a link in the Dymo Stamps software.  Especially given the fact that even the least expensive Dymo Stamps capable LabelWriter model is over $100, this will NOT save you any money in postage, will NOT save you any time, and ordering stamps online from USPS (or getting them from the local post office) is just as convenient, if not more convenient, than ordering the stupid thermal refills online from Dymo and waiting for them to arrive.  Thankfully, Amazon is great at accepting returns
Speed dial unusable. To use the speed dial, you must first hold down the button to get the number to be displayed.  Then press phone or spkrphone to send.  I'd say about 80% of the time when I used the phone button I got "number could not be completed as dialed".  If I used the spkrphone button instead it always worked, convincing me that it was the phone button and not something else.  I also had complaints that people couldn't hear me, but only when I was using the headset (which is most of the time).  I use this same headset with other phones, so I'm fairly sure it wasn't the headset.I returned it for a replacement phone and it had the same problem.  I have to say that amazon has made the whole return process very easy.  Since the second phone exhibits the same problem, I'll get refunded.  I commend their customer service
A surprising disappointment from a usually stellar company. I'm a seasoned graphics pro who always reads the manuaI, and have owned several previous models of Wacom tablet. For the life of me, I just couldn't get the Graphire4 working on my Mac at all. The installer crashed (Kernal panic!) my otherwise rock solid Tiger installation. Downloading the latest driver from Wacom's web site was only marginally useful; the cursor jittered like crazy no matter how I adjusted the control panel, and even moderately fast motion caused it to "submarine" from one side of the screen to the other. Wacom's sparse FAQ suggested that interference from my monitor might have been the culprit, and could be remedied by moving the tablet further away. It didn't work, and besides, I have no plans use the tablet from across the room.Phone support was no better: Wacom very thoughtfully gave its staff July 3rd off! Too bad, it would have been a chance to talk me in to keeping it. Looks like my trusty workhorse Intuos2 tablet will be enjoying a few more years of service, if this is the level to which Wacom's legendary tech support has fallen.
Beware!. If you have a cable modem for broadband connection to the internet, your unit will not be covered by the APS warranty on this device. Lightning hit near our house and the motherboard plus router got fried. The cable modem stayed intact and we filed a claim with APS. They denied it saying backend surges through the cable may have caused the damage (even though the modem wasn't hurt?)
Bag is ok. I purchased this from Amazon based on the description that a long lasting rechargeable battery was included.  However when it arrived, there was no battery.  Upon questioning Amazon about the battery, the customer service rep said he could give me a $5 credit for the batteries.  I asked how the battery could only be worth $5.  He said that is what AA rechargeable batteries go for. The bag is ok, but don't order this if you are expecting a battery specifally made for compact printers
Poor support for defective mapping engine. If TomTom's maps fail and you submit a bug report, the nice support site sends you to TeleAtlas's site which promptly CLOSES the support request.  It took two requests before I realized I was being redirected away from TomTom's site.The real problem is not with the maps (which is a good thing), but with the mapping engine (determine how to find a point on a map).  I submit the request to the main support group only to have those bozos close the request saying that the problem is with the map.  At this point I don't care who is wrong since neither TomTom nor TeleAtlas will say who owns the mapping engine.  This stupid device failed when I needed it the most, driving in New Jersey! The TomTom Go 300 cannot map roads that are broken, see bug submission below for more information.So, why two stars?- It fails when you need it- I could scroll around the working map and find the right street, but then I need to stop in an unsafe state .. er .. I mean place and use the device like it was my trusty AAA map.- Support does not read bug reports (I want that job with zero accountability please!)Does it work? Yes it does and it does work very well when you have a nice clean streets with a good map.  It does take some time to find its GPS often, but its tolerable. It manages to lose signal with tree cover (seriously, I can still see the sky).Moral of this review: verify with an online map service BEFORE driving to unknown places.  Defeats the prupose? No.  TomTom Go 300 did find my way around some detours in NJ near Trenton and get me into the parking garage saving me time and frustration (the prupose of this device).Updates:After using TomTom Go 300 for a few months I have seen more problems than I care for.  I have recommended everyone in my family to not buy TomTom products.  The map for my area, King of Prussia, PA more than two years out of date.  It got my dad lost going to a hotel which is 1.3 miles away from me.In some areas, you will fall off the map.  The most annoying new feature is TomTom alterate route functions.  I am headed to a fork in a road in the middle of nowhere.  TomTom wants me to take the "long" way to my destination by switching from the State Route (meaning Route 1 or Route 66) that I'm on to the another State Route at the fork.  The thing is, if I tell it not to take the other State Route, the damn device will tell me to turn around!!  Once I pass the fork it keeps telling me to turn around.  When I choose to re-run the routing software from where I am, it figures out a new route completely passing the road that I need to take.  The road is on the TomTom map, but it won't take it until I get on to it.  WHAT GIVES?Bug Report submitted to TomTom-------TomTom Go 300 v6.150The mapping engine is BROKEN.  It cannot handle a road that is broken into several non-contiguous sections.  The city, Pennsauken, gave several distinct streets the SAME name!Destination:3401 Cooper Ave, Pennsauken, NJ 08109If you map the destination on any Internet site and scroll around, you would see that:[...]All points map to real locations but are not on the same physical road.  They are on different roads by the same name in the same city.The TomTomGo 300's map actually has these locations on it, but is UNABLE to map to anything but the first OCCURANCE of Cooper Ave: 7200 Cooper Ave, Pennsauken, NJ 08109Trying to find the intersection (cross street) of two streets Cooper Ave and Park Ave does not work even though the TomTom's map clearly shows that they do intersect.  TomTom can only see the intersection of Cooper Ave and Derousse Ave.That area has several other streets, Sherman Ave for example, that are also non-contiguous
*Buyers Beware*! Check your camera model before you buy this. These cards only work with Camera that supports the Write Acceleration !! otherwise the speed is no different from a 12X card. There is nothing wrong with the card in terms of capacity or quality.I have given a single star rating coz it should clearly state that the 80x speed is only possible with cameras supporting Write Acceleration !!Very Few camera support this technology and one can easily get the same capacity ( 12x ) at 1/4 the mentioned price. SO why pay more if your camera does not support this technology !
Don't buy the PSUS4. I've a PSUS4 for over two years now. I'm awaiting the return of a forth replacement unit from Linksys. They stream my LAN and kill connections. Linksys tried to claim the warranty was one year even though the .PDF on their web site states three years. When I cross shipped the last return, they charged my credit card early and then took forever to refund the money. Now, they claim the unit is on back order for over six weeks already. This is the last Linksys component in my LAN. I've replaced every other device with other brands. Linksys stinks
Great looking case design, lousy implementation... The Netgear SC101 Storage Central device holds a lot of promise and offers a nice looking case design. In fact, I referred to mine as a "network toaster" since that is kind of what it looked like.Unfortunately, "beauty is only skin deep" when it comes to this unit.Netgear did get some things right--the ability to buy just the enclosure and add your own hard disks is great. Anyone who has worked on computers for some time will undoubtedly have some perfectly serviceable hard drives sitting around. This unit gives you the ability to put at least some of those drives to use.Installation and use of the device--when it works, which it doesn't always do--are both easy and definitely geared to new and inexperienced computer users who just want something that works.What Netgear missed with this device, however, is the ability for more advanced users (or people who have multiple computers with different operating systems) to take this device further. It offers no web based interface and no file sharing protocols outside of the proprietary software (for Windows 2000/XP only). This is a serious flaw to an otherwise great idea.The hard drives are also loose inside the device when you install them. There's nothing to hold them in place or keep them stable other than some blocks of foam. I could see this leading to electrical shorting from the circuit board on the drive to the case and even serious disk damage in the event that this unit would fall. The interior of the case is also quite sharp, so watch out not to cut or slice yourself while installing drives (or taking it apart to see what's inside).All things and limitations considered, I returned mine after five minutes of using it. It's just too limited for the power user, hobbyist or tinkerer. If you pay full retail price (~$100), it's also quite pricey for such a limited piece of hardware. If Netgear were to come out with a more powerful version that offered true network attached storage functionality, I'd certainly give serious thought to buying it. As it is right now, the product was an expensive disappointment to me
If only the wireless part of it worked!. I' writing this eview onthe nwkeoard tht I picked up a few urs  Don stop redingdue to th numerous misspellins and rors.  That's the kyboard, nome!!  I'mt ba to to y na o y n Acino esr I ia.Ok, switching over to a wired keyboard!!  The above mess was me trying to type on the Microsoft 6000 V2 Keyboard!!  I'm taking it back to the store ASAP!!  According to the programs, I have a full signal on both the keyboard and the mouse while typing, but you see what comes out!  Not once have I had a low signal warning or anything.  I just get random intermittent letters to appear.  Now, perhaps it's because the receiver is back by my monitor and the keyboard is on the keyboard tray, but my goodness!  This thing is supposed to have a range of 6 feet.  I measured and they're about a foot and a half apart!!I type for hours on end per day and have been typing "properly" for about 16 years.  I type much too fast and much too frequently to be able to deal with such random signals!!  Another thing I noticed about the 6000 (and actually was concerned with it while I was trying it out in the store) is that it makes my fingers feel cramped.  Perhaps it's due to the curve of the keyboard and I'm just not used to it yet (although I have used split key ergonomic keyboards and never had a probelm with them.  The 4000 felt fine (even though it has a somewhat awkward layout!!)No matter what, that thing is going back!  I'm far too agitated to keep it!Oh, there are some neato plusses!  I love the shortcut keys.  It's nice to be able to just hit one key and get my e-mail, my music, my pictures, or whatever else I assign the keys to.  I had gotten excited about that feature, and will be sad to lose it (even though I only had it for about an hour.)Better luck to the rest of you
Not as advertised. The description gives the impression that the material is made of hard rubber and that it can protect you ipod in "rugged" conditions. In reality it is made from very thin flimsy rubber. I suppose will protect you nano from scratches and other cosmetic damage, but it will not porvide any protection from drops or other rough handling
Best for your printer, Worst for your pocketbook. This is a great printer and the ink cartridge system is tops - but this item is available elsewhere for much less.  Amazon should do better than this
2 bads don't make a good. The specs look great, and the features it has work great. Sound quality is amazing. But many parts of the device are cheaply made, such as the main navigaion/controll device, and the headphone jack, both things needed for operation of the player. Also if you're buying this for OGG or FLAC playback be warned it doesn't play many of these properly. Within two weeks the screen broke, I tried to get it repaired with Cowon but they where of no help, so I returned it to Amazon
My plastic band broke. Folks,If you purchased this unit and the plastic band broke, call Logitech support at: 702-269-3457Once you prove that you have the old model, and send it back to Logitech, they will cross ship you a the new Free Pulse model which has a high strength carbon spring-steel headband.You will have to pay shipping, but you are getting a great pair of headphones to replace the previous defective model.
Good TV for the price - MORONIC remote. I purchased my 6620LDG, like other reviewers, to replace my old kitchen TV.  I really wanted an LCD with a built-in DVD player.  While I like the TV just fine, the remote is another story.  I actually wrote to the manufacturer about the remote and gave them quite an earful.  Included in my e.mail was the following:"While I find the overall TV to be good, I am appalled at thequality and functionality of the remote that operates and comes withthat particular model. I simply can't believe that a name brand likeSylvania would provide such a poorly designed remote to accompany ahigher-end TV.""...this remote is very uncomfortableto hold and operate. It is as if your designers made no accommodationsfor how people hold remotes, and what makes them comfortable.""Seriously. I cantt imagine who designed the actual size and shape of that remote or which idiot approved it's public distribution, but the entire lot of them need to find other professions if they think that this remote is at all acceptable.""A remote should be, at the very least,functional and comfortable enough to go unnoticed, dont you think???? Aside from the horrid shape, size and weight of the remote, this remote has an absolutely terrible layout and lacks some of the most basic buttons that come with the cheapest of remotes. I was shocked and horrified to realize that this hideous remote had no "last channel" button. Are your designers living in the 70s or do they just have their heads up their butts?""I havent had a TV remote in my hand without a last channel button in at LEAST 20 years. Since the remote is so huge, how could it not have one of the most traditional buttons on it? I consider the very lowest and feature-less remotes to be those in hotel rooms. They look like top-of-the-line models when compared to this piece of crap.On top of not having the basic buttons, and amongst other issues, the remote is frustrating because: 1. The text is illegible, 2. The buttons are laid out in a way that doesnt make sense and 3. When you channel surf, the remote is so slow to change the channel that you want to throw it on the floor and stomp on it. In fact, if I can find a universal remote that works with this TV; I intend to do just that. Of course, to add insult to injury, it states clearly in your owners manual that 'We do not recommend the use ofuniversal remote controls. Not all of the functions may be controlledwith a universal remote control.' Great, so you provide a bottom of thebarrel remote with your TV, but then dont allow your customers to get adecent remote by making your TV uncooperative with them. This is thefirst time that I have encountered this too, BTW."Finally:"I hope that you promptly change the remote that comes with the 6620LDG LCD TV/DVD combo TV. I expect that you will experience many returns of this product due to the crappy remote that comes with it."THIS was their entire response:"Thank you for taking the time to express your concerns regarding our product.  Your comments and opinions are important to us.  Please understand that it is our objective to provide the best possible product.  We hope you accept our apologies for the inconvenience you have experienced with our product."I am on the verge of taking this back because of the remote
Very slow. My best USB drive is the Lexar Media JDE512-231 JumpDrive Elite USB 2.0 512MB drive which I had for about a year and a half. But I needed more space, so I thought I would buy this as the upgrade since it's made by the same company and has the same brand name and they don't make the other model in 1 G anymore. This drive is very slow. I timed the same backup procedure on both drives, and my older 512 MB was at least twice as fast
Never really did work. Perhaps I am luckier...my Netgear adapter "crapped out" five times in the first two weeks.  After reading all these negative reviews, I decided just to take it back while I still could.  Netgear support was spotty--some reps really tried.  But I had one simply give up and walk away fromt the call
Junk, junk, junk!  Have had 7 bad ones so far!!!. 1st unit had bad logic board and died after about 1 week of use. Next one the power supply died within 1 month. 3rd unit had bad paper feeder. 4th unit same bad paper feeder problems but couple weeks after warranty ended and HP would not replace despite same problem they "fixed" earlier. Drivers are junk and buggy. In contrast we have a Canon All-in-One unit over a year with zero problems and a Canon printer about 2-3 years with no problems. Stay away from this HP (in fact all HP units) as it will be a pain dealing with the repair issues. My son also had a HP All-in-One that was replaced 3 times in 4 months. He finally ended up selling the replacement unit he received and buying a Canon All-in-one. All in all, 7 replacement units within 1 year between the 2 HP units in our home. Junk! Junk! Junk
don't buy this if you have Yamaha keyboard. This item will not work if you have a Yamaha keyboard. The people at the company were very nice to deal with but their product just won't work with a Yamaha keyboard. There was a constant low humming noise that showed up at a low note on the music notation software I us
DIDN'T WORK RIGHT THE FIRST DAY. THE DAY I GOT IT I WAS SO EXCITED TO MOUNT THIS AND START USING IT. ATTACHING THE ITEM WAS VERY EASY TO DO IF YOU CAN READ, WHICH I WAS IN LUCK THERE, SO I GOT THAT DONE. AS SOON AS I USED IT, IT WASN'T WORKING CORRECTLY TO START WITH. I OPENED THE SLOT TO PUT THE CD INTO IT, AND THE CD TRAY WOULDN'T CLOSE. I HAD TO TURN THE POWER OFF AND THEN BACK ON TO GET THE TRAY TO GO BACK INTO THE UNIT. BY THIS TIME IT WAS EASIER TO JUST DO THAT THEN TO REMOVE THE UNIT AND SEND IT BACK; SO TO THIS DAY I HAVE IT IN THE KITCHEN BUT BETWEEN THE CD TRAY AND THE POOR SOUND QUALITY I DONT USE IT AS MUCH AS I THOUGHT I WOULD
Broken in 3 weeks. I got these to replace my yellow Sony sports headphones.  The yellow ones were kind of "rubbery" and I've had them for years.  These broke within 3 weeks.  And not under great stress or high use, either.  Just simply taking them off of my head by pulling them apart to get them out of my ear and they broke where the length of the left ear adjusts.Very poor design and cheap plastic.  I'll buy other Sony headphones, especially if I can find ones made similar to my older yellow ones.  But I will never buy another set of these.Plus: They sound greatCon: They are such poor design that they broke at a really thin place of construction that would get a LOT of pressure from anyone when putting them on or taking them off their head.
Don't use it in your basement. This thing worked fine for about nine months and then died.  It doesn't like humidity.  I keep my switch and router in my basement.  Like many basements, it's a bit damp, though I have a dehumidifier running all the time.  It's not that damp in there, but the switch just died on me.I'd question the power supply or some other factor but my router and DSL modem have never had any problems at all and this is the second Netgear switch I've owned that has gone kaput; my best guess is dampness
Nice user interface but not reliable. Palms have nice user interfaces. This is my second Palm PDA. The screen is excellent, and it is thin and light. The software works well, and synchronizes without problems to Windows XP Home and XP Professional. Unfortunately, after two years the on-off switch has failed. This requires me to use one of the "hot" buttons to turn it on. This allows me to continue to use this device, but it is annoying and inconvenient (these are all about convenience, right?). My first Palm device, an M130, also had its on-off switch fail after two years (before its main board failed). Palm needs to understand that I have other things to do with my money than to spend $200 every two years on a PDA because they didn't make the on-off switch robust enough. One should want to buy a new PDA because of new features and design, not because of mechanical failure. This device has been well taken care of and has not been abused. My wife's Treo 700p had its speaker fail after 45 days, and occasionally the phone portion requires a reset. Although I have not had any problems with Palm software, my IT consultant tells me that the Palm software does not synchronize well with the Windows Tablet operating system. Although I would have liked to stay with the Palm OS, because of the mechanical failures of my two Palms and the Treo 700p, my next PDA will probably be from HP.
Does NOT work reliably with an optical mouse. I can occasionally get my Logitech cordless MouseMan optical mouse to work on this pad, but before long, it just stops tracking.  Not surprising, since the pad is a smooth, solid black surface.  It's also quite large and rigid, so I had a hard time fitting it into my desk's tray alongside my keyboard... had to ditch the wrist pad and turn it sideways.  I've given up on it.  I guess if you have the space and the right mouse, it would be a nice mousepad, but it was not the right purchase for me
Waster of a weekend. Bought it on a Friday night. Spent 3 hours Saturday and 3 hours on Sunday trying to get everything to work. It took 3 tech people and an hour on hold for them to confirm that there were no upgrades to the software to support M4A files. Not that it's just grabbing files from itunes, but when I just rip a regular CD, it also stores as an M4A file. So, my music was useless on the machine.So, now I'm just left with viewing my photos. That's ok. I can deal with that. However, the help for getting a connection to your wireless networks (both the on line help and on the phone help, mind you) was useless. After 6 hours of getting "No server found", I packed it in and returned the item
Not universal - Bring Your Own Screws. Construction quality of the mount seems good, but it is not universal out of the box.  Despite being listed as compatible with my Sharp Aquos LC-37GD4U on the manufacturer's website, it does not ship with compatible screws to attach to the television.  The directions list incorrect screws that are too fat, while the ones that actually do fit into the TV are too short or too long.  I'd recommend trying something else rather than relying on this product's questionable compatibility info and directions
Did not work well with DI-524 Router. I bought this to hook to my Dlink DI-524 router in order to reach a wireless device at the other end of the house. It did not help at all. I am returing it. I talked to a Dlink tech person and he said that the DI-524 did not have enough power to effectively drive this antenna and he was not surprized that it did not work in my application
Stylish but way too small for regular use. I've been looking for this style of phone for a while, looks great, works great but it's so tiny as to be a pain in the rump to use.  It's both more narrow width wise and length wise than my Samsung SPH-A900. When the Samsung is fully opened this is still a smaller phone. I want a small sleek mobile phone, but this phone is impractical for using for long periods at home.  If it we're 1/3 larger it'd be excellent, maybe a great phone for women. Also it does not have any plugs for headsets.  I am returning mine to Amazon
Never worked in N-draft mode. It took a few hours to learn how to download the latest firm ware for the router and n-draft adapter (both from d-link).The wired connections worked great.The wireless conections worked fine for the B (add-on D-link notebook adapter) and G (built-in adapter) laptops, but the other 2 laptops that had the N-draft adapters would not work.  One n-draft adapter was from dell in a brand-new 1505, the other n-draft adapter was from DLINK.   Scary that the dlink adapter would not connect to the dlink router.Even with all of the security disabled, the N-draft adapters would not connect to the router.  With security enabled, and taking all of the right steps to set it up, nothing would connect to the router.  It refused to recognize the security key.After being on hold for an hour, Dlink tried to help me.  They gave me about 20 minutes of support before dropping the call.  Basically, they gave up and said that I should return it.Three weeks ago, I mailed the items to Amazon.  It was well within the 30 day window from the date of purchase.  I am still waiting for a refund.  Why does it take so long?Obviously, I can not give this product a good review.  Between the headache of dlink, and the slow response for my refund, this has been a miserable experience.Dell tech support recommends the Netgear N-draft router.  Once Amazon refunds me my money, that's what I'll buy
Disappointing. This home theater package, despite being attractively priced considering its apparent functionality, is ultimately very disappointing.I'm new to HDTV and HDMI so I didn't know as much as I needed in order to make a fully informed decision.  I have a Sony Bravia XBR3, Oppo upconverting DVD player, Scientific Atlanta HD box and Nintendo Wii game console.This unit only offers pass-through video, so you have to have separate video connections from the receiver to the TV for each type of input (HDMI, component, etc.).  For the price difference between this and other receivers that will convert to a single connection, you'll pay in extra cabling costs.The HDMI on this unit carries video only - no sound - so you have to have separate cabling to carry audio from your DVD or cable to the receiver, and then from the receiver to your TV.  Again, major inconvenience and lots of additional connections.The manual for this unit is beyond terrible.  I'm astounded that an international consumer electronics firm like Sony would provide a manual as difficult to use and just indirect as this one.  For example, there was a hum when watching TV that turned out was because the speakers while looking identical are not - some are shielded and some aren't.  Nothing in the manual about this.There are probably just enough HDMI and component connections for the basic user like myself.Plus side is that there is no DVD player with this, so I can use my own.Given a chance to do this again, I would spend a little extra on a unit that converts signals to a single output
That's why I hate apple. Never seen a worse, less intuitive, inconvenient to use and worsely documented software that iTunes. Apples is up to it's usual standard. That's precisely why I prefer not to mess with it
Where's the fricken battery, crooks!!??. As with other reviewers, I did not receive the battery that was supposed to be included with the case.  In fact, I didn't even receive the case that was pictured. The case I did receive was the case I had originally planned to buy so it's a keeper.  I am assuming that the batteries are being removed from these cases and sold seperately to increase profits.  Buyer beware.
Like everyone says - WEAK PINS. I have disconnected this cable TWO times only to temporarily relocate the TV and guess what - Yes, one of the pins got bent and broke off.  Now this expensive cable is just a worthless piece of junk.  Don't by this Monster Cable - try a different brand
Horrible.  Do not purchase!. This item was a total bust.  Sound quality is lousy, reception is poor, and you can barely hear your music come through.  It's cheaply made and is obvious once you see the package it comes in and the product itself.  I would return it but by time I paid return shipping I'd only get a few dollars back.  Not worth it in any way
works ok, but no wonder. I've had several UPSs now for a while. Belkin UPS quit after about 3 years of work. I understand that this may be long enough, but I have several from APC and they are still working. One UPS, I think, now has been in service 7 or 8 years
Very disappointed. I purchased 2 Rite Lites to use under my kitchen cabinets.  The light output was not strong enough to assist in food prep or even read a recipe. Additionally, the batteries were drained very quickly so I would have to be replacing batteries all the time.  I called the company to see if I could return them and was told no if I didn't have the original packaging -- even though I had the invoice.  I was very disappointed to have $32.00 worth of merchandise that I couldn't use or return
Horrible Software and Support. After using the Printer, which is a nice unit, I had numerous Software related functions that did not work on the Printer. I called HP for some help but found their Tech Support to one of the worst.I spoke with two (2) different techs who could not solve the problem and told me to contact Microsoft.I spoke to Dell and Microsoft who both spent time trying to solve the problem and both agreed that the problem was strictly an HP problem.I never solved the problem and returned the Printer to Amazon for credit.I am now using a Dell printer with no problems
Company stuck in the stone age. I agree with the poster who complained about the drivers not being available for download. In this day and age, there is no excuse for a company not making such things available for their customers. A voice recorder is tool for on the go. So we should have to carry a CD with us as well in case we want to plug the recorder into a different machine? This is just a case of wanton disrespect of the customer by a big company
Returned it the next day. For $500, Bose sells an extremely easy-to-setup pair of TV speakers that sound no better than your TV.  The "Acoustimass" unit is apparently trying to be a subwoofer, but maybe only dogs can hear it.  Seriously, I unplugged the two main speakers to hear what that big thing was supposed to do, and all I heard was some muffled noise.  (Trust me, I had it hooked up right.)  I fell for the Bose Cinemate at the Target demo wall, where it sounded pretty good.  But once I hooked it up at home and compared it with my TV (Samsung 50 inch DLP) speakers, I realized it was a joke.  I took the advice of reviewer TH below and bought the combination (Onkyo/Polk/Sony) he recommends.  For the same price, much much more value, including better sound and the ability to play other audio sources like CDs.  Can you believe that this Bose unit has absolutely no sound output controls?  You can't even adjust bass and treble.  I will admit, however, that the universal remote they provide worked great, even emulating my Motorola Moxi DVR controls.  But that was the only thing I was sorry to send back
Not worth the money. I recently bought this unit after returning 2 defective 9430 models by Cobra and I'll have to say there is no improvement as I had thought. My impression was 'pay more and get a better product' but in this case that is not true. This detector gave me nothing more than a series of false alarms or no alarms. When radar was detected correctly, it was either too late (less than 1/4 mile) or the alert signal did not increase as I approached the radar making me think it was another false alarm. Thankfully Cobra covers their units for one full year and it is on its way back for replacement. I will say that their customer service is much better than my luck with their radar detectors. I spoke to a live rep right away, something rare to get these days! A UPS postage paid sticker was sent right out to me. I hope the replacement unit works correctly
Faulty router with web utility config issues. I bought this router and since day one I had problems in accessing the configurations through the web utility. Linksys support's suggestions didn't work. I researched the problem and noticed that a lot of other people were having issues in accessing the router configurations through the web utilitiy. I problably had a faulty router to begin with. Anyhow I send it back for a refund
Wrong application - not suited for use with radios!!!!. Even though this AC Power Adaptor was listed on the Amazon website as an accessory for a Sony portable transistor radio, the instructions with the radio and the Power Adaptor both clearly state that it is not suited for use with a radio, because it will cause the radio to HUM!!!!  Sure enough it is totally unusable with a radio because of the HUM!!!  The only AC Power Adaptor to be used with a Sony portable radio is a Sony Model AC-E45HG, which is unavailable through Amazon or anywhere else that I can find!!
crappp. sure it gives you better signal strength but it doesnt detect all network connections. DO NOT BUY THIS ITE
Horses for Courses. I have no axe to grind with Bose.  I originally bought this speaker for a custom cabinet with almost no room for a center channel set up.  This speaker has an incredibly small footprint.  If space is limited, this is not a bad option.However, being honest, this is not a great center channel speaker.  Choosing speakers is like the addage "certain horses for certain courses."  Your budget, your room, your components - all play a part.I have two home theater setups.  One is a daily gathering area with basic in wall treatments from Polk Audio.  The other is a dedicated theater utilizing Definitive Technologies with B&K Reference 7.1 Processing.  Clearly the Bose VCS-10 can not hold its own with my larger setup.  However, I have run it with my Polk Audio's and it was workable.  The timbre match was slightly off and the vocals were not as sharp as they are with my Polk CSi3 but it was not awful.My bottom line - you can certainly buy a better center channel speaker.  Can you buy a better one in this price range.  I think so - if you are only focused on the quality of this one speaker and not the blended sound of your system.  You should always buy the best components within your budget - but remember you are building a system - it's not just about one speaker.  If this speaker fits your space and (more importantly) matches your other speakers, then it may be the right speaker for you
misleading advertising. I was not aware until purchasing, that the U3 Smart Drive by Kingston would not run just any software but only certain programs therefore it is mostly useless to me.  However I will use it as a general back up thumb drive
where should I start?  it's a BAD phone. I have gone through three over 9months.    Tried different stores and made sure the box was factory fresh.the issues listed are the same for all three.1.  extremely POOR voice quality2.  low volume3.  people on other end of line complain of excessive loudness.   so the speaker stinks but the mic is good?4.  callerid doesn't allow me to simply hit TALK after receiving a call.so I if get a call from someone, and I scroll through the list of numbers, it does NOT dial correctly cause it doesnt' add the 1.   I can't figure out how to add the one through the menu.the phone is junk and will be regifted to someone I hate
Limited range, several issues. I paid about $12 + shipping for this at CompUSA. Net $18 or so. It's probably worth about $10 total.I get about an 8 foot line of sight range. The Griffin FAQ on this mentions two issues: RF interference with 433.92 MHz devices (common in home security systems and some phones) and battery issues. They suggest testing the range away from interference and then swapping battery.I tested away from interference and got the same results. Then I took it apart (it's not designed to be opened) and found the battery was cemented in.I called tech support and got a message they were in a meeting. I tried submitting an online message and got a 'server malfunction' error from their server.I'd recommend this device for use in automobiles and motorbikes. It would also work on a bike, but riding a bike with impaired hearing is illegal in some states (and should probably be illegal everywhere)
Impossibleto receive SW. I bought this radio 2 years ago. My worst 80 dollars. It is pratically impossible to get 1 short wave station. I have tried everything. Nothing, nada. Also the slide for the volume is terrible. You can't control the volume. They should remove this radio from the market, or at least remove the short wave reception, since you can't hear nothing
Extremely Incosistent...poor performance. I've messed around with this product for about 4 hours and have wanted to throw it against the wall multiple times.The mouse function is not smooth...that's if it is even working.The functionality during a powerpoint presentation is very hit or miss. I plan on doing many laptop presentations and feel extremely un-confident in utilizing this product for fear of experiencing embarassing technical difficulties.I plan on trying other wireless products, hopefully with better results...apparently I can't even return this opened product. Ugh.-Dissatisfied customer.
This Lock is GARBAGE!. This Locking System is GARBAGE.I have 20 of these for a set of 20 laptops that we use as a training lab.1) These locks are difficult to operate as all parts of the lock turn.2) The mechanism is difficult to work and prone to problems because of the way the flip-switch on the back of the lock sits.3) We have had 3 of these locks freeze up. NO combination will open them. 4) 2 times I have had to use a hack saw to remove them from the laptop.I recommend that you DO NOT BUY this lock!!
Works best with one pc only. I have a linksys router hooked up to a Power Line Bridge and on the other end another PLB hooked up to a PC.  It works just fine.  The problem is when I add a second PLB/PC.  Sometimes it works for a while and then the line drops and sometimes it doesn't work at all.  For some reason, the IP addressing goes off when adding a second (or third) unit.  So I am constantly resetting the router, cutting the power, disabling and enabling the PC LAN connection to manipulate them into working again.  Frankly, as you can see, it's driving me up the wall.  I'm starting to debate laying cable under my house (wireless isn't an option because I use 2.4 gig. telephones.Like I said, with only one PC, the system is flawless
don't waste your money. doesn't work for me - i live an hour north of boston and an hour south of portland - not the best area for reception but the little wire antenna that came with my stereo works a lot better than thi
i dont like this mouse. I dont like this mouse, i brought, and never work, its useles
Sure they're cute BUT...... Sure, these colorful jewel cases are pretty to look at but I give their functionality an F. As soon as I opened one of these cases to put a CD in it, the case broke. It happened to 3 cases out of the 12 I have used already. I wasn't using excessive force, in fact most people call me gentle. Buy at your own risk and HANDLE WITH CARE!
features don't work and Panasonic is aware. I have the 2.4 ghz 4000 version and I love it, but it does buzz sometimes because of my home wireless network, so I thought I'd try the 5.8ghz. What a surprise to find it isn't as good. Yes it has some nice features that do work, but over all, it way over priced and flawed. 1. it's really hard to get a call off hold once you place them on hold. I never did figure out how to do that. 2. it's really difficult to call in to get your messages, knowing what to push, waiting to be told and you better have a lot of patience if you push a wrong button. 3. it's supposed to page you when a caller leaves a message. My 4000 pages me with the caller id of the person who left the messages, from the main unit. The hand sets page me with the number of the handset so I know which one the message is on. The new 4500 pages you with a blank page. You don't even have a way of knowing for sure that it was your phone system that did page you. It dials your pager, then nothing, so I get paged with a blank page, as if someone called my pager and didn't leave a message, or my cell phone with number held. 4. the pause key doesn't work in the paging portion of the phone, so you can enter a number and a pause to wait before continuing to enter numbers. 5. The worst part of the phone system is Panasonic, I'm sorry to say. I buy a lot of Panasonic products, but I won't be so much in a hurry to buy this name brand. They do not answer emails, I spent hours on the phone only to have the "techs" read to me from the manual that I have... they don't know the phone. No one bothers to ask or look into anything and after they read to you from the manual, they hang up on you, so you have to start over. I took it back and I went back to using my 4000, which is many years old (5 or 6). When I finally did get responses from Panasonic, via email, I was told that "that feature doesn't work, that feature doesn't work, that feature doesn't work" and "if that feature doesn't work, return for replacement". I had to go back to my email to see the order in which the questions were being answered; very impersonal
Horrible Color. I have used HP printers for years, I administrate a network and have dozens of HP printers (b&w, as well as color).  While b&w and spot color printing are very good, color pictures are tremendously dark.  A print of a picture of a bright sunny day will look overcast and stormy.  I have changed drivers and re-calibrated the printer to no avail.  HP support, while normally very good, has been disappointing
Complete Waste of Money. If you buy it, you'll be spending forty bucks on a stand with no features that the Zune doesn't already provide (sync cable output, headphone jack, that's it).  This might be worth buying if it came with speakers (you'd think Zune would want to provide accessories that compete with iPod instead of making the iPod look so much better!).  I suppose if you want waste more money to buy the remote (sold separately), it might be worth paying twenty bucks for the dock, but definitely not forty or whatever discount Amazon might give
maybe better with a Sony?. Adds volume but overall I would say the sound quality is very similar or not as good without this device. I use it with my Olympus WS-300m. Maybe it would work better with a Sony. It is also more prone to have interferance and it will make a loud noise when it picks up on something. I don't use it just in case it makes that noise I don't want it to ruin my recording.
Finally got rebate. I had all the same rebate issues with this item as others, so if you are buying this CD case just because of the rebate, please DON'T.  I did finally receive my rebate, 4 months later after a second mailing in and irate email.  I just cashed the check and I'm crossing my fingers that it actually goes through!  The product itself seems okay.  I can see if you use it a lot that the zipper might break, but I rarely get into my CDs so I haven't had that issue yet.  However, I do not plan to ever buy from this company again because of all the rebate run around.  A very dishonest company if you ask me.  Good luck to everyone else waiting for a rebate
Excellent sound, Bad design. As most anyone will tell you, these speakers do have excellent sound and if you're just going to set them up on your desktop, then I'd give them 5 stars.  However, the design for wall mounting these is horrible and you can't ceiling-mount them.  Logitech does not make separate mounts for these and no "universal speaker mounts" will work with them.  If you want to see how they mount, go to Logitech's website, go to product support and enter wall mounting.  Some might argue that they're computer speakers, not home entertainment center speakers, but for $300, I expect a little bit better design
Nice Try. One month after purchase one speaker power supply burnt out.  The support company, Recton, is bankrupt.  Thomsen has taken over support but you need to return everything just to get a power supply.  Cheaper to buy a power supply at Radio Shack.  I'd suggest taking your money elsewhere
The worst phone I've ever owned. This phone system is now in a box where all my old and failed electronics go.  You could be 2 feet from the base and all handsets still sounded scratchy like an old cell phone.  I have a 2.4ghz and a 900mhz phone in the house and they work like a champ and have been where the Uniden base was....so its not the location.If I could give this product a zero star I would!
This backpack didn't hold up. Pro'sIt's really roomy.... ample room for my old brick of a computer Dell 15" inspiron 6800 and my tiny HP NC6230.  Good sized for overnight.Con'sNo compression straps when you have a smaller load to carry.I ended up ripping the nylon on the bag accidently as it got hooked on the side of a gym locker.  not as good as ripstop nylon.The zipper "teeths" aren't secure/strong enough... the bag would separate at the zippers numerous times.  Eventually, the zippers all broke loose in one night, even the separate zipper for the laptop.
Doesnt last for long. I regret buying this product since day1 u have to reboot it again and again and now atlast after 6 months only it died on me
Horrible design!. Thank goodness for Apple they made a product designed well enough to get you just past a year (1-year warrenty) and then die. I would hate for them to have to replace all these horribly designed $100 dollar iPods.
NOT Mac compatable. Purchased this item, was thrilled that it was so inexpensive.Cable got here, I take it out of the package, it's too short to use with my Windows XP desktop PC, unless I want my iPod Nano sitting on the floor under and slightly behind my desk. It does work, but I've got a longer, better cable for that same purpose. But that's ok, we bought it as a second cable so that my husband can use it with his Apple iBook, and his Mac OS formatted iPod Video. So he plugged the cable into his iPod, and into every different USB port on his iBook... nothing happens.This cable is not compatable with Macs! If you're not a Windows user don't bother, it won't work for you!I had to get a refund for mine, the seller was nice enough to give a refund without my having to even send the cable back, since I suppose it would have ended up costing them more to reimburse me for shipping it BACK to them than it did to just give me my money back.The product page needs to specify that this is a Windows-only compatable cable. Although if I hadn't experienced it myself, I probably wouldn't have believed it, that a CABLE can work with one OS but not another
Don't do it. Don't buy it.  In the 6 months I had the phone, the screen burnt out so I can see the numbers, the answering machine is horrible, and I get better reception from my baby monitor.  I had a cheap Panasonic beforehand which was much better.  This was a complete waste of $$.  Hooking it up to your PC to get those "cool" features is just a pain.  I'm having a tough time returning this.  Be careful
Bad Choice!. I bought this Mp3 player because it was just a few bucks cheaper than the Ipod and I ended up paying dearly for it.  It is a piece of junk that stopped working only after a couple months.  The firmware decided to stop recognizing songs, albums titles, and eventually that there was even any music to listen to.  Now I have a 200$ dollar mp3 player with no music on it that will not interface with my PC.  Customer service? Don't count on it.  So if your into extensively troubleshooting, highly frustrating, pieces of junk, this is a great product.
terrible product. When we first bought this television we thought it was great. 18 months later, it stopped working. We thought it was the lamp. Wrong. Two "authorized" Samsung service centers can't seem to fix it. It has been in the repair shop for 3 months and hasn't been working for over 4 months. We've spent $600 so far and now we're looking to buy another set, definitely not Sansung
Griffin iFM. Functionally, the iFM is great. I like to use it for workouts at the gym to watch FM transmitted TV's. However, the construction is extremely cheap. I bought two of them and both fell apart. One fell apart the second time I used it. The construction is so cheap that I couldn't put it back together because the controls don't line up. I wish there was an alternative but I can't find one. I like being able to switch between iPod tunes and FM, but will have to carry two devices from now on
Using this Power Supply with a radio. I read the other reviews before I purchased this power supply. The one review stated that for Short Wave radio use, the power supply created significant interference, but for FM use it was probably fine. Most of our use is for FM, so I purchased the power supply. Locally, our town is considered to be "radio free". Our experience is that for "the one" strong local radio station reception overpowered the interference.For the rest of the stations there was significant interference. We've opted to not use the power supply when we are listening to the stationswe want to listen to. And, just decided to send the Power Supply back.The package clearly states in the first note "Do not use this AC adaptor with a radio as it may cause some noises". Information on web did not sufficiently declare this weakness.
Don't buy... I've had this flash drive for 2 months. It was working fine until recently. Now it doesn't even light up. I've had my other flash drive (lexar) for about 4 years and it still works. It is flimsy and at first I liked the case it came with because I could attach it to my keychain. Now I think the case might have caused it to malfunction. I'm disappointed, luckily I didn't lose much data!
Will not work with PrintServers. I bought this printer and printserver separate so at any time I could switch out the printer without having to buy another wireless network ready printer.  Problem is the HP Laserjet 1020 doesn't work with either the Netgear or Linksys Printservers which boggles the mind.  My customer wan't happy and neither am I
2 major design flaws - Buy Kensington version instead. I purchased this product, but after 3 months of frustrating use wound up throwing it away.The first problem is that the structural support of the power tips between the laptop plug and the cord plug is the electrical solder!  The effect of this is that if you use the adapter on the road where it's subject to a lot of plug and unplug and varying mechanical stress, the solder breaks.  You then at best have a tip with an intermittent connection.  I replaced the tip twice before giving up and getting another better designed adapter.The second problem is that when I unplugged the power adapter from the wall, it would cause my laptop (IBM T20) to emergency power off.  Unplugged at the laptop plug was fine.  I understand this to be an issue between the T20 power system and a surge issue in the adapter.I replaced this with a Kensington 33197 120W adapter.  It looks almost like the same product (same OEM?) except they have stronger power tips.  It also didn't have the power-off issue.I loved the form factor, but the product just didn't work
BEWARE OF EPSON "PLANNED OBSOLESCENCE". I will never buy another Epson Product after my Epson Stylus Photo RX500 died exactly 3 years after purchase. This was a lightly used machine for household purposes only.  I believe Epson pre-programs this obsolescence so that user is told "parts inside your printer have reached the end of their life..."  There is no toll free number to call -  No literature given at time of purchase deals with this event.  Very very disappointed with this manufacturer.
It only made things worse. I tried this product on two DVDs that would no longer play reliably. The scratches were minor and only in one part of each disc. After liberally spraying the "lubricant" and running each through the machine twice, then buffing just as the directions suggest, neither disc would load in the DVD player at all.I will be returning this product immediately and will advise anyone I can to avoid it
Gumy??. I do not know why they named these gumy headphones. There is nothing gumy about them except the look. They are large in size and as hard as a rock. I bought them for my 14 year old daughter and they are too big and uncomfortable. I tried them in my ears and agree. I recommend spending a little more money and getting something that is comfortable and it will sound better too
Photo is of wrong item. This is not an xD to Compactflash card adapter. If you order this item number, you will receive a PC card adapter that accepts xD picture cards and SmartMedia cards and fits your PCMIA 2.1 slot on a PC or Mac. It is not for a camera or substitute for a Compactflash card. There is nothing compact flash about it. The product you will recieved does not look like the photo on amazon's website
misleading prior Eton E-5 review. Just received radio yesterday, and am returning radio today! Pluses.... adequate LCD display and good illumination while on AC adapter. Good thumbwheel tuning in 1 Khz increments. Adequate speaker fidelity for small radio. However, the volume slew buttons have set "numbered" volume levels, and between settings of 5-6, there is a BIG noticeable increase in volume(not good), and while tuning shortwave bands, every approx 100Khz increment, there appears to be a "null" area, where signal meter reads a signal received, but quiet speaker. Also, on FM, if hands are near the radio, the signal breaks up(for weaker signals, not strong ones), and compared to my Grundig 400-PE, which I feel the sensitivity is not good and the hiss is bothersome, the Eton E-5 seems worse still!!! I am returning this today, and obtaining the Sony 7600GR instead. Eton E-5, not bad, but certainly not worth 3 stars or above, especially, if comparing it to another similar size radio, and then comparing it to my Sony 2010.
Cheap and Loud. Looks really good on the shelf but it's all show.  If you like/need modular, the connections are convenient, but the cables are low quality.  I purchased a much better unit manufactured by HIPER, the connectors and cables are much better.  If you don't need modular, Coolermaster is also much better quality.  I'm not just splitting hairs here, this unit does not compare to others in the same price range
Delivered Inoperable. The PD-M426 did not play CDs without static, bounces & other noise.I initially thought it was the CD cartridge or CD.  However; I have two of these units & the media tesed fine on my other unit.
many cases are broken. Check 10 cases, at least 6 are broken in new box. I don't want to waist my time to check the remain 15 pieces.
Don't buy. I got this CD player because I thought sony was a good company, plus I liked the look of it. But after just 5 months after purchase, and not even using it that often, it has already broken. I paid about 40 dollars for this CD player, so I am very disappointed. If I were you, I would buy a different CD player
good product but only lived a short life - 1 year. It was a great product when it worked.  Sleek design, super user friendly, sharp image and easily unlock to all region.  Never had any problem loading or playing until last week.  Went completely dead for no reason in the middle of a movie.  Swallowed the DVD with it.  It would've been a greater product if it lived pass 1 year at least
Uniden DCT758-4Expanded Cordless System with Digital Answering System and call Waiting/Caller ID. Phones had buzzing interferance,upon pickup calling party was not there all the time, volume always varied,either too loud or you could not hear caller
A fool & his money. soon parted.... very disapointed, bad design, not for the gym which is what I bought them for.. sound is OK, not wonderful... wish I would have read these reviews before I spent the $100.
Junk. I bought this radio as a Christmas gift for my seven year old son.  The CD player did not work. It was a bummer.  Also, when I bought it I did not know that is was a refurbished unit
DOES NOT WORK WITH SHUFFLE. Despite the product description (and even the box packaging!), the claim that this product works with the Shuffle is incorrect. IT DOES NOT WORK WITH THE NEW, TINY iPOD SHUFFLE. It only works with the old, "stick" form-factor Shuffle.So: cool design, looks and sounds great, but does not work as advertised.
Reeks!. I had the same experience as another reviewer here, the sleeves smell very strong (I put them out in the garage till I can return them). I bought these elswhere but came here to see if others had the same experience & low & behold yes they did! To me its almost a musty odor probably has something to do with them having to be shipped from Taiwan! The sleeves I've bought in the past were made by "Ampad" here in the US, I'll go back to buying their brand
ATI Products are NOT fully Vista compatible. I recently purchased this ATI TV Video Card which clearly stated "Vista Compatible".  The "FREE" ($11.00 in shipping???) remote is NOT compatible.  It took me THREE DAYS for ATI to admit that.  Clearly the company engages in misleading advertising.My recommendation: DO NOT BUY ATI PRODUCTS.
Poor design. There is something quite wrong with the Laser Mouse 6000, the shape is not right, it's kind of shallow.  I have to be conscious every time I grab this mouse so that I don't to hit the side buttons.  All in all, terrible
Neither Fail-Safe nor Fail-Seldom. Ran fine for just over a year. Pointedly, this took it just beyond the warranty period. Then, the converter in the AC power cord failed, mearly bursting into flames. Unfortunately, the failure mode also took out the modem itself. So, instead of a $15 power cord, I got to replace the whole modem. I bought a different brand this time, with a 3-year warranty. Ominously, however, both modems were made in China
Looks Good, But... The case looks great and fits well, but it's nearly impossible to remove.  I had to insert a credit card between the latches and pry for a long time.  I was afraid of hurting both the case and the iPod.  In addition, it's too wide in the case to dock in my Logitech speaker system.  I might have considered keeping it if I could have just snapped the case off for docking
Difficult. I bought this for my granddaughter, and I have used 3 other mp3 players, and this one is horrible. Getting 2 different computers to recognize it was impossible. Hello, this is 2006, this stuff should just plug and play, I thought I was back to DOS, and I am pretty computer savvy. Anyway, save yourself and get an Apple, Dell or Phillips. WOW
Great Sound but In a Stone Age Clock Radio. Let me start out by saying that I love Tivoli radios. I have a Model Two with a Model Sub-woofer in my living room and truly love the warm, rich sound along with the simple design and good looks. I liked the Model Two so much that I decided to buy the Model Three for the bedroom. Even in Mono mode, the sound is rich and exceptional and the tuner truly does pull in and lock onto FM stations as advertised. It looks beautiful and I had planned to order the up-firing companion speaker and have the ultimate clock radio. The problem I have is that as at least one other reviewer has stated the back light for the clock dial is so bright that I have not been able to sleep since I got the radio four days ago. I mean it is bright, you can make shadow figures on the wall from the light it puts out. I had to put a sock over the dial just to get some sleep. Now I feel foolish to have a $200.00 clock radio that I have to cover with a sock at night. Also the LEDS for the sleep and alarm function are bright enough alone to keep you awake. If you use the sleep function the LED stays on after the radio shuts off until you depress the button again and of course the alarm LED stays on all the time the alarm is set. Since Tivoli designed this to be a "bedroom radio" it is an inexcusable design flaw to not have include a means of toning down or disabling the back light for users that would prefer darkness while sleeping. I haven't tried the snooze function yet so haven't experienced the "snooze flaw" other reviewers have but it sounds pretty scary. One other clock flaw I experienced is that if I get home from work and go through my routine of getting everything ready for the next day before I settle in for the evening I discoverd that the 12 hour clock will sound the alarm if you try to set it for the next day within it seems a 2 hour window after the time you want to set the clock for the next day. In other words if you have the alarm set to wake up at 6:00 A.M. you can't activate the alarm until after 8:00 P.M. This bothers me because I personally have over slept more often by simply forgetting to set the alarm. In conclusion I cannot recommend buying this clock radio until Tivoli takes it back to the drawing board.
Bad product support. I set up everthing according to the Quick install. All setting is correct but i still could not print. I call Technical support,on hold for 20 minuts then told me he was not the right support agent. Back in the loop i go . wait for 30 more minutes 2nd agent told me the same thing. Don't waste your time calling thier support. if it work out of the box great if not return it don't waste ur life like i did
Started good but ended bad. I had this card for more than 6 months, and It worked super in my Canon Powershot A510. Transfers went well too. Then all of a sudden for no reason I kept getting "card error" on my computer and digital camera a week ago. My SD/USB converter couldn't find the card either. I had really good photos I wanted to transfer to my computer and now they are probably lost for good. What a joke
Super cute, sounds good, but.... I wouldn't buy these again and wish I hadn't paid so much for them either. (around $9)  I've had them for less then 5 months. At first they were perfect because they matched my pink Ipod, i thought the gooey stuff would feel nice... etc. I didn't have any problem with the sound quality. The problems I have/ had with it is the first month after I would use them the outer ear ( where they sit) would feel sore. (I don't listen to the music loud either so it wasn't that.) My ear doesn't hurt anymore after a use, so you will get use to the discomfort. Then main reason I wouldn't buy this earphone again is because the white cord sticks with dirt like glue. After awhile no matter what i used (clorox wipes, water, hand soap) i couldn't get it to return to it's nice white color and now it looks off-white or basically dirty. I also didn't like the part that connects the earphones to the Ipod or whatever you connect it too. For me, I like to slip my Ipod in my back pocket when i need to use both hands for something, well because there is a bend in the plug, it pops out of my pocket, disconecting from the Ipod. (The Ipod earphones stick straight out and are as thin as the Ipod) Since I'm a student I haven't gotten around to, or feel like spending money, to get another, different  set, I strongly advise you not to buy this product. If anything I would recommend the normal Ipod earphones, or keep searching for some better ones.
Crippled Design. Requires installation of bloated software on every Windows machine you want to transfer files too.Only works with a Windows machine.From the Manual (of which I couldn't copy and paste from because it is "copy protected") a note states "Tracks that have been digitally recorded on a Hi-MD device and then imported to SonicStage cannot be written to Audio CD."  So if you hook up a digital mixer to the MD to record your band you are out of luck.Transfers to and from the computer often fail and corrupt your file.  The Manual states "Tracks that have been recorded on a Hi-MD Walkman can be imported  ... to SonicStage ... only once."  So you're out of luck if there is a power outage while transferring that recording of your band's greatest live performance.From the Manual "Tracks transferred to the the MD ... from another computer cannot be transferred back to My Library on your computer."  So god forbid if you actually use more then one computer to manage your the audio you record with this device
Worked poorly, then broke!. This thing was a major hassle from the start.  Difficult to set up (even for an experienced computer user like me).  Once it was set up, it took about 5 minutes to get an IP address every time I connected to it.  For the non-tech savvy, that means I would turn on my computer, connect to the network, then wait 5 minutes to be able to go online, even though I was laready fully connected to the device.  That level of terrible performance is simply unacceptable.Then, about 4 months after I bought it, it up and broke.Don't waste your money on this terrible, terrible piece of equipment
Only comes with one mount. I returned this product. It only comes with one mount. I felt the description indicated there would be two. I went to Wal-Mart and was able to purchase a pair that worked great for less than $9.00.
Disapointment. I'm very disapointment about this product, I think it look so ugly in my car and doesn't have good sound.Realmente luce muy feo en mi carro, me parece un aparato sin ergonomia y muy mal diseado, ademas no suena tan bien, se escucha cierta interferencia cuando se le sube el volumenNo lo recomiendo, estoy decepcionad
did not get it in the mail yet. I have been charged however I did not get a copy of the policy to date.
still can not get to operate on internet. a virtual nightmare with set up. no help from their support staff on phones, nor online Q&A. poorest choice i ever have made in a product!!I am a savvy computer type with network experience and this one for the books. Item still sitting where i left it......., useless
Sorry to make the first review a bad one. Looking for my first MP3 player, thought something small and inexpensive might be where to start, so got I this one. Big mistake. The screen was just impossible to read (TINY in EVERY WAY) and the included instructions were utterly useless. I'm not sure what purpose the CD serves because I couldn't get anything from it but warnings about possibly screwing up my laptop if I continued and error messeges. I know there are 8 year olds out there who could figure this out easily but I really need something simpler to use and easier to read. I am going to return this and try something that is about twice the price
IMPOSSIBLE. Okay, For one, I don't know how this is getting good reviews. Maybe I got a lemon...There are two things that i hate about this product.1) It is matte. The surface to write on is not smooth. This makes writing akward and unpleasant.2) It is nearly impossible to apply and since only 1 comes in the package if you mess up... you mess up...DONT GET THIS! Its also overpriced! $!2 for 1!!! C'mon.. At j&r they sell a 15 pack of a similar product for $9.99This is a waste of money
Very Poor technical Support. My Tv started to have sound problems and I sent off an email to Olevia. No response. Then tried calling support - had to leave a message.Days later after no response I called and transferred to sales - helpful guy and wanted all the details but again he could not help and would have tech support call me back - NO LUCK with call back3 weeks go by and now I am getting rather ticked at the no response. So rewrote email again - no response.Called tech support and left my number - no response.Again called sales and got another person.Got a live body - Yaaahoo! - could not help but forwarded me to customer service (to give me the service at home number). Customer service could not help and said Tech support were the ones to talk to. After an hour plus on hold I get to talk to a tech. 1/2 hour later he came to the conclusion that I needed service.The support issue is really bad. My recomendation is call them yourself before you buy the TV.Oh, and Good Luck!!!
Unhappy. Product was difficult to setup and didnt come with complete instructions.  Had to call tech support (India?) and after 30 min. on the phone was able to complete the installation.  Unfotunately after all that work I discovered that my printer (Xerox) was one of the "few" printers not compatable with the Netgear wireless print server
Garbage!. To back up my personal DVD collection I burned 200 discs.  100 on these Memorex DVD+R's, 100 on Philips DVD+R's.  EVERY Memorex had flaws during playback.  EVERY Philips was flawless.  I've been buying Memorex for years but I'll never buy Memorex again
Looks great works bad. I bought this for my 4 kids who love the frozen drinks. But, I soon found that it does not work well. After a few uses the gears began to stick. It would no longer crush/shave ice. Stick with the smaller units
not usable due to SonicStage. Hardware awesome, software a flop. Since you HAVE to use their software the package is destroyed. I will give you the final nail on the coffin for me. I tried to put Podcasts on the device using the latest SonicStage 4. No chance. It wants to be able to find each "artist" in the Sony library. This was bad for the odd bit of music it could not find but obviously it can not find the podcasts in their library.I had bought one of these and had considered one for the girlfriend - no chance now. Shame as the hardware was A1
Non Adjustable Headband Is Uncomfortable. The headband on these headphones is a fixed size, so they are held in place by the pressure of the earpads against your ears. They were uncomfortable after 5 seconds, so I can't imagine wearing them for any significant length of time. I'm not sure what they were thinking - one size fits all is not a good idea for headphones
No support!. I paid 300+ dollars for a NEW Magellan GPS less than a yearand a half ago from boat Us and they have already declared it obsolete. If you expect any support DO NOT BUY Magellan.
The Price Isn't Worth It. Buy Something That Works!. I have owned this projector for almost a year and a half.Let's start with the PROs:Its a projector. It projects. I am using it on a 9.5ft screen in my bedroom.Thats about it for that section.Now onto the CONs:Within a month, the DVD player stopped recognizing any type of media placed in it (DVD, DVD-R, CD). It does not load. Being that I own an alternate DVD-player, I just hooked that one up and ignored the problem, hoping that that would be the end of my difficulties (as shipping back to the company for repair comes out of my pocket, eventhough its under warranty, and not having a "television" to watch for that period wasn't beneficial).Next issue came to a head about 8 months after purchase when turning it on one day, the motor ran very loudly (a noise-level you have to speak almost in a yell when sitting beside the person with which you are conversing). The color also seemed to be off (reds appear a muddy brown, image is much darker without variating tones, i.e. naturally high contrast). This more than takes the thrill out of watching bloody horror flix.The only source that has a reduced buzz is when using it as a computer monitor, but this still is very loud, especially on start-up. Since then, this is the only way I watch my movies, through the DVD-ROM on my computer projecting a horrible image on the wall.My computer speakers also provide much better sound than the built-in system speakers, which is very necessary to use in order to hear anything over the loud buzzing (If you close your eyes, you would think it was a chainsaw)The picture itself is also very dim. I have two narrow windows in my room, both with mini-blinds and a curtain, yet it is still difficult in the daytime to watch anything that isn't a bright cartoon. (Back to my love of horror movies, this causes a dilemma)Finally after saving up enough money to purchase a replacement, I am having an Epson Powerlight 76c shipped to me. Hopefully this projector will last longer than the Optoma.I HIGHLY recommend researching other projectors before buying this one. Just because it has a built in DVD-player, don't let that win you over. It's just as easy to hook-up an external DVD-player to a better projector.I purchased this with the 9.5ft screen on the home shopping network for 2200$. Talk about PRICEY! Next time I won't be so hasty to purchase anything. This is a piece of junk. Try the Epson Powerlight 96c. I have researched and read many good things about this projector. It costs less, AND the lumens is 2000, 1000 more than the Optoma, meaning that you can watch dark movies during the day. Hook up your own Cheap $20 DVD-player. I guarantee you that even the cheapest of DVD-players will last longer than this system's built-in one. Go for quality not cheap hooks
Looks good, but....... The player came in excellenct condition.  Exactly what we were looking for: compact, sturdy, a pleasure to look at, easy for a 4-year-old to use. But as a previous reviewer commented, it refused to play all songs on any cd inserted.  Out of 13 songs, it only played 9.  I tried many different cds, but to no avail.  My product was returned the day after I received it
Horrible quality. I bought this product.  The second time I used it the volume control broke.  I can't adjust the volume.  So I returned it for another one of the same model with the manufacturer.  Three days later, the same problem, the volume control broke.  Horrible quality product.  The manufacturer should pull the product and address the problem.
Stopped working after using twice MP3. After spending hours downloading songs, the player quit on me.  Tried replacing batteries, did all the trouble shooting - nothing.  I purchased it January 30 2007 and it is now past the return to amazon.  Please someone tell me how to get my money back!!!
Total Junk. I have to reboot this at least twice per day. Netgear refuses to acknowledge that their Access Point sucks
Typical Lousy Razer Performance. The Copperhead was my 3rd and last attempt to get a decent performing gaming mouse from the Razer people. I have had 2 Diamondbacks and this Copperhead, all with inherent problems that could not be resolved. The biggest being the expense of the mice.The Copperhead being the worst of the three with an update format that takes a rocket scientist to get it figured out and never really stood up to half the work it took to get it working second rate. The Diamondback's both would drop out on "boot-up" and leave you mouse less. I did ALL the updates and preps by the manufactures specs and never got them to work right. I have given up on Razer and I suggest that any good gamers not waste their money on Razer's product!I give it 2 stars and that strictly for the lights and color.
Less than a year and gone......!. I really NEEDED this printer.  I even overlooked the 'shaking' of the printer and table it sat on during printing.  In less than a year-the scanner errors began and the ink catridge symbols are a problem.  I have always loved HP but now will try a Canon printer
not so waterproof. Initially, this worked okay, but after a few weeks, i was swimming and all of a sudden my mp3 player stopped playing.  When I looked at the case, water had seeped inside, ruining my mp3.
Overpriced Underperformance. I have owned many radios and purchased this received short wave stations and to get better reception for local stations.  This radio did neither. This radio performed worse than a $10 cheapy radio which received station more easily and much clearer.  I returned this radio shortly after trying it. What a waste! Do not buy this piece of junk
Good for about 30 cards... So after scanning my first batch of cards (which it worked great for), the scanner simply stopped working correctly.  It couldn't be recalibrated and won't read any more cards.  I called tech support only to learn that this is a known problem, there is no fix available and that it's likely due to their outsourcing of the manufacturing of this product.  I'm returning the one I got and I'd strongly recommend against getting one until the quality issues are resolved
impossible to use without additional accessories. Comes with lousy instructions and is not complete, as far as I can tell.
Runs hot. Functions absolutely flawlessly under Vista 64bit (unlike most other cards such as my older WinTV PVR-150).  If not for the next paragraph, I'd give it five stars for just this.  Heck, it does better under Vista x64 than my old card did under WinXP 32.  (Disclaimer: I tested the analog video only, not the digital.)But I discovered that it was running extrememly HOT, even when just sitting their idle.  So hot that you literally can't even touch it.  Ouch!  I ended up removing it from the case as I didn't trust it. Perhaps it's a vista driver issue in that the driver is not card go idle even when it's not in use.  Emailed tech support but they offered no real answer other than it shouldn't be warm at all
One word, disappointment. I didn't give it a one because it started out ok.  I have a Compaq, Presario with the integrated Intel 817 video chipset.  I purchased  the Ali 6pt USB 2 PCI  to USB card to use with an external 200Gb USB hard drive.  I inserted the card into an open slot and  everything went pretty smooth install-wise.  The card worked wonderfully with the hard-drive.  Then I bought a 30Gb iPod.  This is where my previously  considered 4-star card went south.  I plugged it into the card and everything froze.  I tried every  conceived configuration, but to no avail.  Then I also learned my Odessa 12" pressure pad, my Compaq USB keyboard, or even a USB Logitech mouse won't even work with it.  The rule of thumb is your USB devices will work as fast as the slowest link in the chain, but it should work.  The iPod works if I plug it into one of my integrated onboard USB 1.1 slots (albeit sans the transfer speed of USB 2).  Frustrated, I did some research and found the chipset the Ali card uses to be incompatible with many USB devices.  What's the point of that?  Lesson learned.  If you're going to buy an inexpensive PCI-USB card and want to take the chance it will work for you then go ahead, but the NEC chipset is the way to go for across-the-board compatibility.  I hope this helps someone
Awful. Clock radio-alarm does not work. Manufacturer does not list telephone number. Apparently Customer Service does not exis
Not worth the extra money for Lightscribe. It really isn't worth the extra money to pay for Lightscribe CDs.  When you do use Lightscribe, it does even look good.  It is very faint and the writing is very small. Just use a label instead..
Mine broke quickly!  Software is terrible. I agree with all the other feedback saying this product is faulty.  The on/off button is terrible.  It takes 5 tries to turn the unit off.  After 5 months of using this, the unit would no longer "talk" with the satellites.  I sent it back to DeLorme.  It tested bad.  Now I have waited 6 weeks for a replacement that is backordered.  Customer service rep will not refund your purchase after 30 days!  The software claims it will compute driving routes for you...but it will crash your PDA instead.  I had to buy INav IGuidance software (which is outstanding) to get software that will actually compute road routes for me.  I would not recommend this product to anyone.  It has been a complete waste of money for me
No support!. I paid 300+ dollars for a NEW Magellan GPS less than a yearand a half ago from boat Us and they have already declared it obsolete. If you expect any support DO NOT BUY Magellan.
super streaky. After some use of my new notebook (Sony Vaio FE590P) I started collecting dust and fingerprints on the display.  I purchased the monitor wipes to clear the display.  I was foolish enough to trust the packaging!  I expected the product to be streak free.  I tried wiping my monitor with the product and it quickly dried and left horrible visible streaks.  I discarded the first "wipe" and tried again with the second one.  It also left streaks.  I tried wiping vertically instead of horizonatally.  It left streaks.  I tried wiping in circles.  It left streaks.I tried inquiring about my problem by visiting the manufacturer's web page.  My inital thought was that perhaps I had received a bad batch of product.  I filled out a form and never received a response.  My new thought is that I've been cheated.Ultimately I purchased a 3M microfiber cloth and some cleaning solution.  That did clear up the streaks left by the monitor wipes
Not Fit For Purpose. I will not bother repeating the specific complaints of numerous reviewers, in  general, this product should not even be sold.It is not a real NAS in any meaningful sense of the word. There would be similar value in simply getting a USB-attached hard drive since it is not as if a Sonos or anything else could access it - no real sharing.Get a real product. I am embarassed for the retailers who actuallly sell this product. It was the only NAS available at the nearby Office Depot, which is why I have this glorified doorstop. As soon as I get my Buffalo Linkstation running again (my fault that I bricked it - not Buffalo's) I will happily be taking this thing off my network and out of my life.It doesn't even support filename lengths permitted by Windows or Linux. It really is an unbelievably poor product.
Worked like a charm for 24 hours. Install went smooth on my W2K/dell inspiron notebook. Everything worked fine for 24 hours then it just stopped. Worked with customer support for about an hour getting nowhere. This thing is junk. I'm sending it back
CD Player does not work. I have exchanged this karaoke machine twice already but the CD player does not work. I can't believe that Toys R US would have this toy on their shelves!!!! It is really annoying. I plan to return it and buy another karaoke machine
Broken out the box. This took out the package, plugged it in, and got nothing. The power light would not come on. The connection going into the unit seemed to be flimsy. After wiggling the wire around, I got some static on the screen. Finally I got the power to stay on, and tried playing a DVD. It played a few minutes and then froze up. Repeated this 3 times, put it back in the package, and mailed back to Amazon
Buy Palm USB Charger / Car Kit. I have a USB AC charger and car charger that came with my Palm PDA, and they work just fine with my Nano.  Don't waste your money supporting Apple when it charges $30 for basically a piece of plastic
couldn't   see print. type it up, print it out and all you get is a blank label.  couldn't see the prin
Poor performer. This little D-link box is reasonably simple to configure and use. Even using fast broadband service at both ends, audio quality was rather poor (I suspect the microphone is not very good) and the video was awful mainly because of the camera's extremely poor quality. I wonder what possessed D-Link to fit such a device with a camera that's about the same level of quality as a $15 USB webcam. Under ordinary interior lighting conditions, it is impossible to get a clear, naturally colored picture: all you will get is a noisy, muddy mess. Of course the lens quality matches the image sensor: it's awful.This is a real shame, because D-Link almost made a pretty good product here. The user interface and configuration are reasonably simple and well explained in the manual, and the performance passable. Unfortunately, the built-in microphone and camera are so bad they make an otherwise fairly decent product unusable
Bad Bad Bad. I had this product less than a week when it failed to play any DVDs.the tv is ok. But over all not worth it
Unreliable. With the DiNovo Cordless Media Bluetooth Desktop, Logitech has produced a product with a sleek appearance.   The product looks sharp and the mouse has a nice hand-feel.  The mouse has a rechargeable battery and comes with a recharging cradle, so the disappointment of finding a dead battery in your cordless mouse has been relegated to "the old days."  When the product works, there is a noticeable lag between keyboard entry or mouse movement and a response on the screen.  Surprisingly, the lag time seems to be greater for this bluetooth device than my older non-bluetooth cordless desktop, but it is not so long as to make the product unusable.  However, this product has two fatal flaws.  First, as other reviewers have found, my experience with the DiNovo is that it crashes constantly.  Secondly, Logitech is no help whatsoever with this product.  A keyboard and mouse that work less than 50% of the time is simply not acceptable for my needs.  Bottom line is this product didn't even help my clutter problem on my desk, because my corded keyboard and corded mouse have to sit right next to the computer, for rapid access whenever this product decides to stop working.  This product is troublesome, unreliable and decidedly NOT RECOMMENDED
Fantastic  Product!  But Don't Buy it Here!!. I love this minisisc. It holds an incredible amount of songs--the equivolent of an I-pod mini-- and the ease of use of my minidisc recorder is great. BUT DON'T BUY IT HERE! Just by having it in my order it jacked up the shipping charge by $9.00 while everything else in my order would have been shipped free. And you can get them at your neighborhood Radio Shack for the same price as here. I got a HI-MD recorder instead of an I-Pod and I'm glad I did. Just don't buy the disks from Amazon
If I could find a better pouch I would. I would not buy this again.  The edge of the pouch impinges on the earphones connection and already wore out I set of earphones.  The attachment to a belt is tricky to use, cant be done one handed and frequently unlatches when I am moving around.  I am in the market for a better one
Too bulky; low battery life; poor quality. I bought this phone to replace a GE phone.  It's a lot bulkier and heavier with a much lower battery life.  The sound quality is ok if I'm in the same room with the base, but has a constant "record skipping" sound when I leave the room with it.  I bought this phone because it was just a few dollars more than a new battery for my old phone.  I wish I'd just bought the new battery instead
0 for 2 on compatibility. I tried this adapter with two different iPod docking port devices: a Belkin TuneBase FM transmitter for the iPod Mini, and the iPod connector integrated into my car's Pioneer radio.  With the Belkin, my shuffle charged, but no audio made it through the adapter.  With my car stereo, I got the message "iPod communication error" on my Pioneer display screen.  So, this was a nice concept, but the adapter did not work with either of my devices
Not Sure if This Thing Does Anything. The first one i had was broken.  So Amazon replaced it, quick.  Thanks!  Anyhow... It doesn't take a genius to figure out how to plug it in, but they could have given SOME instructions.  What does the little knob do?  Anything?  I can't tell any difference.  How should I point the antenna for best reception?  People and objects moving about the house can affect the reception, channels come an go sometimes for no reason.  I can get the same quality picture just by hooking up a long coax...
DO NOT BUY!!!!!!!. I bought this Mp3 player about 5 months ago and it just stopped working. I did nothing to it to provoke it to break. It has a 1 year warranty by iaudio, so I have spent the last 3 days trying to get a hold of the company, but quess what! they don't exist! A phone number leads you to a website that dosen't work, how convienant for cowon to be ripping off consumers with thier crappy products. STAY AWAY FROM ALL COWON PRODUCTS. i just lost 100 dollars
Don't Buy if near US/Canada Border. This GPS comes with US map on the SD card and Canada map on the included CD but never the twain shall meet.By car I'm a few hours from Canada and several days from the eastern US but I can't swap out the faraway eastern US part of the map on the TomTom Go 300 for a nearby Canadian map.  It's either all Canada or all contiguous US.  This is a major functional flaw if you live near the US/Canada border or live further away and like to take cross-border trips.Oh, and if you do decide to swap out the US map, be sure to save it on your computer first - TomTom doesn't bother to provide a backup on the CD so if you don't first make your own backup before changing to the Canadian map you can't later get the US map back
Overpriced. This model was much more expensive than other brands because it was made from "Sony". I believed the product will meet my expectations since it was more expensive than Samsung or LG.Anyways after using it for a monthI already have two dead pixels(both RED). And very frequently I get these white pixels which I need to press with a cotton swab so it turns back to normal.Save your money and go for another product!
If they would send you the right card. I am not the first person to have this problem. What I received was in fact a  WinTv-HVR-1600. Which is not at all the same as a WinTV-PVR-150 because it does not have Linux drivers. Then I had to go to the trouble of calling Haupauge to get them to switch it out. Had to pay shipping to send them the 150. More than a week went by before I was able to build my MythTV Box
poor design. very poor design..would never recommend this product.The connection is so flaky,you will end up wasting lot of time
this system blows (not in a good way). do not buy this system.  for the money there are much better systems out there.I bought this for my family room mainy for the small size of the cube speakers.  The main problem with the system (which bose has corrected by the way) is that the "acoustimass" component (bose's fancy name for a subwoofer) is not active (or powered) which means the base is totally inadequate and is overun by the cubes which have no mid or bass ranges.  The result is that you get a very "tinny" sound out of most applications including dvd's.  I ended up getting a sony active subwoofer and it sounds much better.In hindsight I would have bought a different brand than bose, but already had to much invested in bose to scrap the system completely, and the size of the cubes is nice.  Still pissed that I spent that much money on a substandard system, but hey, got sucked into the bose marketing machine
Electronic Service plan with Amazon. The time starts ticking when the item is purchased, not when it ships!  The GPS that I bought will not ship for another couple of months, and I agreed to purchase it a month ago.  So with the one year manufacturer's warranty (or whatever), and the three months (or more?)one is actually being delivered less than expected
Beware the shipping costs. I thought this would be a great buy, but the shipping costs make it more expensive than best buy.  Screw that
On/Off. It is the year 2005. The 21st Century. We've put men on the moon. We've launched space probes to the edges of our solar system. We can even remotely drive little vehicles along the surfaces of other planets.But we can't design a simply on/off button.The on/off button for the Blue Logger is one of the most insanely stupid things I've ever encountered. Some mentally-challenged engineer somewhere decided that you have to hold the button 2-4 seconds to turn it on, and 2-4 seconds to turn it off.It doesn't *sound* that difficult to do, but in practice it is infuriating, especially when you are trying to turn it on but end up turning it off. Right now the Blue Logger is sitting in front of me and I cannot turn it off. It simply will not turn off.Oh, and I've had lots of problems connecting it to my Bluetooth adapter, and have yet to get Street Atlas USA 2005 to recognize it
NOW I'M KINDA P!SSED OFF!!!. I AM REALLY UPSET WITH THESE. NOTHING REALLY ON THESE HEADPHONES ARE PROS. THEY ARE MOSTLY ALL CONSPros:- Volume remote...which doesn't even help peak volume anyway, so this really isn't a pro.Cons:- These are some of the most QUIET HEADPHONES I'VE EVER USED IN ANY OF MY PLAYERS! The impedance is 32 ohms, one of the worst impedances you can get.- There is SMALL BASS ON THESE! The bass is completely bloated and tinny.- The treble is IN A TUNNEL??? Honestly, is there a long tube in between these.- These have HORRIBLE COMFORT. The rubber headband makes them extremely oversized.- These are NOT DURABLE! Every single pair of these broke in the same space, with good care. The left side of the earcup, which features the right side's cord.- If there not durable, they are NOT PORTABLE EITHER. Sure, they fold up, but that's all the portability you'll get out of them. They break, one in my backpack, one putting them on the way I always do, the headband on my head, and the speakers correctly on the ear.SO YEAH! I'M KINDA MAD, EVEN THOUGH I'M GETTING MY $$ BACK. THE FACT THAT THESE HEADPHONES HAVE BAD SOUND, COMFORT, DURABILITY, AND PORTABILITY, WHY ON EARTH WOULD I GIVE THESE A GOOD RATING??? THEY ARE WASTING ABOUT A WEEK OF MY LIFE. NEVER AGAIN WILL I BUY FROM JENSEN
Sandisk 2GB. I just cam from Las Vegas and the sandisk has a disk error that doesn't allow for more photos after only using 40mb. I have tried to format the disk using the camera and through Windows XP. It doesn't allow it to be formatted. Bad investment!!! Would not recommend the product unless there is a way I can get a refund or an exchange
Makes a Lovely Paperweight. And also gave my children an amusing exhibition of what it was like to try to tune in a station on a TV circa 1963.  Pulled in weak signals from about 3 stations 18 miles from NYC broadcast towers.
Didn't work for me. Midi UNO + Yamaha Keyboard =  Buy the UX-16Simple mat
Only worked for 10 months. I bought this DVD player to play DVD's from Australia.  It worked great for about 10 months with very light use.  However, it started freezing up and not reading discs.  After doing research, I learned that the laser lights on these machines are very weak and don't last long.  It's cheaper to buy a new one than to get it fixed.Hold out for a better product
Not user friendly. The armband works fine, but it is such a pain!  You can't see the screen, it is hard to control the volume, pause, etc... through the fabric and you have to take it out anytime you want to do something.  I understand that this is the one with room for the iPod/Nike attachment, but I would try to figure out another solution with a different armband
Earbuds shorted after only 6 months of  light usage. I used these for 6 months when they shorted out and only one side works at a time. If I wiggle it, it works until the wire moves. I only used them about 2 hours a week at the gym. I know it's the earpod wire - I went back to the ones that came with the Ipod and they work fine. I'm not happy I wasted the money
Firewire Connection Was Messed Up. I bought this hoping it would cure my busted Superdrive on my G4 iMac but when connected via the Firewire it would freeze any program I was using to burn cd's or dvd's.  I thought it might have been a messed up product so I returned it to Lacie and got another one but the problem still persisted.I then thought it was my computer, but the firewire ports worked when connected to my old iPod and even worked when connected to my Lacie external HDD.  Finally figured that the product was defective after I purchased the Sony DRX-830 dvd burner and that burner worked perfectly when connected via firewire.This product however worked when connected on the USB port but the burning speeds were so slow that it was just about useless
Freezes and tech help not good. I purchased dvd express and it never worked. I spent endless time with tech support. The old story about, "It must be your computer." did not fly either, my machine is a media type and it far exceeds the system requirements advertised by ADS. I exchanged the item and it was supposedly checked out before I got it. Same problems. Tech support told me I was the only person having trouble with this product. They need to check out a few websites that review products there are hundreds of bad reviews very few good ones. My only mistake was not reading them before I wasted my time and money. ADS also told me it would not work with Ulead's Movie Factory 3, some of the software it came bundled with, but that was Uleads problem. I should use Cap Wiz ( Their program ) DUH!!! Guess what, it did not work with their program either. Ulead said they had several complaints with ADS's product. Their final solution hold on to the product and maybe they will have a new version of cap wiz and that might work. Save yourself time money and aggravation buy another product! P.S. Since ADS doesn't consider the product defective they will not refund your money or allow you trade it in for an upgrade. I don't think they want a product like that either. The only reason I gave one star is.....it was packed well.JU
broken after one week. I owned this product for about one week, very nice little piece which I can take to work or jogging, but today when I am copying some files to it from my computer, it stopped working, even reset didn't work, so I will  return it for a refund and try different products
It doesn't work at all. I connected all the cables as instructed, but it doesn't work, the light is not on.So I return it to Amazon
The easier way to do it. I mean seriously guys, is it really worth forking over to those greedy peeps at Sony over 40 dollars just for a silly memory card. There is an easier way to do it ya know. For your psp, if the game is really important to you and you can't save it. Just press up on the power switch real quick the screen will go off..it will go on hold and next time you wanna play it again.. just push it back up..and hopefully if you did it right you'll have the game right back in the place you left it..hey it saved me 50 dollars..and it can do the same thing for yo
Will not work With SporTrak Color. Don't know how this could work with on SporTrak and not another, but it will definately NOT work with the SporTrak Color. The back of the unit is smaller than the Meridan series, and is too small to lock into place, and even if it were large enough, the locking mechanism won't match
Go 510/910 Additional Mount Kit. this piece of product was horribly engineered. it is very difficult to mount the tomtom 910 unlike the mount kit for the 700. Honestly  If I could return my tomtom 910 I would have done so immediately because of the mount kit
harman kardon is so unreliable nowadays. i've had hk products since the 80's and generally like their products. but this is the second hk cd that broke just after a few months of light use (the first one after a couple of years). cd should last longer than that, i believe. i want to stick with hk to have the same brand name in the house, but unsure if i should throw good money after bad any more.
DVD is disappointment, LCD does its job. We bought ours from Amazon in October, and have been disappointed with the DVD player, which has a flaw documented in the manual that more than outweighs any convenience provided by the built-in player.Unfortunately, we got to the point where the DVD player could not play any DVD's.  Every DVD inserted produced a message "Disc Not Available".  I tried Netflix DVD's, then retail DVD's from my library, then opened some DVD's still in shrinkwrap and they would not play.  It was not a problem with DVD scratches, or failing to put the DVD's in the right way.I called Toshiba support, and they recommended a cure that sounded incredulous.  According to the manual, static electricity can "build up" in the DVD player, forcing you to physically unplug the REGZA for a few minutes to dissipate the charge.  Of course, to reduce cable clutter, the REGZA is plugged into a receptacle in an out of the way place, but to meet the requirements of the manual, that should be accessible.  The plug going into the back of the REGZA is not even designed so it could be unplugged there, it has to be unplugged at the receptacle.  And, it is not even a grounded power cord, which an electrical engineer I talked to about this said could contribute to the problem in the first place.  After the aforementioned "hard reboot" of the REGZA, it resumed playing retail DVD's again.Unfortunately, the DVD player is not of high enough quality to play any of the DVD-R and DVD+R media I've tried so far (TDK, Memorex, Office Depot, Maxell) which were burned with a Sony DVDirect VRD-MC1.  These same DVD's play in my computer DVD drive and with my Pioneer DVD player in another room.On the plus side, we've been happy with the images we get, and haven't noticed some of the LCD artifacts we observe on our smaller Sony WEGA TV.  We watch a lot of HD through cable, and the display is crisp.  We use the HDMI connector, and haven't used any of the computer/network functions of the monitor, so we can't comment on them.  The only minor comment about the display itself is that we use this in a room that is very bright during the day, and very dark at night, so I only wish it had greater range on the low side for its "Backlight" setting.If Toshiba can come up with a design that doesn't require periodic unplugging, and can play a more robust range of DVD media, I could recommend it.  As built today, I do not feel the integrated DVD is worth recommending this model
Waste of money!. I, too, wish I could give a 0 star rating.  This product is worthless.  We get almost no radio stations to come in and the CD player only worked for about a month.  A complete waste of money.
hated it... This thing was a nightmare for us. So much in fact that we returned it. It never played the movies correctly and even scratched every movie we played in it. Do not waste your money on this thing
Now only if it actually works!. I am now the proud owner of an Archos 404, after spending one traumatic month having owned, in my opinion, the far inferior Archos 504.Inferior, you say? But the 504 has a larger 4.3" screen, better battery life, a removable battery, and much larger Hard drive capacities (even for the 40 GB). How then, can I say that it is a far inferior product? Well, primarily because the Archos 404 actually works, while the 504 (much to my dismay) does not.You see, beneath that beautiful metallic exterior and beautiful screen of the Archos 504 lies a niggling problem that Archos doesnt want you to know about, especially if you live in a hot and dry location. This product is extremely, and I mean EXTREMELY, sensitive to Electro Static Discharge (ESD), and hangs almost instantaneously if you expose it to even the slightest amount of static. Using this player had become an absolute nightmare for me. Whenever I was listening to music, and would for example want to see which track is playing or skip to the next track etc., I would simply touch the player (whether in its case or outside), and not even press a button, and it would hang instantly. Soon after, I actually used to become nervous every time I needed to touch the player, and soon developed a habit of beforehand touching a metallic object (eg. doorknob) every time I needed to use the player. Needless to say, when one has to do such things just to touch a device, it kind of ruins the experience of owning that device. The 404 suffers from none of these problems, I have been using it for over a month now, and it has not even frozen once.Having said that however, I still give this product two stars instead of just one, because a) the video playback is very good (much better than the 404, and not only because of the larger screen), b) the battery life is decent, and the battery is removable and c) it offers capacities larger than most other video players available today.As for the sound, anyone interested in an Archos 04 series product should know that the volume on these players is significantly lower than the others, even with the latest firmware 1.6.20. I have made a direct comparison using the same pair of headphones with the 5G iPod, iPod Nano, Cowon A2, Cowon X5, and Creative Zen Vision M, either owned by me or by friends, and they are all louder than the Archos. Better, I cannot say, as that is subjective, but certainly and verifiably much louder.
Big red flag - don't waste your money - Syntax tests at your cost. It will work only until about one year for which there is a warranty after that it all depends on your luck. Mine stopped working at 14th month, took it to a local repair shop, low quality and unavailable parts, so repair was not possible except by Syntax. They ask for an arm and a leg to fix it on top of shipping this heavy junk, you are better off buying a well known brand with extended warranty
instructios. Have still not been able to program this the way it should be, confusing controls instrucitons, complicated, not at all like my old scanner, cannot find a way to check to see what frequencies are stored in the scanner, would look for a diferent scanner that is more user friendly
prepare to lose your data!. I have about 200 live concerts that I burned onto TDK discs about 3 years ago.  None of them are playable now.  Going forward, I will only use Mitsui Gold cds
What did I expect... for $20 bucks...After finally figuring out that I had to turn my mic inputs ALL the way up, I still can't get more than a -20db signal from my guitar...Save your money..
Great initially but DEAD one month after the 1 year warranty expired. This WAS my favorite little device. It's slow, as it's a hard drive and not a flash drive. But, for the capacity and price it was unbeatable. That is, until it suddenly locked up and cannot be revived, literally weeks after the meager 1-year warranty expired. A 2 GB Kingston memory stick has a 5 year warranty. I can see why this device has such a short warranty--it's completely unreliable long-term. Check out the other reviews-same problem.  6 months ago I would have given it 5 stars, but the obvious unreliability of the device makes it worthless in the long-term. Too bad Seagate can't raise their manufacturing quality
Camera locks up frequently. I'm on my second DCS-5300G.  I sent the first one back because it was locking up all the time.  The replacement is also locking up, I guess I'll have to send it back too. I would avoid this camera, at least until they fix the problems.  When it works, Video quality and features are OK
Connections are TOO TIGHT!  What happened to Monster quality control?. What has happened to Monster's quality?  In 2003-04, I had a discount on Monster cable through my employer and purchased close to $1000 (retail prices) worth of their cables for wiring up my home theater. I have been using the Gamelink with s-video for my PS2 and that works great. Here it is 3 years later and I buy these Gamelink 400 for use with my new HDTV with component inputs. When I tried to install them I thought I was going to snap the connections off my TV because of the amount of force I had to exert. With much determination I got them to connect. I switched on the PS2 and experienced no video just sound. I had even a harder time removing them. When comparing these cables to my older s-video Gamelinks the differences are the new wires are lighter, rigid and the connectors are definately too small in diameter.  In hand, they feel cheaper compared to the heavier more pliable older wires. I will no longer buy Monster cables and I do not recommend these to anyone. Audioquest is much better.  Too bad they don't make gaming cables
Poor Reception. I also had the model before the M85V and got great reception.  This new model gets terrible reception.  I still have my old model and put the old one next to the new one and it was like night and day with the reception.  Don't waste your money on this model!
Sub-par. I'm a tenor who use pc to record my vocal. This mic is just so-so, slightly better than a chat-mic. My major complaint about it is that it apparently does not have a 'pop' filter that reduces explosive noise due to proximity and breathing. If you're serious about getting your vocal performance recorded nicely, this mic is not for you
not working or printing properly. I don't know if the cartridge is dry, but it is not printing properly, unlike the previous cartridges we bought from you
wrong CD changer. It didn't match the Acoustic Wave player I bought. There should have been also two outdoor speakers, as a promotion for buying both pieces.The page, from which I ordered both pieces, was unclear, and I received the CD player with the wrong CD Changer.I had to return the changer and buy the one that matched the player. (I know I'll be refunded the price of the first changer). But by then, the promotion they were having for the outdoor speakers had finished. I received the real changer a few days later, but lost the speakers. I think Amazon owes me the speakers, which is what the bad page made me miss
Complete Junk. I bought these radios for their size and supposed range.  I installed the battery packs, set the frequencies, and was impressed at how compact, solid, and function-packed they seemed to be.That was where it all ended.  I hadn't been using them for ten minutes when little bursts of static came over the line.  My freind kept calling and asking if I had said something.  The squelch seems to not be very discriminating when it differentiates between an actual transmission and background noise.  Ironically his transmissions kept cutting out mid-sentence now and then.  Following each transmission (Assuming you can hear what the other person is saying because of the lousy speakers on these things, see below) is another burst of static that can last anywhere from 1 to 5 seconds.  Extremly irritating.It comes with a vibration mode when the call button is activated, presumably so if someone is in a loud environment they can tell when someone is trying to contact them.  I'm not exactly sure why they bother with this as the lousy speakers they put on these things is barely audible even with the volume turned all the way up, so there's no way you can hear anyone's transmission in a noisy environment anyway.The Lithium Ion battery packs aren't bad, they probably have a good life to them, but I was so fed up with all the other funtional flaws I ended up returning the radios before I had a chance to test battery.In conclusion: Avoid these radios!  They are junk, they have extremly limited range, and they don't work well under the best of conditions.
Not a Good company or Mouse. It is hard to reach the buttons on the side of the mouse, they are worthless.  The drivers start a cyle of rebooting your system that never ends, system restore fixed that.  But that is dangerous, your computer is completly unusable since it does not boot.  Support did not answer any of the three tickets I sent.  I could not ever download the new drivers and firmware since their site would not allow it.  I restored my system and am asking for my money back.The only good thing is that the mouse movement feels nice, but the ergonomics and support renders it worthless.  No good for gaming without the side buttons...what were they thinking.  Oh one other thing the mouse is rarely recognized by the system at boot or when plugged in.Buy a logitech, never had a problem with my X700 and I have had it for over three years.  Support has always been there and the side buttons rock
I can't believe they call this junk "Sony". I have had this system for 9 monthis now, and I am sure this is the worst piece of AV equipment I have ever owned.  Sony is usually known for quality products, but it this case I am afraid they rested on their laurels and delivered a poorly designed and poorly manufactured piece of equipment to the market.The worst part is that I have had numerous problems with it.  Occasionaly it fails to recognize CD/DVD inserted after you turn it off and back on.  On other occasions it completely locks up.  The first time it happened I had to call Sony customer support and find out the secret combination of buttons to press to unlock it. Now, after about 9 months of use, it has taken on a habit of completely shutting down with a message "PROTECT UNPLUG".   The only way to bring it back to life is to unplug it and plug it back in after a few minutes.  There is nothing wrong with my electric wiring -- I have checked, and the system is plugged into a fairly expensive surge protector/power conditioner.  I am not sure whether to go through the trouble of fixing it -- at this point it's just not worth it because of all the other things I despise about this system.First off, CDs and DVDs take forever to load.  To insert a disk one has to press an "Eject" button and then listen carefully for about two minutes while the system rearranges itself and lets you finally insert the disk.  If you missed your chance -- tough luck, start all over.  Second, it is a royal pain to use -- any configuration apart from the basic settings is as convoluted as it can possbly be.  On screen menus, a standard on most systems, now do not exist, and the manual is a joke. Third, the FM radio is awful.  I went out and spent money on an expensive FM antenna -- still, my cheap clock radio gets better reception.  Fourth, there are other annoying little things about this system which are too numerous to list in this review.Finally, I don't share people's opinion that the sound is all that great.  It's average.  Out-of-the-box it is way too heavy on bass.  The wireless feature is nice -- I admit, and that was the reason I bought it.  But I would not buy it again (or probably another piece of Sony equipment) in a million years now.  I could live with wires running around my room, or even just a two-speaker system rather than deal with this piece of junk. Shame on Sony for slapping their name on this lemon.
Less than pleased. Although the radio still works, the searchlight illuminated only once, the first time I turned it on. It hasn't worked again since.The radio works while plugged in. Unplug it and come back in an hour and no more charge.I used the hand crank, I cranked that handle for well over a minute, when I pressed the on button the radio didn't work!This radio is worthless in an emergency.I give it one star because this radio does work while plugged in. Plus the dial is well lit illuminating the stations in blue light
AWFUL. What an awful product. After less than a week of use, the camera will no longer connect to my wireless network. Even when it did, it kept causing the wireless router to crash several times a day. Recording settings for the camera software were lost if the computer was re-booted. The instruction manual is poorly written and doesn't even accurately describe the software interface. Save your money
What a rip off!!. I purchased this product after quite a bit of research and after finding that it was finally available for windows I couldn't wait to get my hands on one.Why wouldn't I? it's supposed to be the best thing since sliced bread. At first it looked like a really cool product, and is, if your system is a Mac.Logitech has done a great job of selling the Nulooq to Windows system users but only give you half of the software to operate it on. There is no tooldial for the Windows version ( a fact that they don't disclose ) which is probably the most powerful feature of this product.I now feel as though I have wasted my money on what is a useless tool ( if you have Windows ) and been totally conned by Logitech.What is even worse is the fact that Logitech don't have any future plans to include the tooldial driver for Window users. So if all you want to be able to do is zoom and scroll then this product is for you....and I know where there is one for sale!!!
EA-BLO6 NOT for Minolta Dimage Xi. Since this rechargable battery was clearly listed under "accessories" on the Minolta Dimage Xi Amazon WEB page, I purchased one to serve as a backup.  It was delivered well before I received the camera.  Imagine my surprise when I finally received the Dimage Xi and opened up the Sharp battery package to find that the battery was too wide to fit in the camera or the battery charger which came with the camera!  This battery is NOT an accessory that fits with the Dimage Xi.  I have sent it back
not good. This is the worst thing.Never buy this one!!! There is serious noise,big problem..
Dont be fooled by the name Motorola. I have had this phone for 6 months and it works -but the battery life is not good.  The phones are now to the point that the battery life is very short.  I expected much more with a product made by Motorola.  I tossed my sony wireless for this one and wish I had not.
Unreliable; died after a couple months. I bought this adapter for use with my Suunto X6HR watch.  It seemed to work at first when first installed.  But on subsequent usage, Windows would fail to properly recognize the adapter.  Sometimes unplugging and replugging it would work, other times a reboot would do, and occasionally a reinstall of the driver was required.  Also, it seemed to only work in the same USB port as it was originally install.Then after a month or two, it stopped working altogether
LaCie won't repair products out of warranty. Have 1 and 1.2-TB versions of this product.  One failed after 16 mos, and LaCie refuses to even look at it..recommends I buy a new one.  The other drive is starting to show signs of failure.  Since when are 1TB drive assemblies disposable??
A Piece of Garbage. This was the worst electronics puchase I've ever made.  When I first got the mini it was great, looked nice and sounded great.  Within about 6 months battery life started to go way down, after a year it was down to nothing, didn't work properly, would show a full charge and not last more than 20 minutes.  If you're going to take a chance on an iPod, definitely get a newer different model that may be of better quality than this one
Beautiful Picture - Poor Quality Control. I bought my first Samsung HLS 5087W on March 6, 2007 from one of the well know "big box" Stores.  I chose this model because its picture was far superior to any of the other models in its price range.  I took a chance, however, and bought returned "open box" TV, saving a few hundred bucks in the process.  The salesman assured me that the set had been gone over thoroughly before it was put back on sale.When the Television was delivered the picture was stunning, and I was very pleased with my purchase.  After a few days, however, the picture arbitrarily began switching from 4:3 to 16:9 aspect ratio.  This would happen every half hour to 45 minutes.  Not a big deal but annoying to say the least.  Instead of returning the set under the store's 30 day return policy, I had them send a service technician out to see what could be done.  He scratched his head and said he'd have to do a little research, and would get back to me in a day or so.  About a week later, with no further contact with the technician, the set developed a new problem - it would cut off every once in a while.  At that point, I had had enough of this dog and sent it back to the store.  However, I wasn't ready to give up on Samsung and their bright and beautiful DLP picture.  I paid the extra bucks and had a brand new, right out of the sealed box HLS 5087W delivered.The new TV had been in my house for less than two hours when it lost sound.  I checked all connections and determined that it was a problem in the TV.  An hour or so later I turned the set back on and everything was fine.  I watched it for about an hour thinking all was well when the sound failed again.  I returned to the store that night and told them my sad tale.  The salesperson told me that they had, indeed, had several of these Samsung models returned for various problems.  He said they seemed to be having major quality control problems.  I told him to come get the TV.I took a chance the first time on an open box model and got burned.  I chalked it up to the old adage that "you get what you pay for."  The second time around I took no chances and paid full price for a brand new version of the TV, but still no luck.  Not being a complete fool, my third was not a Samsung.  It's a shame that a TV with such a beautiful picture has to be done in by poor quality control.
Sound cuts out after under 3 months. After light use (less than once a week) for under 3 months the sound began to cut out.  I noticed it would cut out over 80% of the time I was listening either entirely, or a large portion of the sound range would suddenly dissapear.  Usually mid range (vocals) and below would cut out.  If the cord was held just right it would come back for a few seconds but then cut back out.  Also, they are slightly tight on the ears while wearing glasses
Constant noise. July 31st 2005:I was looking for a DVD player for my bedroom at Costco and couldn't resist the $179 price for this brand new Philips HTS3400 (HTS3410 is the same except that it comes all in silver rather than silver/black).I played some DVDs and CDs and after 2 days i decided to return it for 2 reasons:1. It makes a hissing sound when it's turned off. Now, it wouldn't bother me too much in a basement (althought it would still be anoying), but it's a definite NO NO in the bedroom.2. Rear speakers are almost silent no matter how much you increase the volume to them.If you don't mind these 2 things, then by all means go for it.Aug 2005 UPDATE:Having nothing better to do, I went and purchased another unit from Costco to see if indeed I have a bad unit or it's a design/manufacturing issue.Surprise surprise...second unit makes the same exact noise only a bit louder!Curious enough (i'm a mechanical engineer with some knowledge of electronics) i open the unit to see where is this noise coming from. It is the AC/DC transformer, more specific two 330uF capacitors making this noise.That is really poor design and/or low quality components!!! I did not expect this from a brand name like Philips. This is no different than any no name units out there at half price.As a result I am changing my initial reivew and recommend that you look for a different product, this one is definately not worth the money. I cannot update the stars but this time I would rate it with 0 stars.Oct 2006 Update: It stopped reading CDs but it reads DVDs no problem. Returned to Costco!
I bought the Marware Protection Pack to Prevent it From Getting Dirty. This is one of the most frustrating things that has happened to me. So I bought my MacBook a week ago and to go a long with it I bought the Marware Protection Pack.The purpose I bought the cover for was to protect my notebook, however the hand rest cover has RUINED my notebook.There is a sticky residue that is left behind when I peeled back the hand rest today. It is all over the hand rest portion of my laptop.Keep in mind that it has been a week.I am irritated and upset that Marware has sold me such a negligible product.
Could be great, haven't been able to use it yet..... Got the phone and found out that in order to mount it to the wall, I need to purchase a $4.00 part and pay $5.00 shipping and taxes.Now all the specs say wall mountable, not wall mountable with an extra purchase!Ok, $8-10 isn't going to break me, but somewhere it should state that you need to get an extra bracket in order to mount it on the wall!So, since I can't mount it on the wall, I haven't used it yet!Have to wait a week or so for the wall mount bracket to come in...
Doesnt work. It just dont work, in the whole dial there's no single FM station that transmit load and clean. To much noise
Horrible DVD player. I have bought and returned three of these units now. Each one has been defective, and finally I just gave up on returning the system. The DVD player constantly gives "Bad Disc" errors and skips if there is even the slightest smudge on a disc. The sound quality is very nice for the price, but since the player doesn't work, it's essentially useless. This is a complete rip-off at any price point
Not worth the money. I live in an area with no xm repeaters and must rely on good satelite reception.  I have purchased 2 sets of headphones for use with my inno, both of which crapped out after only a few weeks use (check antenna message).  It seems that this has been a common problem with other users.  I won't be buying another set, at least until a different manufacturer produces them
Buyer beware. I returned this contract and asked for a refund but NEW ignored my first two emails. Then I called them and they informed me of their shady business practice that it would take 8 weeks to refund my account. I then contacted Amazon and they resolved the matter in one day. I read reviews for NEW and most people that actually had to deal with NEW were not happy. The 77% positive rating they have is misleading because the majority of people rating them have never actually had to use the product.
Can't do math?. Obviously Amazon thinks that it's customers can read but not do math! This is the most inane offer yet!!
Low performance on Linux. First I must mention that the package or manual does not say this card supports Linux, but it's using Realtek 8169 chipset which driver 'r8169' is already in kernel 2.4 or 2.6, I downloaded the latest 'r1000' and still couldn't get anything higher than 80Mbps under kernel 2.4.20.  Some users reported on newsgroup for this known performance issue on Linux, and one was able to crank it up to 240Mbps running a 3.2GHz AMD system.  Since this card is not meant to support Linux and I haven't tried it on Windows I would give it a 2 stars to be fair
What a let down . . . I purchased this MP3 player thinking it was a good purchase.  Boy was I wrong.  Creative Labs tend to have glitches whether it be computer hardware, software, or other products like this one.  Now having problems with the product is one thing, but customer service is lousy and they could give a rats [...].  Also when I ordered seperate batteries from their online store they mentioned AFTER I purchased their product that it was going to be delayed for an extra month.  My MP3 player stopped working after 3 months, I did get it to work again.  Two months later the screen told me I had hardware problems.  OK, so I download the drivers that is supposed to fix the problem, no go.  Oh, and I forgot to mention that I am working in Eastern Europe at the time so it makes matters even better trying to get ahold of them via phone.Save yourself some frustration and get something better.  iriver maybe?  Just stay away from Creative Lab products.
Is there a zero stars?. This is the worst thing I have ever owned!!!! It broke (said there were no cd's inside) after about a week! Do yourself a favor don't get this product, don't buy this brand and don't buy from sears they sucked about the whole thing too
Expensive Disposable Printer. I purchased this expensive All in one 12-30-2005 exactly 2 months after warranty while replacing black ink cartridge. The plastic piece that holds the metal clip in place broke off and is not repairable or replaceable. BUYER BEWARE! HP printers are not same quality as they used to be. This is very expensive for a DISPOSABLE product!!!!
They send the wrong antenna. I ordered the Cobra HG A1500 High Gear CB Antenna. They keep sending the Cobra HG A1000. Now I'm stuck with a antenna I did not order nor do I want.
Did not work for me. I was unable to get it to sync up with our computer and we have Windows 2000.  So it was no use to me
No USB capabilities. Where is the USB compatibility that all the other cards have
Sad compared to older Models. Just purchased 3 units , thought they would work as well as the Novi units they were replacing however they have absolutely no range . My original Novi 2 channel units worked well from a distance of approx 110 ft from house to barn , these only work in the same room... I am attempting to return these currently.
Be careful of what you think this is.. First of all I thought Sat radio advertised " Commercial Free radio" was that. IT IS NOT AT ALL!!!! In fact I spend most of my time looking over the 160 chanels for something not with commercials. (...). They claim they have nothing to do with that. So this is a good buy IF you want another radio player WITH commercials (  A lot of them ) and to pay for it. I got this because I was tired of radio commercials and awful radio announcers who talked over songs and too much. Well sattelite radio is the same thing just with cussing. So keep this in mind before you buy.
Missing Cable. Never got a chance to try out the drive because it was missing an interconnect.  When I tried Western Digital support I was kept waiting for 45 minutes and hung up.  I returned the item and would avoid the brand in future
High Capacity, low cost, but slow. Fairly inexpensive when I purchased this for $150 last summer. If I waited until now, for the same price, I could get a CF card in non-hard drive version for the same price which I would suggest over this. The unit is very slow and the hard drive base unit takes alot more power from your machine. I use this with my Dell Axim X50v, and though it works, the battery consumption is very noticable. Also, the speed of the drive is definately not the fastest. Like I said above, for the $150 that I paid summer of 2006, it was a great deal but as all things, prices drop and if I had to do it over, I would skip this and go for flash based unit
I swore I would never buy a D-Link product again... And I was right....I should have passed on this.  It was a pain to configure, and then none of the settings would stick.  Whenever I changed the default password, it would never let me log back into the camera without having to do a reset.  That kind of defeats the point.  Returning this item so I can get something decent.  The money saved is NOT worth it
Not for running. I wore these yesterday for the first and last time.  I bought these headphones in hopes that they would stay in or at least near my ears when running.  They didn't last one minute.They are very light, but at the same time very flimsy.  The over-ear design does nothing in the way of supporting the buds in you ears like I had hoped.The buds are set at an awkward angle and found myself having a hard time, even when stationary, keeping them in or on my ears.As far as sound, holding them on my ears they sounded terrific albeit very uncomfortable.  Holding them in place also pretty much defeats the purpose of having headphones.  Another thing to be noted, the volume control on the cord is a terrible idea.  The volume pod itself probably weighs as much as the headphones.  Unless the volume control is secured somehow it is very problematic doing any sort of activity.These are probably what to expect out of a $10 set of headphones.Comfort:      1/10Sound:        6/10Design:       2/10Cost-benefit: 3/10
not network ready. The printer works great as a usb printer, a fax machine, and copier.It may as well not even have a network port on it.The networking driver will find the printer ,but then it goes back to searching fora printer, and this loop continues till you give up.I can't tell if thr network scanning works because of the above driver problem.I can tell you that a Dell 1600 works great as a network printer, network scanner,fax & copier. We have 3 of these and we tried this Hp 3055 and I would not reccommend it to anyon
Amazon Inventory Control?. This product has a known defect for serial numbers R641 and less (see Logitech website). I just received my Amazon Order  and it was serial number R635. It will be sent back tomorrow. Hopefully, Amazon will cleanse its inventory on its own, rather than relying on its customer base
Kingston 2 GB SD Memory Card. This SD would not work in my  Nikon  Coolpix S6 camera (but the Fuji and Sandisk product did
Back-UPS ES drops power AFTER power is restored!. Most people buy a UPS, plug it in and never test it to make sure it works. I tested this device a number of times to make sure the software would at least shutdown the computer after an outage. I set it to shutdown Windows after 1 minute. Only the computer and a few small phone accessories are attached to it.After power was cut, it held the computer up and allowed it to shut down. Then I restored power to the UPS. AFter about 30 seconds, it beeped, clicked, and temporarily DROPPED power to the computer while it was rebooting! So when it switches back from battery power it causes power to be interrupted. That is unacceptable. A UPS should never drop power to the attached devices after power is restored to it.
not what I expected. I purchased this dvd recorder to go with the sony hdd camcorder.  They should have been perfectly compatible, but mine has been nothing but trouble. The first time I used it, it simply froze at 99% complete and I had to shut it down and start over after waiting 3 hours for it to finish.  After that, it recorded from the camera, but seemingly randomly, not in the order I videotaped on the camera, and incompletely burned video segments from the camera as well.  Plus, there is no editing capability whatsoever with this device.  I use very high quality Taiyo Yuden dvd's in it, so I know it is not the discs
Breaks too easily. Cheap and definitely nasty - they may look nice and robust given the hardened plastic ear-cups, but after a few months light use, I lost sound through one cup then the other. In general - when placed over the ears you do get an echo effect of surrounding noise unless you actually have the noise cancelling unit turned on. The batteries seemed to last pretty long though - actually the battery I had in there lasted longer than the unit itself. Very disappointing, but for the price, this is hardly unexpected
After a year's use, not a keeper. I was given the iQue M3 for Christmas of 2005. A few months into the new year, I dropped it onto pavement, and it broke. For $99, Garmin replaced it with a refurbished unit, which I consider a fair price. Unfortunately, the refurb unit couldn't play directions at full volume, so I returned it for another refurb. This unit fell off the windshield still in it's cradle, and it started making that frying sound of short circuits. I called Garmin and was told that if there was no obvious damage to the unit, they'd look at it under warranty. I had told the guy what happened, so I was pleasantly surprised; they did, in fact, replace it.Under all circumstances, the report you get back says the returned unit was "within specifications" (or words to that effect), even though clearly not. I have no idea why. Units will be returned with new software keys to enter, and the software will begin urging you to register, even though you already have.For some, the mapping software on the M3 will appear crippled. It is a basic drive from here to there unit. It does not allow you to load way-points, Points of Interest, and the like.Each of the units had quirks. On the first one, every time I inserted the SD card with maps, Windows player (or whatever it's called) would start up and ask me if I wanted to search the card for tunes. The second one had inaudible volume. The fourth one has a problem common to the first one: The brightness resets itself randomly to zero. Yep, zero. The first one left the powered brightness full on, so you could give power and see to reset the battery brightness to half on, but this one resets them both to zero. So you may think the unit is not turning on, but it's on. You just can't see anything on the screen. If you're outside, you can put it in the sun and see dimly enough to navigate to the brightness setting, but if it's dark, you need a flashlight.The current one will do a hard reset if I start the car with the unit plugged into the lighter and sometimes when I put it in the cradle. This means I have to do the full new user routine. Touch the screen on the little plus signs to register the touch screen. Press and hold to learn again how to copy. Press and hold to learn again how to paste. Reset the time from Olathe, Kansas, to where I live. All contacts, notes, calendars, and other information is lost. All preferences are gone. After I've gone through the restart routine, the unit will then find the satellites and get me where I'm going, but I can't load destinations from contacts, as they're gone, so I have to type them all in by hand.If the battery runs out of juice, the unit is dead. It forgets everything, and I have to touch the screen where the plus signs are to register the screen. Press and hold to learn again how to copy. Press and hold to learn again how to paste. Reset the time from Olathe, Kansas, to where I live. All contacts, notes, calendars, and other information is lost. All preferences are gone.I complained about this to support at Garmin, and I was assured this is a Microsoft feature and that Garmin can do nothing about it. They recommended that I buy a program from one of several vendors that backs up the data to an SD card where it will not be lost. So now I carry a card with my detailed maps and a card with my backup data. I did learn, though, that if the battery runs down, the backup program is lost, so you can't retrieve your data from the backup SD card unless you have told the program to save as self-extracting archives. I learned it the hard way, of course.To restore, I pop out the detailed maps SD card, insert the backup card, navigate to the File Explorer, navigate to the SD card, open the contents of the SD card, select the latest back up, click through the restore procedure, click to OK that it has finished (just a minute or two with my small amount of data), click to restart, wait a long time for it to restart, tap to get past the owner data screen, enter the password, then pop the restore card out, reinstall the map card, wait while it reads it, then I'm good to go. I can't do it while I'm driving, of course, so if the unit resets on its own, I just go with the complete lack of contacts and without the unit knowing where "Home" is, which means I have to type it or other locations into the Where To dialogue.The unit defaults to 3D directions instead of north is always up, which is confusing for me as I can't look at the screen and out my window and make immediate sense of where I am vis-a-vis the map. I'm sure this is my shortcoming, and I then have to remember how to navigate the menu to the setting for north is up, which I can't do while driving. It also defaults to different displays for day and night. The night display uses a dark background, and I have found that the menus for the Windows programs use a transparent background with black text. So I can't read the menu selections against the dark display. And the unit will not save my preference for using day at all times if I lose power or the unit resets when I start the car or sometimes when I put it in the cradle.On the contacts database, the unit assumes all phone numbers start with the area code to Olathe, Kansas. It also formats all numbers as US numbers. I have a few overseas numbers, and they are crammed into the (xxx) xxx-xxxx format, even though they are longer and don't start with an area code.In the calendar, if I have meetings scheduled outside my time zone, I enter them at the time they're scheduled. Then when I get there, I have the option of choosing the visited time zone, and all the times are screwed up, as the unit assumes all times entered are for my original time zone. So I never use the visited time zone feature, and the unit assumes I'm still in my home zone wherever I may travel.I have not found a way to have it tell me how to get to places that have no street address, but for which I have the lat/long coordinates. I camp in places that are off main roads and trying to move the map around gets to be burdensome at the scale necessary to show unpaved roads - I quickly lose where I am and have to zoom out, which loses the road.On the whole, the directions part of the M3 is excellent. It gives good directions, has reasonably up to date maps, and lets you find stores, restaurants, gas stations, hotels, and the like in your area, and it provides addresses and phone numbers so you can call ahead for information and reservations.On the whole, using the device is too aggravating to make it a keeper. After a year of use, I can't put up with it anymore. I'll take Garmin's word that this is all a shortcoming of Windows Mobile and not Garmin's fault, but I can't put up with it anymore. I'll switch to Magellan or TomTom or some other unit that isn't Windows-based and that doesn't completely lose its mind when the battery runs down, doesn't randomly do a hard reset, doesn't randomly set the brightness to zero, and doesn't assume all phone numbers start with the area code to Olathe, Kansas. Maybe another manufacturer will let me import POIs and way-points from other people's files
ComPLETE ripoff!. The very idea that this cheap piece of plastic could ever warrant a list price of $30 US makes my stomach hurt. This is a KNOCKOFF computer component, like buying a "ROLEX" on the streets of New York for $5, and shouldn't cost more than that, a price that factors in a cut for retailers and distributors as well.The bootlegers that make those fake Rolexes probably own the factories that make junk like this.I got one for 3 dollars on Ibiao dot com with FREE shipping and surprise, surprise, it did not work. And YES, it was the exact same as the one in the photo above.A "real" one can be found for not too much more money and will work far better
look at all the pretty bubbles...not. Simply put, the keyboard sticky scuff cover never flattens out completely. There are always bubbles.  If you like playing with them all the time then this product is for you.  The keyboard soft material cover is not so bad, but holds onto the dirt and oils that would normally get on your screen and keyboard.  So, when you close the lid, the material then transfers some of that dirt right back.  My resolve...just wipe your keyboard and screen with a soft, clean, semi-wet towel every so often and the macbook pro will keep its luster
Doesn't pass the test of time. Great looking keyboard. Unfortunately all it takes is one minor spill and the keyboard is destroyed. That includes cleaning. And don't think you are ever going to take it apart and dry it. The keyboard self destructs after you have the, count them, 10s and 10s of screws.I called their customer support. They weren't like DELL, nobody is that bad, but their resolution was to buy a new one from them for 50% off their retail price. shipping was extra. So you save maybe $10 off street prices.All-in-all they are no longer the good company they were in the past. They need competition. So I'm pulling out my old logitech from retirement. Too bad they don't make those old keyboards anylonger
The Worst Waterproof Heaphones on the Market. I have spent from $20-$100 on waterproof headphones over the last 2 years and I can say, without hesitation, these are the Absolute Worst of the bunch.  Before I discuss this brand, I would like to say, if you are a swimmer and buy waterproof headphones, they are going to short out so be ready to buy new ones every few months. That having been said, let's talk about the H2O brand.The first thing that I could not understand about these headphone is why a bungy cord behind the neck would be so short.  There is no way for any normal person to use these comfortably.  Once they are in your ears, you are not able to comfortably rotate your head without pulling at least one of the ear pieces out of your ear.  To solve the problem, I just removed the head piece so that I would just have the ear pieces and could stick them in my ears and swim away.  Well, that was not possible because the ear pieces continuously slipped out of my ears.  I even changed the ear piece covers to some that I had used in the past. The ear pieces still slipped out of my ears. I spent more time fiddling with this garbage than I did swimming.Let me just sum this up by saying, this is the only pair of waterproof headphones that I have thrown away that still worked. These are the worst headphones ever.  Opt for the $20 brand, they work just fine after you cut the tips off and replace them with your own!
Not worth the trouble. This card died on me after about a year of use. My laptop will detect the card, but it won't power up. My reaction? Good Riddance! I now have an excuse to get a different card.As others have stated, this card uses its own drivers, and they don't work well. Everytime I woke my laptop from suspend mode, the card would fail to reconnect to the network, forcing me to remove and reinsert the card, then do a 'repair' of my connection. Huge hassle.It looks like you get what you pay for with these cards, so stay away from the cheap ones!
It is in the shop. Every thing works well enough with the exception of the HDMI terminals that were not functional correctely as I recieved the Sharp Aquos LC32D42U LCD HDTV.  The picture blinks on and off when I used either of the two HDMI terminals for input from my Direct TV HD receiver.  Toke some effort to get Sharp arrange warrenty repair.  It is still in the shorp.  Hopefully it will get fixed soon.  Aother feature that is missing from this TV is the option of elimating weak stations ater auto tune
Sent it back. Purchased for my daughter, an English teacher, Scrabble lover. She said she'd rather have a book to look up words and most of the features on the Franklin she'd never use and thought they took away from the mental challenge of the game. She said it would end up on a shelf in her house. She'd rather have a paperback Scrabble Dictionary. I returned the Franklin. She didn't even like the idea of taking it to school for her kids to use when she lets them play Scrabble in class
Am I missing something here???. It's like wiping your monitor off with WD40. Somebodygoofed on these. Not sure what I can use these things fornow. Yes I know I'm from Alabama and a degree fromthe U of A but I need more instructions or a differentbrand.
wireless mouse. Not very good for a house with impatient people. It was a little sticky at first, by the time I contacted seller, they broke it.
Poor Product. Despite not being written on the packaging or website my HP iPaq RX3417 was compatible with this keyboard.Unfortunatly the software supplied was extremely bad, clogging my PDA making it run very slowely. As well as this, it also flickered when in use making the settings for the keyboard very difficult to change.In terms of hardware, I found the size and position of keys to be the biggest problem. While targus does include all 5 rows of a standard keyboard, it shrinks the top row (numbers) and the bottom row (space bar). This makes it very difficult to use the space bar (which is for some reason split into three parts) and the numbers (which could have been made full size as there is nothing else in the way). I found myself constantly not hitting the right key or not hitting the right key hard enough for the key to register. In terms of key position, there is a gap between the keys on the left side and right side of the keyboard making hitting the keys in the middle very difficult. Some keys are also very small (e.g. the right shift key and backspace) making them difficult to use (strange considering they are used a lot on keyboards).One of the biggest problems I had with the keyboard was the lack of proper arrow keys. Targus includes an oval shaped four direction button that controls a mouse cursor that appears on the screen. This mouse cursor is useful, but needs to be supplemented with normal Up, Down, Left and Right keys which are needed when typing to go back to another part of the document. Using the mouse to do this is very frustrating.The final negative thing about this keyboard was the price. I paid AUD$149.95 for this keyboard. Doing some research on the internet found better models (i.e. Think Outside Stowaway IR Keyboard) available for less than half the price (around AUD$70) and bluetooth keyboards available for less than AUD$190. I think it might be about time Targus releases a new model PDA keyboard with a design and software that are suitable for the use the keyboard will get. No more tiny keys and no more than two space bars
Not a quality item. This item worked for a while, but required fiddling (unplugging and replugging repeatedly) with the lighter socket each time I restarted my car.  Eventually, however, it blew out the fuses in both my lighter sockets.  Don't waste your money on this piece of crap
Duhh! Why print 4x6 when it is 4x6.5. This makes no sense. If the industry standard is 4x6, why did they, Kodak, cut the paper to 4x6.5 and then advertise on the carton that it is 4x6 -- yes, I see the fine print on the back side of the carton that reads "actual paper size is 4x6.5"I still don't understand why they did this.Now I have cut the pictures down to the correct size...what a waste of my time!!!!!!!!!!
Bad experience. Received DVD's damaged due to inproper packaging by the vendor.Vendor refused to exchange damaged discs.
Can't find a fit!. I bought these on a limb. I hadn't read any reviews, hadn't seen them in action -- not that it would have helped. Everyone rates these 5 stars, especially here on Amazon... but I couldn't find ones that fit!I tried every piece. I tried pulling my ear, using 2 different pieces on each ear, and nothing would ever work. They'd always fall out on the slightest movement or anything.Sitting here right now after trying to figure out a way to make them fit for 45 minutes leaves me extremely frustrated and wishing I could return them. Nope. Guess not. Hundred bucks down the drain.Grrr
What's up with this DVD?. My friend bought these dvd's so I could burn her wedding video...not ONE of these dvd's were recognized by my Toshiba DVD burner...I use Velocity DVD-R's with no problem...go figure
Non-existent customer service. I am having some problems with my receiver and, from what I've found, you can't contact a live customer support rep if your life depends on it. I've sat on hold for hours trying to get someone. Complete joke
they're useless. iv tried these earbuds multiple times hoping they'd work. everytime i put them in my ears, they fall out. theyre useless. waste of my money
Had pix loss w/Lexar cards. About three years ago, maybe four, I bought two Lexar CFII cards. One never worked, the other worked, but lost all data. I wrote to Lexar, that I had two bad cards, they sent me one new card of the same size. I gave that to my girlfriend & told her to only use it on pix she didn't care about losing. I still have my card, in a ziplock. None of the file removal programs will get the images off, & I've used all of them, & had their (file removal) tech help give up.In this day & age of "just make the item" I am upset. But you take your chances. Do you want the only picture of your great grand-mother lost because you used a Lexar? I wouldn't, I use an actual sandisk card, myself.If they ever (Lexar) made it right, I may have written a better review, but they haven't. So that tells me that they don't care.How important are your pictures to you?Frederic
I returned this system in one week. It came down to a choice between a $40 sound system with a seperate dvd player or this $200 system. The reason I purchased it was because it would save on space. Well, it may save on space, but the functionality was reduced to nearly ZERO. The cons:-Audio popped in and out when playing MP3 CD's. Also a cracking sound when it actually played the audio.-Hissing (especially from the rear speakers) when the unit was turned off.-Low volume from the rear speakers.-Didn't play many DVD's right (it would just stop, as if it couldn't read it).-Will not read DVD-R/RW's.-STUTTERING PICTURE. It did this on ALL DVD'S PLAYED. Every few seconds (it was an intermittent length of time between ocurrences) it looked as if it would drop a few frames. The audio never varied from being spot on, but it looked as if the player couldn't keep up with the DVD. This is what killed it for me. This COULD BE because of a defective unit, however, I will not be risking my money on another Philips player.The pros:-Good audio output. That's about it.My expectations were disappointed HORRIBLY. I will not be buying another philips if I can help it at all. Instead, I bought a Sony slimline DVD player($75 with a $40 sound system) and it is far superior. Far. AND it plays DVD-R/RW's
HDMI port unreliable. Maybe it's just the one I got, but my HDMI port seems to be very unreliable.  Most of the time it will be working fine, but once in a while for no reason, the screen goes black and stays black for an extended period of time.  If I switch back to using component cables, it works immediately, but the picture with component cables always looks noticeably worse.  I have tried connecting it to my cable box with 2 different HDMI cables, and connecting it to two different computers with a DVI to HDMI cable.The same thing happened each time, so I don't think it was the cable or the source of the HDMI input that had any problems.So basically I'm stuck watching it with component video, which does not look very good
Underpowered... Unfortunately, I picked this unit up with much higher hopes than I should have.Setup was relatively simple.  I know what I'm doing and I have an existing UPnP server on my network, so that made life a little easier.  When you power the thing up for the first time, it steps you through network setup, locates UPnP servers, and makes it all go.However, once I got it running, I lost my optimism.  Video was very choppy.  It was completely unwatchable.  I futzed with the settings on my router and UPnP server and video formats for a week before finally giving up
Unreliable Manufacturing. I bought this in November and used it a couple times. It worked on one disk and not the other. I went to use it again and it stopped working. I then called Maxell and it only has a 90 warranty. So I am feeling ripped off and angry. Oh well, that'll teach me to buy Maxell anything
poor quality, burned/shorted out in 12 hours. I was able to install this adapter on my Windows XP Dell, and it worked with my household wireless network, at least for a while.  The next time we went into the room, less than 12 hours later, it had shorted out.  It smelled like an electrical fire and (of course) the little indicator lights were not on any more.  The quality of this expensive speed booster adapter is awful, awful, awful.  Read these reviews.  Do NOT buy this product
Not for Win 98 users!!!. I've had a HORRIBLE experience with the wireless card in this networking kit--all because my laptop runs on Win 98 SE! Although it claims to work with Windows 98 SE, the software has a flaw that can't find a .dll file to make the card work. I've spent hours trying to come up with a fix and I finally contacted DLink for tech help. (...) Before buying this product, read all about the problem this product has with Win 98 and decide if you really want the headache. I solved my problem by purchasing another card that said it worked with Win 98 and actually did. I had it running at a Dell store in minutes. Disregard what the box says. Only use if you run Win 2000 or higher! It seems to work really well with XP.
sorry - big step back. Service from Amazon was great,better than expected. This antenna however was useless to me. Standard omni ant gave 1 to 2 bars. My 7 dB Omni ant gave solid 3 bar reading. This one went from 1 bar to complete loss of signal when aimed at source and peaked.. I had hoped being directional would help
Very disappointing. Not only is the microphone not Mac compatible (as stated in another review, unfortunately posted after my purchase), the entire headset is incompatible with some cellphones as well. With three different model Nokias as soon as the set was plugged in, "Enhancement not supported" flashed on the screens - never had a problem with other headsets. It would have been helpful to have had a list of compatible devices to view before purchasing. I'll just have to pass these on to a PC using friend and hope they have more luck.
LOVES TO EAT PAPER. I've had this scanner for 6 months now.  It worked OK the first month, but since then it loves to "eat" paper. It scans multiple pages at once.  For example, a 20 page document, becomes 15 pages one scanned.  I have to scan the same document multiple times (sometimes up to 12 times) until the scanner finaly scans each page. It gets to be very frustrating, actually, it's the worse piece of office equipment I ever purchased. Otherwise it works fine
DO NOT BUY!!!. Died after 6 months, could not configure.  Would only reset to default config which gave no security.  Worthless.  Support was BAD!! Never again for Netgear products!
dissapointing. I record dvd movies as a hobby and am always looking for better media, software etc.- I'd been using Ridata for some time w/ next to no coasters but figured I'd upgrade and go with memorex this time around. Big mistake. They skip, pixelate and freeze up. I have had to recopy at least 5 out of the last dozen or so movies I've done. Were it a compatibility issue I could understand, but it appears to be strictly a problem with the quality of the media. I'm going back to using my cheap disks!The lesson here is: " If it works, dont fix it!
Beware of Mail-in Rebate Hoax. The card works as advertised but SanDisk does not send in Mail-in-Rebate. Even though I mailed it in with the UPC Barcode, SanDisk sent me a post card stating that I needed to resubmit it with the barcode. How can I resubmit when they already have the barcode?In my experience with SanDisk, I got rebate back on one of two cards that I submitted - so you get mail-in rebate 50% of the time with SanDisk. I think mail-in-rebate is a big hoax perpetrated by these companies. Don't trust it!
Stopped working almost immediately. Extremely disappointed, especially after having done a lot of research and read the great reviews that this product (and the Axion 7" player) received.I bought it for my wife for a road trip and she was excited about the large screen and the ability to connect an antenna to watch tv.  The player worked fine for the first DVD we tried, but after that the screen freaked out and went almost black.  You couldn't see a picture but you could hear the movie just fine.  No complaints about the sound I guess, but what good is that if the screen doesn't work?Needless to say I returned this as fast as possible.  In fact, if I could rate it less than one star I would, since it didn't even last one day. Terrible product
Looks great, but beware... Wish I had bought this from Amazon; I paid $20 more for it at Staples.  This pack is cushiony & great looking with lots of pockets, but beware - the zippers are very prone to breaking.  We ended up cutting through two of the zippers after they broke, to get the objects inside.  This was after only 4 months of use.  Also, the backpack is quite heavy.  I wouldn't buy this again; at the steep price it is, it definitely isn't worth the money
This product has serious deficiencies. Jewel Cases are diffucult to open and are extremely fragile
Freezes and tech help not good. I purchased dvd express and it never worked. I spent endless time with tech support. The old story about, "It must be your computer." did not fly either, my machine is a media type and it far exceeds the system requirements advertised by ADS. I exchanged the item and it was supposedly checked out before I got it. Same problems. Tech support told me I was the only person having trouble with this product. They need to check out a few websites that review products there are hundreds of bad reviews very few good ones. My only mistake was not reading them before I wasted my time and money. ADS also told me it would not work with Ulead's Movie Factory 3, some of the software it came bundled with, but that was Uleads problem. I should use Cap Wiz ( Their program ) DUH!!! Guess what, it did not work with their program either. Ulead said they had several complaints with ADS's product. Their final solution hold on to the product and maybe they will have a new version of cap wiz and that might work. Save yourself time money and aggravation buy another product! P.S. Since ADS doesn't consider the product defective they will not refund your money or allow you trade it in for an upgrade. I don't think they want a product like that either. The only reason I gave one star is.....it was packed well.JU
Garbage!. To back up my personal DVD collection I burned 200 discs.  100 on these Memorex DVD+R's, 100 on Philips DVD+R's.  EVERY Memorex had flaws during playback.  EVERY Philips was flawless.  I've been buying Memorex for years but I'll never buy Memorex again
RIPOFF!! Bad Deal Here. I got the printer only to find that it doesn't come with a cord to connect it to your computer.  After wasting my time going to three different places, the cheapest one was for $50.Amazon's advertisement that this is "free" with the purchase of a camera is misleading to say the least as it's not honest about the extra $$$$ you have to spend just for a connecting cord.  In my opinion, this has been very frustrating and a TOTAL RIPOFF!
Slow, slow and SLOW!. Do NOT buy this product.  It is incredibly slow, by far the slowest USB drive out of the dozen or so that I've used.  It handles small numbers of large files rather well but it immediately chokes whenever faced with a large quantity of small files.  I attempted to copy ~50MB (1500 files, 800 directories) to the disk and it took almost 30 minutes to complete the copy!  That's roughly 27K/second.  Deleting the files was painful as well, taking at least 15 minutes to delete everything.  For kicks, I popped in an old 128 MB Kingston drive and was able to copy the same set of files to it in under 30 seconds and the delete took under 15 seconds.  Bottom line is don't be fooled by the drive's small physical size, large capacity and price point: it simply doesn't perform
Has to be one of the worst products on the market!. This router has to be one of the worst made products on the market, and has the poor customer service.  This router was defective out of the box, took 3 weeks of communication with Linksys's customer service before I finally just returned it and build my own router with the same functions
there are better options. I purchased this case to store my DVDs along with the inner and outer liner notes.  Unfortunately, the sleeves are only large enough to hold in the inner notes.  Since most of my DVDs only had the outer liner notes, this case was pretty useless.  In general, the design of the product left much to be desired.  If by "XTREME" it means big and bulky, then the description is right on
First Amazon disappointment. I ordered this item, as I have many items from Amazon and it did not arrive after two months.  I cancelled the order
Caused system instability. I bought the Belkin N1 wireless router and this notebook card in the hopes of obtaining a usable signal several rooms away from the router. The router worked flawlessly, and the notebook card gave me a weak / intermittent signal where I wanted to use it. This was however an improvement over my previous 802.11b Linksys wireless router that gave me no signal at all at this location.After about an hour of use, I got the 'blue screen of death' on my new Dell dual core laptop that warned that a serious error occurred and Windows was halted to prevent further damage. It further warned that if I recently installed new hardware I should reboot and uninstall the hardware. I rebooted, Windows came back, and I uninstalled the notebook card. I called Belkin tech service to report the problem, but the rep just kept trying to get me to reinstall the card. Nope. Too risky. I'll return the card.By the way, when you install the card, Windows warns that the product is not Windows logo certified. Belkin's instructions state that you should ignore this warning and install anyway.I hope Belkin addresses the issue with a firmware update and gets Windows logo certification
Did not perform as advertised. This unit failed to provide reliable power to my new Toshiba Satellite A60 laptop. It cycled on and off every 3 seconds. It powered a 100 watt lamp okay, but wouldn't start a 250 watt heat lamp at all. Product spec sheet says it can supply 400 watt surge and 200 watts for 2 min., and is rated at 140 watts continuous. My laptop power supply is rated at 2A input at 100-240 VAC, and if it drew 2A constantly I agree that it would need 200 to 230 watts, which exceeds the continuous rating of this inverter. However, even at that power demand the inverter should run it for 1-2 min., but only manages 3 sec.  In addition, I doubt that the laptop power supply actually draws a full 2.0 amps continuously. I talked to Linksys support, and they suggested returning the unit for replacement or refund, so I did. It did not work for me. Maybe it would work for a laptop that only needs 100 watts, but I wouldn't recommend it for more than that
waste. this heater is very quiet, but it never turns on. I basically have to use the manual option. The heater hardly turns on..don't count on the themostat.
Disappointed to say the least ... I should have saved my money on this one.  I bought it thinking it was a belt-clip carrying case.  My mistake!!!  If you need a protective case in the event that you drop your Sansa and want to protect it ... well, maybe you want this item.  But it's not very attractive, and it's a shame to put the player in it because you can't access the buttons very easily.  Definately not worth the money spent
Too small for most computers. I would not recommend this unit for most computers as the battery is too small to provide reasonable runtime.  Under a 200W load it only lasted 3 minutes while the Back-UPS ES 500 lasted almost 12 minutes.  The ES 500 is only slightly more expensive but provides much longer runtime.  In my opinion this UPS is only good for very small loads (less than the average computer)
Returning it tomorrow. I'm trying to replace my IOGEAR MiniView Micro 2-Port KVM Switch with a four-seat KVM. A four port version of the one I already enjoy, from the same company, seemed like the logical choice. Turns out, it wasn't. Using the exact same equipment (after reading the brief manual), I installed it. My keyboard never succesfully transmitted a keystroke and my mouse stopped working between switches. I followed the manual's troubleshooting suggestions but they didn't change the outcome and now it's going back
Worst Media Ever -- Made by CMC Magnetics!. These Verbatim discs are hands down the very WORST blank media I've EVER encountered! They're made by CMC Magnetics -- well known as the worst media manufacturer in the world. But not only are they CMC Magnetics, they're the worst of the worst of CMC Magnetics!The latest KProbe *hangs* when faced with these, forcing a hard reset. The latest Nero Burning ROM *hangs* when faced with these, forcing a hard reset. The program continues, non-stop, to display "waiting for media" when I use these, and an attempt to abort hangs Windows XP SP2 the same way it hangs Kprobe.Curiously, the media IDs on these are exactly the same as that on Philips LightScribe CD-R media (they're made by CMC Magnetics as well). However, at least the Philips are recognized by all my software and hardware, quite unlike the Verbatims. That's why I say that these Verbatim are the worst of the worst from CMC Magnetics. (The Philips are no prize, either, but they perform minimally well).The *ONLY* thing that worked with these media are the LightScribe labeling.  But what's the point of labeling discs you can't even RECOGNIZE, let alone burn?I had the exact same problems with these media in both my Lite-On LH-201AH burner and my NEC ND-2510A burner (the latter is universally recognized as and ideal burner for even low-quality media).Note that Verbatim had a great reputation when they sold media manufactured by Taiyo Yuden. But, stupidly, they chose to go ultra-cheap and turned to the dreaded CMC Magnetics Corp. Thus, they lost all credibility!*AVOID THESE LIKE THE PLAGUE!*
This product doesn't work on my board and is supports a short list of boards. Can someone tell me what boards can I buy for this memory
No PC Driver Support From Olympus. AS the other reviewer mentions, the sound quality is mediocre at best. What is really terrible, however, is the lack of support from Olympus. The driver disk that came with the recorder, was lost by me. I went to Olympus' website to download a new driver. Not available for download. I called Olympus tech support, and the rep confirmed that Olympus does not make any of their drivers available for download. He said that he would bump my case "up to the next level", and that maybe I would get a new CD in the mail "in a few weeks or a few months". In the meantime, I've got a great new shiny paperweight... Don't shop from this horrible company until they change this ridiculous policy
scanning and faxing work 1/4 the time. If you just want this for a printer, its a dandy little machine.  If you want to use this for business, be prepared to fax your pages twice...  because you will have to get a call from the receiving end saying "your pages are all garbled, could you please fax again?!".  Then you either must run the "scan hotfix" off of the hp website or turn the machine off.  This happens about 1 out of every 4 faxes or scans.  You'll know when you scan something and see the horrible results.  Stay away from this machine if you need it for faxing or scanning.  Printing... sure.    Unless, of course, HP does some sort of new software patch or driver update or something, otherwise this would be one of the quickest, best multi-function machines on the market
Hawking Hi-Gain is really a No-Gain. I would have to agree with the majority of assessment of this product on Amazon: this product fails on every count.1.	Most significantly, product does not perform as described.  Signal strength not "significantly improved."  In fact, no change in reception at all.  I have used this in my one-story home and in a caf I work at with no effect whatsoever.2.	When there is a rebate, it is more trouble than it is work.  [...
Stop and Save your money. I waited a while before submitting a review to give this unit a good try. I already had a portable unit (Garmin) but wanted an in-dash unit for my other car. At the time this unit was twice as much as the Garmin but it also played dvds. I was very disappointed once I got this unit which cost twice as much as the portable and more than most of the other units of the market. The biggest disappointment was that he does not guide you a fraction as well as any of the portable units on the market. The Garmin will take you right to the door of the address you put in. This unit (if it can find the address) gets you there and says "you have arrived..". But where, which side of the street, which building etc. My Garmin will take me right to my own front door and this expensive unit gets me in the area and then I am left to figure out which building (all having unique addresses) I am looking for.The detachable controls for the unit would make you feel that you paid $200 for the unit. It feels like it is mostly plastic and that it couldn't cost them very much to make. The radio unit I had in the car prior had a great detachable unit with its own carrying case - you get no such thing with Pioneer. I thought that was a bit cheap of Pioneer not to even include a carrying case for such an expensive unit.The interface with the unit is awkward and time consuming. When you put in an address it apparently searches in both the state of Washington (where I live) and in Oregon. I called pioneer to ask if I could just search in Washington since I didn't care about the addresses in other states at this time and when I did I could just put that state in. By the way, this is a regular feature on the portable units. Pioneer tap dances around the answer but the bottom line is - no.  What can you expect from the only unit on the market where you have to put over to the side of the road and apply parking brakes multiple times before switching addresses.I would get into the problems Pioneer has with getting its map upgrades out. Again, something I spoke to them about and you should hear the song and dance they give on that. However, if that was the only thing wrong with paying twice as much for a unit that delivers half as much as the portable units I would just complain to Pionner.Save money. If you want a good reliable gps unit look at either the portable units or one of the other brands of in-dash ones. As for the built-in dvd players you can get one of those put in your car for a fraction of the price.Remember you can always take back one of the portable units but with the Pioneer you have put out an extra $200 to get it installed as well so no real taking it back. I urge you to shop carefully if you are at all looking at purchasing this unit.On a positive note, it is fun to watch the screen come out and pop up with you first turn it on. But I am not sure that the price was worth that
service and product terrible. bought the cable after 1 printing the USB connection failed, so called manufacturer he said cable was broken and gave me a RMA, Emailed tiger they said I would have to ship back at my own expense, called amazon they gave me another person to contact at tiger, they said to ship it back and they would reemburse me. It would cost as much or more to ship back, and since getting conflicting statements I don't trust them to reemburse me.Would suggest you stay awa
APC 350ES - Very poor UPS. I had the same experience as the reviewer on 11/17/2005.  I tested the UPS by shutting off the power at the breaker.  Within a minute, the UPS software shut down the computer (I had set for 4 minutes, so obviously the battery wasn't going to hold up long.  Only load was computer, monitor, and router).  At any rate, the shut down was successful.  But upon power-up, about 30 seconds into the reboot, the UPS beeped and cut power to the battery-backup outlets, which killed the computer mid-bootup and killed the router for a second or so.Absolutely worthless, as the whole reason I wanted the UPS was to prevent shutdowns during the occasional 2 minute power blips I have here
Nice concept but terrible reality. I brought the 2200T in November 2006 after having my Magellan 700/760 stolen from my car. It barely last a month. From day one I was on the phone with customer service. I had to reset it constantly as it would freeze up in the middle of navigating on the highway. It then started to reset itself, constantly going on and off never completing the task of finding an address. I sent it in for repair and they sent me back the same unit with no repair and all the maps removed. Finally I just had to return to Amazon. I have lost my faith in Magellan and going over to Garmin. I bought the c530 yesterday and saw far it works right out the box, The navigation is spot on. Although it does not say the street names, the directions are very clear and accurate. I can put it inside my window sill in my apartment and get a signal. The 2200T took forever and indoors even by the window could not get a signal. While I did like the photo veiwer and mp3, neither one was  worth writing home about. The mp3 was tinny and with a cassette adapter played with such static on my stereo it just was not worth it. The pictures were okay, but the screen is tiny and fuzzy. Both features would have been passable if the device performed its main task, but it didn't
Sucky. This DVD player was fine for the first few months that I had it but then it started not recognizing disks and now it won't recognize any disks also it rattled so it is a piece of sh**
good sound, terrible feel. It's true what has already been said: the sounds in these headphones is better than expected, but I thought the above reviews under-emphasized the other important feature of earbugs. These are, without a doubt, the most uncomfortable headphones I've ever used. They're cheap, but any price is too much. JVC should know better than to think a clever name and different colors means they don't have to worry about comfort
disappointed in lexmark p450. I was very disappointed in the Lexmark P450 printer.  The colors were very dull and the picture quality were definitely not up to the Lexmark standards that I am used to.  (I have several Lexmark products) I returned the printer
Inadequently Represented. This product did arrive in good condition, for that I will award two stars.This product represents little information of what it does. I believe it only works with DVI signals having TV-Out.With my component television, the display has inaccurate colors (white is purple), no resolution setting (from 620x480-1280x1024) on many different hZ frequences solved the problem.This product is not intended for a normal video card (as in my Macbook Pro- which works great by the way
DOCK is a WASTE. This dock was a waste for me.  It came with the Home AV Pack.  I wanted a durable zune case that would look good and protect the screen at the same time. The Toughskin case does all three and is EXACTLY what I was looking for protection. The only down side to the Toughskin case is that the zune will not fit in this docking station while it is in the case. I believe that is an engineering problem of the docking station. This is NOT a bulky case, it fits the zune perfectly, however, even with removing the insert of the docking station, the zune does not fit the dock while in the case. Why they didn't make a docking station that would accommodate a zune in a fitted case, makes no sense. No one is going to want to take the trouble of removing a case each time they dock their zune. They should take these docking stations back from customers who feel as I do and replace them at THEIR expense with something that works! As for the Toughskin case, I highly recommend it; the other cases just didn't seem to offer this quality of protection while also having a nice professional appearance.
The Newer Maxell are now Junk CD's. I used to buy these all the time.  They were made in Japan and had a bluish dye to them, and when you held them up to the light, you couldn't see through them.  I never had a bad burn.The newer ones are now made in Taiwan.  They have a silver dye and are see-through when held up to the light. These CD's suck.  Don't buy them
disappointing - poor design. Shortly after I began using my head phones, I noticed the wiring at the hinges was starting to crack the wire coating.  Within 8 months of not-very-heavy use, the left earpiece wouldn't work any more.  Guess I can't send them back, since I didn't keep the box!Also, the battery pack is in an annoying place - every time I turn my head, it catches on something
BUGS OF PREVIOUS YEAR MODEL STILL PRESENT. I have owned the DMR-ES40V for over 6 months. It is a combo DVD/VCR unit. I have had sufficient time to become intimately familiar with the pros and cons of the unit.The MANUAL:  It is imperative to have the manual. This machine is somewhat complicated, and frequent trips to the instructions is necessary. If everything is working correctly, you can usually find the instructions that you need somewhere in it. It is overly time-consuming though, since the items don't seem to logically flow. If you dig long and hard enough though, they are in there somewhere.The SET-UP: Being somewhat experienced at setting-up a home theater, this was generally easy. The text and pictures were sufficient. Searching through the Function Menu, I learned that to perform the same action and different levels required using different imput buttons. This is needlessly confusing. Of course the auto clock set function isn't very accurate ( I haven't seen an accurate one yet).DVD PLAYBACK: The general playback is pretty straight-forward. I really miss some of the extra playback features that are on my JVC progressive player (which is 3 years older). Finding a scene in a movie is comparatively difficult. A Zoom feature is missing. Many convenience features are not present.DVD RECORDING: Recording onto a DVD-RAM disc is a dream compared to old fashioned VCR tapes. I really enjoy using them. A quirk--you must have the unit in stand-by to record from the scheduler. This mandates that to watch a recorded show while recording another(on the same disc) you must wait until the unit begins recording, then select the show to watch from the Navigator. The UHF tuner has some trouble recording somewhat weak signals from channel 19. Other weak channels record but not 19. This problem started about 6 months after initial set-up. There is an annoying bug with Daylight Savings Time, and the newer extended time period. The Panasonic Web Site suggests going into the set-up menu and unchecking the DST box; thus removing the feature. If this did anything, it would allow you to set the clock manually. Being without the automatic DST adjustment would not be annoying, but even though you turn-off this feature it still resets your clock twice a day at noon and at 7pm EST. This ruins any TV scheduling you had set. This malady persisted until the date of the former DST Spring-Ahead arrived. Several weeks of scheduling hell! I requested assistance from customer service but never received the telephone call that was promised. No message, no number to call--just a promise to call again when I was home.THE VCR USE: This feature is really buggy. You are supposed to be able to eject a cassette with the remote; but this only worked for a month or two. When a TV show is scheduled for recording the unit won't tape it if you merely insert a cassette. It doesn't recognize the insertion of the cassette unless the tape has been made to move--either playing a little or fast forwarding/reversing. This is really annoying.LAST IMPRESSION: The last movie (Last King of Scotland) I watched took over the machine. The remote control would not function, the disc would not stop, and the disc could not be ejected. It was necessary to unplug the unit, restart it, eject the disc, and totally reset all menu items--which were randomly reset to various settings. Worse some settings are no longer selectable. One other movie would not even play in the machine--forcing me to use the trusty JVC unit.I must say that this machine has many of the same problems that are still occurring in the new units from what I read at this forum and other ones. These units are being released for sale way before they are ready for public consumption. I recommend looking elsewhere.
Defective. I read the instructions.  Inserted a tape.  It made a horrible noise.No matter what button I pushed, nothing worked, just more noise. Then the noise stopped, and it won't do anything.  I can't return it because of the"policy".  I neglected to save the box.  What a waste of money
Not well made, hard to use...already broken. I think this is a waste of money. I wanted a cheapie CD player for my daughter to listen to CDs...haven't even had it for three months and it is broken.  The CD drive now shows 'no disc' no matter what we do.  Unfortunately, I can't return it because of Amazon's return policy. Buy something else
check w/ the manufacturer. Check that this fits your plasma or LCD before you buy. It's not so universal as they say. It didn't fit my Philips 42PF7320A plasma. CHECK! I can't stress that enough.Eri
Bad Design. The iRock's sound quality is on par for most of these FM transmitters, they all sound bad. I was aware of the sound limitations when I bought the iRock, my big issue is the design and placement of the power button. It is set up in such a way if you put it in your glove box (or just about anywhere) you can guarantee something will press the power button and run down the batteries. Very frustrating. The iRock also limits you to only four station radio choices, 88.1, 88.3 etc. Since I live in Boston, a fairly large city with many, many colleges, those frequency are being used. So the iRock is useless for me when I am downtown. As soon as I get out of the city I'm fine. There has to be a better unit out there
Can't use Shuffle lanyard when using this skin. What this product description doesn't mention is that you must use the included Speck USB cap when using the Skin Clear. The ball-bearing mechanism of the standard Shuffle USB caps do not engage when the Skin Clear is installed on the Shuffle. Since the Speck USB cap does not have a lanyard string, you're out of luck if you use the lanyard as I do
Broke very easily. The extendable arm breaks very easily.  I had two of them and they both broke within the first month.  The company does have a 3 month warranty but you have to pay for shipping to send it back to them and I have been waiting over a month for my replacement.  Very poor product.  Do not buy
Disappointing. I put this cover on immediately after I opened my iPod after reading how easy they are to scratch.  I've never had my iPod without the cover on it and have had it 3 weeks.  I now have an iPod covered with distracting scratches on the screen.  SAVE YOUR MONEY.  THIS CASE IS JUNK
Looks good, but very wobbly. This stand looks okay but it is very unstable.  When I put my monitor on it it took 20 seconds to stop wobbling.  Very unsturdy
Beware of DRM file formats. After careful consideration of sites like Napster and other download music file "To-Go" types. The iAudioX5 will not be recognized or music files(DRM)will not play. Even when the firmware is upgraded to 2.11_b1. Also if you have Windows XP the drive has to be formatted in FAT32 and the max partition is 32G leaving a wasted partition that the iAudioX5 firmware will not use for file storage because it is designed for a single partition. So if you need to "wipe" the iAudioX5 drive Windows 98(SE)can do this upto 2T in FAT32 or a third party software on Windows XP OS (although it needs to port through USB2.0 as well). NTFS formatting will not work! as the firmware is written to look at FAT32 sectors. Other than that this unit has many features and functionality that surpasses any iPOD
Junk. Bought my Go510 on November 14 as a Christmas present for the wife. It comes with only 90 days of warranty. Today is April 6 and the thing is broken. For a few days it had trouble finding the satellites, then just went dead. It was never abused, never left the car. Out of warranty for just 45 days, $600 wasted. It is junk! Stay away from it
Doesn't live up to the specs on the box. Gigabit? The speeds are about 5-6 megabytes per second. Does that sound like Gigabit?Since it is a file server you would expect to be able to have multiple shares right? wrong. Only one at any one time.Mac compatible? Hardly. It's more like the Mac can connect, but it doesn't have Appleshares or Appletalk/IP.The UI is really bad. I updated to 1.02 of the firmware, but that didn't help any of these problems. Other than that it was great
It Does not Work with Macs. They totally misrepresent this product. It does not work with Macs. I feel cheated and lied to by Memorex, shame on you
Not worth the money. I got this for christmas 2004.  Played 5 DVD's on it and started to get the &quot;No Disk&quot; reading.  I only had it for 1 month.  I sent it back and they are replacing it since it is under warranty but they are replacing it with a different model.  We will see if it has the same problems.  According to reviews of the 1700m model I expect the same.  I suggest you spend a little more money and get a better DVD Player
Familiarity breeds contempt. I wanted to give this calculator higher marks. On paper it appears to have alot going for it:o two line displayo editable equation historyo persistent function memories (4)o "440" functionso bitwise logical operators and five number baseso neat cheat sheeto equation solverHowever, the more I got to know this calculator the more I disliked it.1. The large glass panel covering the display (and the top 1/3rd of the unit) is highly reflective and makes the display hard to read under flourescents.2. The two line display is a source of continued frustration. The top line, which at first appears to be the input area, shares this function with the bottom line. Function key presses register immediately on the top line. The bottom line is for numeric input which only registers on the top line when a function key is pressed.  Yuk! I often find myself having to delete redundant digits due to this input area confusion. Not so with the Casio Fx-115MS.3. The {algb} function suffers from [2]'s poor functional separation of input/output. Prompting for variable input is severely restricted--only the numeric input line is available--thus no expressions, only simple numeric literals.  To populate the variables with expression results you must first evaluate and store these BEFORE executing the {algb} operation.4. The equation solver is also lame. No underlying algebraic rewrite rules are in effect as with the Casio Fx-115MS and HP 33s. So, if you want to perform a Time Value Money series, you will have to rewrite the equation yourself for each variable of interest (periodic payment, period interest rate, number of periods, principal, future balance).With its beaucoup functions I'm sure this calculator has alot to offer engineers. However, the function memory and equation history persistence don't quite compensate for its disturbing lack of elegance
Do not buy this camera. My 3220G died as soon as I applied the latest firmware. I had first tried the 6620G ($750!) and it froze up constantly, lost its wireless grip, didn't return reliably to location settings... All in all a great concept but D-Link doesn't deliver. No tech support. Don't waste your time with these cameras. I had to return both the 3220G and 6620G to Amazon.
poor reception and constant static. this phone has constant static and very poor reception, it constantly makes a clicking soun
Poor Quality from Sony. I didn't like the TV, HD sound was not working.HD picture quality is poor, improper color display. On the whole its a not good product from Sony. None of big stores like Best Buy, Circuit City etc... has this TV( I guess it is because of its ppor quality).
Poor. Not nearly as good as the $25 earphones that come with the IPod. I listen to lots of classical music and wanted some quality earphones for my new IPod.  In the $200 range the Shure E4 gets top reviews.  Mine were a big disappointment.  I thought my first pair was defective, and Shure generously exchanged them.  The replacement pair was just a bad.  The E4 series has very poor base and very harsh higher frequencies.  Overall, these $200 earphones are much worse than the original $25 earphones that come with the IPod.   Much worse.  The sound produced by the E4 is marginally better than a cell phone.  If you're not serious about music, and want something fancy to plug your ears with, the Shure earphones will do the job.
AWFUL reception! Barely a mile. I just purchased these in part due to the relatively decent reviews and for the rechargeable aspect, features and brand-name. Took them out to test and really not pleased with the performance. In Florida so mountains and hills are not a major influence in the performance evalution. Also, it was perfect weather. I'm not in an area with high rise buildings, rather outside of town in a mostly residential area. At one mile they began crackling severely with static. At just over a mile-they became non-audible...only the call feature worked. By 1.5 miles-forget it. Full charge, no mountains, no hills, no tall buildings, nothing but a few tree's. Now, I did NOT expect anything near the claimed 14 miles, not even half that. I did expect somewhere between 2-4 mile range in perfect weather...nowhere even near it. On the other hand, the rechargeable aspect is nice, the car adaptor is a great little touch but for the price difference-they barely outperformed the $20 set I purchased as toys for my neice/nephew. Disappointin
RECEIVED BAD SERVICE. AMAZON FAIL TO DELIVER ITEM WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME.  THE ITEM FAIL TO ARRIVE AND THEREFORE WE NEVER RECEIVED THE GOOD
Poor compatibility, poor customer service. Switch did not work with my Samsung 191T monitor. Customer service people were slow to respond and were not helpful
Please, Don't buy this product, if you what to config VPN. No support available for VPN config.Wasted 60+ man hours configuring VPN, not working as of now.Looks like this product was not tested or certified for VPN.Poor functionality for VPN.Sad, that i bought this equipment.
I miss my stowaway. I bought this as a replacement for my stowaway when I replaced my Palm m105 with an HP IPAQ. The palm-stowaway combination was an excellent portable alternative to my laptop and I used in nearly every day.  After my positive experience I expected my new IR keyboard to function the same way.  What a dissapointment! I can forgive the large size of the keyboard but there are several aspects of this keyboard that have made it intolerable to me. I found the keys did not always respond leaving me with multiple errors to fix in every paragraph and the split space bar has been a constant source of irritation, I usually hit the solid piece of plastic in the middle instead of one of the keys.  The little plastic arms on the stand do not hold the PDA at all securely, even bumping the table can knock it off, and I have taken to using an elastic band to keep my IPAQ in place. The "mouse" arrowpad is a nice idea but does not justify the loss of the arrow keys. Finally the backlight does not stay on while using the keyboard and there is no backlight control on the keyboard (unlike the stowaway). I will be replacing this keyboard with another after a much more careful search
Waste of money. Ok, never buy electronics online. I first ordered this tablet online, and when I got it, it installed just fine, however, the pen was not working. Had Adesso send a new pen. Seemed to work fine. But when I started drawing, the tablet itself made the pen jerk at two spots which looked like two strips might not have been working. So it was impossible to draw anything with it. Had that returned for a new one.Now when it comes to actually drawing, the pressure sensitivity and the actual use of the pen itself were just downright awkward. Pressure is one thing, it can be adjusted and I could just learn how to use it. But the pen itself needs to be almost pointing directly down on the tablet in order for it to even see the pen was there. Tilt the pen too far down like a normal person draws, and the point of the pen would no longer be touching the pad, because it's so small.It has a USB cable, so it should be plug and play. The tablet gets recognized, but the pen takes a while for it to even be able to move the mouse cursor around to do anything with it. The pen and mouse are wireless, so the tablet picks up their signal when touching. There's a light that keeps flashing when neither is touching the pad, but when they do the light stays lit. But even with this happening, the pen does not always begin working even if the light is lit.Simply getting a hold of Adesso was a chore in itself. After going online sending e-mails, and even calling them on the phone, the whole situation took a few months in total for them to give me a return number so I could mail it back to them, until they finally had the free time to send me a new one, which is still not reliable.Now buying a pricey product online was my own fault, because if you get it at the store you can return it right away and have the whole thing settled in a day or two. Sending things by mail takes days, weeks, and eventually a few months in my case. Don't buy this, or any product from Adesso
"This is not compactible for the 80gb video Ipod.". This is the description for this item.Eforcity's Black Aluminum Case for Apple iPod Video 30GB / 60GB / 80GB Models / iPod Video U2 Special Edition."This is not compactible for the 80gb video Ipod."
Just Smears Dirt Around. To start off with, It's hard to start the wipes through the hole in the cap.  You have to take the cap off and then take the foil seal off, then you find the start of the roll.  It's glued down like the start of a roll of toilet paper.  (They say you are supposed to start in the middle of the roll but I couldn't find the middle!) Then you have to feed the wipes up through four very tough plastic tabs in the cap.  The only problem is the hole is small and tabs are not very flexable.  I was honestly afraid my finger was going to get stuck in the hole. (It didn't) I think the safest way to do it is to use a pencil or pen to start them with.  Once I did get them started, the tabs are so inflexable that the first sheet just tore in half no matter how carefully I pulled on it.  So I took the cap back off, started the next sheet.  This one came out in one piece, and tore off the roll, BEFORE THE NEXT SHEET STARTED THROUGH THE HOLE. (grrr) OK, forget feeding the sheets through the hole.  I just take the sheets straight off the roll.  So now I clean my computer monitor, which is pretty dirty.  (It's in a room with 3 smokers)  I can clearly see that it's just smearing things around.  I check the sheet itself.  It looks clean still.  I sit and watch as this filmy substance dries on my screen, with very pronounced, very visable streaks.  I try another sheet.  Still got streaks from hell.  A third sheet later, I can't seem to make the streaks disappear.  They only move around.  I say forget it and clean my moniter the old way.  I say forget this stuff.  It's junk.  Save your money
wizcom quicklink elite pen scannner. Have to have it and use it to write a review, Don't you think;Sorr
Small but deadly. Being a graduate student and living in an apartment, I was hoping to find a cheap printer that would allow me to print off course materials and assignments.  It prints off things quite well and it is fast.  It does not, however, print 500 pages per month.  50-100 pages per month is a more reasonable estimate and then the cartridges cost over $20, which is high considering how often you need to buy them.The item did arrive in a timely fashion and it arrived in the specified condition.
BETTER STAY AWAY FROM LOW QUALITY CARDS. I considered this card to shoot a wedding because being short on cash it seemed like a good value, I researched a few websites and found some encouraging comments so I went ahead and purchased it. What a mistake!!I filled up the whole 4GB with RAW/JPEG photos (I use a Canon EOS 30D) and when I transferred the photos to the computer (used 2 computers and 2 card readers) I started getting hardware failure errors after errors and lost over a dozen precious photos.Needless to say I was majorly furious. Thankfully I like to be prepared and also carried my old and trustworthy (5 full stars) 2GB Sandisk Ultra II.From now on I will stick to Sandisk cards, I'll pay more but I know my photos will be safe
Buyer beware. I returned this contract and asked for a refund but NEW ignored my first two emails. Then I called them and they informed me of their shady business practice that it would take 8 weeks to refund my account. I then contacted Amazon and they resolved the matter in one day. I read reviews for NEW and most people that actually had to deal with NEW were not happy. The 77% positive rating they have is misleading because the majority of people rating them have never actually had to use the product.
Worked great for a couple of days.... I was so excited about how great this product worked when I got it.  I had purchased the FM transmitter for my wife and they do not work so great so I thought since my car had a tape deck I would give this a try.  I was excited that I had all my ipod music with me, BUT after less than a week it the sound  started going down hill to a point where I couldn't listen anymore with it.  It is now in a landfill somewhere.  My guess is I will need a radio in the car that is ipod compatiable cable.  For now just have the radio and CDs I burn
Promising prototype; poor finished product. For me the main drawback of this unit as a clock radio lies in the primitive interaction between the radio and clock.  It is basically a clock attached to a one-way time switch.  The radio has to be switched off by hand and the alarm set to go each night - unlike a wall time switch but just like the traditional alarm clock. You can't reset the alarm when turning the radio off in the morning because there is no AM/PM distinction.  This might all be fine if you have never had a clock radio before, but for the last 30 years or so the canonical design that works very well has been automatic switch on, every morning, with usually an hour or so of run time before automatic switch off - set and forget.The clock itself is rather small, poorly-lit and difficult to tell the time from when half-asleep.I found the sound quality unremarkable for current table radios.  Higher frequencies rolled-off a bit too quickly and bass tended toward boxiness, perhaps because of the bass port being tuned in an attempt to reach too low frequencies for the driver and cabinet combination.In side-by-side comparison with the Boston Acoustics Recepter, the latter had greater clarity and presence and a more pleasing bass, though suffered slightly from bass boominess (doubtless also from pushing the bass port tuning a bit far).  For functionality as a clock radio, it wins hands down and the Tivoli I'm afraid has to go back
SONY ALARM CLOCK/RADIO. This is the second Sony cube clock/radio I have owned.. The first one lasted 25 yrs. I see the improvements made.. I like everything better EXCEPT it is difficult to see time in darkness..The background light is good, but the digital numbers are not dark enough.
Important Note: NOT SATA HARD DRIVE. I thought that this was an SATA hard drive because the label is ATA/100, but is in in fact an EIDE hard drive, so when i bought it I was unable to install it. This was probably my fault, but no where in the product description does it say that it is EIDE so I am putting this review up in hopes that no one else mistakenly buys this hard drive.
Very poor performance. Quality is OK for antenna, but design just does not work.  Glass mounts just don't provide any xmit power.  GO magnetic mount.  You'll be much happier
Mediocre sound quality, questionable reliability, weak radio reception. I bought this stereo because of its relatively small size and stylish appearance and because it had aux inputs for me to hook up my mp3 player to it.The first unit I received would not turn on at all.  I contacted Philips' tech support, and their solution was for me to send the brand new defective stereo back to them at my expense.  Fortunately, Amazon has a very nice return policy, and I sent it back to them instead.  Amazon was also very nice in sending a replacement right away without waiting until they received the defective unit.The replacement stereo arrived in short order, and I was immediately disappointed in the sound quality, which didn't seem as good as the 15 year old cassette player boombox that I was replacing.  After listening to the stereo for a few days and comparing it to a Sony CMT-NE3 bookshelf stereo that I own, here are my thoughts.1. The FM reception is not as good as the CMT-NE3.  Both units have a thin wire type of antenna, and both wires are about the same length.  The Philips stereo, however, would hiss and crackle as I moved around the room - my body interfered with the reception.  This did not happen with the Sony stereo.2. The sound quality is not as good as the CMT-NE3.  Playing the same song side-by-side on the two stereos, I found that the Philips stereo had a flat, tinny sound when compared to the CMT-NE3.  The Sony system had a much fuller and richer sound quality.  Also, there seemed to be significant distortion in the high-frequencies on the Philips stereo, making "S" sounds sound more like "H" sounds.  I also noticed an occasional crackle of distortion in the overall sound, possibly due to a bad connector on the aux input.3. The ergonomics of the Philips stereo are not so good.  For one thing, the stereo will easily tip over forwards if accidentally bumped.  If that happens, the CD can get wedged in the CD tray and it becomes almost impossible to remove.  The electronically actuated CD door is much more likely to break than a passive mechanical door like the top-loading CMT-NE3.  The volume goes up to 31 or so, but 5 is about as loud as you would need it for regular listening.  This means that there are only 4 quieter volume levels, which is rather limiting.  Finally, the stereo is a bit bigger than I was expecting (though I could have looked more closely at the specs when buying it).I am in the process of returning this stereo, and I will try to find a Sony system instead.  Unfortunately, Amazon no longer sells the CMT-NE3, which I bought just about a year ago.  I don't understand why electronics manufacturers feel the need to churn their product lines so rapidly.  Is there really that much innovation in bookshelf stereos?  The only difference between the Sony I bought last year and one I bought in 1989 is the ability to play MP3 CDs.
IM AN IDIOT FOR BUYING THIS. Ok so, so i ordered this thing on the 10th and it just arived today (19th) nine days later, of course the last day of there so called "Delivery Estimate" . The package came from walnut california, i live in humbolt county california, i can dive there in 9 hours9 HOURS!and on another note the thing doesnt want to worki plugged it in my wall and my i pod shuts off, ok coolit finaly starts to work and i unplug it freezes for a second then... shuts offits not somthing i want to trust with my $300 i poddont buy this thing pleaseyou think oooo 2 bucks for a wall chargeryoull be thinking oooo when it frys, electrocuting you instantly putting you in a coma for the next 20 years of your lifepeople you get what you pay forlove, joshua
BSOD with Installation. I, too, experienced the "Blue Screen of Death" on my laptop which has XP pro on it.  I had to uninstall the card software in order to stop my system from continuously rebooting.  On another note, the install of the router was GREAT, regardless.I didn't get anywhere with the Tech support group and had to return everything.Anthon
Well built, poorly suited. I purchased this game pad due to good reviews.Found it online for $15 with free shipping so had to try myself.Its true its built well and pretty comfortable in the hand.The programming software is alright as well, not as nice asthe Nostromo n50/52 software for example.But what i didnt like about it was much more relavant.Firstly there is a toggle lock shift button.This button is easy to press by accident and since it is nota momentary button you have to go back and press it off agian.Interupting game play.Also buttons 7 and 8 are not paddles but rather thumb, and quite far from normal thumb use. I had a hard time using those buttons quickly.Also the toggle and digital buttons cant be mapped for other uses so your limited to 8 total buttons rather than 10.And finally, for some reason there was no way to invoke fight in NHL06, i couldnt live with that so i had to ship it back, and ill soon go with the logitech
A Real Lemon - Returned the Product. I used the FR114P for a couple of days before returning it.  I had to reboot the router every day to re-gain connectivity to the internet.  Additionally, if I disconnected my ethernet cable on any of my PCs, the print server app would continually try to connected/search for the printer server causing the pc to bog down and be really slow. Do not buy one of these - the D-Link DI-707P is far superior
It doesn't work. I bought this product to help cleaning the lense of my auto cd player. I tried it for at least 10 times, but no luck. Wet clean the lense manually is the best way, but that will include getting the player out from the dash board
I rate this below consumer reports glowing review. I purchased this product partially on the recommendation of consumer reports.  Looking back, I would have gone further and NOT bought it.  The iPOD interface is poor at best and the speaker setup via the front menu/remote usage is difficul
Total Rip Off. The other negative reviews are correct.  Too small, can't see screen, the fit is so tight it affects the wheel.  I spent $30 dollars on a little strip of cloth that actually makes my nano and nike+ useless.  If this was designed and made by some 3rd party it would make a little bit of sense, but as it is, I have no idea how they screwed this up so badly
Horrible dvd player. It constantly paused and froze up playing brand new dvds i bought at best buy. Gave me headache just watching it, that I started renting vhs tapes to watch. samsung should do their testing before releasing junk like this on the market, make the working consumers the testing guinea pigs.
SanDisk SDDR-103 MobileMate - good luck. The reader didn't read my 2G MiniSD. I have another reader that does so I dumped the MobileMate and took the lost
Good potential, but nasty. The Tomtom has great features.  But I returned mine.  First, the maps are very dated.  This makes it iffy at best.  It has terrific potential, if it worked.  You can use a PDA stylus on the map sitting at home outside on batteries to plan a trip.  It's amazing.  But I wanted to plan a 600 mile trip myself using it's internal maps and waypoints.  But I tried a local test first.  I used roads as waypoints, main roads.  This way I can force the Tomtom to use MY routes.  I did not like it's choices, since it is a dated map database.  I set up a local route, and started to follow it.  It took me to the first road/waypoint no problem.  But it would not go past the first waypoint.  I would go down the road (first waypoint) then it would tell me to take a u turn!.  I did.  Then it said take another u turn.  It had me going in circles.  Perhaps it's not made to use roads as waypoints, but all indications it gave were that it would.  The manual was no help.  Support was no help.  So it went back.  I have ordered a Garmin i2.  Hope this is ok.  I have taken the same trip from SE FL USA to SC USA with a Garmin C330.  The Garmin has maps that you cannot update, but got me to my destination no problem.I don't recommend this TomTom.  Do research.  Go to manufactures websites and look at unit manuals.Hope this helps
Terrible, absolutely Terrible. I think this is the same razor as the more expensive stand/clean razor.  I have a light beard and this razor takes twice as long as my other Braun shaver. It rattles, and has a obvious lack of power.  Now I have always bought Braun shavers and they have lasted years.  I predict this won't last the year out.  Save your money.Mik
The colors are great but kills budget system performance.... I purchased this AGP to run 3d software occasionally and not really for games. I updated the BIOS, DirectX, and video drivers before installing the card and loading it's support software. The manual was a general manual that wasn't specific to my card. It recommend exiting hardware wizard and running the ATI install. The amount of software that was installed was overwhelming and unnecessary. All you need is Catalyist and the drivers. Not file player, ALL-IN-ONE-WONDER, REMOTE-WONDER, Multimedia Library, unless you plan to watch TV on the PC. (I don't). The card has no fan but a large heat sink. I have a Sempron 3100+ with 1 GB ram, additional cooling fans and 300 Watts. With all that the system was shutting down from overheating. I lessen the resolution and refresh rate to no avail. The card showed rich cooler and the built in 3d configuration, pc check and screen savers worked with no problem. But just doing web surfing, playing quicktime, running 3D screensaver causes overheating. No games. The video payback was choppy. My onboard video that came with the motherboard outperformed the card but can't run 3D. As a test, the card couldn't run even the most basic 3D game demo even in it's lowest detail settings. I returned the card after that. The overheating and shutdowns went away. It maybe a great card for larger systems but for budget system it's a performance killer. It has overheating issues. The support software did little to prevent system crashes.
Don't waste your money like I did. I purchased the Cyberpad 8.5x11 digital Notepad with the expectation that I would be able to digitize my sketches and notes I made at work. Unfortunately the product did not live up to my expectations. The first unit that I received did not function, the usb connection to the pad was defective (the connector would not insert all the way hone). I returned it and received very promptly a new unit which at least functioned. As far as being functional that is another story. I proceed to try to use the it in either using the memory in the pad itself or using it directly connected to the computer. Either way the unit produced images that were useless. The lines that look fine on the paper pad were incomplete or missing in the digital version. Drawing a straight line was impossible even with the help of a straight edge. I let a friend try to use it and he had similar unsatifactory results. Unless this performance is a function of this manufacturer's design, I would say that this is one technology that is not ready for 'Prime Time'
Don't buy.  Terrible terrible product. Like so many others in these reviews (I should have read them first!), I can categorically say that this is one of the worst software/hardware products I've ever bought.  It does not work, tech support is useless, and you should not even try to make it work. I am a computer expert with a great computer, and there is ABSOUTELY NOTHING I can do to make this work.  Don't buy.
Looks Good, Needs A Lot of Attention. Brought this home and immediately there are problems: it will only work if the unit is tilted. So I put a napkin folded up under one side it works..but seems a little silly. There is some sensor in there that needs to be in contact with water and somehow mine only works with the "leaning tower" approach..avoid this one
Doesn't support Explorist GPS units. This software does NOT support the Explorist series from Magellan. For that you need Magellan DirectRoute v3.0, which is part number 980654-04. Amazon doesn't currently carry that version. If you have an Explorist, do not buy this, go elsewhere and get the correct version.If you have an older Magellan GPS, this should work just fine
worthless. Bought this player to amuse a 3 year old on a plane ride, worked the whole trip just fine, got home just stopped working.  (gives the error of "wrong disk" when trying to play a DVD I know works fine) All of the disk play was supervised by me, so I know it was nothing the kid did...I then looked up the web site to send in for repairs found out it would cost almost $100 to fix!  That's almost the cost of the player itself.  What a scam, sell an inferior product and expect the consumer to fork over repair costs or buy an new one, well not me.  Go to a different brand
Avoid this product. I have had the unfortunate experience of dealing with 3 of these at the office.  Each one is plagued with the activity lights flashing constantly when there are no other wireless devices in range. (flashed to the latest firmware) I tried multiple locations, even going as far to bring one home and see what happened.  I live the middle of no where, so I am sure there are not any wireless devices around.   Also, the fact that neither 802.11a or 802.11g would keep a constant 54m connect.  Sitting the laptop 1 foot from the router and the speed would fall back to lower connect speeds constantly.  After trying multiple wireless lan cards, and multiple laptops, I can honestly say this AP is a piece of garbage and I would not recommend it at all
The Tablet. I received this tablet and it looked real good I loved it --I pluged it in to the computer and put CD's in and nothing--the CD's did nothing the WACOM tablet doesn't work so here I am with the tablet the mouse and the pen sitting by my computer and out the money wondering why I even bothered buying this thing in the first place -don't try it because you might just get I did --a WACOM tablet that doesn't work and then you are out the money plus  figuring  out how to get your money back or how to get in touch with the sellers!!  I have tried and there are no answers anywhere there are no phone numbers to call for help---no numbers for trouble shooting you are on your own no return numbers or adresses you are left with this so think again before you waste your mone
Case Logic Needs Better Designers, FAST!. I really need binders that can hold more discs as my collection grows and as so many new DVD releases are multiple disc sets, so I was really hyped about the release of this new 80-disc binder.  Boy was I DISAPPOINTED.I bought mine at a local retailer.  But before purchasing it, I noticed that the binder came with two types of sleeves: 10 each of the old 2-disc design and 15 each of the new 4-disc design. I thought the binder was tampered with, so I started to inspect at least 6 other binders and found the same allocation of sleeves in each of them.  So instead of potentially storing 100 discs (25 sleeves x 4 dics/sleeve), I'm left with only 80 max.  At least it was accurately advertised as an 80-disc binder, but wouldn't it be better if it held 100?  BUT, the bad thing is that the dimensions of the 2-disc and the 4-disc sleeves are different, with the 2-disc sleeve being between 1/4" to 1/2" shorter on a given side.  So if you have the 2 types of sleeves interspersed in your binder, you may easily miss some of your discs stored in the shorter sleeves when you flip through it.I bought the binder anyways.  It wasn't until I started using the binder at home that I found really bad things about the new 4-disc sleeves that just totally irritated me.  The openings for you to insert the discs are so minimally cut out that the only way you can take a disc out of the sleeve is to GRAB the disc with your fingers, causing fingerprints and possibly even scratches on the surface.  To make matters worse, the sleeves have notches in them that I am guessing were designed to hold the disc in place so that the disc doesn't fly out while you flip through the binder.  But these notches hold the disc so tightly that they make you have to GRAB the disc even harder to remove it from the sleeve.  The old sleeves, though not perfect, were designed much better because the cutouts were large enough for you to stick your forefinger into the disc's hole and slip the disc out by its edges.My only option now is to hope the current Case Logic designers are replaced with more talented and creative ones soon because my DVD collection just got bigger with the new Star Wars release
Does not support windows 98. The product description says:"Includes drivers for Mac OS 9.1 and later, and for Windows 95/98/ME/2000 "This is a lie. Once you get the product, set it up, fail to install and go to the web site it says "does not support windows 98".  Who knows what they do support. Don't buy it.
Ok...for short periods. I have used this mouse for 3 months with my laptop.  Look/feel and general use are fine for short periods of time (~&lt; 1 hour).  However, I am currently shopping for a replacement as this mouse has one problem:  Intermittently, after clicking/double-clicking, the mouse will go into a "move to the left" mode...and will continue to move until it reaches the edge of the screen.  Sometimes it will move to the upper-left.  This is so inconsistent as to be unpredictable.  I will often (at least 10 times in a 30 minute period) have to give the mouse a wiggle to stop it from continuing.  Frustrating if you are trying to click through a multi-level menu, for instance.  Another example is if you working on any CAD-type or image editing project where you need to insert a line one segement at a time (mouse will move when it feels like it).It was ok for a while, but now it is annoying...going to buy a replacement.If I have to buy a replacement for a product because of how the product performs at an early stage in its life, it gets no more than 2 stars.  It could be just this one particular mouse, but then that points to lack of QA at the manufacturer end...again, 2 stars
Twice Smitten. I bought this Linksys router on the advice of a salesman at CompUSA. It was what I was looking for and I had had success with Linksys products in the past.  Not this time.  I could not get any of Linksys software to recognize the router.  Couldn't ping the router either.  Tech support said it was defective so I returned it to CompUSA.  Tried again with no success and called tech support (4th actual call).  They said it was another defective router.  Two off of the shelf defective!  Needless to say returned for a refund
memorex blank dvd's. In each pack there have been several dvd's that aren't any good.  Too many bad discs in my opinio
cheap. Upon my first use of this cute little flash drive, it broke. The yellow cover broke off and wouldn't go back on. I would not recommend it. I returned it.
Garbage. I suffered with this clock for a year because it was a gift and expensive.  Even on the lowest setting the blue glow is so bright my finace says it looks like an alien spaceship is landing in the room.  The sound is so-so and it has no battery backup, lose power for a second and you have to reset everthing.  It is also very big, taking up 1/2 my nightstand.  The final straw was that it has trouble tuning in even the strongest radio stations where I live.  This morning I finally gave in, accepted reality and tossed it in the trash.  I won't miss it at all
My Opinion. I am less than pleased with this product. The buttons on the player for operating the CD are stiff. The location of the cassette player on the top makes it awkward to insert a cassette.The remote operates well but it is poorly designed. It is shaped like a V with the narrow end toward the holder and it is slippery. I had to tape some waffle type foam to the back so that it would stop slipping out of my hands. Because it was so hard to clasp I dropped it at least 3 times and the battery door broke its tabs so I had to tape that shut
Brother - Never again!!!. I was with HP for 15-20 years, needed MFP read all reviews here and decided that MFC-8860DN will be a good choice (other option was HP 3055).  It has everything I need - copier, network print, scan, fax.  Easy setup (I am in IT for 25+ years).  Everything was almost perfect.  The only complaint you need to keep in mind - IT EATS 1100 WATTS when starts printing - light could flash.It was OK, until I reached 1500 pages mark - it start printing small dots every ~3".  No problem - need to clean everything (per my experience and confirmed on Brother's web site).  Cleaned - it was the biggest mistake - all outputs were with tons of small dots all around the page.Called Support 2 times.  After few hours of troubleshooting - they advised me to replace DRUM.  Hey - its only 1500 pages, nowhere close to promised 25000!  After I mentioned it, they offered me 75% discount on it.  What's about warranty?  Sorry.  I spoke to supervisor, he explained that Support in Philippines can't do it, the only option - to call USA office.I replaced DRUM.  Now counter shows around 2000 pages and I have same problem again.Hey, I heard this before - never say never.  Still as of today:I would NEVER, NEVER buy Brother printer/MFC again!!!
Very Disapponted - Does not work, etc. I had previously purchased an HWU54D and love it ! This model never functioned properly and the software could not be completely removed from one of my desktops.I will not purchase this model again
This thing sucks. While I'm driving, this thing doesn't work at all. There's tons of static and the music cuts out all the time. The only time this FM transmitter works is when my car is still. Maybe it's because my antenna is on the back of my rear window and the transmitter can't reach it. Overall, I'd say this product is garbage
Warning this is not a car holder. If you are buying this thinking that you will be able to use this to mount your Magellan into another car, forget it. Don't be fooled. Basically when you buy a Magellan you get the unit, a mounting cradle, and a mounting arm. The mounting arm attaches to your windshield with a suction cup. The mounting cradle then semi permanently mounts to that mounting arm. This cradle allows for easy insertion and removal of the Magellan unit. If you buy this all you are getting is the cradle. Without an arm this is a worthless piece of plastic. Not even a very pretty piece of plastic that could serve as a Christmas ornament..
Tape reel sticks; does not spin. I couldn't get this cassette adapter to work in my car.  Upon investigation, I found that the tape reel sticks, and doesn't spin.  I opened the cassette adapter up (it's screwed together), and found that the gears do not line up very well.  Needless to say, I returned this cassette adapter to Amazon.  I was pleased to see that Amazon paid for return postage on this defective product.  I will be buying another cassette adapter from a local store (maybe Radio Shack), so that I can more easily return the item if it doesn't work.  It seems that a lot of these cassette adapters have flaws in them, and the more expensive models are not always better.  Good luck
Nice while it lasted. I bought this mouse a couple months ago to use with my MacBook Pro.  I loved it, until a couple days ago when it decided to stop working.  It's not connecting to the USB adapter any more.  I changed the battery and tried the Connect button, and nothing.  Sad, isn't it
CAUTION: Only 1 Star for PowerPoint Presentations. Unfortunately, this projector comes up very short for PowerPoint presentations because of the 800x600 resolution. As a result, the images are blurry and fuzzy. When I called Epson to explore this issue the rep said this was indeed a problem and results in the "screen door" effect.If you intend to use this projector for PowerPoint presentations you need to get a projector with much better, at least 1024x768 or better resolution. Wish I had known that
hype. Bought new ear piece for new ipod. Had Koss plugs. Panasonics are awful. Tried all the sizes. Guess I don't have the right ears for these.Koss plugs are great. Reverted back to them and have no desire to upgrade after hearing Panasonics. Are the Sony look alikes any better??
Need help finding HP Inks.... Dear Sir/Madam: Its very difficult to email you regarding things I can't find.! Or you don't sell? I am looking for HP black ink. #20 for 656C printer. Now, you tell me which ink I need? No way you can tell.!! Because you are NOT selling or what? You site is very difficult to find Ink I need
Save your money!. Heavy, Short Battery Life, Rechargeable Batteries last a couple of months then need replacing. I do not recommend this product
print heads are duds. I have had this printer for more than a year.  At first, it was a great printer. Not anymore!!  It uses up ink like no other, yes, it is great to have the individual tanks(which is why I bought the thing) but now the print head isn't working right.  Do several deep cleanings and use up nearly all the full tanks up, and the problem is still there.  The pages have splotchy black marks and the texts are only partially printed.  Went to the canon website, they don't even acknowledge this printer ever existed.My recommendation is don't buy this model!!
Not Compatible!. I was hoping, and was led to believe by the listing, that this item could be used with a MAC and a PC. THIS IS NOT THE CASE! In fact, Seagate does not recommend transferring information between a Mac and a PC using this hard drive. Unfortunately, I found this very important information on the third page of the user's guide. Very disappointing
Unless you want to clean it everyday, find a different one... I bought this humidifier for the same reasons as many other reviewers, and was happy with it for the first few nights.  It put out enough humidity to keep our bedroom moist, and it wasn't loud-especially in comparison to other humidifiers we've tried.THEN, on the third day, I noticed brown streaks on the paint on the wall nearest the humidifier.  I washed them off without any real problem, just thinking this would be a pain to do every few days.  Well they were back the next day, and so I decided to clean the entire humidifier as well (which you're only supposed to have to do weekly).  There was brown bacteria growing in the water tray and the base!  It was so disgusting, and very hard to get off, even with bleach and water.  Our water does not have a high mineral content, and I was using filtered water anyway.I bet if you clean this unit every single day, that wouldn't happen, but who wants to clean a humidifier every single day, especially when there is a baby in the mix?  I'm just glad that we tried it out a few weeks before our baby is due!  I can't wait to take it back
this system blows (not in a good way). do not buy this system.  for the money there are much better systems out there.I bought this for my family room mainy for the small size of the cube speakers.  The main problem with the system (which bose has corrected by the way) is that the "acoustimass" component (bose's fancy name for a subwoofer) is not active (or powered) which means the base is totally inadequate and is overun by the cubes which have no mid or bass ranges.  The result is that you get a very "tinny" sound out of most applications including dvd's.  I ended up getting a sony active subwoofer and it sounds much better.In hindsight I would have bought a different brand than bose, but already had to much invested in bose to scrap the system completely, and the size of the cubes is nice.  Still pissed that I spent that much money on a substandard system, but hey, got sucked into the bose marketing machine
terrible, worst than original stylus. The replacement stylus is terrible, much lower quality than the original stylus that comes with the LD.  The replacement telescoping top is too loose, and thus wiggles around a lot in your hand.  And it doesn't extend and retract smoothly into the barrel.I would rather get a stock LD stylus than get 3 of these replacements
stayaway from it. i have so for used inav iguidance,mapopolis,navigon navigator 5 and The Blue Logger & Street Atlas USA .out of all these The Blue Logger & Street Atlas USA is the worst and inav iguidance 2.1.1 is the best  .blue logger gps hardware is good but v impractical to use bcuz of its strange onoff button....i will not recommend it to anyone....simply waste of time and mone
October 2006. This dvd player is potentially a great, cheap and versatile machine BUT...The two i bought from Worldwide Distributers were faulty.  I have a friend who owns a CH-DVD 300 which works perfectly with my Region 2 (English) DVDs. I have a CyberHome DVD player in England which works perfectly as well.  The two machine i received didnt work very well and didnt play some discs at all. This is why i would recommend spending a bit more on another machine.  After returning two players i decided to buy a Philips DVP5140 (Multiformat DVD Player with Divx, MP3, Windows Media Support) which with a code to allow it to play all regions works perfectly!  It cost $60 with free shipping through amazon so wasn't actually much more expensive than the other player!  (See the reviews of this player for the code!)I would also like to say that there was nothing wrong with the service from Worldwide Distributors and that they refunded most of the shipping costs. The problem was ONLY with the DVD players they sent me
Need warranty repair........forget it. Purchased this TV from Walmart, on Feb 1'st.  On Feb 13, took it to the repair shop for warranty repair.   Was told after 5 days, that the part that it needed was no longer available.  And that they would send me a  replacement TV.   The TV was a 2005 model, manufactured in 3/2006.   Was asked to fax my receipt.   Samsung gets my receipt and says that it is to blurred to read.   Have spent hours on hold trying to get to their customer support about the TV.   I feel that since I have called several times to try to get some answers that Samsung is recognizing my name or case number  and just ignoring my being on hold.   Yesterday was on hold for an hour and a half with music playing in my ear.   Monday, I will fax them an 8X10 copy of my receipt that I hope will not be too blurred to read.   So things are still up in the air.  Was getting the TV for a bedroom, and had plans to buy a 40 inch soon.   No way, will I buy it from a Samsung dealer.   With all this calling and waiting, my 30 day return policy has passed and I stuck having to make payments on it. I had the TV for about 10 days, and even though it was my first LCD type TV , had to learn about it.  I could not turn it on or off, except with the remote.  Neither did the controls on the side work.  So I can not give any opinion about picture quality or anything..........just want them to send my replacement TV.   So beware of needing any repair while in warranty.   And if your TV is not working as it should, take it back and do it quickly, and forget about having any warranty work done.  Like pulling wisdom teeth.
Won't sync as advertised. This is a nice organizer for the price.  Easy to use and has all the basic features, but it wouldn't synchronize with Outlook 2003 on a Windows XP computer.  Without the sync feature, it's worthless to me.I contacted Sharp support several times, but they could not find a solution.    Despite this, they referred me back to Amazon for a refund, which I can't get because it's been more than 30 days since I received the product.I'm unhappy with the product and I'm unhappy with Sharp
Buyer Beware. I ordered the Colby CX-CD241 portable CD player for my 8 year old nephew -- along with a CD - for his birthday.  When it arrived, the AM/FM Radio worked, but the CD player did not. This unit was obviously not tested prior to its release.  My nephew was so upset that he wasn't able to listen to the CD he has been asking for. Talk about a terrible birthday gift!  What a tease.  I would have been better off not buying anything at all than "half a gift" that was of no use to him.  In the meantime, I'm still waiting for Amazon to send a label so I can return this piece of crap.  I will never buy anything branded Colby in the future.Amazon -- Unfortunately, I'm associating you with your affiliation to Colby.  You would be better off dropping their products.  Don't let them drag you down with them.
Look elsewhere for better values. When you move significantly above the $100 mark with headphones, one naturally expects superior sound and build quality - things that can be found with competing phones like the Grado SR125, Alessandro MS1, or even the Sony MDR-V6. For one thing, the body of these headphones is made of a relatively flimsy plastic, and lends little in the way of confidence in the product. The sound - the part that matters - may impress neophyytes with their strong bass, but balance and richness of tone are sorely absent. Perhaps that's why may TriPort owners find themselves defecting to other products.Bose has earned a name through aggressive advertising and name recognition, but if you're a savvy shopper (and are willing to look at some superb competing headphones (sometimes at half the price), you and your music will be in a better place
Big hands beware... (also Mac OS X users). I was hopeful about using this mouse for gaming, and its response time did deliver. It is more precise in it's cursor control than any other mouse I've used.However, it was apparently designed for someone with smaller hands than me. I find it's side buttons are difficult to use. They're very small and their action is not to my liking.Further, I was hoping that third party drivers would provide the ability to use all of the buttons when using Mac OS X Tiger. The Steer Mouse driver provided the best support and it supports everything except the right side buttons. I've found nothing that supports those buttons on the Mac platform to date
RCA Wireless Headphones. Can't evaluate, UPS could not access our area due to snow, road closures so (apparently) the UPS driver/UPS "mailed" the original, soft-wraped-shipped headphones by regular mail -- they arrived (the Headphones) busted. The trouble to file a claim under the apparent curcumstances seems more than the paper work/troubel to file a damaged-in-shipment claim so I am just out the cost
Horrible CD player. Well, maybe I should give it two stars because of the four units I tested in Target this one definitely sounded the best. HOWEVER, the CD player is downright pathetic.  It will not play any homemade CDs and I suspect it might have something to do with the company that built it (Sony is well known for their hyper-strident stance on copyright issues).  So, we can't use any of our friend's productions (I have several musician friends who record their own music) and we can't play any of our own compilation CDs in it.  Bummer.  CDs that play in every other CD player we own but not in this one.  In addition, older CDs have a tough time getting kick started.  Newer ones (last 10 years or so I guess) are OK.  So, if radio is all you want, this unit does sound OK.  Just don't try to play anything besides mass produced CDs
DOESNT MAKE SENSE TO BUY. GET A PS3 60 gig version.. IT has this technology built right in plus u get the best gaming system on earth till 2011.OH YEA and buy a good hdmi wire from here.. i got one for 10 dallors and a 37 inch flatscreen from walmart hdmi hdtv.. u know the full deal.. and its emerson so its not a no name brand.. I hope this review is helpful to yo
No Sound. You only have three choices of stations to use for transmission, two of which were already occupied.  The third station should have worked but we were only able to get sound by turing the volume all the way up and even then it was quiet and poor quality.  The only good thing was that Amazon was good about the return
Never could get my computer to recognize this player. I have a 2 gb player, which I like. I wanted a player with more capacity, so I ordered the 8 GB model. I tried charging the device but it never seemed to take a full charge. When I attached the device to my computer, I got a message about invalid drivers for the device. I looked at their online support and tried their suggestions, but it didn't help. I talked to Creative Zen phone support many times, they seemed to be more interested in getting rid of me rather than helping me. They would send me emails suggesting solutions and hang up as quickly as they could. I updated Windows, motherboard drivers, changed registry settings, cleaned the drive and reset the device, all to no avail. I returned one device and got another, just to see if the first device was defective. It didn't help. I tried the phone support again, and they sent me the same emails I got before. I finally gave up and am now looking at other higher capacity devices.
Very Disappointing Product. This product looks and feels very flimsy. Do not be fooled by the flashy, metallic-looking picture. The plastic shell of this device is the quality of McDonald's toys. One would think that for $300, the company would at least commission a manufacturer that did not leave plastic whiskers hanging off the rims due to bad cutting.The buttons are hard to press. In order to turn the device on, you have to press very firmly, which is a risky thing to do considering the cracking delicacy of the shell.The cable port for the DocuPen is also extremely flimsy, and you have to hold the cable firmly in place in order for the downloads  to take place; otherwise, the connection will be lost.I am a pre-medical student, and I very stupidly invested a lot of money in this product, believing that I could (for 8 seconds a page and 100 pages per disk) scan my science textbooks in the library, including the colored diagrams, and in that way, I thought I would make back my investment, since textbooks go for at least $100 each. However, I now see that this belief was naive, to say the least. The Docupen is extremely difficult to use. The words come out distorted, like a jammed fax machine, and although the free Paper Port software which comes complimentary with the DocuPen is rather useful for annotating PDF's, the DocuPen does not produce texts that are legible enough to annotate.Furthermore, downloading is very slow (at least 15 seconds per page on my fast computer), and since you can't see how your scans have turned out until you load them into the computer, you will have to re-scan about 80% of pages due to stretches, smudges, blurriness, suspicious blank spots, and general illegibility.I wish I had read some of the other negative Amazon reviews before buying this product. I would have saved myself a lot of money and time.If you are a user who is only looking to scan pictures or a few flat documents, then this product may work okay for you, although a digital camera will probably deliver better results. If you have been harboring grandiose visions of going all-out "paperless" with this product, you will find yourself extremely disappointed.Until PlanOn decides that this product is worthy enough to invest in a semi-decent shell manufacturuer, it will not a good buy. The idea is wonderful and has a lot of potential, especially when coupled with a Tablet PC. However, the execution of the idea needs improvement. I hope to see a far better version of this product in the next few years, at a price that is comparable to quality.
A waste of money. I bought the WinTV tuner to use primarily as a video capture card. Frankly, I believe using a computer as a TV monitor is a waste of a good computer. I intended to use the WinTv-PVR 350 to convert video tapes into digital format but when attempting conversions the computer freezes up. I have lots of RAM and plenty of room on my hard drive. The longest capture I have managed so far is 15 minutes, but most range in size from one minute to six minutes. After spending a day splicing together the fragments of a VHS tape I converted with the 350 and which I then burned to DVD, I discovered the quality of the image far below DVD quality. It is far below video tape quality.I am willing to spend some real money on a good video capture card but it isn't the WinTV 350. It's not useful as a capture card and it's too small to be a doorstop
good pack for the money, but... I had to spend the same amount of money fixing a tuning problem on the guitar and changing the string
save your money. seldom do i write a review downgrading a product but this one is truly the exception.  i bought this one on ebay and thought i was getting a good deal.  price-wise, it was great.  however, it would appear that the designer of this organizer tried to put so many features into it that it ends up doing nothing well.  the directions are terrible.  they are extremely difficult to follow.  i never could get it to sync with outlook.  i fear that today i will waste more time trying to get it to work.  i owned one of the first palm pilots and it was child's play in comparison.  in this case, you get what you pay for.  don't purchase this, you'll be sorry.   Take care, it's a time bandit and even if it were to function flawlessly, the design with all of its attempted functions is way too much.  punch this button to get to this screen which will take you to the next screen, ad nauseum.  do you carry the manual with you.  put together in another country and probably by someone not entirely familiar with the English language.  truly disappointed with this worthless plastic.
This product is great; etronics is the worst!. While the quality of this product is great, I highly recommend you find ANY other source to purchase than etronics! All the customer reviews I have read are poor and this one will be worse. They shipped us the wrong product;they wouldn't respond to us to get the right product, when they finally did send the right product, a month later we got the bill to pay for shipping the wrong product back to them! There is no way to contact them other than email. This place is a scam! Get the equalizer, from anywhere but etronics
Intermittently working. I just purchased a set of two 4 channel Westinghouse intercoms and they worked only intermittently.  If I tipped one of the units, it worked sometimes, as though it had a bad connection.  I am trying to return them now to the seller.  Good luck if you purchase a set of these.  They seem to be hit or miss as to whether you get a good set
not so great. I wear these headphones at work for several hours a day, and I don't find them very comfortable for extended use.  The wire that is hidden in the back plastic piece has begun to slip out in places. Plus, the ear pieces are a little large and shiney in the middle, so I feel like an insect when I'm wearing them
USB Bluetooth Receiver WORTHLESS. The included receiver has very limited range.  If you already have another receiver (I did) you might be able to live with this set.There is no back lighting on the keys or mediapad LCD.The media pad is somewhat useful to use as remote control for iTunes and Windows Media Player.  However the useless LCD can't navigate song titles, it simply displays the currently playing title.  Would be great if you could scroll down a list of artist/tunes and tag for play
Good but can't see the keys anymore. This is a great idea, very useful to protect your keyboard. I think that computer companies should always integrate this kind of protection to the keyboard. Keyboard aren't cheap, and on laptops if you spill your coffee, your laptop is pretty much dead. So this comes in as an important piece of protection.Unfortunately in low light environment, especially when there's still enough light for the backlight of the keyboard to be off, you just can't see the keys anymore. Because of this issue, 1/2 of the time i'm not using the protection. The protection is very sticky on the side that goes against the keyboard, meaning that when you don't use it, it gathers a lot of dust very quickly, beating the purpose of having that "skin" on top of your keyboard.Another good idea, that really needs more thinking, as to what material should be used so that it's fully transparent
Not very ergonomic at all. If the thing actually fit my ear, I'm sure I would have loved it. This headset wants a bigger ear than I have, that's for sure.  If I hook it around my ear in the way that feels most comfortable, the little soundpiece hits below my ear canal, meaning that I cannot hear anything.  If I jam the soundpiece *into* my ear (which is seriously uncomfortable and takes some work because it's too large to fit in there easily!), the ear-hook doesn't even touch the top of my ear.  Just poor design overall.On the positive side, seemed to be sufficient for Skype (which is what I had bought it for).  Wouldn't recommend it for listening to music, of course; turns anything bass into tinny sound.In any case, I need to find the packaging so I can send this back. :
Wow, THAT Much?. My father needed a 3.5" drive to recover some old files on floppy disk.Why did this thing have to cost more than a spindle of DVD-R's?Because its medium can hold over 1.4MB of data!  That's almost 1/500th as much as a CD-R!!!Don't get one of these unless you really need to...let the old tech rest in peace
Poor Quality. The mouse works fine. The keypad is pretty much crap. The rubber anti-skid things on the bottom came off the first time I used it and the plus and minus keys no longer work. I haven't even tried all of the keypads functions yet to see if they work, as I've only had it about 2 weeks. I'm returning it.I do like however, that both the mouse and keypad have an auto off feature after a short period of not being used
NO FLASH BUTTON ON HANDSET!. I bought the KX-TG5571 and an extra handset after being so pleased with it'spredecessor KX-TG5471.The 5571 handset does not have a FLASH BUTTON!What you have to do instead is press the speakerphone button, wait foroptions to appear on the screen and then press a different button toaccess the FLASH function and there is NO WAY to figure that out whilelooking at the handset.WHY
Too Small. The case is too small.It just fits the laptop with no place for laptop accessories.Not even for laptop battery.I wouldnt suggest this case
Unreliable product and unresponsive customer service. After less than one week of use, I am forced to return this product due to its inability to maintain a reliable network connection.  In 5 days, I have had to cycle power on this unit, on average, more than once per day after it locks up.  The Web UI fails to respond to connection requests, it loses the ability to communicate with the internet and the only solution is to cycle power.  I have tried to work with NetGear technical support, but their suggestions (e.g., lower MTU) have been useless and their responses quite tardy.  If you are looking for a firewall/VPN unit, I suggest you pass on this particular product
I really wanted to like these... ... but I'll be returning the third set in a month.  First set headband broke two days in.  Second, microphone didn't exist (as in, literally removed that tiny cap on the tip of the extension, and there was no little mic inside) and the main volume control knob started going crackly, where you have to pinch and squeeze and torque it to get all channels working.  Third set, microphone existed, but the sound quality is wretched, just utterly wretched.  And yep, the volume control is now giving out just like the first two.  During the brief periods that it's actually functioned properly, the sound was quite positional and fun for gaming, of pleasantly acceptable (but not audiophile) sound quality.  Not to be confused with product quality, which this puppy comes up short on after even the third try
Very poor FM reception and not usable walking or jogging. Reception is only acceptable if you are seated with the headphone antenna adjusted to maximize signal strength
Channel + did not work. One of the most essential buttons on any remote is the Channel + button and it did not work straight out of the box.  I returned it.Beyond that, setting it up takes time but is not difficult.  I am just going to wait and see about the next model that comes out
paint wears off keys after 4 months of use. Just like others have stated. The paint comes off the keys after a few months of use. You would think logitech would have made a better product.
Microsoft B5W-00001 Wireless Notebook Laser Mouse 6000. One of the worst pieces of hardware I've purchased in the past two years.Short on features/functions.Short on range.Suggest buyers consider Logitech
Will not help with car stereos. I cannot help but wonder how this device helped two other people who used it on car stereos.  Car CD players have a front loading mechanism, as opposed to a tray or top loading, and the instructions specifically say not to use it -- bacause this damages the brushes.  If the brushes are out of alignment, as they should be after using the cleaner in the car stereo, the device will do nothing for your CD player.  It helped a little with my CD-ROM, but I highly doubt it could ever solve the neverending issue of a dirty car CD player
Disappointed. I purchased 4 of these units and 3 were either DOA or had to be returned because of assorted defects. I replaced them with the media Carousels by Ziotek. The software from Ziotek is not as sophisticated as Disc Stakka's but Ziotek's units are a higher quality product (and hold more DVDs)
Poor radio, small buttons. I purchased the Rino 130 specifically because it also had the  radio and NOAA features.  Fortunately I read the other reviews on this model as well as the 120 and 110 versions that complained about poor radio performance. I tested the unit and sure enough the radio performance is absolutely terrible, and I was able to return the unit to Amazon in time for a full refund.  Be sure to test this yourself.  Also the buttons are very small, and the zoom function is impractical as you constantly have to activate the zoom and then slide the zoom level up and down.  I returned the Rino 130 and purchased a Garmin Etrex Legend C (color display) for about the same price.  I will miss the NOAA feature of the 130 but not the radio.  This is an overpriced GPS.  Spend the money on a color display unit instead and you will not be disappointed
waste of money. You'll end up looking for something better.  Sound fidelity is pretty bad.
Time in one small package. Ok maybe it was in the fine print or something but this alarm clock is TINY! I didn't realize it would be so small. It can pretty much fit in te palm of my hand
Don't expect any support when it stops working. I bought version 2.5 of this card to run on XP.   Linksys claimed that they really support XP, although the install told me to ignore the warning that XP was not supported. After a few months, the card suddenly stopped working, I tried downloading the drivers, uninstalling and then reinstalling. (The only download available was the 3.0 version, which I think may be a prolem.)  The setup program would not even run!  I then spent an hour and a half doing on-line chat with a support rep.  His advice had the same results -- the set up would not run.  He had me try the card in another laptop with the same downloaded drivers.  Same result. After all that time, he just told me that something must be wrong with the card and to buy another one.  There was no diagnostic that I could run to determine if the card was indeed defective.  I would not advise anyone to buy this card.  Linksys clearly does not care whether the cards work or not, as long as they can continue to sell them to unsuspecting buyers.
SW Won't Run on all Computers. I have a fairly new computer (Fujitsu S7110 laptop) and this SW won't run on it. It installs without any error. Clicking on the program icon results in nothing happening.As a test I installed it on my desktop (a CyberpowerPC) and it runs just fine.But, I need it on my laptop, not my desktop. It doesn't do me any good while on the road to be running on my home machine.I called tech support and they basically had me disable all the boot time software and services and, yes, the software does run. But is that really a solution? It's more like a kludge. The software has issues and Magellan doesn't want to admit it.The Magellan web site hints that version 2.0 of DirectRoute won't run on all DVD drives, but they don't provide a solution.I asked if they would upgrade me to version 3.0 and they said no.This software was essentially a waste of money for me.
Worthless!. Sony Premium Grade T-120 VHS Tapes used to be pretty darn good.These days that is not the case.The past few times that I have bought these tapes to record movies from the satellite dish,there have been to many flaws with the tape.One problem has been a line through the middle of the picture,like you sometimes have when you rent a movie thats about 20 years old,and also there have been jumping pictures,and small audio flaws as well.I use various brands of videotape,so I know that the problem lies here with the Sony videotape.Basically the record about as well as a tape you have recorded on over and over and over.They show too much wear way too soon.Get Maxell tapes instead
expensive and no good. I must say I bit into this Senheiser scheme. I paid a lot of money on a product that should not cost that much.First of all I should say that I only paid 65 dollars for it and I still think it is much more than it is worth.Now the problems:1.	It is called open air design or something like that, bottom line is everybody in the room and the neighboring rooms can hear what you are listening. What is the purpose of the headphones then? I could play my games using the speakers and have a better experience.2.	The highs are too high and the lows are too low. First time you use them you say oh it sound great but after a time it gets annoying.3.	These are supposed to be audiophile ones. I play my guitar sometimes at 2 at night, this was the reason for the new headphones (I got tired of my old ones - they had a very short wire). Now the problem is I use a lot of distortion and because the highs are too high and so on they are horrible. I went back to my old ones and I am only using these with my computer during the day or when nobody is at home.Anyway my opinion is that I should have bought the $20 Phillips model that I used to have before these
needs TWO USB slots... i bought this to replace an 80gb portable firewire drive. wanted more capacity and the same convenient portability. there's nothing convenient about its need for 2 USB slots and the data moves slower than the firewire drive it is replacing. nice little glitch on the small type of the packaging... if you're reading the requirements for Mac OS X you miss the bullet point in the Win XP section calling out the need for 2 free ports. Amazon's description of the product is similarily misleading as completely negelcts the mention of needing TWO USB ports...boooo seagate. i'm offended that you're offering such clumsy connectivity
Tivoli subwoofer sounds more like a chihuahua than a bulldog. I have my Tivoli model 2, which I love, hooked up through an inexpensive home theater system and it sounds great.  But sometimes I want to listen to the radio without using the home theater.  The sound quality is a bit tinny so I decided to try the subwoofer to fill in the low end.  When I received the new speaker I was impressed with it's eye-appealing design.  I immediately hooked it up to the model 2 and turned it on.  I didn't hear much difference so I cranked it's volume knob up to the max.  The bass response improved, but just a little bit.  I guess I'll continue to play the radio through the $40 home theater.  In summary, the subwoofer looks great but the sound quality is disappointing
Eugh - Yuk!. Some of you guys must have some crummy soundcards installed on your machines if this widget sounds better than your stock unit.In theory of course, the AA micro should be the business. It's a dedicated D/A or D/D unit as far as I can tell. But the transients are terribly produced - No solid sound stage, I'm also hearing added noise. And I'm not expecting audiophile quality either! I'm using a mid range pair of Sennheisers on my IBM X40 Thinkpad. Seriously, the installed sound card is quieter and does a far better job. I tried a variety of apps (musicmatch, mediaplayer, audition) with the same results. The noise is not constant, so must be in the conversion stages, instead of interference.Wanted to love this - but it's rubbish
Hypersensitive and bascially doesn't work. I bought this DVD player for the multi-region capabilities but I now have a much bigger problem: I can't watch ANY of my DVDs. This player seems to be extremely sensitive to the slightest scratch or smudge -- and it really does not like discs I've burned myself. Every time I use it there's a 50% chance it won't load the disc at all. I have to wait about 5 minutes to find out. If it DOES load, it will likely stop several times - and probably never start up again. Very frustrating! Don't know what is wrong with this thing - but I've tried dozens of discs with the same result. I'll be looking for something else. This thing just does not work
Did Not Work. This product does not work at all. I called tech support and they agree. They told me to send it back and get another one. I did. It did not work either. I sent it back and got my money back. Amazon was great, but the AVerTV card is junk
Dont even think about it..... I had been using philips adapter that i got from Walmart and was quite satisfied with it until the wire broke when it got entangled. I bought this one just because it was MAXELL and i had to make 25$ in order to qualify for free shipping. But the moment i inserted it in my stereo i realized my mistake. It sounded terrible. The very same day i went to walmart and picked up philips adapter once again. You can try others as well but dont even think about this one...
Don't be fooled by the 1100mAh rating. I bought a couple of these Nikon EN-EL1/Konica Minolta NP-800 equivalent batteries for my Konica Minolta A200 camera. Their performance is simply terrible. The OEM NP-800 (rated at 800mAh) can take 150 - 200 photos, but the SterlingTek can only take a few dozens. I didn't bother to return them because of the hassle and shipping charges.If you want to use third-party batteries, try Lenmar or Ultralast. I have used them on my Sony Alpha A100 and Panasonic Lumix LX2. The performance has been great from these brands
prepare to lose your data!. I have about 200 live concerts that I burned onto TDK discs about 3 years ago. None of them are playable now. Going forward, I will only use Mitsui Gold cds.
Good idea, but caveat emptor!. These do work great for organizing CDs and DVDs, and I do still use them, but I found that the two inside CDs/DVDs can become scratched by a small plastic ridge that runs down the middle of the page. I kept my TV DVDs in these pages for awhile, and discovered that all the discs on the inside of the pages had been scratched along this ridge. A few of my Simpsons discs still won't play certain episodes. So I keep all the discs on the outside slots only, and I've never had another problem with them. I use the inside slots for liner notes/episode lists, though I usually have to trim them to make them fit right
Great service if you never plan on canceling. I have been a subscriber for 4 years.  Back in November my account was turned off due to a billing issue. The week prior to it being turned off I started receiving 3 calls a day for payment.  I advised one of the reps to wait a week for the payment, payment was made.  Calls stopped for another week.  The radio was then turned off and the 3 calls a day started up again.  I explained to the bill collectors I owed nothing and when offered to reactivate the radio I told them not to bother, at this point I wanted nothing more to do with XM.  They offered me 3 months of free service to come back, anyone who cancels can get this by the way, and I refused.  The 3 calls a day continued for the next week, I was informed that it simply takes a week for your name to fall out of their automated system....2 more months go by and then I start receiving a bill saying that I reactivated my radio and owe for 2 months of service and all the late fees that go with that.  40 dollars.  I call in and state I never reactivated my radio, thus I don't owe for reactivating my radio and the 2 months of service that would have followed.  The customer service rep told me that it would be taken cared of, 2 weeks later I get another bill.  I call back and the rep tells me the same thing and apologizes for my inconveniences.  I even called back the next day just to make sure it was finally resolved, and that rep confirmed that I no longer owed anything.  So then last month I start receiving COLLECTIONS NOTICES. YOU HAVE ONE MONTH TO PAY THIS BEFORE IT GOES TO COLLECTIONS.  I called in and was promised they would look into it and call me back.  This apparently has taken care of the issue, though I never received the call back.  This week I called 6 times, 3 of which I was promptly hung up on for no reason, and was told each time that it had been resolved.  So hopefully this time it really is...  To anyone considering XM I suggest you just get an MP3 player
nothing but problems... I bought this television in December. The problems occurred in March. I made a request to have a repairman come and he basically replaced everything in the unit. The problem was the light engine. Now that the parts in my tv are brand new, I thought my problems were well behind me, but I was wrong. After it was fixed 2 days ago, more problems occurred. When i try to change the contrast, brightness, etc., the settings would reset once I turned off the tv. Also, sometimes the tv won't turn on, it would just make this weird buzzing noise. The picture is now worse than before.For all the new owners, please advise that you will be dissapointed once it turns into a dog like mine did. The tv may work great out of the box and you may be tempted to write a "5 star" review on here shortly after viewing the tv, but wait until 2 months approaches and I guarantee you will have Nothing But Problems. Write a review after 2 months and you will see what I mean.
Junk. This is the worst pice of electronics I ever bought. Started falling apart after few days only. Battery life is a joke.Software that comes with it is totally unfriendly and even if you manage to install that thing on your computer it won't work with OS prior to XP. You will find that out after you're done installing it. Mediocre performance. Don't waste your money on this one.
Won't work on the Zire 71. What a waste of money! Yes it will load. It has great graphics. But you can't control the games. Instructions are almost worthless. They are written as if you are using a joy stick.
iHome is a disappointment. So when I first got the iHome for Christmas, I loved it. Well, I loved it in spite of the glaring bright light, that even at its lowest setting has to be blocked for me to get to sleep. However, after awhile the iHome will not register my iPods existence at all. Today I was able to enjoy thirty seconds of a song before it fell into disgrace again. I would not recommend this product if you want something that lasts. This device has become nothing more than a nuisance that won't even pick up radio stations. So, the alarm can only be set to a vaguely annoying beep when these functions are disabled. Useless
If you enjoy static, this is the phone for you!. I've had this phone for approx. 9 months now, maybe longer...and I truly don't know how I've stood using this dual phone system for so long.  However, tonight I've taken a giant step "upward" towards better quality and design with the Panasonic KX-TG 5432M dual system.This dual handset is the worst I've ever experienced in a cordless system.  From the moment I set it up, the static has been atrocious.  Step away from the base unit over ten feet and it sounds like someone gargling gravel or a mad cat hissing in your ear.  I can't even step into my attached garage to talk with someone without major static to the point of not even being able to be heard by the other person.  Even within six feet of the base I receive intermittent static that becomes obnoxious and distracting, not only to me, but to the other person on the other end...for they hear it too. I will never purchase another uniden product, if this is the non-quality of product they put out.  I had a 2.4 mhz system that would outshine this system...and I wish I'd never gotten rid of it.As the title says...If you desire a lot of static when you talk on a phone, this is the system you need to bring that crackling symphony of music to your ear. The melodic consistancy this system creates in ones enjoyment of talking on the phone will not put you to sleep, but rather increase your aggravation of dealing with what sounds like a major electrical storm going on inside your head. Uniden should be ashamed of this product.Stepping down from the soapbox now..
DO NOT USE AS A DATA DRIVE!!. I have been a long time user of Sony's minidisc equipment. I mainly liked the removable media feature. For about $3, I could copy a whole CD to one regular minidisc and keep it in my media library. The early units seem to be made better. The more recent units look to be cheaply made. There is one inherent design flaw with a media that has to spin. The read/write heads have to move back and forth across the media, and this is the weak point. There is a tiny ribbon cable that attaches to the read/write head. THIS CABLE WILL FAIL in time. It may be 6 months, it may be three years, but it will happen. When it does, you will get the famous "BLANKDISK" error whenever you insert your disc. This will destroy whatever data was on the disc. No great loss if you use the minidisc for music only, but a potential disaster if you use it for backing up data (which I used to do). I researched this on minidisc forums and found that It had happened to others.I used minidiscs for data backup because the $3, 300MB discs were perfect for my needs. After loosing valuable data, I have put all 3 of my units and dozens of recorded and blank discs in a drawer. Probably never to be used again
Great TV for the Price. I like the fact that you can save money with not having a tuner that you do not need.  The Monitor is light and was easy to hook up.  The picture, even not in high definition is great.  DVD's look great on the screen, although the picture in widescreen does not fill the screen as you would think it would.  That is the one downside to this otherwise great television.
This product doesn't work. I bought a Netgear WG311T wireless card to replace one from another manufacturer that had failed.  First, I coudln't get a connection to the router.  Two conversations with tech support in India produced the information that I had to download a new driver for Windows XP-SP2 from the internet.  I installed the new driver, which allowed me to connect to the router, but not reliably to the internet.  A third attempt with tech support produced the suggestion that I change my web browser (I'm using IE!)  Instead, I bought a Linksys card, which worked straight out of the box.  Don't buy this product!  If you're not convinced, go to the Netgear user forum and read the horror stories there
Unacceptable. This model was intended as a replacement for my not-very-old and yet quite functional Panasonic PM-series stereo.  This is the kind of thing that happens when you browse Amazon while drunk late at night.Unfortunately, with the exception of a very slight advantage in audio quality, the Sony is in all respects inferior; ergonomics, appearance, and above all, FM reception, which is laughably poor.  Do not buy this stereo if you expect a quality receiver.  Hiss abounds, several local stations I heard previously are now unreachable, and to top it off, Sony has stuck with their time-honored habit of using proprietary connectors, so when I went to plug in an after-market antenna to get better reception, I found a weird little plug that I hadn't noticed when I put the damned thing together.  Grrr.  So now I'm going to sell this thing and buy a nice new Panasonic with the proceeds.  Death to Sony
look out!. mine blew up the batteries, what a mess. called eton, they said never heard of this happening. took it back for a refund. now i hear a recall is in place
poor quality control. These cases are O.K. but fragile. If you drop one, it's trashed. My main complaint is that only 40% of them are useable. I bought mine at BestBuy. When I got them home, I opened the package and found most of the cases were missing the little plastic hinge.Tried to return them, but BestBuy accused me of breaking them. I went into the store and inspected the other packages. Those too had most of the hinges missing. Go ahead, buy 'em if you want to. You'll just end up throwing most of them away
Roll the dice, this one is a gamble. I purchased this item and one month later I still have not received any paperwork. I emailed and have not received a reply
Almost... The duet mic worked for a few sessions.  Then it just did not sync with its master unit.  I had to return it.Amazon customer service was great and I eventually received a credit for the unit.
Not worth the money. It's no wonder the product description was so sparse. What I got was a small piece of thin plastic the size of the screen and a piece of scotch tape stuck to it. I guess I was supposed to tape this plastic, er the screen protector, onto the screen, but there wasn't even enough tape to keep the plastic on! This is the biggest waste of $18 I've ever spent. There are better, cheaper products out there that are actually worth the money
Good idea poor design poor  implementation. I have had my Nuvi for approx 6 to 7 months and overall I am somewhat satified.  Initally I could see no flaws it was perfect I recommend the Nuvi to 3 friends and they all bought one.  First impression, features on the Nuvi 660 are without a doubt very cool and a step above everyone else. Now to the not so good stuff which is really a deal breaker for me. First after a month and half the unit locked up, my friends locked up after 2 weeks of light use.  Once a nuvi locks up it has to be sent back to Garmin the reset does not work restarting it wont work nothing.  We both had the same issues and our units where replaced with refurbished units.  My second issue involves the suction cup which is insufficent to hold the Nuvi properly onto the glass.  Do not use it at all cost.  Every car that it has been placed in the suction cup has failed and the Nuvi to my horror has come falling back to earth each time.  For between 600 to 1000 buck you would think they could provide a more secure mount.  The Dashboard mount that I have purchased works well.  The FM transmitter is not really a feature I would purchase the Nuvi for.  If you live in a city the quality of the audio is poor at best.  Bluetooth hand free communication is cool when it works and is not sending me false signals.  BE VERY CAREFUL the nuvi has a small list of bluetooth enabled phones that it can work with very small.  If I pair my phone with the Nuvi,  I get continious ghost calls to my Nuvi every 3 to 8 minutes where I have to tell the nuvi to ignore or it will just keep ringing for a bit.  I wish I could continue recommending the NUVI like I once did, but with all of the issues it's kind of a lemon.  I have worked around most of the issues and it's acceptable to use with many of it's key selling points disabled so my recommendation would be to save some money and purchase a cheaper model with just gps.  The Nuvi's bells and whistles are not worth the expense. I expect better from garmin really a let down.
Not for Comcast / Motorola DVR users. Start off with the bad news.  I have a Motorola DVR / Converter box with my Comcast cable service, and the Comcast remote sends the ADS box into gonzo fits.  Attempting to use the menu button on the cable remote causes the ADS box to switch inputs.  Using the cable DVR fast-forward button cycles the ADS through screen formats with each button push, etc.  I contacted ADS tech service and they responded that the only fix was to physically separate the two boxes so the remotes could be aimed at one at a time.Obviously, this is not acceptable.Too bad because this box does a much better job than my Philips Cineos at upscaling.  Tivo, analog cable, DVD, Laserdisc all look better.  The improvement is more than worth the hassle of having another remote to handle, but definitely not worth it if you have a Motorola cable box that will conflict.5 stars for video quality, 3 stars for user interface (which is not so great), subtract all but 1 star for failure to publicise conflict and for failure to solve conflict.
Ordered 2 ten packs, tried 3 different chargers, only 4 batteries worked. I had heard some good things about Lenmar nimh batteries about two years ago - but had bought another brand. This time around, with the good price on Amazon, I gave these Lenmar batteries a try. I ordered two ten-packs. Only 4 out of 20 batteries would accept a charge. I tried an Energizer charger, a LaCrosse BC-900 charger, and a RipVan100 Lightning Pack 4000N charger. The LaCrosse is a high-end charger, including diagnostics on batteries (voltage, etc., displayed for each battery).  None of these would charge 16 of the batteries - even in the 'recovery' modes available on the RipVan and LaCrosse. Returned the batteries to Amazon
Don't buy this junk. I bought this and within ten minutes it failed.  I was completely dissappointed with this purchase.  I loved the concept, but the product is cheap and will not hold up to normal use.  Lesson learned
Far too overpriced for this length!! You shouldn't spend more than $10. Much like the previous reviewer I urge you not to spend lots of money on HDMI cables. HDMI specs state that only one pixel out of every billion can be lost, therefore there is no reason, no matter what the cable is made of, to spend money on HDMI cables.Search the internet, you can find plenty of good 10ft HDMI cables for $10 or less.Digital is zeroes and ones. In HDMI's case, either the cable is connected or it isn't
Great product... at first. This is the same unit that HP sells, but has Lite on do its support. Great unit for about a month. Support is not good.
Poor Quality and Poor Service. My wife purchased this cordless phone set for me as a Christams present.  Since putting it in operation over two months ago I have had nothing that comes close to quality phone service.  None of the three handset will operate ten feet beyond the base station.  All the handsets have static and a constant buzzing sound regardless of where they are relative to the base station.  I followed every point in the owner's manual regarding trouble shooting with no success.  My calls to Uniden customer service took more than 15 minutes to reach a representative.  The end result was that the last of the customer service representative I spoke with told me that the Uniden phone I was using was a high quality product but that the frequency "just doesn't work in your environment."  I live well out in the country and know of nothing that would interfer with cordless phone operation within miles of my house.  Moreover, a Radio Shack cordless phone that I purchased five years ago works perfectly throughout my house.  I am out the purchase price, but Uniden has lost a customer
Iriver products lack Plug and Play with Macs. I have an Iriver T10 and there is virtually no software to support the USB plug and play interface that Mac owners have always expected.Pay a little more and buy an IPOD.  It interfaces with PCs and Macs equally well.
Low price doesn't make up for poor quality. I was looking for an inexpensive way to store homemade cd's so I chose this item.  I would estimate that at least 40% of the cases arrived damaged or broken and they are so cheaply constructed that on the ones that weren't broken the plastic tabs break on the first or second use.  Spend a little more and get something of higher quality
Thought it was great...until a month later. This item was working fine for about one month.  Then it stopped functioning.  My computer (and several others I tried as a "double check") could no longer read from the device.  Very disappointing
Great TV when it worked. Bought this TV in September, worked perfectly until it died unexpectedly in February.  Called service at Samsung, they assigned it to a local repair person.  No call back, finally tracked down the repair man and he wanted me to take the TV to him. Total of 2 weeks lost on that, I then called Samsung back, they dispatched a larger repair shop after numerous calls to schedule an appointment they finally came out two weeks later and couldn't fix the TV.  They told me I'd have to call Samsung for an exchange, Samsung agreed to an exchange. After a week, when no shipping company called I call Samsung back. I was informed the LNS4092DX/XAA is no longer available.  They agreed to ship a different model instead.  Long story short - 2 months later - still no TV - I spoke to them today 4/18 and I was assured that the shipping company has the TV (in spite of their denials) and that I would have the new TV in ... you guessed it.. 2 weeks.  Not sure if the TV was a lemon, but their customer service sure is!  On the plus side, a telemarketing firm did call me to survey me on the service technician
Not a quality product at all. First off the company I work for ordered three of these.  One out of the three did not work.  There is no sound comming from the right side and it isn't the speaker as we have tried different speakers.  Amazon will not take it back and will not exchange it for another one.  This is just the start.  The two that do work work very poorly.  The connecotor for the iPod is very flimsey and feels like it will break off.  They give you inserts to use depending on what model iPod you have.  These inserts prevent the iPod from sliding all the way down so when you use them the iPod will not work.  Also, the CD player has a lid that opens with a motor.  Yes, a motor.  So, if you push it down when it is open it will close but this throws off the gears as it is very sensitive and now the damn things don't close all the way.  You need to use the open/close button to prevent this but natural reaction is to push the lid down when it is open.  All of the buttons are very clumbsy and confusing.  The sound is not that great at all!  There are a TON of wires with this thing.  Power, speaker, antenna and iPod firewire type connector all run between the speakers, subwoofer and main unit. This is not a good product and has been a nightmare for my department.
Adequate at low power. This system does an adequate, but not great, job of decoding digital S/PDIF audio with volume adjust for center, surround, and subwoofer.  It has several simple digital decode modes.A fair value for $100, but if I had to do it again, I would prefer a lower end home theatre receiver with speakers, which often start around $150.  These speakers show significant distortion at fairly modest volume levels.  However, they are adequate sound for my small home office at lower volumes
FAILURE. Out of the box, one of the two radios is not sending nor receiving Everything else is working but it does not pick up a signal. Like if you are on a different channel. I sent them back to Amazon
Poor Quality. Unlike many reviewers, I had no real issue with the installation process.  I have installed many Linksys products on my wireless network, and a few minutes of reading on the Linksys community forum revealed a good user install tutorial that worked just fine.  I was up and running in minutes.The problem is that the quality of sound coming from the Music Bridge blows!  I had the unit sitting less than 30 feet from my router and was experiencing a large number of drop-outs, not to mention the fact that the music sounded like it was coming from under water.  I know I have the most recent firmware, etc.Many user forum comments indicate that one problem is network traffic.  Hello!?!?  If this product cannot work while my home network has other traffic then what good is it?I am not even going to bother with further trouble shooting.  I wanted to give this unit a try because it was cheap and I have all Linksys gear already.I have been down this path with other Linksys products, and typically if their product does not work out of the box then no amount of tweaking will really solve the problem.  I am going to return this unit and go with one of the Logitech wireless solutions, which use a direct wireless connection (not through your home network) and have better reviews
In review of the seller. I placed an order for this Kingston memory stick only to have my order cancelled without explanation. Very lousy customer service
DON'T BUY THIS ADAPTOR!. As many of the other reviews here have stated, the thing falls apart very easily. Mine worked until I had to move the Tivo. The little hinged door broke right off. Now the cable is attached to it with electrical tape. Even that doesn't do the trick. I've been shopping for a replacement, but TiVo only recommends this one, or a wireless one that forces me to "dumb down" my wireless security to WEP. Grrrr....How could a crappy product like this actually get produced?
Junk!. Replaced first spindle and still junk. Will always stick with Verbatim from now on
short bulb life. Rated as 3000 hour bulb life when purchased, today they claim 4000 hours.Bulb lasted only 900 hours.  Service at "unfocused" does not care about creating a satisfied customer base.  Would not replace bulb even on a prorated basis
Customer Centres are no good. It was a nice little thing for a couple of months. After that it just froze. Aparently that happens often with COWAN (where's the pride?). anyways, since then it's a drag to repair the unit. I would definately advise the people to buy an Ipod.
Twin pack is overpriced!. The price for the twinpack ($67.52) is more than twice the price of two single packs ($24.57 each).  $24.57 x 2 = $49.14Buy two of the singles, not the twin pack
Garbage!. My last Uniden phone. I've been disappointed before by Uniden so I'm not sure why I even botherd with this phone. Poor quality sound - always some delay when pressing buttons too. But, it's the sound quality that is ridiculous.Never again. Panasonic phone or nothing
Good idea poor excecution. This product only works for light scratches and greasy dirt and grime. It could be better if the polishing heads rotated at a much faster speed and applied more pressure.  The polishing fluid is also not very good.  Better is compound from an autobody paint store.  Acrylic is acrylic.  Essentially it lacks power.  I've polished to a shine deeply scratched cds and dvds using an automotive paint polishing machine.This tool is a waste of time and money.If they powered it up for $50.00 more than I would probably buy one.  Commercial cd polishers are available but for a couple of hundred dollars
You get what you paid for!. I was a little disappointed with this item. I was expecting the item being more sturdy, it seems to me that the turntable is not going to last long. It is not a good buy.
Impossible To set up. I spent two days tried to have it formatted by my Powerbook G4 and set up a wireless network to replace my Microsoft wireless router.  No luck.  It is on the shelf ever since. People at the Genius Bar in local apple store may be able to help but it is too much troubel.To set up other routers with a PC you can easily hire some one to set it up for you at your home for a couple of hundred dollars.  Not Apple.If you don't have time don't buy this product.
stay away... recent quality is TERRIBLE. I've previously purchased Memorex media DVD+R and have not had any problems until recently. My latest purchase has given me infinitely more grief and frustration than the initial purchase price... Where do I start, how about the fact that the media is labeled as 4X and only burns at 2.4X (gray spindle)? How about the fact that files and videos have errors causing file corruption and/or video dropouts (stutter or DVD lock-up)?. I thought it was my recorder until I read all the reviews... There has been a HUGE drop in quality recently. If you want to gamble with the recent sub-par quality of the Memorex branded media and "hope" every thing turns out ok by all means make your purchase here. For me, I'm dumping more than 50% remaining on the spindle because the media is completely unreliable and worthless for anything other than coasters
Not for the iAudio Like Amazon Claims!. I purchased an iAudio U2 MP3 player for someone as a gift.  On Amazon, they recommend this case as an accessory.  As already noted by another user, this case does NOT fit the U2 player and I am just re-emphasizing that point.  Do not buy this as an armband for the U2
review of Netgear WG602. In an attempt to increase the range on my Netgear MR 314 router, I got this WG602 access point but I could not get it to function.  I was told I needed two of them, so I got a second one and I still could not make it work.  I gave up and replace my router with a RangeMax WPN 824 and it is terrific.  Gives me all the range I could want, letting me send and receive at 24 Mbs where the MR 314 would not reach at all.
Unreliable. This printer is capable of producing high quality documents.  But it frequently jams and requires surgery through the back door to get out tiny scraps of paper. Often I have to lift open the top door to get at the ink injector which gets hung up with paper also.  The printer crimps the top left corner of every document.The scanner function works well and I have had no problems there.The fax capability is poorly laid out and has never worked.Overall, whatever cost you pay is not worth the frustration. I would spend my money elsewhere.
no good. i bought this humidifier reading the reviews here. but when i actually used for a few days, i found that it provided no relief from dryness while sleeping or during the day. it pretty much did nothing except make the room hotter. i would not recommend this to anyone
The absolute in wireless GARBAGE!. When we brought this home and took it out of the box we were rather impressed with the sleek design and the Cisco label. When we got it all hooked up all our dreams of surfing the internet at the speed of light turned into nightmares with constant connection drops and NO TECH SUPPORT!If you read the boards on the Linksys site you'll see that there are no end of connection failures across many different ISP's and areas of the US since this item has been released. PLEASE don't waste your money on this worthless hunk of garbage, you'll end up sucking down 2 bottles of ibuprofen and a 12 pack of your choice before the night is even through
I was disappointed with this tuner and wound up returning it. At first, I looked forward to having one of the few HD tuners out on the market.   However, once I received the tuner, I was, sadly, disappointed.I had a couple of problems with the product, one which made it unusable for my use and I returned the unit.The first, fatal problem is that the power supply has a low frequency hum.   I purchased the tuner for a home office, and will sometimes work without any music.  I contacted the manufacturer hoping that it may have been a manufacturing problem, but they indicated that I should at least not hear the noise from "across the room".   Even when the tuner is off, it draws power for its clock and continues to hum.The other design issues that make the tuner slightly clunky:1) Accessing any of the presets requires pressing a preset button before a number making every station 2 buttons away.2) The width of the display causes most station/song titles to scroll, and to scroll slowly.   The slowness may be based on the RDS signal, but I would have preferred to see the text all at once
Terrible!!! BEWARE!!!. Pros: Uses less batteries than the Space Shuttle... (6 AAs)Great idea gone to H*** quickly due to LACK OF PRODUCT SUPPORT! Apparently the person in charge of designing and marketing tapes for these units suffers from Attention Deficit Disorder and is totally unable to remotely consider any meaningful COMPLETE LINE of tapes. Red, blue,white pearl (paper?) - Yellow smiley faces. Green metalic. Black on clear - but no white on clear...There appears to be little, if any, hope for those who might actually like to COLOR CODE products in any single medium - plastic, paper, polyester, metallic,etc. Just whatever come to the designer's head is what's released. Five types here. Two there. One over here... No rhyme nor reason.Dymo has done themselves NO FAVORS HERE
Not good!. Very clear image! Probably the best that I saw on this kind devices! No software availble. Device is useless if You do not have Windows Media OS. Absolutely no Linux support. Good hardware... but useless...You have to buy software for ~$70-120 to be able use it...
Mine was DOA too. How do I assign a rating? As several other people have experienced, my unit is also DOA. I received it, plugged it in, pressed 'clean', and the motor started up. I popped open the cover, put in the disc I wanted cleaned, and pressed 'clean' again. Nothing. Terrible quality control.What's worse is the unit case is glued together -- no way to open it up to try to fix the electronics inside without mutilating it and voiding warranty
Low Life. At the same time that I purchased the Axion AXN6070A 7" Portable DVD Player for my kids, I also purchased the Phillips PET824 8.5" portable DVD player for myself. The Phillips is in a different league than the Axion, and if you're a traveler that will rely on the battery life of the portable DVD player, then you definitely don't want the Axion. The Phillips is a bit more expensive, but it has everything and more than you could want out of a portable DVD player.Both the Phillips and the Axion LCD screens are crystal clear. You lose a little definition as you move side to side (as with most LCD type screens), but nothing too drastic that would warrant a complaint. The Phillips PET824 has an 8.5" screen and the Axion a 7" screen. The 1.5" difference is not dramatically different, but the larger Phillips screen does enhance the viewing experience.The sound is fair on both the Phillips and the Axion without headphones, but I don't think that the idea was to use the units without them. Sound is fabulous on the Phillips with a good pair of headphones, and just okay on the Axion; your iPod headphones will do just fine for either unit (and if you don't have a pair you'll need to buy one because the players don't come with any). Both have two audio output jacks, and a 3-way splitter (not included) worked fine on both so that 4 people could watch and listen at the same time with headphones.Here's the big difference between the two units: Battery Life.I've gotten almost 7 hours out of the Phillips' battery, and the Axion's battery gives you less than 2 hours. Therefore, if you're an airline traveler or just want to bring your player somewhere that you can't use either the car adapter or the DC adapter, then you absolutely don't want the Axion; you want the Phillips.On a recent airline trip the Axion--after a full charge--conked out after less than two hours...that's not even a full movie in most cases.The Phillips' battery is a bit bulky. You'd think that with today's technology they'd be able to slim it down, but you can't complain about the 6+ hours of life you get with it after a full charge. The Axion's battery is smaller and more lightweight than the Phillips, but what can you do other than watch a few SpongeBob episodes with less than two hours of battery life. The Phillips PET824 is good for at least 2 full-length features before charging and that's awesome for long trips where you can't use the DC adapter or car adapter.The car adapter on both the Axion and the Phillips work great and they both have long cords. So no need for the battery on car trips. The Axion at best might be a nice, less expensive alternative if you won't be taking your portable DVD player to places that require battery use.Both the Phillips and the Axion fit in my small briefcase, and they're both relatively light. The Axion is a feather compared to the Phillips. Amazon sells cases for the units that can mount on the back of the driver or passenger seats. The case I got also mounts in between the driver and passenger seats. I'd highly recommend a case for your player. I went with the Case Logic Koskin DVD Player Case.All in all....The Phillips PET824 was a much more satisfying purchase for me. For my purposes, the Axion just won't do for airline trips, and that's a major requirement; hence, the Axion is a major disappointment. But as I said earlier, the Axion is certainly a viable alternative if you don't mind sacrificing screen size and you don't plan on the need for battery power.Choose your view.
too slow and ugly accuracy. I bought one, and used for only 2 days, and then decided to return it. The turnaround time is too long. Reading speed as well as transfering data to PC is extremely low.Can not suffer from it any more. And return it.At the same time, I ordered a Cpen 20. It is much better than infoScan
Video and Audio Out of  Sync. Save yourself time and aggravation and DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT! I bought this to put home movies on DVD. Almost every time I downloaded a home movie to my computer the audio was not in sync with the video. I spent hours trying to get it right. I also kept upgrading my computer thinking that was the problem. I finally saw a review here explaining that the PX-M402U is notorious for this problem, so I bought a CANOPUS ADVC110 and have not had a single problem!
Comes with a Self Destruct. I had my Pink iPod mini since Feb. 2005. It was fine until it died the next year on the exact day I got it, and the warranty ran out. I got it repaired at an Apple reseller, and then it died again  on the warranty expiration date. What is it with the iPods? It's like they have a self destruct inside! ):-
NOT THE CORRECT MODEL!. I ordered the TRU9460-2 and Amazon sent me the TRU9465 (which is what the picture is of on this Web page).  I spoke to customer service and they had me send back the original item and they said they would send me out the correct item.  I just received the package and *again* they sent me the TRU9465.  The phone itself may be great but Amazon is *not* fulfilling these orders properly.  They are advertising one model and shipping another.  And their customer service is clueless!  Somebody at Amazon needs to wake up
Sanrio should know better. Forget the terrible layout, labeling and location of buttons. Forget the fact that the cover won't close if the mic stands are in place. Forget the lack of any type of anti-skip technology. The overall quality of the machine is OK. I had a hard enough time finding a CD player that DID NOT include a radio tuner and my daughter loves to sing so the karaoke is a nice bonus. Sanrio should be ashamed of selling this player WITHOUT an AC adaptor. There is alway a fair amount of "batteries not included" at Christmas, but a even your basic $12 CD player includes a AC adaptor. I now have to search the electronics store for a plug that will match so my daughters Cars soundtrack doesn't drain my bank account and continue to fill the landfill with dead batteries.
KC-36IP Ink Paper Set. Got two and neither would work.  Both looked like they had been used and were empty.  Lots of paper but no ink to print with
Intermittently working. I just purchased a set of two 4 channel Westinghouse intercoms and they worked only intermittently.  If I tipped one of the units, it worked sometimes, as though it had a bad connection.  I am trying to return them now to the seller.  Good luck if you purchase a set of these.  They seem to be hit or miss as to whether you get a good set
Going downhill. I find it strange that the Memorex DVD-RW reviews here are favorable, while at the same time the Memorex DVD+RW reviews complain of bad media.Last year I bought Memorex RAM disk as well as Memorex DVD-RW disks for use with my Toshiba D-KR2.  I believe I only had one bad disk out of 10 or so that I used.  They lasted over a full year of through dozens and dozens of recordings and eventually degraded, no complaints here and at that time I probably would have given them 4 stars.However I recently bought a pack of 5 Memorex DVD-RW and only 1 of 5 formated (hence the rating here).I also recently bought a pack of Fuji RAM disk and the first two I tried did not work and failed several tries at formating.  Unfortunately, I bought these at Best Buy which are notarious for their lack of customer service and they refused to accept returns on these.So, what's going on here?  Why are we letting these manufacturers get away with selling products that sometimes work in some machines and fail most of the time in others?  Where's the Six Sigma attitude when you need it?
I cannot believe the gall. I ordered this TV (model 32DF46 as listed here) on 11/8/06. Amazon TWICE delivered the older model (model # 32D46), which I refused (took a total of 3 says off from work to accept delivery, have the wrong model picked up, then await delivery again but refused it on the spot). Then they sent me an email stating that the problem was not going to be resolved easily, but when I checked the website, the model I ordered was still available but at a significantly higher price (can you say "Bait & Switch"???) As of today (1/9/2007) I have heard nothing from Amazon since the 1st email, still don't have the TV I ordered on 11/8/06 BUT today they sent me a request to come here and review it. So I obliged
This product corrupted my boot sector. When this jumpdrive was plugged into my Windows 2000 system, the software that it loads corrupted the boot sector of my hard drive. The Lexar "technical support" was no help at all. They told me to reinstall my system.Luckily the computer repair person I hired was able to recover my data files before the OS was reinstalled. Lexar would not cover one dime of my repair cost.I will never purchase one of their product again
Haven't actually gotten my real WinTV-PVR-150 yet. No, it's not Amazon.  Amazon sent me what they thought was a real PVR-150, since Hauppauge says so on the box.  However, it has another card in the box.  Fine, it's a better card, but not what I need.  So I send it back to Hauppauge to get a real PVR-150.  That was like 3 weeks ago.  WHERE IS MY DAMN CARD?!?!
Another dissatisfied customer. Not only was this difficult to set up (even a generally polite but sadly ill-informed technical helper from Belkin was baffled regarding the simplest steps and keyphrases) but once I finally managed to get it to work (by simply as a last resort resetting the router with a paper clip) it had practically no range whatsoever; in fact, my MacBook Pro placed within 2 inches of the router itself only received a 75% signal, and once the threshold of the room was crossed, the signal disappeared altogether. A free four-year old Linksys router which I received with my Earthlink "home networking" package (and which this Belkin was supposed to replace) always worked with a full signal everywhere in the house and rarely failed, and Linksys is supposed to be notoriously Mac-unfriendly. Anyway, I hope that there are enough UPS trucks in America to handle the returns that this item -- mine included -- will require.
Stopped working after two months. I saw several people state that this product stopped working after a short while, but it seemed like a reputable company, and I liked the idea of a charger that I could continue to use if I got a new laptop, so I went ahead and bought it, taking my chances.It began flickering in and out of power after two months, and now hardly works at all.  I should have bought the IBM product to match my computer.It might just be the tip which needs to be replaced, but at 15 bucks a pop, I don't want to have to replace these every two months.Don't buy it.
NO BATTERY BACK UP!!. We bought this clock radio, got it home, set it up, realized that it didn't have battery back up, called Sony only to find out that they do not find it necessary to put that feature on their alarm clocks....how bizarre!!  They do not carry battery back up on any of their new models according to their representative at the customer service center!  Boxed it up and it's going right back where it came from.  If it's okay not to have battery back up, it might deserve a chance, however, what's the use in having an alarm clock if you can't trust that it will indeed wake you up
Wrong product description. After 2 bad Linksys routers and many hours on the phone with their tech support and being told that I must have had 2 bad routers from the same batch, I bought the Belkin.  I was able to connect to BellSouth in a matter of minutes and so is the 2nd desktop in my office.  The 2nd computer is able to connect to my hard drive, but, I cannot connect to it.  When I called Belkin, I was told this router is just to connect to the internet, not set up to share files and printers.  The product description clearly states "share files and peripherals."
Buyers Beware!. Buyers beware!  I have never written or posted a consumer rating in my life.  I am so disappointed with Vonage's overall customer service; I feel that I have no choice but to warn others.Vonage in its own words does not guarantee the quality of its service. Vonage customers will experience: (1) dropped calls, (2) garbled communications, and (3) a non-responsive and dishonest customer service department.  The reason Vonage does not guarantee performance is because it knows that it cannot.  My first mistake was in believing the Vonage help desk, during my initial, "30 Day Money Back Guarantee Period," when they told me my issues were due to line quality and not Vonage.  Since then, I have spent three months with Vonage and my High Speed Internet Service Provider's technicians attempting to make this service work. All speed tests indicate my ISP lines are fine.  I had a High Speed Internet Technician visit my house last week only to tell me everything checks out.  All this said, my Vonage phone has never worked worse.  I made a call today and the recipient could not even discern whom I was.  When I finally threw in the towel and decided that Vonage was not for me, I was hit with a $39.99 service charge upon cancellation plus the cost of the phone, despite a documented lack of performance from day one.Vonage's performance is substandard by any measure.  Closely look at all other options before bringing Vonage into your life and definitely terminate all agreements within your first 14 days to avoid the inevitable early termination fees.Make sure you read the below clauses in Vonage's Terms of Service agreement before you agree to anything.  A Vonage Customer Service Manager, Mike, sited these disclaimers when I told him that I was not satisfied with the service:(1)	"No Warranties on Service," section 4, paragraph 4;(2)	"Return of Device," section 2, paragraph 10;(3)	"Termination Fee," section 3, paragraph 6; and(4)	"Money Back Guarantee; Limitations and Conditions," section 3, paragraph 7.When I switched to Vonage, I was simply looking for a reliable telephone service and a company that stands behind its product and supports its customers.  Vonage's lack of line reliability and poor customer service has motivated me to document my experience.I had to call Vonage Customer Service on my old fashion landline because the voice quality on my Vonage phone was so poor that I would not be able to have a conversation.  After waiting for 20 minutes to talk to the Service Manager, Mike, I was told that I was contractually bound because I did not terminate my agreement within the first 30 days.  At this moment I thought of the stereotypical shady used car transaction.  I was lured to buy Vonage because of the promises of great service and all the free bells and whistles that only "internet calling can provide."  Instead I received a lemon, a phone that was unreliable and a company that did not stand behind its product.  While Vonage may get my $39.99 termination fee and the cost of the Vonage phone, I do not feel that I can just lay down about Vonage's failure to perform.  I feel compelled to (1) warn others about Vonage and hopefully save them the aggravation that I have experienced and  (2) Hit Vonage where it hurts, in the economic pocket book.  I am terminating my service as soon as possible.
Auto feeder does not work well. We've had this machine for 2 years, and the automatic feeder started its problems.  Whenever we try to use it for muliple-page faxing or copying, sheets would get stuck together.  This is very annoying because it is extremely painful to track which pages got faxed/copied or not.  This is the most annoying feature and because of it, I'm not recommending it
Would not buy it again. Works in '02 Suburban.  Gain is too high and not adjustable, so when changing tfrom radio ro CD to ipod, it blasts you with volume and also the sound quality is compromised by the too-high gain.  It does not charge the ipod, nor can it be connected to a charger because it necessarily uses the docking port on the ipod.  Belkin makes (made?) a charger that plugged into the docking port and then   accepted an earphone jack from a separate tape.  The Belkin solution had a gain adjustment, which was very useful, but it was not possible to use the vehichle's tape/CD controls to control the ipod.  Using the tape/CD controls works for on and off, and it is great that the ipod stops when I switch to the radio or turn the car audio off.  Going to the next song or backwards works with a delay that is not terrible.  When I use the car controls I am in shuffle mode, so it's ok.  If I want to find a particular song, I pick up the ipod.  If the SmartDeck was had gain adjustment and a charger, it would be a lot better.  We really need to pop the ipod into a hole in the dash and control it completely from the dash, with all the ipod screen infor visible on the car stereo.  Until then, the SmartDeck is a couple steps forward and a couple steps back.  Becasue of the gain issue, I would not buy it again unless it had a gain adjustment
Don't buy until you read this!. I purchased this unit shortly before last Christmas. Initially the unit worked fine and the sound was acceptable. Within a month the unit would play the i-pod but there would be no sound coming out of the speakers. When I visited the Klipsch website to see about warranty information I saw numerous complaints about the same problem. Apparently there is an undisclosed defect with this model.(Just check to see how many refurbished units they have for sale on the web) I still have not heard back from Klipsch regarding fixing or replacing the unit.Since I have little or no hope of hearing back from Klipsch, I have purchased the Bose unit and want to tell you that it blows the Klipsch unit away in the sound department. Bose knows what they are doing when it comes producing big sounds from small spaces.Hope this helps
Totally Frustrated. I received this item and it proved to be defective. I have returned the original item and Amazon has been promising me that they would ship the replacement for over a month now but has failed to make any of their estimated ship dates. Right now I am looking for another source and about to cancel the order
Watch your pricing!. Started to order this item at the listed price of $299. On checkout the price was $320 - plus $22 more for handling and shipping
Defective. I got this for X-mas plugged it in and the sound was great then I attached my ipod and the volume stopped working, I disconnected it and then unpluged the system. Now when I plug it in it emits a high pitched sqeaking and will not turn on.
Woof. The radio dials are not accessible when the radio is in the case -- I cut slits in the case with a knife to be able to tune the station and volume when in the case; I can't believe the case didn't come this way -- and that's just the start of the problems. The dials are fussy and it's not easy to carry this radio, even in the case, without nudging the dial to the point you must remove it from the case -- if you haven't cut any slits in it -- and re-tune your station.In Minneapolis-St. Paul, WCCO AM radio comes in fine in a suburb 15 miles from downtown. But that station has howitzer power. Forget about tuning in virtually any other AM station in the city. Granted, I didn't buy this to listen to FM or shortwave. It was to be an inexpensive radio to listen to baseball. With the Minnesota Twins having moved from WCCO, that won't happen, as this radio is incapable of pulling in the Twins' new AM radio home, or any othe AM signal in the area. That's really difficult to imagine, being other radios I own -- even chintzy giveaway promotional radios -- can pull in most any station in the metro area.If this is an example of Grundig's work, I'd say they rely more on their brand name than their products.
Frustrating way to watch video. I had been using a Hauppauge MediaMVP Digital Media Receiver (Model 1000) and quite happy with this $99 device. I was able to play my recorded videos and show my vacation photos on a large screen but it died mysteriously and I thought I would upgrade to this more capable (or so I thought) device. I had lots of problems getting it working correctly and used it with 3 different media servers (both the one that came with the device and the Windows media server worked for me).I use the device primarily to watch shows I time shift from cable. There are two features that make this $200+ device far inferior to my previous device.1) The fast forward is "fast" in name only. Perhaps it doubles the speed but it does not seem that quick to me and I spend a LOT of time watching stupid ads. In addition to FF the Hauppauge had a feature that would skip 30 or 60 seconds at a time that made missing commercials a breeze. There is a "jump" feature but that lets you enter the total time into the clip you want to be so if it actually worked (it froze the device each time I tried to use it and I had to unplug it to even get the thing turned off) it would be a pain to use.2) When I had watched part of a video the Hauppauge remembered where I had stopped and offered to restart from that position. Image my frustration when I clicked the wrong green key (sending me to the video menu) about 2 hours into a movie. To get back to where I was I had to slow-forward for an hour to get to see the end of the movie.Who ever designed the software that the remote uses should be ... (well I will leave it to your imagination). So after mucking with this for to long it is going back to Amazon and I am going to buy another Hauppauge
Be Carefull. Be carefull, make sure this is the upgraded unit, that came out recently. No reason to buy the old original one, because of many flaws in design.
Not meant for working out!!!. Well I now have a handle for my $250 I-Pod Nano. The arm snug would be a great idea if they maybe thought about who is probably going to buy this product and what they are going to be doing. First off I have to wear this arm band just short of the largest setting on my forearm because even at the largest setting it makes my arm fall asleep from lack of blood flow. So unless you are a skinny 140lb biker this probably won't fit you comfortably. The second issue is that there is not a locking mechanism for the strap so when I am working out with my muscles constantly contracting it just changes the strap size and I end up with my Nano on my wrist.Over all, this product is great if you are riding a bike or doing anything that doesn't cause you to move your arm a lot. So if you if you are planning on buying this for relaxing bike ride through the country it is well worth it. Planning on using your I-Pod to play angry music to help give you the strength do that one extra rep, don't bother.Bullet proof shield though is a must since those little screens get scratched so easily.
Won't do slides unless you're willing to unmount them. Just a heads-up for people looking to use this scanner to scan slides. You will have to unmount the slides in order to be able to scan them. Given the verbiage on the box, it caught me as enough of a surprise that I returned the scanner. I'm not OK with deception like that
Panasonic couldn't locate a replacement part. I surely wouldn't reccomend buying this dinosaur. Bought it online and it never did work. Panasonic "support" was as bad as it's DVD. One support specialist told me to unplug it and then plug it in again. Another was reading from a list of "What to do if the caller says this." The repair shop gave me the idea that Panasonic no longer makes this product. They couldn't find a replacement part so they are replacing my DVD. In all I've waited over a month and a half to watch my $299 DVD player and I still haven't got a new one from the repair shop. If your smart don't purchase one of these antiques
Does not fit Explorist XL. Title says it all. Returned it. There was not caveat with respect to the XL although did come across some other sites that highlighted the fact
Decent player with problematic Audible file implementation. I was looking for a "do-it-all" player for music, voice and audiobooks. Although the iRiver T30 handles the first two functions pretty well, I advise you not to buy this unit for its support of Audible files. In this mode it works (sort of), but I have discovered several very annoying quirks.As soon as I use the voice recording feature, the unit:1) Will not save bookmarks in an Audible file.2) Will not retain the last position in memory when I exit from an Audible file.When this happens, the only solution I have found is to completely reformat the device and reinstall the operating system.As well, when the unit's battery runs out in the middle of listening to an Audible file, the entire file is no longer recognized by the player. I must load a new copy of the file to continue.
Spend a little more... I bought this to record Tivo DVR stuff to DVD.  Worst frame rate capture and audio capture of .avi's of the four different devices I have tried.  Completely unusable.  The software is a trial version.  Instead, buy the ADS DVDXpress DX2 for a bit more.  Ulead's software is stable, and it's not a trial version.  It is also the only analog capture device I have tried that gives a good picture using mpeg capture.  Pinnacle's Dazzle only is tolerable using avi capture which is great if you have the drive space, but the software is way too buggy
1 star seems to nice. This was the first it what seems to be an endless quest for a good working radio. It was hard to get the stations in and those that did come in where kind of fuzzy. It didn't seem to work well when joggin. Like the stations would fade in and out from the bouncing. I'm not sure what the deal was. I spent $10 on it, but after a while the $10 here and there is making me look foolish
Not for use on Treadmill. I bought these headphones to watch TV while on the treadmill. They don't work at all for that purpose. Interference from the motor causes them to cut-out. They work great when I stop the treadmill
worked great at first...... When I purchased these batteries, I was very pleased, but that wore off after a couple of months. I don't use my camera all that often, but when I do, I expect ther batteries to have some charge. I recharge them per instructions, and they do not hold a charge any longer.I know Monster makes good products, but I am a little disappointed in this one
Chinese made Junk - save your money!. I was tempted by the cheap price and got myself a 10 pack. They are rated at 2000 mAh, but run out of juice after the digital camera has shot maybe 5 frames. My 2 year old Panasonic 1600 mAh in contrast can run the same camera for over a 100 shots. I tried these batteries in my MP3 player - and even there, it won't supply enough juice after an hr worth of playback. It is not that the battery does not hold any charge - that it has. But it just does not supply the peak current required by most digital devices. It seems to be all right for use in a flashlight. A set of batteries that will not power a camera will power a flashlight (a bit dimly) for hours (yeah - I tested it). For the test, I had  charged the panasonics and the lenmars for the same duration (it is not a charger issue).I plan to complain to the state consumer affairs department regarding this brand and hope action is taken against shady products which are nothing but rip-offs.One last tip - nowadays, the best NiMH batteries are made by Sanyo. It is better to pay 2 - 4 times for them than for a Lenmar. Trust me
Cheap Product!. This adapter seems pretty cheaply made. No matter which stereo I use it with, the music only comes out of the right speaker, so music with a lot of panning sounds pretty bad.  I'd go with a pricier model next time.
I paid 76 dollars for this?. Pleasant to the eye, pretty sturdy construction, small, but only uses 4 out of 5 shelves if you want to use it for DVDs! I like the rack, but think it is overpriced! With shipping, it was way too much money for what it is
Still Getting Telemarketer Calls!. The TeleZapper has been a very poor substitute for Ameritech's Privacy Manager which worked 100% of the time. The Telezapper may have reduced some of the Telemarketing calls but it has definitely not eliminated them and we've had it for months. I'd recommend looking into alternatives before buying a TeleZapper
Caveat Emptor. I cannot speak for all devices, but this was a total failure in my case.  I am a fast typist, and it seemed that about 20% of the keystrokes were not picked up by my Treo 270.  This was simply unacceptable, so I immediately returned it.  I cannot determine whether the problem was due to the keyboard, the software, or my old PDA.  Newer, faster PDAs might have a better success rate, but the potential for problems will still be there.  My suggestion is to buy this somewhere with a generous return policy so that you can return it if it is a mismatch for your PDA
Junk! Absolute Junk! All 3 of them!!!. I purchased 1 of the old model when I bought my ipod. As hard as I tried I was unable to switch stations on it. "Okay" I thought, "I must have got the one bad one..." So I called Griffin and they were not much help. They said that the "radio stations" may have been bad and said I would need to down load new software. Well no luck it still didn't work and the one station I could get sounded like horrible - when it worked at all. So then I saw the new version out on the market. So I figured I'd upgrade to one that looked easier to use. I bought 2 of them - 1 for me and 1 for my wife. Neither one sounds any good. I can recieve a radio station 40 miles away with no problem but I can't hear my ipod from 4 feet away. Both of them sound exactly the same. They constantly sound fuzzy like they are "just not tuned in right" If you turn up the volume on the ipod to boost the power to the Itrip then the sound distorts before the "station fuzz" goes away. Only a fool walks on thin ice twice - and I've done it 3 times now...Never again! Don't follow in my footsteps! Please take my advice and do not waste you money on this garbage
Just return my money. I have already returned the wrong items you sent me. just return my money please
It is very hard to update the remote due to software glitches. It is very hard to update the remote. Very seldom we can delete and if there are two DVR boxes remote get confused and keep on turning off and on, even though we choose the right one such as A or B.Software update is cumbersome and take 45 minutes on a Intel Quad computer with 2 G memory. Can supply some patches. I have the remote sitting on my coffee table useless.
Review of Amazon process, not the product. Hello,I purchased the AVIC-D2, XM and the iPod kit from Amazon.  I then went to my local installer and confirmed with them that they could install all three devices and still allow my factory rear entertainment center to function in the new setup.  After 3.5 hours they failed.I decided that I'd return the items because I needed to get an alternative gift before Christmas and I didn't have time to find another way to get it installed.  I was able to return the D2, but the GEX-P10XMT and the IB100II  are not returnable.  It turns out that Amazon brokered my sale to three other companies that have differing return policies.  Had I realized that Amazon would sell me something that I can't return I would have purchased elsewhere.  At this point I will never purchase anything else from Amazon ever again
NOT EVEY GOOD ENOUGH TO BE A TOY. I AM VERY UNHAPPY ABOUT THIS, I NEED TO BUY A GOOD NAME BRAND FOR AN INSTRUMENT. THIS IS POOR QUALITY AND I RETURNED IT VERY DISPLEASED
Dangerous... I used a previous Olympus DVR model very happily for a year before losing it. I used to operate it while driving, taking notes, reviewing notes, erasing what I no longer wanted. The controls were easy and intuitive, and I could safely operate the device without looking at it. Not so this one. Overall, the controls are much less intuitive and it is down-right impossible to erase safely without looking.  If you do not pay close attention, you can easily erase the entire contents of the machine. This occurs if you inadvertently hit the erase button twice--which switches the function from erase entry to erase "all."  And believe me, it is all too easy to hit the erase button twice.  So I decided not to erase while driving. But then, last week, while being relatively careful (and while looking at the device; not while driving), I accidentally erased 38 voice files because I was not paying 100% attention. This item is dangerous if you value your recordings. Unfortuntely, it appears to me this and other control design defects have been built into the entire series of Olympus recorders
Not my favorite headphones. I have to confess right now, I'm not an audoiaphobe (or whatever it's called).  I just wanted relatively inexpensive headphones to plug into my hard drive so I can listen to music while I'm at work (and block out all the annoying noise around me).  I had the Sony headphones which were similar to the JVC but I ran the ear bud over with my chair and crushed it.  So I thought I'd get something similar but a little cheaper.  I wish I had bought the Sony again.  These are ok, but everytime I move my head, I get static.  So unless I'm sitting very still, the sound quality is not that great.  Of course, when I am sitting still, they're fine and get the job done, but that pesky static every time I turn my head or move is very annoying.  I won't buy these again.
Works great for a few months then it is crap!. Easy to set up and worked great for 2 months then it just stopped working.  Horrible customer service!  Will never buy from this company again!
the touch screen sucks. i bought this organizer cos i saw the previous reviews saying its cheap and good but it really sucks when i first used it. the touchscreen of the organizer isnt sensitive and too hard to key in the alphabets i want. second, the word structure on the screen is arranged in an awful and confusing way and its hard to read what u have just written. i seriously dont recomend this product to anyone
Try something else. I bought a Garmin RINO 130 specifically for a mountain climbing trip to Mt. Fuji and the altimeter, compass and go-to features failed. Even manually recalibrating the altimeter to posted altitudes proved futile because the successive readings would soon be off. I checked my RINO reading 3,000 meters to a signpost reading 2,700 meters. I re-calibrated the RINO to 2,700 meters and climbed for 30 minutes and my RINO's new reading was 2,694 meters. The GOTO feature took me back down to the wrong rest station that I had stored on the way up. In Tokyo, the electronic compass was 180 degrees off even after recalibration.On the island of Hokkaido, the RINO failed to find enough satellites. Either there are super secret bases on the island with GPS jammers or I passed through a wormhole to the Twilight Zone.I hope Garmin aviation products fare better. I got a refund.
adapter card. I had trouble with installing the firewire port. I did not get any help with the company.
Goes kaput quickly after normal use. This device worked great for a short span of time (a few weeks), then just stopped working.  I returned it to Amazon and received a new replacement.  It worked fine for a while, then stopped working.  It's a great idea, but very weak quality
power adapter. Good thing I read reviews prior to purchasing power adapter. Thanks to 3 of 5 reviews, I found that the adapter recommended on this website, for the model I own, is in fact the wrong one. Why hasn't this issue been resolved? (The reviews are dated from Dec. 2003 to July 2005!
Please don't Buy a Zune. I bought the Zune around Christmas time of 2006. I used it on a daily basis and was happy with it. Early in April, it stopped working. After spending three (3) hours on the phone with four (4) technicians, Microsoft accepted my return for repair and sent me a box to ship it to their repair facility. Two (2) weeks later, I received the Zune back with a note that the Zune was not repaired because the problem it had was not within the warranty limitations. They did not tell me what the problem was - only that they did not fix it. I was more then dismayed. I had spent almost $300.00 with tax and shipping to buy this product. I did not abuse it in any way. Please think twice before buying this product. If and when it breaks - Microsoft will not fix it and you will be stuck with a $300.00 paperweight.
Customer Service Nightmare. Product came DOA - software wouldn't load.  Called technical support who 3 times said they would email the download, but their English wasn't good enough to get my email address correct - even after spelling several times.Called Kensington Corporate in California and spoke to Customer Service Manager who said someone would call me shortly.  Called Customer Service Manager back 24 hours later and he noted it wasn't his fault no one contacted me, as he passed on the information.I'm returning this after investing hours unsuccessfully trying to overcome the Kensington Customer Service Prevention Department.
Having Problems!. When trying to download information to the Ipod, I keep getting error messages reading Ipod is corrupt and it asks me to restore the Ipod.  Sometimes the software will recognize the Ipod and other times it won't.  I have installed and reinstalled the software several times, but it does not seem to fix the problem.
Expensive, doesn't work with plain paper and ink is painful to find. The Epson R2400 is a purely Photo Printer. Be sure to understand this before you buy. So if you are planning to have one printer and think this is it  . . . think again. The K3 inks are not compatible with plain paper and any documents you print on plain paper are horribly color shifted and distorted. It took three calls to Epson and replacing the ICC profile before they would finally admit that the problem was the K3 ink compatibility with the plain paper. All the magazines raved about the Black and White printing quality. NOT. At least not on Premium Quality Photo Paper. Perhaps in some of the more expensive matt papers. I saw very little improvement over my Epson R320. Now if you are going to use it strictly for a photo printer then this is very nice printer. The biggest drawback is you will not find the ink cartridges at any major store such as Staples. The in stock ink guarantee there does not apply to items not carried in the strore. This is Hint #1. Hint #2 if you run out of ink on a weekend and need to have something for Monday you are SOL. The only option you have is to order the ink online. Trust Amazon as they can find and deliver. However if for some reason your lucky enough to have a large pro photo store near bye they may have the cartridges. Cartridges certainly dont last very long and at $12-$15 each with eight of them your burning $100-$125 a set. Bulk ink tanks are coming out but I doubt the K3 Inks will be imitated. IF you can stand ordering everything online and are only looking for a great photo printer than this may be just the ticket for you. However at $850 I fully expected to be able to print documents with pictures on plain paper. I haven't been happy with this printer and I plan to replace it soon. Amazon's being able to locate and ship the ink is the only reason its still here.
This "Emergency Radio" will let you down  when you need it most!. The Antenas on this unit are so small they might as well not be there.  If you live within a mile or two of a radio, TV, or Weather station you will get fair reception, otherwise you will not get any! Even the AM antena is undersize...The sound quality was very poor with much whistling and poping from poorly sheilded / poorly tuned circuits...There is no option for regular batteries, or DC power options.Connections for external antenas AM, FM, TV, Weather Band and high Quality antenas as options would be great.The Clock, alarm, display, buttons, digital tuneing, and flashlight, are well designed however.The company needs to put in a telescoping antenna for FM, TV, And Weather Band, and a larger AM antena, or they should take this product off the market as an "Emergency Radio".In an Emergency information can save your life and lack of it can kill you...The poor reception from this unit will not give you the critical information you need in an emergency situation...Come on GPX / YORX Electronics you can build better products than this!I returned mine for a refund...I have purchased an "American Red Cross FR400 Emergency Radio"and found it to be OK. It at least gets 2 Weather Band stations (instead of Zero on the gpx unit) and with a lot of finess manually tuneing you can get a few TV stations.I am trying A "Sony ICF-M410V Portable FM/AM/TV/Weather Radio with Sleep/Turn-on Timer"  next; it has no built in charger or flashlight so haveing extra batteries is mandatory for emergencie use.Perhaps someone will come up with DC hand generator w/ batterie for powering any device with a DC adaptor / plug?  One that works with cell phones would be very good for the next hurricane like Katerina
CMC disks are crap. I would avoid these discs.  I have been using these discs for some time doing backups.  Recently, I've had a few problems and decided to look at these further.  I noticed another review that said that the discs are made by multiple companies under the Memorex brand as are others like TDK, etc..  I used to DVD info and noticed that my most recent purchase is made by CMC and I'm having problems with some of the discs including burn errors. One disk has strange ring in the die.   I have the NEC 1300a burner.  I also having some trouble playing backups on the same drive on my computer. Less trouble playing on my Sony DVD player. Just based on this (not a clear indication of what you're getting when you purchase), I would go with something else. These discs are not cheap enough for this reason.
Never again. Four months ago, I used this product and had no problems except the finished CDs did not play in one person's car player. With this stack every one of the first 15 CDs I made did not play in most equipment, although they played in the recorder where I copied them. It was very disconcerting to put them in other players and get nothing, or get something only after forwarding to the 3rd track. Didn't understand why this was happening. But I'll not buy them again. It was a waste of many hours since I was assuming they worked
Use it carefully. First of all, as proved by many computer experts, the performance Wi-Fi and 802.11x devices are far less reliable than 10/100/1000 Mbps 802.3 Ethernet NICs. If you decided to buy one 802.11b/g/n router in order to get the "wireless" convenience, be prepared to face the inconvenience of some new problems.I have used several brands and models of wireless routers (including Linksys, Belkin, and Netgear) in the past three years. None of them were perfect and I had to spend some time to figure out how to work around some technical problems. This one is my latest router and I have been using it for five months. I have to say, this one has many functions that I like, it is usable, but the reliability is not good.I really spent some time to find the firmware upgrade web page from Belkin, as the automatic upgrading function seemed not working. Belkin does not have a direct link from the product page of this model.The reason that I was trying to upgrade the firmware was that the router didn't support Wi-Fi constantly, and pushing the "reset" button or rebooting the router didn't always help. After the firmware upgrade, it still has some problems, including:- The web mode to configure the router does not work in many popular browsers such as firefox, if an administrator password is enabled. Every time after I input the password, it will report error. But thank God, I found Opera browser works in my Linux system.- Sometimes even though I set up the administrator password, I can still configure the router without inputting the password. This is definitely a security hole. The router doesn't support cookies. Instead, it uses IP address to recognize a user, but IP address can be customized easily by anybody who wants to initiate an attack.- The DHCP for WAN (Internet) does not work well all the time. When electricity is out for several seconds, it may take a long time to get the DHCP work. That means you may not be able to get online for 30 minutes even though your Cable or DSL connection is totally fine. To avoid this problem, I use static IP for both WAN (if allowed by ISP) and LAN.Since this router also has functions such as port forwarding and several WPA modes, which is much safer than WEP. I will continue to use it, but very carefully
Be very careful. I was (wrongly) advised by tech support to buy this instead of waiting for a new supply of power supplies from Voodoo.  Be sure your computer is supported, because Targus tech won't give you any info about voltage , amperage or wattage on this thing, so you can't safely maake it work with an unsupported computer.   So Amazon, As usual, graciously took it back.  Love Amazon.  I just now read the other reviews and now consider myself lucky I didn't keep it and try to make it work
Poor design, lots of false alerts. I purchased this to replace my 10 year-old Bel 846i, and was really disappointed.It is difficult to tell in the picture, but the portion of the detector that appears light grey is actually kind of silver. On its own, I wouldn't particularly like the color scheme, but what makes the design terrible s that the shiny silver reflects on your windshield. I can't believe they'd think this was a good idea.For some reason, I was getting false laser alerts like crazy -- empty subdivisions, on the expressway without a police car in sight, parking lots... At first, I thought my phone might be interfering with the detector, but I was getting just as many falses with the phone turned off.I'd expect this with a Cobra detector that cost half as much, but this is pretty terrible. Based on other reviews, I don't think this is isolated to a defective unit.
Beware the line of products. There is an entire series of these cameras produced by Dlink, which can be grouped into one product line. This being the most expensive of the line, would have the least reviews and exposure. Read about the others before buying.I was just called to a new client site last week that has 11 cameras installed.Of the 11, half at any given time will drop off the network and/or lock up. He was continually calling his exiting tech guy who performed the install to reset them and eventually called me in because he wasn't getting in his own words "what he paid for".I've used netstumlber and a few other apps to verify the wireless network health, which in my opinion is very good. At the farthest point, I am still receiving 92% signal with a non-enhanced Linksys router. Other devices on his network are problem free; the issues are isolated to the cameras.Short of recommending the client box them and send them back for a refund, I've emailed DLink for any opinions or aftermarket "fixes". They are running the latest firmware. I've tried to pick a few up on E-Bay to at least test them in a controlled environment, but spending $400 per camera when there are obvious problems would not be something I would be willing to invest in. It would be something I would be interested in since if they do work as promised, I could recommend them to future clients.My credentials, ex-NYPD officer and instructor, CCNP/CCDP CISSP, have a 10+ year networking business serving major Brokerage houses in Manhattan and have a smaller business auditing networks, recommending network security, and wireless solutions.I will follow-up if Dlink provides an actual solution. AIM is my username above if anyone has jumped this hurdle.FOLLOW-UP10 days have passed and not a peep back from DLink Tech support. Considering that the inquiry was for a $6500 total DLink purchase which was detailed in the e-mail, it would lead someone to believe that selling is important, support is not. I called their sales line and someone immediately picked up. Sorry, Ford Motors in 1908 wouldn't have survived if their Model-T failed to start "most" of the time.The cameras were boxed up and sent back. I was able to pull a few down and place them in a controlled environment for testing. Of the 3 I tested, 1 locked up within 24 hours. Not a good score. Still they also are trying to get into the infrastructure market with hubs, switches, and larger corporate items. I support over 40,000 users on my main account and their line is one I can't recommend.Waiting for DLink. Not too confident they will get back to me
terrible!. Bad bad bad.  I'm not sure exactly what is wrong with these discs, whether it is flimsy material or an asymmetrical center but they are not reliable.  I purchased a 50 spindle and from the first 28 used only one worked properly.  This is an expensive waste.  I suggest going with better quality discs at the outset.  It will save on headache later
I wish there were negative stars.... The DVDs are a rip-off, although I'm counting on the REBATE to at least break even (not counting my time).The DVD player completely fails to recognize them.  Even after extensive troubleshooting with Disk Management and ensuring my regionalization was not an issue....Just a poor product -- Velocity ought to be ashamed.  More Taiwanese junk.  (I'd recommend Verbatim's DVD+R DL product - made in Singapore)As a note I can get other DVD-Rs to work just fine...I haven't submitted the rebate yet, so no comment on the veracity of other negative rebate comments
Unreliable. I ordered this DVD player so I wouldn't wear down my Xbox by playing movies on it all the time.  I didn't have any of the audio problems that others have reported, however, after about 4-6 weeks of use it just died.  I couldn't even get it to power on.  If you're looking for a cheap DVD player this will do, just remember, You get what you pay for
Worst item ever!. I recently bought this card to add on to my HP desktop computer. The card went in easy enough, but that's when the problems started. I put in the disk that came with the card, but over and over my computer wouldn't recognize the card or the program on the disk. I kept having problems occur one after another and other programs starting to fail due to this mess. After almost losing the computer on the second occasion, I was forced to take the card out of the computer. All problems ended immediately! I've had no problems with Belkin's cords and wires, but their cards and hubs, I've had nothing but trouble. Do yourselves a favor and don't get this item. It could cause you nothing but your entire computer to crash. It's not worth your hard earned money to see your computer crash and burn, is it? If you need to add a card, find yourselves a different brand. I, myself, am going to try Adaptec. Hopefully that one won't cause me the problems that I have gotten with this one
Note Type M and H xd cards are incompatible with some card readers!. Note Type M and H xd cards are incompatible with some card readers!I have a Fuji camera and bought an xd card type M. But it turns out that type M and type H cards are not compatible with all card readers (even ones that work with regular xd cards) so I have to use my cable and camera batteries to upload photos from my new card, or purchase a new card reader. Ugh!Buyer beware
Not quite as advertised. I have a Dell laptop.  This inverter provides sufficient power to recharge the battery while I drive.  But it 'cuts out' if I try to turn on the laptop to use it in the vehicle.  The information on Amazon.com doesn't make clear the limitations of this product
There are better choices available. My unit failed after one day of use (never even got to the field.) Plugged it in to charge it overnight and next day only the blue LED would come on but could no longer connect. Bluetooth connections can be tricky and the paper manual provided is worthless. The on-CD manual better but is still way too spartan for a device like this.I liked the standard mini-USB cable connection for the charger (similar feature on my RAZR) but I found it vexing that you couldn't use that same cable for data (it appears to be a standard cable) but instead have to buy a "special" cable for using the data port. They give you the mobile AND AC charger but the omission of a data cable seems odd. Other units using Bluetooth and USB (such as the 4-in-1 by Wintec) provide this. I found a LOT of complaints and kudos for this unit surfing for solutions to my issues so it appears that their are some quality control problems in the manufacturing. Folks with working units seem to love them. If you get one with the bad solder connections, you are disappointed
Unit added noise to line, but works like regular phone even without a land line. Maybe I got a defective one, but there was a slight humming sound even before it dialed (and no I am not talking about the dial tone). The sound was more noticeable with some phones than others, as some accentuated the frequency interference that this device added to the line. Again, the problem was the device and not Skype.I bought an Actiontec Internet Phone Wizard instead and the noise was gone completely. So maybe I did get a defective unit, but either way there is probably some quality control issues with this device, or maybe all of them have the noise and some people don't notice. It's up to you to decide. With the Actiontec or DLINK, it will probably be much much clearer.Also, the people posting saying you cannot dial out if you do not have a land line are COMPLETELY WRONG. You download the latest software, right click the system tray icon and choose advanced, then change the default mode to USB instead of POTS. Then you can dial by doing:"001 areacode number #"This will dial skype from any phone... If the device didn't have that interference to it, then I would have kept it as the software and functionality is very good, even without a land line.
PIECE OF S**t !. THE BELT CLIP IS LOSE AFTER HAVING IT FOR 1 MONTH CAN NOT ATTACH TO PANTS HAVE TO HOLD IT IN MY HANDS
Canon  S530D Review. This printer prints fast but the quality is poor. Consumer reports rates it a best buy but I disagree. Pictures come out very graney and its almost worthless to have a 2 megapixel or higher camera because the quality will not be seen with this printer. I do not recommend this printer to anyone. I bought the Cannon to replace a Hewlett Packard deskjet 932C and it was slow but the picture quality was superior to the Cannon. This purchase was a real dissapointment
Great design, but &quot;fragile&quot;. I bought this product because I'm impressed with the feature it has, and as a customer support engineer I need the computer case that has a professional look at the customer place but should be comfortable enough to  carry on the street. Most of the time I carry it as a backpack. But it's  not tough as it should be. It last only 1 month and the inner side between  the padded computer compartment began to tear. Because it has a lifetime  warranty, I went back to the shop and got a new one. After a month plus the  inner side (I will say it as a weakness) starting to tear again and then I  will go back to the shop to replace it
it's horrible. it's horrible.. you imagine that now you could put your TV up your wall and you get this box filled wit just 3 metal piece and bunch of screws and with a crappy instruction manuel. the instruction mannnel doesn't explain at all. it's difficult to attach the parts to your TV, it doesn't work with all kind of LCD tvs, it only works wit some specific parts of walls of your house. The only thing I could say is.. "DON'T BUY IT
ABSOLUTE JUNK!. Backed up some movies and not even 1 played well.  They either skipped or didn't play at all.  I backed up my harddrive with one of these and some of the files won't even open... says damaged or corrupted files... ABSOLUTE JUNK!  I will stick with Verbatim from now on
this thing stinks. I used it once and it charged my ipod only 80% after about four hours.  The next day I tried it again and it simply ceased functioning entirely.  This thing is garbage!
Hunk of junk, go for the manual version. Luckily, I didn't pay a penny for the motorized SkipDr. as it was given to us as a "prize." I have the original (manual) SkipDr. which worked every time, and I always end up using it instead. It has more than paid for itself in repaired CD's--$20 for an entire kit at a wholesale club that came with spare sanding discs and the whole shebang.The motorized version didn't come with any deep scratch sanding pads, which I need about 25% of the time for a badly scratched disc. Most of the time the automatic sensor fails to detect that a disc is even in the machine, and won't start turning, so I have to squeeze it together to make it work
Does not work. I tried 4 DVDs with different DVD writers and still doesn't work.  This stuff is junk.  In addition, the manufacturernever sent the rebate.  Don't buy anything from Velocity
What the description here does not tell you!. This adapter is NOT for use with a radio! I live in a fairly strong signal area, and the noise from this adapter totally wipes out AM 800 (a 50kw station!), which is what I listen to most often!
mp3 player and voice recorder. large storage volume: 2 GB, mp3 player sound quality is ok, but the voice recording sound is mixing lots of noise, it is not a good voice recorder, change battery very 3 hours, it is not a good power efficient player
JBuds ear buds do not reduce ambient noise. Unfortunately, the JBuds were disappointing to say the least.Purchased after reading reviews of the headphone but after one flight with it, I had to return it. It did almost nothing to reduce the ambient noise inside the airplane. Purchased JVC HA-FX33-A for $20 and am very happy with it. It has foam ear pieces for far better noise reduction and comfort. Hope this helps.
It overheated and melted my keyboard & mouse!. Piece of junk.  I used it for 4-5 months without incident, but it always ran hot, not warm, HOT.   I came down one morning and the KVM switch was so hot it burned my hand.  Went to check my computer and found the KVM literally fried my MS keyboard and MS optical mouse (on PS2 adapter) - keyboard dead - MS mouse had a MELT MARK underneath (no joke!).Thier tech support is overseas (ergo: terrible), I sat on hold forever trying to get an RMA.  All I really wanted was to make them aware that this switch is possibly a manufacturer defect, and quite possibly a fire hazard.  They claim no one ever called to complain about it before.  Amazon's review section proved them wrong, and I told her so.I went with an IOGEAR KVM switch at half the price.  If that one dies I'm going with a hard wired KVM box for more money intead of these 'all in one' switch units, I think it'll be worth the piece of mind since I use my computers for a living at home.  I can't take the risk some junky cable could destroy my livelihood while I sleep.Linksys claims they never heard any issues with this unit overheating or melting down components, but if you search the web you'll find lots of "my computer will not post, connected to Linksys KVM switch."  This thing is overpriced garbage and a fire hazard as far as I'm concerned.  Avoid cheaply made overpriced junk like this
Poor compatibility, poor customer service. Switch did not work with my Samsung 191T monitor. Customer service people were slow to respond and were not helpful
Pretty disappointed. I really wanted to like this product after reading the positive reviews found on Amazon, but to me the Cowon A2 left much to be desired.  I've been looking into purchasing a PVP for a long time but I've held out because I was waiting for the one that had all the features that I wanted namely:-An excellent music player-A player with recording capabilities built in-An Intuitive user interface-Excellent screen qualityThe Cowon A2 achieved 1 out of 4.Music quality is great on the Cowon, BUT, when I transferred songs over from my PC, there was a hiccup at the beginning of EVERY song.  Also, this device is not Play for Sure compatible, which was not a deal breaker for me. It would have been a nice feature to have, however, and I'm sure it will be a deal breaker for those who are suscribed to music services like Napster.The built in recording capabilities of the A2 were also subpar.  Although they advertise they have a high quality mic built-in to the device, recordings tended to sound scratchy when played back.  Recordings from a TV source were decent, but there are other devices like the Archos 604 that have the ability to record with s-video, and component cables, which I'm sure make a huge difference in the quality of the recording itself.Navigating the A2 was a nightmare for me as most of it is controlled by the annoying little thumbstick.  In order to make a selection, you have to click in the thumbstick.  Most of the time I somehow ended up backing out.  There's a trick to it and you might eventually get it but it was still very annoying to me.The one place that the A2 shined for me was in screen quality.  Videos that were transferred from my PC, (not recorded from a TV source), looked awesome.  Unfortunately, the very same video had horrific audio playback on the device.  Although there was no problem with playback from my PC, the audio when playing the video on the Cowon constantly skipped, and for all intents and purposes, ruins the video.If you are planning on purchasing a PVP, do yourself a favor and look elsewhere.  I personally think the Archos 604 would probably be better, but reading reviews on that product suggest music playback quality on that device is not that great.  So that would leave the Creative Zen Vision W, but THAT device does not have direct line-in recording... Sigh, I guess I'll have to wait a little longer for the perfect PVP
Cool Radio, but an Awful Shortwave Radio. This is a nice radio. Cool design and nice to keep on your desk and use to listen to FM or AM radio stations. That's why I'm giving it two stars - because of design. If it wasn't for the the design, I wouldn't give it more than one star. The reason being that I expect a product (especially a Grundig product) marketed as a shortwave radio to actually be able to pick up some shortwave radio stations. I have had this piece for 3-4 years now, and I have still not been able to make it pick up a single shortwave radio station successfully. There are about three stations it finds, but barely. The signal it picks up is so weak one can't hear a single word. If you like a nice piece of very well designed radio to keep on your desk or nightstand, buy it. If you're looking for a shortwave radio, look somewhere else.
Never worked. It gave me format errors out of the box..  I returned it to Tiger Direct for an exchange and got a refund instead. Not to happy about paying all the shipping costs for nothing
would give it negative stars if I could. LOUD! LOUD! LOUD!Believe the reviews!I have a Mac Mini in my upstairs office. Nice and quiet. I have 3 other external drives. All fairly quiet. This thing sounded like a hair dryer. My wife asked me if everything was ok in my office because "it sounds like something is about to launch!" So I updated the firmware per the WD website to lessen the fan noise. Now the drive doesn't even mount! I call WD tech support. The first guy I talk to chuckles when I mention that the copy on the box claims this drive is "remarkably quiet." He said "yeah, not this drive." I get transferred to advanced tech support. We run some tests and determine that the firmware upgrade essentially killed this drive. I can't even get it to power up. Nice. Glad I transferred my iTunes collection to it. Guess I get to rerip all my cds.My advice? Look for something else. I have 2 other WD MyBook drives of smaller capacity that have worked just fine. This 1TB drive sucked from day 1. If you have any kind of drive activity at all the noise will make you crazy. I guess it's fine if you want to leave it turned off most the time
Introduces Noise. You have to use the Speck USB cap if you use this skin, and it introduces noise to my iPod Shuffle, which I hate very much. It's good protection but you've got to give up some audio quality for it...
it will ruin your games!. I bought this for my son who has had a few scratches on some of his games. He followed the directions, and the game doctor put a perfectly circular scratch all the way around the disc-completely ruining it.  Kids being kids, didn't give up and tried another disc, again, completely ruining the disc- the kind of scratch this will not get out.  Ps the "resurfacing fluid" is primarily distilled saline.  Try that first with some muscle behind a soft cloth, you have a better chance saving your games!Customer Service is hopeless.  I would warn anyone to NOT buy this product.  Perhaps I got a bum machine, but Digital Innovations will do nothing to rectify the situation.I had to leave a star.  The system wouldn't let me leave zero
Bad quality - Problems with the keys. I live in Venezuela and bought the keyboard through Amazon because he was cheaper than to buy it in my country and I thought that the quality of the product was superior. Nevertheless, the product that Amazon sent to me is defective, the complete last 10 keys of the acute notes don't work because they are hard and they don't emit any sound.I'm really very disappointed and annoying with the purchase of this product.Now I'll have to fix it in Venezuela because to give back it to Amazon will duplicate the cost (shipment plus Venezuelan tariffs and taxes).Don't recommend the product
Muddy Sound. You will be surprised how crummy this sounds compared to the Panasonics that cost about the same. This is my main problem - the sound quality sucks compared to the competition out there.1 - The speakers are lightweight and shoddily built. They sound muddy and the deep bass from them is nothing to write home about. They are fairly light weight - meaning very small magnets in them. These are 3 way speakers - for really good sound on the cheap - speakers need to be 2 way!2 - The sound input consists of a headphone type jack in FRONT. Not even standard phono inputs at the back.3 - Its advertised as 320 watts - which is meaningless - since the speakers suck. What good is a high power amp with crappy speakers. And in case you know some audio - 320 watts is only twice as loud as 32 watts (log relationship). For some reason, this is not even half as loud as my 100 W receiver!4 - No user adjustable equalizer, only presets possible5 - Cannot connect a different pair of speakers to upgrade because of the "biamping" type of connections.6 - The receiver sucks - even my Sandisk flash player seems to have a better receiver.I concur with the other reviewer - Death to Sony! Shame on them for taking consumers for a ride. This company nowadays makes it stuff for ultra cheap and prices it "Competively" with the others - meaning - fat profit margins.
Disappointed. This product does not produce a clear sound.  The connection emits static and can be annoying to listen to.  We ordered two of these and they both have had the same results
CHEAP PEICE OF CRAP, DO NOT BUY!!. These are sooo cheap! They grab your hair! the volume sucks as well, not very loud and some weird ringing, cheap short life peice of crap,I had to duct tape mine from falling appart, what ever you do, you must not puchase these, they suck really bad, buy Sony There much better
Great when it works. I got this for Christmas in 2005.  I treated it with kid gloves, didn't use it everyday and was careful not to drop it and always unplugged it by gripping the plug and not the cable.  It worked perfectly until a couple of months after the warranty expired (Feb 2007), then one morning it simply failed.  I had copied a file to it to bring to work and when I went to transfer it to my work computer the next morning it did nothing. I tried it in four other computers with the same result.  Since the warranty was expired and Seagate won't repair it unless you have a service contract on it (see their website), I took it apart to see what I could do.  There is a microdrive that's easily removed.  I put it in my compact flash/microdrive reader and still it won't work.  If you use one of these don't keep important data on it that isn't stored elsewhere, which is always a good idea.  In theory this should have outlasted flash drives, but I have three flash drives that have lasted longer than this with more use and abuse.  I wouldn't recommend this
Falls out--gets lost. I was happy with my original stylus. But, the replacement does not fit snugly inside the silo. Turning the PDA upside down causes the stylus to fall out. I've dropped the stylus six times in only two days. It's only a matter of time until I lose it. I am a very unhappy customer and will seek some other replacement pen.P.S. My PDA was replaced by Palm and may be defective. I cannot be certain that the problem I cite above is due to the stylus rather than the PDA itself
DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT. I have been on the phone, and on the internet with LINKSYS support suince I received this ite,  The install discs did not work.  The support personnel cannot help.  After an HOUR on the phone, stumped, you are CUT OFF and have to start over.  E-Mails to LINKSYS are ignored.  I am NOT computer illeterate, but you have to have a systems degree to install this unit.  Mine is still sitting here like a lump--I will return it to Amazon and ask for costs of shipping as THIS IS A USELESS PRODUCT.
It doesn't work at all. I connected all the cables as instructed, but it doesn't work, the light is not on.So I return it to Amazon
Did not work. Did not work right out of the box.  Followed the directions to reset and it still did not work.  Button on side is too small.  I returned it to Amazon
Over hyped, Over priced. If Apple makes everthing works as it advertized, then it's worth it
Do NOT do business with Bargaincell!. Bought a cell phone battery that, of course, died one week past their return/refund deadline. Refused to refund or replace even though the product is CLEARLY defective. This company is a ripoff and will never do business with them again. Consider yourself warned
Okay product, terrible instructions, but it DOES work on a Mac*. It took about 10 hours of work to make it function with a MacBook running OS X 10.4.6 and an Epson CX 6400, and I needed a windows XP PC to set it up, but yes it works.  For Mac installation, the trick is that (using the windows xp pc connected with wire - not wirelessly) you need to change the static IP of the server to a DHCP given by your router and then you have to go trial an error with your browser to find whatever address it was assigned.  On the Mac, set it up as an LPD printer.  Also, make sure you type the queue name exactly as it is shown on the status screen and God help you if you don't have one of the printers listed on the packaging
Easy to use, until you have to print it out!. I love the idea of this product, and I loved working with it. I created a great layout that looked fabulous on screen.  But unless you have an Epson printer, it is very difficult to print out a great copy.  My hp deskjet could not handle the supplied photo paper, so a friend printed on his Lexmark for me. It worked better, but still had a few problems.  More paper should be included in the package in case of printing problems because after several printing problems, we ran out of paper and I could not find the same photo paper in any store; I ended up buying a second package just to get more of the same paper.Next time, I will make a book using the ofoto site -- much more professional looking (2-sided) and just as cheap
Speakers stopped working days after warranty expired. I am an instructor.  I needed a speaker system with a very small profile for international air travel.  A friend of mine, who works for a major computer company, recommended these due to their size (though he did warn me the sound quality is average).The speakers are indeed small & light - and they conveniently fit into my computer bag.The sound is average, as I was warned.The UBS connection cable is too short - which is an inconvenience.But most disturbingly, the third time I used these they stopped working properly.  Unfortunately it was 2-weeks past my warranty period.  Their malfunction may have been a coincidence, but under the circumstances I cannot recommend these.  Even when they did work, the sound wasn't up-to-par.Do yourself a favor: look for an alternate model (there are many choices out there, in prices that range from $30 - $80).  Just remember to go with a USB-powered model (USB power is a MUST!)
Nasty Surprises. I've had the AT-PL120 turntable for about a month. It worked relatively well with the included cartrdge. There was some minor hum but it was only noticable with my receiver's volume up very loud with no record playing. I tried installing a Sure M78S cartridge for playing 78 rpm records and the problems started. There was noticable hum even when playing records. I also installed an Audio-Technica AT440MLa Cartridge. This cartridge gets very good reviews from audio weenies. The hum was outrageous from the second I turned the thing on. The cartridge works fine in my brother's old Kenwood direct-drive unit. I tried using the turntable with the internal preamp and with the one in my receiver as well as connecting directly to my Mac for CD burning. The problem persists. The unit will be going back tomorrow. Very Disappointing
One coaster .. for now. I bought this on the recommendation of my DVD vendor's documentation (LG). I didn't expect it to fail from disk 1
Slams the tape against either end; tape crinkled, could break!. We received our Kinyo UV-230C 2-way VHS rewinder/cleaner yesterday and tried it out today. The very first tape that we rewound (a much-loved Disney video) slammed against the beginning of the tape so hard that when we pulled the tape out it was hanging out of the cassette housing, crinkled. I'm afraid that repeated rewindings of a given tape could break the tape.I had a blank T-120 tape so I put that in and fast-forwarded to the other end to see if it would happen in that direction. It did. I rewound that tape to the beginning and this time it ended properly, so this problem is not consistent.The tape that was rewound initially was not a full 120-minute tape (the movie is 77 minutes long). I suspect that the sensors on the unit are calibrated for 120-minute tapes and will not necessarily treat shorter tapes as gently. (More tape = more weight = slower overall motor speed?) But I'm not going to experiment with tapes we want to keep! This unit will be returned ASAP. I may exchange it for another in hopes that this particular unit is out of whack.
DOES NOT WORK ON VISTA. DOES NOT WORK ON VISTA.  SOOOOO disappointed because my laptop sound completely disappeared with Vista upgrade (save for the Windows startup music).  I thought this new sound card would bring my sounds back.  Might have, but it says not compatible with Vista.  I guess I'll be getting a new computer.  :
Waste of money. I just ran my first (and last) cd through the Scratch repair system and it made the disk look worse than when I started.  Didn't take off any of the scratches and the scratch remover actually made dozens of perpendicular marks of its own.  It really is worse than when I started.
eXplorist XL Failed in Field. On a recent trip to Lake Powell where I had intended to use my Magellan eXplorist XL as a backup for navigation onm the lake, some geocaching.  I am glad that this was not our primary navigation unit ir we could have had some problems.  The unit would operate for a couple of hours then lock up and not operate until I had removed the batteries for an hour or so then reinstalled them.  New batteries did not help.  After seeing the comments about the slothful service support of Magellen I have returned the unit and will try something else.Overall the unit was pretty good and navigation to a benchmark was right on.  However, the map registration for the region of Utah that I was in was up to 200 feet off in some cases from the actual position.  This included a benchmark on a high point that the map showed to be under water.  Road and highway map registration appears to be accurate.Bottom line, if you feel comfortable with taking a new GPS to the field that may have reliability problems, or other users experience is different than mine, go for it.  Otherwise I would try another product or manufacturer at this time.
Hope it works-NIKO won't get help if it doesn't. I bought the 32" version which is attractive and worked great for 34 days-THEN the picture died although the sound worked-I called NIKO customer service about 10 times-finally I was told there where no service outlets available in my area for repair. I then was told I must ship it back to the distribution center in CA. at a cost to me of $75.00 through UPS. Next they received it according to UPS on the 7th of the month but denied having it there until the 23rd. Then they said it was delived to them with structural damage and there would be a charge of $70 which they changed to $160 2 days later. (I packed it great with lots of padding and UPS wouldn't have picked it up if it thought it wasn't). Now I am out $235 extra costs although UPS gave me $100 back for my damage claim without checking it out. They then sent me a supposed "NEW" replacement that only worked in black and white-no color in the picture. They offered a 3rd TV but after the first 2, I screamed and hollered, with no success at NIKO, but the Tiger Direct people were nice enough to return my money after hearing of my problems with the manufacturer.PS their remote sucks and you will find the no code works for your cable/satillite remotes so you have to use both-if you get a TV that works great, but if it breaks down---don't expect help
bad news. Bad news all the way around. Card does not work, could not get response from seller
Did not Work!. Unfortunately, I never got to use it as the iPod would not charge. Looked very cute, but never got to use it...Returning for a refund..
poorly made. I have had this unit for just over a year.  Beware that the cd tray is in front and it slides in and out.  Because of this design, it is prone to misalign the cd, which will either not load and the "no disc" warning will show or when it does play, there is a significant vibration.  To try to remedy this I had to wedge a piece of folder paper inbetween the disc drawer and the unit!  Alas, I just got tired of not being able to play a disc for my daughter at bedtime.  It is now time to spend a bit more and get a better product such as a Sony.....By the way, the buttons are cheap and the overall construction is poor
Burn in. This product was purchased 10 months after comparison shopping and on line reviews. The picture was great until this weekend when I noticed vertical burn in lines whch approximate the boundaries of non-hd broadcasts. Samsung's tecnical department blithely notes such burn in is common and that it is never covered by warranty. The commercial hype by Samsung about their built in system to prevent burn in is just designed to sell the product as the technician admitted it does not really help. Samsung should be honest and let prospective purchasers know the real % of their sets which experience the problem. My friends have Panasonics which have never had the problem even after 3 years usage
Doesn't Charge Dell Batteries. One thing that one needs to be aware of is that this does NOT charge Dell batteries, and therefore can't really be used as a replacement for a Dell adapter.  I suggest you skip this overpriced item and just purchase a Dell charger (1/3 the price as well).  Also, it seems to run quite hot--I've been warned that too much use might fry my motherboard
Good sound, terrible interface and buggy. I am returning this radio, even though the sound was very good and -- except for one difficult station -- the reception was also very good.I bought this to use as a bedside clock radio.  It has no real controls except those found on a poorly laid-out remote (the bose for some reason also just uses a remote only).  If you lose the remote, or even if you can't find it in the morning, you can't operate the functions.  Changing the clock time, changing the alarms or putting the radio into sleep mode all take endless button pushing on the remote.  It got very frustrating after a while, but because I liked the HD sound I had planned to keep it.That was before I found out that the radio alarm would sometimes just not go off.  Then the machine sometimes jammed up when setting the functions and refused to respond to the remote or the on and off switch until the unit was "reset".  Resetting the unit means unplugging it, unplugging it means you lose everything but your presets (you have to go through all the cycles to set the clock and alarms).  The final final straw that caused me to return it and find a new radio was when it started losing the signal from a local station (but not the sister hd stations transmitting on the same frequency).So, in sum, I liked the look, I liked the sound, I liked the hd stations, I hated the required remote, I hated the difficult and cumbersome user interface, I hated the buggy operation
How the mighty have fallen.... I agree with the other review, Sony brand VHS tapes have begun a steady decline in quality over the past years.  As a almost life long user of SONY premium grade tapes, I have begun to notice a sharp drop in the picture and sound quality I get when I record, even off my dish.  The picture is never up to snuff with what I see when I watch the show as it is being recorded.  For the past two years, I have been able to notice the differences when I am watching something on a SONY tape, the flaws have become to big to ignore. I will be buying TDK from now on, and I suggest you do the same.  SONY used to make a great VHS tape, but I guess they are concentrating now on making more Playstations
Unsatisfactory VGA Image. I bought the Cables To Go USB KBM Switch to replace a D-Link KVM that had failed.  This Port Authority KVM has neat features (auto-switching, switchable USB hub, auto-conversion of USB on all connected PCs to work with PS2 keyboard and mouse), but it delivers a poor image on my VGA monitor.  My HP f2105 plasma display's image is fuzzy and has ghost images.I've not yet determined whether the poor image results from the KVM switch, itself or from the KVM-to-PC cables that accompanied the unit.Either way, I wouldn't purchase this product again
Incompatible with my burner. This media did not work on my brand new asus burner, even after updating the firmware
Rip Off!. I'm evaluating the DVI version.  The cables are sold seperately, so what's the point to buy a KVM without cables?!?Lastly, hearing the problems doesn't surprise me, as working with the two port version, I had some problems where computers becames unresponsive
This card is nothing more than a MMC. This card is nothing more than a MultiMediaCard (MMC). There are many options out there for purchasing MMC. Also, SecureDigital (SD) cards are fully compliant with the Palm Pilots for which this memory card is being marketed. At the time of writing this review, this was among the most expensive of comparable cards. In fact, yesterday at a local retailer I saw a 512MB (4x the capacity) for five dollars more.So my advice is that you do purchase expansion cards to take full advantage of the power of your Palm. I have purchased many and am able to use my Palm as an MP3 player (using RealOne), a video player (using Kinoma), an atlas (using Mapopolis) and a video game system (using PalmOne Sega Classic cards and downloaded games) all at the same time. Do buy SD or MMC cards to expand, but I would encourage you to comparison shop, looking for better prices.-Jacob Hantl
Be Careful. These disks would not work with my Sony brand DVD writer. I have tried several other brands and so far everything works but Memorex.
Worthless. The previous model, the 101 was an excellent pair of headphones that would only set you back about ten dollars.  Sony replaced the 101 with the 110.  The 110 has the same good quality sound as the previous model, but it is smaller.  Even standing still, the headphones slip off of my ears causing me to constantly adjust them.  I don't know if it is the smaller size or angle of the headset, but the fact that it won't stay on my head makes it totally worthless.  I have many other kinds of headphones and have never run into this problem before, so it is a faulty design, not the shape of my head.  I would stay away from this model
sorry - didn't do the job for me. i've given it 2 stars instead of 0 because after i used this CD, the sound from my system did seem to be a little better (the CD's were not skipping as much).  but the bottom line is it didn't fix the problem as the CDs are still skipping noticeably, although not as bad as before.  ... not sure if this has anything to do with the fact that my set has a 6-disk CD changer
Nice but if you have a problem, good luck. I've been using this remote since it was released.  Better than any others I've run into, but when it gets a glitch which all software driven devices are susceptible too, be prepared to give up a couple of hours.When it's working, it's a 5 Star device, however...read on as to why I give it a 2.As I type this, my hold time is up to 45 minutes on the phone to 2nd level support.  3rd call today.I simply got a new PVR.  Programmed OK, but it isn't the default device when I watch TV.  Also, it took two calls to find out my DirecTV PVR is not a PVR, it's a "satellite".  As a "PVR", it couldn't be added to Activities because "you don't have a device that will change channels".  News to me.  Never known a PVR that couldn't change channels.Literally, 4 friggin' hours so far and it still not right.At some point, the TV suddenly stopped turning on.  2-3 hours on that issue and it's still not right.  TV does not go on until I hit the "Help" button on the remote.To add insult to injury, I can't access the website.  Enter my email as an ID and am told it's already in the database.  I ask for a password reminder via email and get a message that my email address is not recognized.I hate that the software doesn't have a simple "Home" button.  You have to go through several menus to get back to it.Hold time now up to 52 minutes.  I have to hang up for an appt., so the hold has to be repeated....AGAIN.Oh yeah...I also dislike the size of the buttons, especially the numbers. Cell phone sized. No doubt designed for a dainty child.I could go on, but if another comes out with a product like this one, I'll be looking hard at it
Flashy, but not very good at navigation.. I have this in my car, and my wife has a Garmin quest (older model ~$350). The pioneer works OK, but looses lock easier, and the database is not as up-to-date as the Garmin. I recommend carrying a phone book with you, since the database doesn't have many newer stores and locations. It also doesn't take you as close to your destination. Sometimes, it stops directing you about a half mile away. Finding stores and points of interest is difficult without the address. It does do a good job of navigating on freeways, with very nice diagrams of each intersection. It also has XM Nav-traffic as an option, and I do like how it informs me when traffic is backed up. If you really need the XM radio, and traffic, I would consider this GPS. If navigation is your primary function, you will be much happier with a garmin. The data for the pioneer is still 1.0, and the replacement data disks are $250. I can only hope the updates will be more affordable
slide scanning very disappointing. I purchase this product specifically to scan slides after a glowing review I had read. No matter what I try, the image quality is horrible; curved lines are jagged and the image is grainy. I have never had the patience to wait for the higher dpis, for four slides at 4800 dpi, the time frame is 252 minutes. 2400 dpi looks exactly like 800. The color adjustments don't seem to make any difference either. Other functions seem OK
Not very durable. I purchased one of these just shy of three years ago (Feb 2003). I have taken very good care of it (it stays in a pocket in my briefcase when not in use) and used it several times a week while I teach. Over time, the silver finish wore off around the "on" button (apparently from perspiration from my hand), exposing the copper underneath. Last week, the button froze in the "on" position, so it is now effectively useless. The laser diode still works, however.Also, the company offers "Geek Points" for future purchases that are supposed to be good for 36 months. I checked the site earlier this week and, while it's now only been 35 months, the ones I earned from this purchase are no longer on record
Poor design, unstable, actually makes computer access difficult. I bought this item because Amazon never had the 3M model I wanted in stock.  So I settled for this one.  That was a big mistake.  The wheels on this stand are only about 8 inches apart which makes your CPU very unstable.  The spring steel friction fit makes it difficult for one person to attach or remove this stand from the CPU.  It is really a two person operation.  Finally, if your CPU has a side access panel, you will have to remove it from the stand to gain access since the stand uses a pressure fit to hold it to the computer.  Take a look at the 3M CS100 stand.  I think it is a much better design
Easy to use, but incredibly limiting. This kit is neat; I have to admit that.  It comes with all the materials needed to make a nice little coffee table book.  However, the kit itself is a little pricey considering that A) there's only 10 pages, B) the pages are only 5 x 7, and C) the pages are not double-sided.  The software included, although as simple and easy-to-use as can be, is so limiting, it doesn't actually feel like you have made this book yourself.  Instead, it's as though you're in preschool, bringing in the pictures and having Teacher put it together for you.  You can arrange different page setups for different themes as you please, but there is seldom the precise one that you really want.  It doesn't help that half of the themes have these cutesy "scrap book" elements that look absolutely ridiculous.However, the book itself is pretty slick once you make many, many comprimises.  The only reason I gave this two stars is for the materials included
Never received. never receieved this item.  contacted company, told me it was the shipping fault.
Stopped working after an year. Bought this from amazon.  Worked well for compact flash cards.  Always complained that i should format the card whenever i used multimedia card (from kodak camera).  so i was never able to use it to transfer pictures from a kodak camera.  And all of a sudden, it died on me.  Had to throw it out
Wrong adapter. Amazing, I read all the reviews and "assumed" the problem with the wrong adapter was resolved since reviewers have complained since 2003. I ordered the Casio CTK 691 keyboard, clicked on the recommended power adapter and trusted the folks at Amazon knew which model I would need. Wrong, it doesn't fit. Since we bought this keyboard to travel this summer it has been very inconvenient, and we haven't had time to resolve it.
Power Problems. The power connector on my FS108 is very sensitive - try to shift the unit or move the power cord in any way and it goes into a fit, flashing all lights and all connected devices indicate they have lost their network connection. My friend reports the same problems with his. Mine is being relegated to the spares drawer as soon as I purchase a replacement - not another Netgear. A shame, it is otherwise a nice switch
DOES NOT FIT!. This keyboard stand is rather shaky and does not fit into the slots of the keyboard.  I am constantly worrying that it will be knocked over with  any type of vigorous use.  I have placed it against the wall, and that is it's only saving grace
Did not work for me... I bought this cable to connect an HP laptop (running XP) to an HP LaserJet 6L printer. XP did not recognize the cable as new hardware. I tried to install manually using the Install New Hardware feature, but that didn't work either. I finally bought a Belkin cable (about twice the price), and it worked like a charm
Wide stipes. The paper stripes of 1/4" are too wide. at times Information such as names and phone numbers came out very clear. IF somebody is really after information he shouldn't have much trouble finding it after you throw away your paper
When it worked, it worked fairly decently. It doesn't make discs worse.  And it doesn't fix every possible scratch.  Some people here think it'll fix severely damaged discs.  It is intended only for reasonable damage.However, I spent $49 for the motorized version at Best Buy.  It worked and I'd give it about 9 out of 10 rating scale on fixing the library's badly scratched discs.  But a year later (maybe less!), it appears as if the internal gears are stripped.  Apparently the gears inside are plastic and don't last long.  Unfort., there's not much choice on CD scratch repair machines to choose from.  I am forced to have to buy the manual version now, or go back to what I was using before - a drill-powered buffing wheel and car finish buffing compound.
Buyer Beware of Version Number. I purchased this software from ANT-Online on 09/08/2006.  THIS IS NOT THE CURRENT VERSION OF MAPSEND!!! This is version 2 of the software.  Magellan customer service has confirmed that version 3 is the current version.  Do not be fooled by the product ID ending in a "-03'  it is version 2 and you cannot tell until you open the box and take the shrink-wrap off of the CD case.  Of course once you open the box, you cannot return it to replace it with ver 3.  Sure the price is good compared to other places but you are buying old software and there is nothin on Amazon to indicate that it is old.
Passable Disc, Terrible Panasonic Customer Service. In my opinion:I own a ton of Panasonic equipment, most recently a DVD recorder. I was using Sony DVD-Rs with no problems, but, being a Panasonic person, I figured Panasonic must be better.In order to save a few bucks, I joined the Panasonic Club at the Panasonic website, and ordered a spindle of these same type DVD-Rs. I did this on 9/20/06.I made several phone calls and emails to find out where my discs were, and, believe it or not, nobody at Panasonic could tell me why they hadn't been shipped. Then, I was promised that they did ship, but I never got them. After being talked into placing a duplicate order by a Panasonic Rep, I didn't get that order either.I finally received one order on 10/16/06. They were so poorly packaged that the holder was broken. Now, I finally had my discs. Guess what? They were only 1-8x speed (the Sony discs were 1-16x speed), and my thermal label printer wouldn't print on them because of the finish. I had been assured that I could print on them with a thermal printer.I did burn a couple of movies, and they worked, but I saw nothing special that I can report.It gets worse: I logged into my Panasonic Club account, and saw two charges I hadn't made: one for $10,017 and one for $915. I fell off the back of my chair. To this day nobody has called me, but I managed to get some email responses, and I was told I would have to watch my credit card - that's just what I need!You know, sometimes you buy a brand and think great things about how wonderful a Company it is, and then one day you have some dealings and realize how wrong you were.I'm going back to Sony, and let me tell you, Amazon Customer Service blows away just about every company I've dealt with (sorry about the preposition). I should have bought on Amazon.
Not as Good as $25 Philips SHE9500. I like Bose products.  I also think they are a good company, overall.  But these phones are simply mediocre in sonics.  Put them on, and they sound good enough.  But, they are inefficient and give the impression of clarity via softness.  They do not compare to $25 Philips SHE9500s sonically.  The Philips are incredible once you get the right sized ear bud on (of course, the same goes for the Bose--it is ESSENTIAL to "find the bud for you," or you'll never see the merits to in-ear phones).  If you don't think that finding the right sized bud is important, try (carefully) using in-ears WITHOUT any buds on and you'll get tinny nothingness.You can tell the difference between these two makes by hooking them up via a large headphone adapter to a regular stereo system.  NO COMPARISON, the Philips are truly PREMIUM at c.$25 against the near $100 you serve up for the Bose.Again, these phones are GOOD.  At $25 they'd be a fair value--even so at just under $50;  still, they would not be as good as the Philips SHE9500s.  At nearly $100, the Bose are overpriced and, in my opinion, you are paying for all the TV advertising they do.  If you have money to burn, you can't go TOO wrong with the Bose--but you CAN do better.TWO STARS because they do work.  But since I now have five pairs of Philips SHE9500s, I doubt I will ever use the Bose again.  They are not a value.  For that, look to the Philips SHE9500s
Summary: AVOID! - Cute, but worthless unless you have a new iMac G5 - Summary: AVOID!. OK, here's how you're supposed to use the Apple Remote with an iPod. Plug the iPod into the new Universal Dock, turn the iPod on, select a playlist, grab the remote, sit down in your chair, start playing music. Now, do you want to change playlists or adjust some other setting on your iPod? Well guess what? The menu button on the Apple Remote doesn't work with iPods. So you have to get up, go across the room to where the iPod is plugged into the stereo and change the settings on the iPod. So what can you do with this remote with an iPod. Well you can pause songs, you can increase or decrease the volume and you can skip back or forth through songs in a playlist. Basically this is the iPod equivalent of a 1960s TV remote control. It's a complete waste of money because you can't browse your playlists or change settings on the iPod. I don't know what Steve Jobs was thinking when this piece of junk was released, or what he was smoking. Summary: AVOID
Poor print quality and failed drum unit. I have used NEC and Samsung laser printers in the past, but the writeups on this Brother printer attracted me.  My experience after just a month of use is awful:  the print quality is mediocre (seeming very gray in comparison with past printers), and the print drum appears to have failed, leaving streaks of print gaps on the page.
Nice feel, but short life. Looks and feels nice.  But when dropped on concrete or ceramic floors ir will snap.  Both broke the same way within a few weeks.  I'm looking for the original all-plastic stylus
Did not work first time. I received the unit on time but after one day the volume did not work anymore have to return the unit for replacement
Maybe I'm just unlucky but mine was a dud. I bought mine when they first came out and at its most expensive cost...I got to charge my iPod 5 times and the charger completely died on me. I bought another from a different brand, used and under $5 on top of it and have had no problems whatsoever and I use it frequently. I was very dissatisfied and unimpressed with this Griffin model
Fashion accesory.... Skull candy ear phones do look nice...but it stops at that. Within 2 seconds of putting them on, they hurt. The things are HORRIBLY uncomfortable and do not look or feel very solid. The sound was ok, but not great...and not very loud even with the in line volume turned all the way up.Yes they do look good, but head phones should sound great and be comfortable, looking good should be a bonus....not the entire sales point. I am very disappointed in Skull Candy. If you want good ear phones for a reasonable price, go for Sony or Senheisser. If you want a fashion accesorie...go with skull cand
Westinghouse service is terrible. bought a Westinghouse LCD TV November of 2006. It arrived broken and I had to send it back. After waiting for more than a month, a refurbished unit arrived which was obviously used for a very long time. The unit was scratched and looked very old. I called Westinghouse and said I paid for a new TV and want a new TV back. Westinghouse told me this is a standard procedure, if something is broken they can sent you back a refurbished unit even if you have not used that TV for 1 minute. It is now February and I am still waiting for a replacement. My advice: do not buy anything from Westinghouse.
Good drive but fragile key ring and bad customer service. I purchased this 7-8 months back and am happy with it for most part. Didn't have any formatting problems as some of the others, but the key hole is fragile and broke off. You can probably buy this thing, but be extra nice and careful with the cap.And be careful if you have Memorex rebates. They ate away a $20 mail-in-rebate which was offered with the purchase. I called the customer service multiple times and each time, they made it harder to get the rebate - I ultimately gave up and feel cheated
Only bought because Imation Sonix stopped making their label. No where near as easy to use as my old system ,But with trial and error can have a decent amount of control over your Projects.But one interesting thing someone mentioned earlieris that regardless of with system you use these labels can alterthe way DVDs play making them stick and freeze and wondering if its the disks,burner or what..after some experimenting I didconfirm that it was actually the labels I was having so much fun making...It might be the weight but i think its possibly the way the beam shines through the disc and reflects off the white label backing..Dunno but if you all of a sudden start having problems try a labeling tape or a sharpie
SOME TIME YOU GET A LEMOND. This wireless speaker system failed to work right out of the box. However; I had not problem with the return , which included return postage. I will purchase from Amazon again
oh where oh where could it be?. Ordered on the 13th of August hasn't even shipped yet
antenna broke. when I went to use this product i didn't even have it  for a day and the antenna broke
Lots of Problems with this player. My Cyberhome portable DVD player worked for all of 1 day. It is unable to play DVDs or CDs of any type. Also, if you charge the battery according to manufacturer specs, it will completely drain out within 24 hours.I attempted to get service from Cyberhome to no avail even though product is still under warranty. Their support number is unreachable as is their support email address. Attempts to locate the company via the web were unsuccessful.This would have been a great product at a great price if only it had worked.Purchase at you own risk. Check out the manufacturer web site. You have been warned
Don't get confused!!!!. This item will not work with PIXMA MP810 printers.  None of the photo pigments are compatpable with this unit.  I am now the proud owner of a CLI-8PC ink tank that is completely useless to me. I suppose it's my fault since, when I looked at these reviews several other people had the same problem.  Let all other buyers be aware and not make the same mistake
Mis-ordered, returned, no acknowledgement of receipt of goods. The product that was sent was misordered.  It should have been the 2 GB SanDisk Micro memory card.Permission was secured to return the card.  It was returned in the original package plus an additional envelope.  It has now been about three weeks since it was returned via the US Postal Service.  The vendor has not acknowledged receipt of the item
garmin rino series DC power adapter. Item is advertised as working with all rino series but it does not work with the rino 53
Good from far - far from good. As a new Skype user, I wanted to have a headset to talk and listen at the same time, however I didn't want one of those bulky headsets that go over both ears.I looked at this product, which looked great!  I love the look of it, and how it seems it will fit right over the ear snuggly.  It also has reviews claiming it is the greatest thing ever.  I thought    I found the perfect lil headset, and I mentioned it to a friend who was also new to Skype and ordered one for each of us.Well, it came and like a kid in a candy shop I went at it.  The ear piece doesnt fit nicely, it was very klunky and uncomfertable - unlike those sony over-the-ears and some bluetooth headsets.  I tried looking past that, and connected the cables to my computer.  As I had iTunes playing some music, I right away heard the sound which was OK I suppose for a cheap headset, but not as good as basic earbuds...  Then I made some test calls, and no one could hear me unless I WAS YELLING.  I do not like to YELL everytime I am speaking to someone, and this piece of trash is being returned ASAP.Bottom line is, do NOT buy this.  Either go for a headset that goes over both ears with a proper mic OR if you dont mind your calls coming off your computers speakers, just buy a mic.  I am ordering a Logitech USB Microphone from Amazon, and I will review that seperately after it arrives
If the software is bad, it doesnt matter how good the hardware is. I am not a techie but I have installed enough hardware of all kinds to know what it involves.   I am also pretty handy with Photoshop and photography.This scanner may scan reasonably well, but the software kills off its usability.  There are two pieces of software (one to view,one to scan) with overlapping functions ( eg resolution) and they do not seem to communicate well with each other.....no problem, I changed the settings on both pieces of software.  I try scanning at maximum resolution and the file size turns out to be about 130 mb for a negative.  I try lowering the resolution but it wont allow it. After countless hours of trying to figure it out, I am defeated....I'll wait for something better to come along
QUITE POSSIBLY THE WORST MOUSE IN THE HISTORY OF ALL MICE!!!!!. DO NOT BUY THIS MOUSE!This mouse has given me nothing but frustration.1. The front of the mouse where the buttons are located is extremely low, causing a muscle strain in your hand if you use it for long periods of time.2. Battery life is horrible. Like 2 weeks...3. When your mouse is idle for 8 minutes, it goes into an automatic sleep mode. The manual says to touch the metal lines on the side to "revive" it but when I do it simply freeze the cursor on the screen. So I have to reboot my computer.Absolutely the worst!!
good when it works. The DVDs I burned successfully showed the movies in excellent quality. The only problem is that for every 3 good burns I get one bad one. I'm using the Plextor DVD burner (love it!!), but I'm going to try my luck with a different DVD brand. The failure rate for Memorex is unacceptable. It's less the cost that bothers me, but more the time wasted on burning coasters
Very well built, but 2 bad flaws. Based on C/Net reviews, Amazon.com reviews and reviews by ilounge I decided to get the V55 versus the iFlip. The reviews I had seen on-line were fairly accurate, but I think [the reviewers] were too enamored with style over function.The V55 is very well built. It's solid, ipod integration is very nice, and there is excellent fit and finish. The speakers provide pretty good sound, and make a good portable system for use on the road. In fact, the reviews used this as one of the real descriminators. But when am I going to use this without headphones? For me at least, a better sounding audio system isn't as important on a device like this.  Additionally, the importance of an IR remote is over-sold for a personal device, at least for my personal use profile in airplanes and other vehicles.All else being the same - these would have been selling points for the V55. However, all else is not equal. There are two flaws which are driving me to return the product:1) No 4:3 aspect ratio selection. Now many posters at ilounge had discussed this issue, and recent posts claimed this problem was fixed with a menu selection, but the unit I bought on Dec 30, 2006 does not allow selection of 4:3. I sent multiple messages to SI and received a response from Nick stating that there was not a firmware fix available for the unit. That leaves only a few possible conclusions:a) There is no fix and the few posts of a fix are 'planted'b) There is a fix in new units, but the vendor is unwilling to offer a firmware upgradec) There is a fix and there is no way to upgrade the unit's firmwareC) is the most likely scenario, but in any case it's a deal breaker. To me - watching i-tunes downloaded video in 'wide-head' mode is simply not acceptable for a product in this price category. I don't mind re-ripping my DVDs with the proper wide screen aspect ratio, but there is no way to play native 4:3 video without video stretching.2) The V55 battery doesn't provide power to the ipod. The ipod battery drains as the V55 system is being used. The cheaper competition keeps the ipod battery topped off, so when the video system drains you still have a fully charged ipod for your portable use. Also if your ipod battery is drained you cannot use the V55. Again, not so with the cheaper competing product.I'll do my wrap-up by repeating the V55 is a very well built product. It's look and feel is very nice, and if I didn't have to contend with issue #1 I would probably live with issue #2. However, there appears to be no way to assure you'll get a unit with the firmware upgrade (if it exists).I cannot recommend the V55
Good Light, Short Life. This is a very well designed light and works very well. You have better control of the light vs. snake neck light types. The quailty of light put out is good and is not so bright as to create glare. There is one major flaw in this light. It has a very short life span. It died after only two months
Poor choice. The alarms works great. The radio and CD has a decent sound. Unfortunately, I needed a clock. The display can only be read when you are looking at it dead on. If you look at it from any angle, the display is washed in blue and cannot be read at all
DO NOT BUY!. I bought 2, being stupid and thinking they would surely fit my standard-size, 7", Coby DVD players.  They did not.  When I went to return them, they said that, in addition to paying the return shipping, I had to pay a $15 "restocking fee"!  So, $25 to return 2 items totalling $33?!  Also, the return policy is very tricky and time-consuming, akin to those "we hope you get so frustrated you never fill it out" rebate cards.As to the product, I ordered 2 of the same thing, and 1 is differnent than the other!  They are shoddy and have a lot of different places where the craftmanship seems poor.Overall, below average product from a company with horrible service- if you're going to roll the dice on the low price, good luck
just working. Apart from the fiddly nature of the charger it does all it says apart from the one main thing if you intend to have it connected to your car whilst driving the charger is not shielded thus a ridiculously loud hum can be heard through the sound system as it charges for the sake of a cheap shielding mechanism to prevent this problem could be easily solved buy at your own peri
Hughesnet (Direcway) Satellite customers BEWARE!. If you use either the DW6000 or DW7000 satellite modems and don't have a land-line telephone, DO NOT BUY TIVO!  Despite what their website advertises, tivo series 2 DVRs cannot get programming updates over satellite internet.  Tivo blames Hughesnet, and vice-versa.  Tivo Customer Support is so bad I would put it in the same category with direcway/hughesnet.  Calling is a waste of your time.  They do not care.  Tivo wouldn't offer me a refund after advanced technical support promised to extend my warranty until their engineering dept could provided an upcoming  patch.  When the patch failed to fix anything, they told me to change my Internet provider(like I could if I wanted to) or that I was simply out of luck.  They offered to cancel my tivo service, but no refund.  Amazing ineptitude.When DVRs work they are really cool.  But buyer beware.  There must be better DVRs out there.  I sure hope so...
Defective cable. I bought this cable to connect 50" Plasma TV to computer. When we connected the cable with TV we could not get it to display computer screen. We spent 2 hours with Plasma manufacturer on telephone troubleshooting the connection. At the end, at our dissapointment, we found out that the cable was defective. When we tried different cable everything worked
What a disappointment... This product has the potential to be tremendous, but due to poor packaging design the inside of the plastic was scratched. That absolutely ruins the iPod video experience, now that there is LCD glare exposing all the scratches.Also, there is a big 'rhigo-skin' logo on the front, which makes the case even that more distracting.I'm sure that it isn't polycarbonate because it scratches with my fingernail.What a letdown.P.S. if you are buying the 30GB version of this case, it will double the thickness of your setup
Terrible product, Read why. First of all the product does not totally inhibit the ability of someone sitting next to you on an airplane seeing your screen, it just creates a more dark shadow of what's on your screen.  Second, if your screen did not have a glare before it will now with this product.  Third, there is a distracting notch at the top of the filter so you have this annoying thumb sized area and the filter does not cover.  Do not waste you money on this 3M so-called privacy filter
Nice GPS product. Used it for cross-USA NY-CA, so learned a-lot about it. It performed very well, probably saved me at least 1/2 an hour every day looking at maps, and still getting lost.As most GPS products, it does Not have "text-to-speech", i.e. it tells you turn right/left, take exit etc., but the name of street to turn on, or number of exit is only displayed - you have to look to see it.So far, I only used it as GPS, not as pocket PC
Garbage-stopped working after 2 months of extremely gentle use. I never even traveled with it. It just stopped working completely making me lose data.NEVER AGAIN I'll buy anything from this company. This drive is a piece of rubbish!
Big on hype, small on performance. I bought the version of this cable with the audio pair for an outrageous $60 at Circuit City out of dire necessity. I have never liked Monster Cable because they use physics mumbo jumbo and deceit to market some seriously overpriced cables to unthinking consumers. I opened the package at home to find that the color coding on the cables was incorrect and that trial and error would be the only way to get the right connection. At their usurious price point, I find this type of defect absolutely unacceptable and furthermore I would note that the cable construction was unimpressive using a cheapish vinyl jacket on the terminations. Thanks to Circuit City's return policies, I was able to return this junk and get my money back. Caveat emptor - cable buyers - spend your money wisely and stop the Monster Cable insanity
Not as good as the MHC-GX250. I thought this new model would be a good replacement to my old MHC-GX250 which was a bit big for my new smaller room. But I was the MHCEC70 Minisystem is truely "Mini" and inferior in quality to the older MHC-GX250 which was around $280 and was well worth it. This system does not deliver the 320 Watts compared to my older system which used to blow up the room. Moreover it lacks an auxilary and Game Sync, so you can't hook up your TV, IPOD or XBOX to it..
No Stand Alone RAW recording. I bought this for a trip to record my photo's from a Nikon D200.  I shoot RAW and JPEG format concurrently.  Upon returning from my trip I Disconvered that the MC1 only records JPEG files as a stand alone. It will record RAW files if processed through a PC.  I contacted Sony to see if there is a Firmware update that will allow me to record RAW files as a stand alone.  Sony responded that they are developing a follow-on unit that will have this capability and there will is no planned update for the MC1 to record RAW files as a stand alone
Please don't Buy a Zune. I bought the Zune around Christmas time of 2006. I used it on a daily basis and was happy with it. Early in April, it stopped working. After spending three (3) hours on the phone with four (4) technicians, Microsoft accepted my return for repair and sent me a box to ship it to their repair facility. Two (2) weeks later, I received the Zune back with a note that the Zune was not repaired because the problem it had was not within the warranty limitations. They did not tell me what the problem was - only that they did not fix it. I was more then dismayed. I had spent almost $300.00 with tax and shipping to buy this product. I did not abuse it in any way. Please think twice before buying this product. If and when it breaks - Microsoft will not fix it and you will be stuck with a $300.00 paperweight.
Don't waste your money!!. I was so excited to get this microphone only to find out that all of the music is POLYPHONIC!!!  The background music sounds like bad elevator music instead of the original background music.  If you just want to tinker with karaoke this is the microphone for you.  if you want to really sing, don't waste your money!!
okay. The only reason I purchased this was because it was a cd/am/fm/weatherband.  It actually doesn't have the weatherband capability
A LEMON. I bought a Palm Zire72 back in April, 2005 for $299.00 and it has proven to be money down the drain.  I experienced the screen freezing up on me which required a hard reset procedure thereby resulting in a loss of all information.  I sent it back for repair around August, 2005.  They returned it, supposedly repaired, and I experienced the same problems with it after this first repair.  Around May, 2006, it was sent back for another repair and I am again experiencing the same problem.  The previous two "repairs" were done at no cost to me.  The company now says that they will repair it at a cost to me because it is out of warranty.  The company, notwithstanding the language of its warranty, should, in my opinion, stand behind its product.  The product has proven to be unreliable and a headache.  Be forewarned.  I rated this product with one star because there was no lower alternative
Will Not Work Properly With Unsupported DVD Media. You pay almost twice the price that you pay for other DVD burners. Then you waste four or five DVD's before you find out by doing Internet research that it will not burn "unsupported" DVD media at highest speed. Of course, burning software should tell you that or adjust the burning speed for successful burn. However, that is too much to ask from free Roxio software that Plextor will give you. It is bad engineering on Plextor's part that they will even not bundle a single sheet of paper, saying up front that what media the burner will support
No ipod controls!! Bulky!. This device is much bulkier than it needs to be. But an even worse offence is that the device cannot control the ipod. The ipod plugs in to the back, and you have to turn the unit around to reach the back to operate the ipod. It is the most ridiculous thing when you have turned off the power to the video unit; then turn it around and find that the ipod is still playing and will continue playing forever unless you turn that off too
tremendous disappointment. Santa brought hello kitty this past christmas.  Hello Kitty is my daughter's favorite. It was going to be the best gift ever - instead it was her greatest disappointment. The mikes, music and lights were going to be amazing.  The one santa brought never worked so we contacted target and they sent a new one.  Well that worked maybe a day. We figured the drain on batteries was so great that it couldn't run for long so we bought an adapter - which it didn't come with (12.99).  Didn't help - doesn't work so now I have 2 broken hello kitty cd players and an adapter. We spent @$105.00. including batteries and adapter for this.
Never worked. It gave me format errors out of the box..  I returned it to Tiger Direct for an exchange and got a refund instead. Not to happy about paying all the shipping costs for nothing
If you see a 20$+ price on Amazon. The list price is wrong. The MSRP from the Casio site directly is $14.99. At that price. I'm sure its a great calculator, but if Amazon is trying to sell at 20$+ I would go for the $19 FX-115ES instead. Better value for money
One broke, other complete fuzz. I purchased these speakers about a year ago. If you'd like to know what your likely useable time is with these speakers feel free to use this example. I'm on Amazon right now buying replacements (ANOTHER BRAND) for these that have completely failed. They worked fine at first, then got fuzzier. One quit completely tonight, no power..nothing. The other still "works" with lots of fuzz. I find myself re-tuning the signal a lot. Time for a replacement. If you intent to use wireless speakers spend some extra bones and get a different brand. I'm trying the Acoustic Research AW-871s now. They supposedly have better range. Don't settle for cheap unless you have to. You'll probably be replacing them in a year if your patience lasts that long! Don't say we didn't warn you
Don't Buy This. After only 3 months the SanDisk Cruzer Micro 2GB died.  Data was lost, could not be read.  Both my desktop and laptop computer wanted to reformat the Cruzer, but when I tried to format, it could not. Flash drive is totally useless. I replaced it with a Kingston Data Traveller and I hope it lasts longer.
NEEDS TO GO TO REHAB FOR ITS INK DRINKING PROBLEM. This printer sucks! It started out working wonderfully. Then all of a sudden (after the third month in use) it started printing very slowly. Then it decided it wouldn't print at all unless I completely shut down my computer everytime. Something is wrong when you can only get 200 sheets of paper out of text only documents from the black ink cartridge. It also uses the color ink when it's not requested. I only needed the color ink a couple of times (not for pictures) and it went just as fast as the black. I used to love hp. They are now making garbage. I'm thinking of looking at the OKI brand. Don't waste your money on this one
Inconsistent quality. The first PMDVR8 I owned worked extremely well for about 2 years.  After it began to fail, I purchased 2 more.  One of the two never worked consistently and failed completely in about a month.  The other failed in about 4 months of light use.  Even inexpensive remotes should last longer
Coasters!. I wish they had a rating for zero stars.  I bought the fifty pack and had 12 good burns and 38 coasters.  That's a 24% success rate.  I subsequently bought verbatim data life and have burned 14 so far with no coasters.  Memorex has really gone downhill.
Horrible - O stars is my actual rating but doesn't exist on this site. The mount is unable to hold my 17 inch LCD without tilting.  I have followed the manufactures advise on how to prevent this from happening and it does not work.  After only 2 months I am now going to have to buy another TV mount.  Don't waiste your money on this product
Noisy Blower. After about 3 weeks of operation, the fan clicks and buzzes like crazy.  Looking for a better option
Horrible keyboard and mouse. I am very unhappy with this combo and will return it. The wireless connection is terrible and the keys on the keyboard stick (brand new). I like my Logitech optical mouse much better
Don't buy. I had just purchased the hp cd and some of the cds were corrupted.
Good scanner, horrible noise. My boss wanted to buy an inexpensive scanner for our office and this little Canon works great.  The CanoScan software is quick, easy to use and is the same software used on almost the entire Canon line.  Scanning documents in B&W take less than 10 seconds on default dpi settings, which is pretty good for a budget scanner.The one thing I can't stand is the horrible screeching noise the scanner makes when documents are being scanned.  It's so bad, that I have to plug my ears while using it...how can I describe it?  It's not a loud noise; it's not a noise that will cause permanent damage, but it IS a screech that gives you that scratching-chalkboard effect.  The first few times I used it--no big deal.  However, the first time I had to manually feed 4 or 5 pages in a row, I had enough.I think the scanner is so thin and compact, it just doesn't have the housing or the insulation to muffle the noise.  Maybe my ears are too sensitive and I can hear dog whistles too, but it's really bloody annoying.I might just have to splurge on a quieter scanner before I go crazy.  I'll ask my boss to reimburse me...he's great like that.Like I said, love the scanner, hate the noise
Be very careful. I was (wrongly) advised by tech support to buy this instead of waiting for a new supply of power supplies from Voodoo.  Be sure your computer is supported, because Targus tech won't give you any info about voltage , amperage or wattage on this thing, so you can't safely maake it work with an unsupported computer.   So Amazon, As usual, graciously took it back.  Love Amazon.  I just now read the other reviews and now consider myself lucky I didn't keep it and try to make it work
POS!  Broke w/in 6 months and Apple bailed on it. What a crock as it looks like everyone else got good product and good service!  I got a shuffle and something happened the second time I tried to load music to make it not even play.  I took it to the Apple Store in Mall of America (Minneapolis, MN) and they claimed to know there was an issue and claimed to have fixxed it.  I go back home (OK) and it still does not work.  Apple said for $113 they'll fix.  Gee thanks!  I'll be looking at another brand!  Apple stinks
Recommend model URC 8910. Customer Service at 'One for All' was excellent but this model cannot be upgraded by phone. They recommend URC 8910 which is only slightly more expensive. I would recommend that model. This did not have the codes I needed  to program for TV or DVD player
Awful. These are awful. I've used another brand's iron-on transfers before with no problem. These not only made all the whites in the design yellow-ish,  but they fell apart on the first wash - even turning them inside out.
No USB cable included!!. I bought this printer as part of a package. The package included the computer, monitor, and printer. I didn't really need the printer, but the price was great for the computer/monitor, and the printer was basically a freebie. I hooked up the computer system. I thought about the printer I already had. It was older and jammed once in a while when I was printing, so I decided what the heck, I'll hook up the new printer. I unboxed it and was starting to hook it up. I looked for the USB cable. I couldn't find it. Started examining the styrofoam packing materials to see if it was shoved in some crevise or other. No cable. Then I looked on the instructions, and the show the contents of the box (printer, power cord, cartridges, and docs/software). They didn't show a USB cable. On the outside of the box, they also show contents. And in tiny little print it says "USB cable not included". What kind of cheap manufacturer doesn't include a USB cable with a USB printer? It's not like I have a choice of whether to go USB or parallel. The printer ONLY does USB. Without a USB cable, the printer is a paperweight. In order to use this printer for anything, you will HAVE TO buy a USB cable! Why didn't they include one? It is just stupid
An absolute sham. Do not waste your money on this nonsense!  I want to believe that it might have been the software that was the problem, but even with saying that this organizer was a total waste of money and time.
Causes high CPU utilization. According to SysInternal's Process Explorer, both HWI (hardware interrupts) and DPC (deferred procedure calls) tend to run to 3%-40% each while this card is installed; both drop to under 1% once it's removed. Both remain under 1% while using another manufacturer's (USB-based) 802.11/b WiFi adapter. I'm given to understand that such high HWI and DPC rates often indicate buggy drivers, but I've found no useful driver update info on D-Link's web site, last I looked. That other /b adapter, BTW, gives better throughput than this /b/g card of D-Link's
is it live or is it memorex?. I hope it's live because if it's memorex, it's crap!  that's my latest opinion after using this product.  I have a LiteOn SOHW-802S and it hates Memorex.  I rarely get a decent burn.  More often than not I'll discover while watching my movies just how horrid the quality it.  My movies will skip, stutter, or stop all together.  So disappointing!  Unfortunately I found out too late that Memorex uses CMC media, which only has a 0-50% success rate!  [...
An Almost Good Product. I have had this Kensington FM transmitter for about 2 months and in my hands it has very acceptable sound and not alot of static.Unfortunately it has one fatal design flaw that makes listening to classical, jazz and any other type of music with any quiet passages VERY FRUSTRATING.  During the quiet parts the unit will shut itself off causing my car audio to emit a ear piercing screech when it loses the signal. I haven't measured it but it seems like as little a 10-15 seconds of quiet causes this behavior.This makes this unit useless for classical music and quite a bit of jazz and other similar styles.  If you listen to quiet music, avoid at all costs.  If you don't it is the best transmitter I have tried.Sirandar
Garmin Quest II not working properly. This GPS ONLY work when you make no mistake/missing/stop/break/change on the route you set before you start driving. Suppose it would work on Marine, but didn't test it yet.This GPS is for my friend. I've use others for 4 years and I do the testing on this one. I never expect it would be sooooooooo slow to re-calculate.When you lost or miss a turn, it just frozen there and doing nothing for you lost. When you manually push it to re-calculate, sometime it's working, sometime it doesn't, seems all depend on if IT HAPPY and you don't trouble it. TOO SMART with temper, isn't it?It may lead you to totally wrong direction. My friend drive out from Atlantic City to Philadelphia, set the destination to Niagara Falls; but he was confused on the toll bridge, then GPS lead him back to Atlantic City. He drove on Atlantic Express Way for a circle, till he realize by himself. It's totally wrong way to his destination.It took so long to start. And in my testing, 60% of the POI is out of date. Couple of restaurant is closeout and one of it closeout 5 years ago. Well, seems it did a good job on record the history.Probably I lost the patient to do more testing. At least it doesn't working properly as my old Navmin, even the map of it is also out of date. But I'm very satisfy for the speed to load up and re-calculate
Disappointed in 1GB XD Picture Card (Type H). I purchased this card to use in my Fujifilm Finepix S5000 camera for a family vacation.  I had researched it beforehand to make sure I could use this card in the camera.  There is an "H" and an "M" card (apparently, they save things in a different format and the "M" card does not allow for taking videos with this camera).  I purchased the "H" card, and used it mostly to take still photos.  Upon returning home and downloading the photos (505) to my computer, I was extremely disappointed to find that once I had copied them to my computer, I was unable to view them on my camera anymore (and I did not choose to erase them from the card).  I got an error message on the camera, and my only choice was to format the card (which meant everything would be erased).  I wasn't happy, but I couldn't view the photos anyway, so I did format it.  That was one problem.  The other problem I had was that several of the photos were displayed as question marks on my computer, with no image at all.  Others looked fine in the thumbnails, but when opened, the top half of them was fine, but the bottom half was either solid gray, or spliced and repeated.  It was crazy!  These are memories that can't be recaptured, so it was very upsetting.  I do not trust the card at all, and I will not purchase another one!
Returned in 2 days. I returned this product in exactly 2 days.  My bad for not doing the research and looking at reviews.  I bought this based on the store demo and the Bose name and reputation.  The promise of an easy hookup, minimal wiring and only 2 speakers had great appeal to my wife.I could not get video on some of my DVDs (which apparently a common complaint on the boards) and those that did get video were very pixelated.  The sound played off my cable TV was very uneven.  The unit utilizes S-Video and has only 1 optical input and 1 coaxil input.As soon as I read the reviews, it was clear that this product has been less than stellar and for $1000, I was not taking chances.  My $65 DVD player does a better job with an HDMI hookup, my old receiver (purchased in the late 90s) has more optical inputs and I stuck it out with my old system as unsightly as that seems to my wife.I think there is a market for this type of product, but poor execution here by Bose.
Direct Turntable Connection Too Weak. I attempted to use this cable with the Griffin iMic to connect my turntable directly to my G5 iMac and import some of my old vinyl LPs.  However, this setup was not able to produce anything close to satisfactory recordings, despite tweaking the settings in the Finyl Vinyl software provided with the iMic and the Mac's Sound control panel.  The recorded signal was very weak, even with input gains maxed out, and even worse there was an intolerable amount of white noise (sound like rushing air) in the recording.  The signal coming out of the turntable is simply way too weak to provide a decent signal for recording without a preamplifer in the setup.  I connected the turntable to my old stereo receiver, and plugged the iMic into one of the receiver's tape recorder outputs,  and voila--lots of signal strength and very clean recordings, no white noise whatsover.  Direct connection of the turntable to the computer would have been more convenient, but the results are not satisfactory to even a casual listener, (such as myself).  I'm 30 bucks poorer, but wiser for the experience
Bad item. One of the fan didn't work straight out of the box, brand new.I looked inside to see what's wrong and saw a lose cable to a fan.I didn't bother shipping it back because of the time, and cost of the shipping
Basic functionality, and that's about all. I bought this router hoping that some of the quality in Cisco's excellent enterprise-market routers would have worn off on adopted child Linksys.  Unfortunately, my experience has me convinced that Linksys is a red-headed stepchild (my apologies to all you red-heads) who has learned very little from its adoptive parent.That being said, the router does work out of the box, and it is probably about par for current market offerings on home-network routers.  My perusals of the DSL reports hardware forums have left me with the impression that all sub-$300 routers on the market suffer their quirks and behavioral anomalies, and this one is certainly no exception.Pros:This router is configured to work right out of the box.  You can pretty much just connect the cables and turn it on, and have functional connectivity without ever looking at a configuration screen.The HTML-based configuration interface is incredibly easy to use.  You don't have to learn one single command line to configure this router.Default configuration was stealth mode -- meaning the router did not respond to _any_ unsolicited connection requests, forming a protective "black hole" on my IP for most uninvited packets.Cons:Not all of the features worked out of the box.  Several of the links in the HTML command pages simply did not link to anything.  Strange that Linksys would ship the firmware without at least taking 30 minutes to hide the links that don't point to anything.Turning on the poorly documented "firewall" feature causes the router to respond irregularly to unsolicited connection requests.  Sometimes the router responds "port closed" to all requests.  Sometimes it responds "port closed" to some and "port open" to others (the set of which does not remain consistent from one trial to the next).  Never does it maintain the stealth operation of its default configuration (with "firewall" inactive).  I'm not sure how the "firewall" in this router is configured to behave, but my initial tests suggest it is more security hindrance than feature.The router's DHCP functionality works great -- when it works.  It mysteriously disengages at random intervals, requiring a reboot (and sometimes a flash to factory defaults) to remedy.Flashing a new BIOS image is risky; router failure during a flash means shipping the router back to the manufacturer - or File13, if the warranty is out.For what it's worth, I am still using this router.  It serves its basic purpose, and while its functionality issues are annoying, there are workarounds for all of them.  I probably will not buy another Linksys, but the problems with this one aren't annoying enough to warrant a return.-sean hennin
TV OK, SERVICE FROM AMAZON BUYER BEWARE!!!!!!. Buyer be ware if you have a problem with delivery or the TV you will be left on your own to sort it out. Amazon may or may not be a big trust worthy company, but they will still leave it to you to sort out there is no personal customer service other then email (run around)!! Bare that in mind before making any large purchase, may be better to pay a little more through a company with a store front at least you will have someone to complain to face to face or take the item back
Worst DVD burner ever !. I have this for a month now and I have issues.The DVD's burned (at slow speeds)are skipping and freezing in my DVD players. The problem is a lot worse with DVD+/-RW.I have several burners (this is the most expensive) and this is the first time I have issues.I also tried different discs.The firmware on Lacie website was not updated since September 2006.Stay away from this drive.This is a repackaged Samsung SH-162L which costs $30. Is a rip off... I got stuck with it..
Kind of expensive for just 1GIG. and also, doen't have radio FM ... I don't recomend
AWFUL SERVICE by this Amazon Store!. I ordered this item on January 17, 2007!!!!!It was finally shipped on 01/25/07!! but, would you believe it, SNAIL MAIL!!!!I received a tracking number for this on 01/26/07, but even though I went and set it up at the US Postal site to be notified of the package progress, I received no shipment progress e-mails.And get this, it was shipped from a city in Maryland which is only about 25-30 miles away from me!!!!Date Time Location Event DetailsJanuary 31, 2007 --- CAPITOL HEIGHTS MD US Departure ScanJanuary 26, 2007 --- US Carrier notified to pick up packageToday is February 1, 2007 and again, nothing in the mail.HOW STUPID IS IT TO SHIP SOMETHING SNAIL MAIL, WHEN UPS SO JUST AS CHEAP AND A HECK OF A LOT MORE RELIABLE AND FASTER!!!!!!!!!!!I am absolutely disgusted with this whole thing!I WILL NEVER, NEVER, EVER ORDER FROM THIS PLACE AGAINI WILL NEVER, NEVER, EVER ORDER FROM THIS PLACE AGAIN.I WILL NEVER, NEVER, EVER ORDER FROM THIS PLACE AGAIN.I have been ordering on line for a long time, I buy everything I need on line, but I have never encountered lousy service like this before.Worst service ever!
Linksys Print Server PSUS4. DO Not buy this product...it is not for multifunctional printers.  Linksys just launched the WPSM54G at the Las Vegas Electronic Show 2007.  Go to Linksys for details....and Google the produc
horrible. it says it's an A/V dock for video ipods but it only would transmit audio to my tv. i'm really pissed about this product.what a waste! A/V cables that sell for 20$ are incredible. they sinply plug into the headphone jack of my 80 gig ipod and into the a/v inputs of my tv
not as expected. This unit boasts 17 mile range, but it can actually do about 1.5 miles after that it's quite a waste of time and the manufacturer should really think practically when making these ambitious statements since the customers want to use the product anytime, anywhere. (who wants to wait until they are on level ground without any frequency interference, buildings, mountains, etc, and the manufacturer's dream conditions are right in order to communicate ?
Very Disappointing. I bought this unit for my wife and we are very disappointed.  For one thing this does not have the resume feature.  That means that when you are watching a movie and have to turn it off, when you power up again it does not remember where you were in the film.  This feature is greatly missed.The other problems are that the screen occassionally goes black and/or the picture freezes.  The only way to fix this is to power the unit off and restart it.  This, of course, wouldn't be so bad if it just had the resume feature..
no improvement. I replaced the antenna on my DI-624 router.I am able to extend the antenna 4-5 ft from the base.But I don't see any signal improvement on my laptop or desktop that'son wifi
iPod Dock: The joke is on you. Last Christmas we were given the iPod Mini as a gift.  It came with the cable to connect to our computer; however, the computer had to be turned on to charge the Mini, thus, we sought a stand alone charger for it.One would think that a 'dock' for an electronic device would be a place that you could put your device to recharge it; however, the packaging on the iPod Mini 'Dock' does not give any information of what is in the box.  The box itself is much larger than just the dock, and the price would lead you to believe that you are getting more than just a piece of plastic and ceramic that helps your Mini stand up on your desk.Here's the joke, the dock is absolutely nothing more than a stand for your Mini.  It comes with no cabling and it does not come with an AC adapter (that is another $40!) Apple makes sure that you can't get any idea of what you are buying until after you have purchased it and broken open the packaging.At best Apple Computers has failed to adequately inform the customer of what they are getting or not getting with the iPod dock and at worst the are neck deep in deceptive trade practices.People always tell me that Apple Computers understands their customers.  Maybe they understand them, but they also exploit them
doesnt work. Well the item didn't work how it said it would. The picture was black and scrambled at best.
Great GPS, awful radio. I purchased the 530 after finding out that a new firmware edition had come out.  The GPS was working fine.  The screen didn't blank out when using the radio.  However, when I was using my radio to communicate with a Rino520, the voice transmission from my radio was garbled and had a lot of background noise.  I verified the channel codes, even turned off the "scramble" mode and the radio still did not transmit properly.  I could hear fine from my 530, I just couldn't communicate out from it.From the problems I've read about, it seems like Garmin still needs to work out some bugs and get quality control issues resolved
Bad choice, digital outputs do not do 5.1 !!!. Well my computer cabinet is 15 feet away from the monitor in the other room...I got this mainly because i wanted to reduce wiring and introduce an optical/coaxial cable to my 5.1 receiver instead of 6 audio rca cables all the way to the receiver, plus wanted to be able to control individual speaker volumes on the pc. Couldnt do that in optical or coaxial mode, no way!! This card can only do stereo mode with digital output. So I am using those analog 5.1 outputs to the receiver (atleast from the cabinet  to my desk its usb so my mission is half accomplished) but hey wait...One more shocking thing I noticed is that the volume control is in no way co-ordinated, which means that as you turn the volume each speaker is incremented/decremented unevenly!!! Takes place subtle so you dont notice it much but if youre into very low-decibel listening you will certainly pull your hair over this.Overall an ok card if you like decent looks. If you want something cheaper, go for an audigy se instead, it does exactly the same thing at half the cost
I returned this system in one week. It came down to a choice between a $40 sound system with a seperate dvd player or this $200 system. The reason I purchased it was because it would save on space. Well, it may save on space, but the functionality was reduced to nearly ZERO. The cons:-Audio popped in and out when playing MP3 CD's. Also a cracking sound when it actually played the audio.-Hissing (especially from the rear speakers) when the unit was turned off.-Low volume from the rear speakers.-Didn't play many DVD's right (it would just stop, as if it couldn't read it).-Will not read DVD-R/RW's.-STUTTERING PICTURE. It did this on ALL DVD'S PLAYED. Every few seconds (it was an intermittent length of time between ocurrences) it looked as if it would drop a few frames. The audio never varied from being spot on, but it looked as if the player couldn't keep up with the DVD. This is what killed it for me. This COULD BE because of a defective unit, however, I will not be risking my money on another Philips player.The pros:-Good audio output. That's about it.My expectations were disappointed HORRIBLY. I will not be buying another philips if I can help it at all. Instead, I bought a Sony slimline DVD player($75 with a $40 sound system) and it is far superior. Far. AND it plays DVD-R/RW's
COASTERS!. I purchased this item and was excited to get them, but burning my first DVDs.. they're all coasters! ARG.. pass Memorex and go for a more expensive media, like Verbatim
Doesn't work as well as the Neuros. There's a reason this is $30 cheaper than the Neuros MPEG4 Recorder 2 Plus -- it doesn't work as well.I originally tried to save a few bucks and grabbed a V-Mate, but it went back after every recording had a squiggly white line on the top of the image and the quality just wasn't up to snuff.  Upgraded to the Neuros and have been VERY happy
ordered two, one broken. Yes it's cheap.  That doesn't mean it's worth buying.  I ordered two of these.  One seems to work fine.  The other only had one working earpiece.  I had to send it back for a replacement (pain in the but), and I have to hope the replacement doesn't fail too.  DAVE says "be forewarned.
faulty chip. I dont know if it was a flaw with my card alone or what, but my 16mb xd card could hold up to 103 images on my 3.2MP camera, but when i put in the 64Mb it only had space for 76..... what a watse of money!!!!
mechanism so loud you can hear it over the film. I recently purchased this model from a source outside amazon.  It is easily unlocked to play all region dvds and the picture quality is excellent, however, the unit would only work using the S video connector, not separate connections.  the spinning of the dvd itself was ridiculously loud
Don't Bother. I owned this system for 9 months.  The single worst home electronics investment I've made in 30 years.  The DVD player choked on brand new DVD's constantly.  "Cannot Read Disc" or 5min+ pauses ruined more family movie nights than I can recall.  I couldn't get Bose customer support to respond to me.  Ever.  It's exapandability and connectivity are miniscule.  It was not even possible to buy a functioning DVD player to plug into it and salvage the investment.  The "surround sound" is a joke, but I never  realized it till I replaced it with a real 5.1 system.  Seriously - don't even think about it.  Friends don't let friends buy Bose..
what a total MARKETING RIP-OFF!!!. Bought a no-name subwoofer cable off eBay, took it over to my friend's house.  He owns this Monster cable; we switched back and forth between the no-name ($6 shipped) and this one, and guess how much of a difference the Monster cable made?ZIP.  ZERO.  NADA.  Thhhhhhpt!God bless eBay, and God help all the suckers who buy all the Monster Cable advertising hype
Palm fan says 'Awful'. For some time I've been buying a new Palm every couple of years. This is first time I've really regretted my purchase.I'm now on my third Tungsten T5, having sent one, then another, in for warranty "repair." (Really, they just replaced it.) The second one froze up and died after only one month. At least the first one had lasted a few months before it died.Even the replacement I just got crashes with regularity. I haven't even installed any third-party software on it yet. The touch-screen goes completely out of alignment every few hours, sometimes so badly I can hardly get into "Settings" to fix it. The SD card reader is also not working. I probably won't send it back over that though, because I'm sick of paying to send it in for "repairs."When it's working properly, I generally like it. I'm annoyed that it has no "vibrate" function, though. I don't know why they eliminated it. And I wish it had WiFi capability instead of just Bluetooth.At this point, I'd really just like to get my money back but it's too late.
I NEED HELP FINDING HP COLR CARTRIDGES. I HAVE FOUND THIS SITE DISAPPOINTING ON FINDING MY TRI COLOR INK #78 THAT I NEED FOR MY HP 750. THIS WEB SITE NEEDS MORE CHOICES. IF THE STORE SELLS IT YOU SHOULD BE ABLE TO FIND IT HERE
Garbage pure and simple. I bought this player because I wanted to play dvds from various regions.  The good news is that it plays discs from all regions outside of region 1 just as well as it plays those in region 1.  The bad news is that I never found a disc which the unit could play through in its entirety.  It would click, grind and sputter along for 30 or, on a good day, 50 minutes before just freezing up.  Save your money or buy a coby dvd-224, which is an infinitely superior unit
tg-45- 12. It is not user freindly and very complicated. I am not happy with it. I even had help trying to decifer it. Bad investment. By the way I am 74 and  computer literate, learned computers begining in 1970"s
Broke Easily. The usb plug broke very easily and threw it away after only two uses.  I would instead recommend buying a car charger with a usb port so that you can charge with the usb cable as you would on a computer
Not Easy to configure. Print server requires fairly in depth knowlage to set up.  After setting ip address and being able to ping the address.  I could still not get my offices printer to work properly.  Even worse the support from D-link support was poor to say the least. I returned the item and bought a hp printer that had a nic port included in printe
CD changer died - can't get a replacement part for warrantee. Like many others here, my CD-changer died after a couple of weeks and it wouldn't read any CD. It's in for repair, but they say the changer part is on National back order and they don't know when they will be available. No surprise, I guess given the number that are breaking. The JVC parts web site says the changer is not available for "more than 3 weeks." I hope they will replace my unit with something that works
Nice Paper Weight.  Now where's my printer i ordered!. This would be a nice printer.  If only I could get it to print!  Not to mention when I turn it on it makes a god awful sound like some thing is jammed.  I've tried over and over to try to print something.  I've checked my options, turned it on and off and still it sits there not printing.  If your looking for a portible printer you have other options and I suggest using them
Cables Unlimited Single DB25 Parallel PCI I/O Card. This item really sucked. It never really worked. I would of sent it back, but being a low price, it wasn't worth my time. I tried it on 2 differant computers and 2 printers. Same result
sucks!. Bought new around $80.  CD player and LCD CLOCK stopped working within 6 months--now nap function and radio are all that works--if only I could find the damn receipt!!!
Gross. The silicone is sticky, so if you plan to put your ipod in your pocket or your bag, plan to have lint all over it.  I never used it because it looked awful immediately.  Not worth all that you'll pay in shipping
Too fragile. I am shopping now to replace this.  Having had success with other Linksys products, I stuck with this brand when I needed a USB network adaptor.  The hinged door into which the network cable fits broke not long after purchase, rendering this product useless
it just doesn't work. You have to move the dial really really slowly to pick up any stations. Plus the connection with the headphones doesn't work so most of the time, if you can get a station, you can't hear it anyway. I'm just going to throw it out and keep the headphones as an extra set
No charging units. I bought these 2-way radios thinking they came with charging units.NOT!!!!Amazon should send everyone who bought these radios under false pretense 8 rechargeable batteries
I can't believe they are actually selling this terrible product!. I bought an Airplay2 from am Apple store for around $60. Other than the fact that "blank" FM stations are hard to find in the New York Metropolitan area, and that you need to keep changing to different "blank" stations as you drive, the product itself is simply terrible. Even if you are in a parking lot, and find a "blank" FM station, the quality of the music the Airplay broadcasts is very bad. The bass is almost non-existent, and there is a constant hiss in the background that you cannot get rid of. This product is not worth buying, especially for $60
Another Dud. We bought this for the kitchen.  After much research and waiting two weeks for it to ship from Amazon, we were very excited to open it up and get going.  The first problem was apparent before we even plugged it in--no remote in the box.  Then, we plugged it in and proceeded through the setup.  There was a two inch green stripe running vertically down the middle of the tv.  No amount of adjustment to the settings would make it go away.  We had to send it back, but Amazon no longer had them.  I will give it one more try from another supplier, but if it has the slightest problem, I'm buying something else
Save your money!. It's a nice look, but it tips over very easily. It is not steady on a rug surface dispite what the picture on the box shows. My advice is if you need a CD rack that holds a lot of CD's? Save your money and invest in something nicer and more sturdy
Pretty desappointed. We bought this phone in order to make/receive calls with Yahoo Voice, using Phone Out and Phone In. But, apart from its nice design, this phone didn't meet our expectations, mainly because of its unability to transfer contact data from your Yahoo Adress book. And entering contacts in the phone or simply navigate into the menus wasn't the best part. However, this phone seems to be a better performer for PC to PC calls (Yahoo Msgr directly) since you can directly access your Messenger contact list
Will not work with Dell Inspiron laptops. I previously purchased a SIIG Firewire 800 Expresscard. After several weeks with SIIG tech support I'm told it is a known issue that card won't work with Dell laptops. So ... i phoned Belkin TechSupport before buying this card. They tell me they know of no such problems. Well, card gives exact same problem as SIIG! Works fine on Firewire 400 but the minute you use 1394b (Firewire 800) drivers, my Dell Inspiron 9400 bluescreens and reboots! Emailed and phoned Belkin tech support but no response/solution. From my experience, Dell Inspiron 9400/E1705's can't support Firewire 800.Update: after almost 2 months of trying to get a resolution from Belkin, they advise their product development team is "still working on the problem". Would I recommend buying a Belkin product, no way, that level of customer service is a disgrace
Don't get sucked into this. I've owned mine for 2 months and all of that time has been spent driving around with it in my car trying to get it fixed or exchanged since it hasn't work since day one.  Some Dream System.  The 'authorized' repair center is a total joke as well.  After being at the repair center for 6 weeks, i get a call saying they can not fixed the system and that I need to send it back to Sony in texas.  I get to pay for the boxes, packaging material and the shipping yeah!!!!  And i haven't even watched a movie ye
leaked in my Grundig radio, what a MESS>. I got sucked into this deal about a year ago and can say long term, risky cells.It could be because the clock draws even when the radio part is off but I'mnot willing to chance it again
terrible belkin. I bought this adapter from the local BestBuy store and found that it was malfunctioning. There as no power light coming on the adapter. After 3 hrs and 4 phone calls to the Belkin Customer Service I found this out. Then I went to the store and got a new one. This had the light but the drivers provided for install were not right.The Belkin technical support is nothing sort of "cheats" and "idiots". Request to be transferred to the level 2 support and they will cut you off. I wasted like 2 days and 8 phone calls and ulktimately am back to square one trying to get a new adapter. Never buy Belkin again
Don't like it at all. I think this is a very bad wireless mouse. It didn't work wireless for me even though I charged the battery for more than 4 hours according to the manual. So I had to connect the recharging cable with it all the time. That makes it a WIRED mouse!!! The buttons on the receiver and mouse are so tiny that you have to use a pen or something to press it. The battery cover is hard to open. This mouse does NOT have a sensitive signal. The motion of the cursor lags behind your mouse. Terrible mouse!!
Does Not Work. Easy set up.  Simply does NOT work.  I have no IR or RF interference and I set up to debug by puting the transmitter in the adjacent room and placing the receiver directly in front of the unobstructed units 8 feet away.  Cannot get any device to work through this transmitter.  If I make 20 keystrokes, ONE will get transmitted successfully.  Great concept.  Really poorly engineered
JUNK!. This is an extremely cheap product (poor grade of plastic) and sound quality is...for the lack of a better word...gross! The earbuds that came with my ipod are 10 times better! It's on it's way back! STAY AWAY
Scratched my Macbook. As long as its on, it will prevent scratches, but its tough to get off, and that act can scratch your laptop.  It scratched my Macbook when I pried it off.  The guy at the Apple Store who snapped it on a Macbook beause I requested a "demo", couldn't pry it off, and after 10 embarassing minutes, he called a colleague over, and they pried it off together.  And, to be honest, this makes the MB look ugly - kinda like putting a veil on a supermodel.  ;--
SAD TO SAY  SONY DVD RECORDERS AREN'T THE BEST. I started using this product on 7/13/06.   On 7/15/06 the dvd I was recording wouldn't finalize.    After many hours of watching the DVD flash, finalizing.   I tried to turn the DVD off, it wouldn't turn off.   I ultimately had to pull the plug and of course the DVD was useless.   This has happened seven times over the last weeks.   Now, before using the recorder, I clean it with a Laser lens cleaner....and still, yesterday, I put a disk in just to play it and it kept spinning out of control.    It sounded as if the machine was eating up my disk.    I again, couldn't turn the unit off, or eject the DVD.   After about ten minutes and pressing many buttons, it stopped.    I was able to eject the disk, and it wasn't damaged, but it really confused me as to why this happened.     I have had many other brands of DVD recorders that turned out to be poor quality also, even if I paid over $200 for them.   I now keep a journal of problems with my recording equipment as it is costing me quite a bit to record anything.  Only good point about the Sony DVD recorder is it does record a very good picture.   But with the above problems, I am not sure how long this unit is suppose to function or last.    Would have thought, purchasing a Sony DVD recorder it would have lasted a lot longer than a month
Very Flaky with bluetooth after few days. Very Flaky with bluetooth after few days, no support phone #, don't waste your $$$.
overpriced merchandise. Although I liked the Bose CD unit, I really felt that the sound was a slight step up from other music units; If I am going to pay top dollar for a cd player, it better give me than it does; this unit would be better value for 200.00 less; it really isn't that spectacular for this money; sorry to say; I am such a music person and I thought that I would give it a try, very little audio difference to make up for the overpriced ticket on this unit.  Remote is small and cheap , little better than a credit card in feel.
Very unreliable. Very unreliable .......... I have used DVD RW and CD RW Memorex disks on multiple computers and DVD recorders.  I find that they.....1) don't last....get about 50 re-recordings NOT 1500  2) may crap out on any occasion.......multiple CD RW's with critical material would NOT read on multiple computers.AVOID MEMOREX DVD RW &  CD RW DISKS!
Great If It Will Turn On. I took the TV out of the box, plugged it in and nothing.  After pushing the on/off switch repeatedly, it finally came on.  Picture and sound were terrific so I was very pleased.  Turned it off with the remote.  Of course, the TV wouldn't turn on again with either the remote or the switch.  Pushed the switch about 10 times and it finally came on.  I called Panasonic customer service who could not do anything to fix it by phone.  So now my new TV is in for a warranty repair less than 24 hours after I received it.  Talk about frustrating!!
Don't waste your money!. I had 1 pair that lasted about 2 weeks.  They did exchange them for me. From the original seller. The next pair made it 1 month. The company won't even answer me. I am still trying to reach H2o but I don't seem to believe they will be answering me either. These are a waste of money. The sound comes and goes at first. Now they are not working at all. Very Very disappointed
Don't waste your money. The recorder/pen looks nice but doesn't work very well.  I could never get mine to turn on without taking it apart, jiggling the batteries and then trying to turn it on again.  Your money is better spent on a non-China made product
Intel Mac users beware!. Intel Macs running the current version of Mac OS X (10.4.9) are incompatible with this router.  The configuration page does not render properly on any of my three Macs, regardless of whether they use a wired or wireless connection.  And with the latest AirPort firmware on the MacBook, the WPA settings cause a system crash (kernel panic).D-Link technical support was no help.  I sent them an email with a screen shot from Safari and Firefox, and they responded: "You shoudl [sic] be able to do it with safari.  Can you try it in another environment?"   So they didn't properly answer my question, and they never responded to my two follow-up emails.  Zero stars for tech support!The reason I'm giving this product two stars is that it did work properly with my Windows computers.  But Intel Mac users should look elsewhere.  I did
Review of Sony VRD-MC3 DVD Recorder. After having a second unit shipped to me by Amazon, I had to ship this unit to Sony Tech Repair to have the software updated so it will operate correctly with my Sony DCR-PC100 camcorder without the MC3 'losing signal' partway through a DVD transfer recording from my camera when using the DV (Firewire) cable, as did the first unit which I sent back to Amazon.It is only through the DV interface that the MC3 can recognize that my camera recording is in wide screen mode (16x9) and give me a wide screen DVD recording, which is why I purchased the MC3 in the first place.I am still awaiting the MC3 to be sent back to me from Sony after reprogramming it for my camera, and I hope it works this time.  If the MC3 allows me to copy from the miniDV tape in the camera to a DVD in widescreen  mode, as it is recorded on the camera tape, then I would rate this unit much higher- say a 5
Extremely poor quality. This card, when it worked at all, was a hit-or-miss proposition.  Many times, I would have to repair the connection, switch preamble modes, or restart the computer to get it to see either the Belkin wireless router or the Linksys wireless router.  This was even when the router was no more than 20' away.Second, it was impossible to get the card to work with my Toshiba laptop.  After downloading three versions of the driver (there are 4), one finally worked, but was unable to pick up the school network, which is nice & strong.If the card is removed from, or falls out of, its USB slot, it is not uncommon for Windows to "forget about" the card, and ask you to reinstall the driver upon putting it back in.I finally smashed the card against the wall.  It works as well now as it did then.  If I could give this thing zero stars, I would
Buyer Beware!!!. Before you buy this drive, be sure to Google "Cypress AT2LP RC42" and "western digital".Until yesterday, I recommended this drive to everyone. Then my drive failed, prompting me for new hardware and to install a driver for Cypress AT2LP RC42. It appears that there is a chip in the drive housing manufactured by Cypress that is failing in drives left and right. (Class action suit anyone?)The Western Digital support staff is no help. Act like they have never heard of this error. Offer no option to just switch out the housing. Will replace drive- but you lose all the data. There are $30 replacement housings available - but you void your warranty.Bottom line - if you buy this drive, be prepared for it to fail. Keep everything backed up, because there will come a day that this drive will fail.
Shoulda read the reviews. I got two of these as a gift and right out of the box I had problems with them.I've owned 2 P880's (the corded versions of this controller) for over 2 years now and they are great, the included software for Saitek controllers is brilliant as well. The controllers are well designed and fit comfortably in my hands, they're like the perfect balance of Playstation and XBox size. The only downside is that they only have 1 shoulder button instead of 2, but you get used to that.So why not go wireless?Well the only reason I wouldn't recommend these is that the batteries are very poorly designed. Saitek has even recocgnized this on their site and will ship you a free pair of batteries. I got mine a couple weeks ago.However that still wont solve the problem and like most reviewrs I've tried and tried to get these pads to work with little to no avail.The individual battery packs actually contain 2 batteries inside; one for the wireless connection and one for the controller display.The problem is that if one baterry is full when the other is not the charger will not continue to charge the drained battery. so while you may get a display on the controller, you wont get a connection to the PC or vis versa.There is no easy solution to this problem either. The user must find a way to drain the batteries without damaging the battery pack and hope that they stay in sync after that (which is very unlikely).If you really like Saitek (like me) I'd wait for a newer model of wireless controllers. Till then stick with the cords or go with a different brand.As of this date Saitek has seemingly started to release newer versions of their game pads so hopefully there's a more functional version out there soon if its not out already.Be warned that the 2.4GHz version of this pad is prone to the same problems
bad quality. I bought this item like 2 months ago, and now it's broken. I'm sooo frustrated.I 'd not recommend buying this item
leaked in my Grundig radio, what a MESS>. I got sucked into this deal about a year ago and can say long term, risky cells.It could be because the clock draws even when the radio part is off but I'mnot willing to chance it again
Good fan but don't buy from Amazon. This is a good fan but it was left on the front porch, just sitting there, wasn't even in a shipping box, just the box it is manufactured with and you can also get it for about $35 cheaper at Walmart or Kmart
Not a viable scanner. I. Impossible to be acceptably used to scan documents to .pdf.a) If you scan from Adobe Acrobat Standard, you cannot stop the HP driver from cutting out parts of the image it considers negligible;b) If you scan from Adobe Acrobat Standard, all colors will be grey;c) If you scan from HP Director, files will be 4 times the normal size (e.g. 3 Mb file with Adobe Acrobat Standard, 12 Mb with HP Director; no way to downsize it).
Do Not Order This Item from BlueProton. The product is fine, but the shipping costs are astromical. I put in an order and subsequently canceled due shipping costs of $25 for a $34 dollar order that is lucky to weigh a few ounces.My advise is to not to order from BlueProton till revise their shipping rates
This thing collects dust like crazy. and it's very hard to remove the dust - frequent washing is the only way!  It fits Zen Vision: M very well, but the feel in hand is terrible, especially when it collects tons of dust on it
Low Price, Low Quality, No Technical Support. This Transcend 4GB, 120x CF card was purchased along with a 2GB, 120x and they have not failed yet, but the Transcend 2GB, 80x CF card that I purchased a month earlier failed and I lost some very important images.  I was using it in my Canon 30D.  I tried several different Software Recovery programs to retreive the images and none of them worked.  I have tried to contact Transcend Technical Support through their website but they failed to respond.  I do not recommend Transcend CF cards.  This experience has taught me to pay a little more and stick with the proven brands, Sandisk, Lexar and Kingston
not audiophile grade, not reliable. when i received my HD 515, I was excited, but after the initial test listen, I was not too happy.overall speaking, the sound is good, but it's not good enough to worth almost 80 bux.here is my detailed review:1. high frequency response - good crisp sound, but it lacks detail and sound stage. the high notes sound "flat" and definitly not audiophile sound quality.2. mid - good, but not great. the notes sounds sort of chopped up on mid-high frequencies. it lacks clarity and detail.3. low frequency / bass response - the bass respons is not tight, and it sounds rather "loose." I tuned the low frequency (45 - 120) to +6 db for testing and the bass started to break up.4. workmanship and build quality: i had the headphone for just a few weeks, and i found the connector is poorly constructed. the sound often go out in one ear, and if i jerk the cable, the sound will come back. the entire headphone is platic, and it doesn't look too durable.bottom line. it's a good headphone, but i think i can get the same quality with a 40 dollar sony or JVC. this headphone in my opinion is over-priced and not so good sound quality.not recommended.
Don't buy a coby system. I bought this system for my baby's room.  I needed a player that had a repeat function.  This player constantly gives a 00 (no disc) code, and it is impossible to get it to play.  The advice given by the coby people is to leave the CD door open and unit on to remove any humidity.  Even when I do get it to recognize a disk, it then won't play, it spins and spins looking for a track.  Then when it finally finds a track it skips and sputters constantly.  DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY, spend the extra 30 bucks to get a good system.  Now, I have to spend double the money to replace this unit, COBY customer service sucks
what do you think? its awful. are you serious?  I bought this a while ago to see if it was cool. It is a piece of junk, u can barely get any channels, and even if you do, you can barely see them and it has loud static.  dont buy it its garbage
Everything nice except most important feature. This would have been a nice phone set, but the reception was awful! I got static sound no matter where I was in relation to the base and no matter where I put the base in the house.The manual said to place it away from electrical objects such as microwaves and tv's. First of all, it is hard to do that nowadays. Second, I did try to move the base and little units around, but I got no change in reception quality.Otherwise, this would have been a really great phone
Definitely stay away. Bought this about two months ago. Never liked it for two reasons:-The rubber cap is so easy to lose. (Guess that's why it comes with spares though.)-Utterly slow! This is what was most uncomfortable with the drive. Yeah it's slow only with groups of small files like everyone else said. Still, it's annoying to have to zip a bunch of small files everytime before you copy them over to the drive. Then unzip when you want to use/copy them. Not practical.And now, well, it just stopped working last week. I mean completely, for no reason. Just great. Like one day before I was going to sell it to someone else.Stay away from this one
terrible, terrible dvds. I bought these disks investing money and trust into the sony name, I am sorely dissapointed in this purchase, one out of every 4 or 5 disks actually shows up as a disk to be burned, meaning that while I spent money on a 50 pack, I actually got a 10 or 15 pack. Absolute trash, DO NOT BUY THIS
Big Disappoinment. Man, were we diappointed with this GE phone! We did everything right---"trained" the battery in the beginning, made sure we routinely charged it, never dropped or abused this phone, and then one day it started not holding a charge. We couldn't figure it out.It worked fine for about a year and then completely crapped out, just like the other reviewers have said. We had a 10-year old Toshiba that was so fabulous and reliable up to it's unfortunate demise, which is when we acquired this loser. Are there any good phones out there somewhere???
Not impressed...at all. Will just have to keep buying new copies until something better comes along!. I ordered this on the recommendation of another Amazon customer. I wasnt impressed. I though this would save me money because until then I had been just buying new copies of my favorite CDs that were scrathced up. I cleaned a few discs and ran them through all three "processes" without successful results. It didnt seem to make much difference with any of my discs. I dont think this is a good "repairer" of any disc thats more than mildly scratched. My suggestion would be to just replace your damaged discs by buying another copy of your CD or DVD on AMAZON!! Many of my CDs I have replaced for $7-10 bucks on here. I wish I wouldve kept my $25
Elementary at best. I currently live in Asia.  I purchases my Magellan on a trip home to Chicago.  Back home, the default map displays almost all mapped roads and landmarks, and even some I didn't know existed.I purchased MapSend so I could have decent maps of the area I live and travel in.Silly me to think that it would perform with accuracy as it did back home...The mapsend features in Asia where I've used it (Japan, Korea, Thailand, Philippines, Bangladesh) show at most 10 percent of the roads and landmarks, and all of those are displayed in horribly inaccurate positions (as much as 3 KM in some cases).Were talking big landmarks including things like International Airports here.A very poor product but one star given because it's better than nothing.
poor customer service. I purchased this memory card for a camera I was also purchasing. It was listed as an accessory to the camera on the same page. When I received the card first and then the camera, I was disappointed that the card was the wrong shape and size for the camera and would not fit. Because I had opened the plastic package to the card, I was unable to return it. In fact, when I emailed the company who sent it, I never even received a response.
Another example of marketing hype... ...designed to lift money from the wallets of the American public.  If one is to transmit digital signals like those that come from the back of DVD and CD players reliably, 100% shielding is a basic requirement. This cable is not 100% shielded; look for foil in addition to the copper braid. Further, digital signals don't care about super low resitance or impedance.  If the bits get there, the amplitude is incidental once a sufficient level is achieved.  Over a distance of &gt;10feet, big and fat are just to make you feel good about spending $40 on a $5 piece of hardware. *see below for a possible exception to this.  Thirdly, if you don't have balanced electronics, what difference could an unbalanced cable with RCA interconnects make? RCA connectors will never be 75ohm connectors; they will never be balanced.  The arrows are mostly to make you feel good about your purchase.  Usually it simply indicates the company specs that any drains are attatched at the end to which the arrows point.  If you have such a grounding problem as to cause interference in your playback, an RCA will never cure anything. As a feel good genuflection to the audiphile gods, attach all your arrowed interconnects with the arrow pointing the same way.    And lastly, look into VSWR and how the design of this RCA affects it.  The large diameter of this cable and therefore the diameter of it's dielectric might help here, but if you can see the solder job, the chance of unhealthy levels of VSWR is greater in that once the signal reaches this RCA, the differences between the RCA's shielding, and other properties, and the properties of the coaxial cable are sudden and definite.      If you have the money to spend and like to massage your cables as you install them, this company makes some nice looking/feeling stuff. Not surprising in the world of audio--big marketing hype over substance
Terrible Product. This tv only worked for three weeks.  Then, for no apparant reason, it suddenly would not turn on.  I sent it back to Coby for servicing and they sent it back still broken and with a new crack on it.  No one should by from Coby
read the terms and condition pdf. I bought this thinking "Failures due to normal wear and tear", which is checked on the checklist of items covered on the overview page, would include accidental damage such as dropping.  However the pdf indicates that (3) DAMAGE FROM ACCIDENT, ABUSE, MISUSE, INTRODUCTION OF FOREIGN OBJECTS INTO THE PRODUCT," is not covered.  This is just an extended manufacturer's warranty.  A call to customer service confirms this - damage due to accidents are not covered.  Save your money
mechanism so loud you can hear it over the film. I recently purchased this model from a source outside amazon.  It is easily unlocked to play all region dvds and the picture quality is excellent, however, the unit would only work using the S video connector, not separate connections.  the spinning of the dvd itself was ridiculously loud
Guess what, it's not universal!!!. I guess this is a bad review owing to bad item description, not bat quality. Turns out, it is NOT a universal ipaq stylus set, so make sure your ipaq is combatible!!
Disappointed. I can not express how disappointed in the poor design of this item.  To charge the battery was an incredible hassle.  At least Amazon made iteasy to return when we weren't happy
Consumer reports gives Panisonic repair excellent NOT THIS 1. Used 2 years by parents that used DVD twice a month.H02 errorH05 errorcalled repair said motor and laser errorsalthough I have taken apart laser at least lights and motor does go. Can get it to read disc if unit is 45deg but will only read for 1 min.Very modual design if I could get the assembly for $40 I might repair but then again my $30 DVD player is still working with similar use
Works as a USB Hub, not much else. As a powered hub this works well. I can't speak to its cooling power because I couldn't get my 17" laptop to sit on it and not move. There are only two rubber feet on the top surface, at the back, so a large laptop will not rest securely on it and will slide all over at the front. After trying another cooler that was too small for a large notebook, I bought this one specifically because it said it worked with 17" laptops. Not mine
At this point, don't bother. I have the luxury of writing this review a little bit further out in the technology cycle than most of the others, so I can say:  Just get yourself a better wireless router.Based on the reviews here, several online fora, and my own personal experience, I can confirm to you that you have about a 30% chance of actually getting this to work, and you might get that percentage up a little bit if you keep returning defective ones and trying another.  But why bother?At this point, there are higher-power routers, high-gain directional antennae, and there are even products sporting 802.11n, which inherently has a better range that -a, -b, or -g.If you've gotten into a situation where your router is inadequate for your needs, research and get yourself a top-notch router with good broadcast power--I would strongly recommend against trying to remedy an inadequate router by trying to add this product to your network.I understand that my suggestion may be more expensive, but I am seriously saying that you will avoid wasting any more than necesary of the precious remainder of your time on this earth.  Definitely hours (if, by some miracle, everything works on the 12th or 13th try), and probably a couple of days (assuming that after 24 or 25 tries you send back the first one and try again with a new one)
Functional, but disappointing. I purchased this clock as a replacement for an older Timex travel alarm clock that I lost. While this model functions on a basic level, it is disappointing overall.As another reviewer mentioned, this clock gains time quickly. After just a couple of days it will be minutes ahead of the actual time. If you only use the clock for weekend trips this probably won't be much of an inconvenience, but for longer trips or regular use at home, this is a bit of a nuisance. I can honestly say that in my entire life I have never had any clock, watch, or other appliance so poor at keeping the correct time.I have also been disappointed with the quality of the Indiglo backlight on this clock. On my last travel alarm, as well as my Indiglo watch, the Indiglo backlight is bright and makes the characters easy to read in the dark. However, on this clock the Indiglo backlight is feeble by comparison. It's just bright enough to qualify as usable, but if your eyesight isn't great the combination of the weak backlight and the fact that you probably aren't wearing contacts or glasses in the middle of the night may make this clock difficult for you to read.As far as the user interface is concerned, the time display is very large, but other on-screen items, such as the "alarm on" indicator, are not necessarily obvious by a quick glance at the display. The Indiglo button, as you can see in the picture, is in the middle of the face of the unit. My last travel alarm placed this button on the top of the unit. If you can imagine trying to illuminate your clock in a pitch dark room, you can probably guess which location is more convenient. Fortunately, all the buttons you need to set the clock are easily located on the lower half of the face of the unit. For setting the time/alarm the clock has a pair of up/down buttons that move the time in one (if you press and release) or 15 (if you hold) minute increments. This is particularly useful for making small time adjustments backwards.Overall I have been very disappointed with this clock. It lacks some of the ease-of-use features I'm used to, and it suffers from poor craftsmanship. It was relatively inexpensive and it hasn't technically broken, but if I could go back in time I would most certainly purchase a different travel alarm
I hope the second GPS works better than the first one. The GPS worked fine for a couple of days and then it never turned on again. I sent a mail to DIGITECHDEALS and they told me to send them the GPS and they would send me a new one.  The new shall arrive this week. Fast response from DIGITECHDEALS
Frisbees or Coasters. I looked for reviews of these, and found I am not the only one having problems.  I have used about 10 so far, and they are generally recording fine in iTunes.  The problem is that my car stereo will not read them. The stereo works just fine with other brands of CD-R, but these just spin and spin until I get an error message.  Next time, I will go back to the HP CDs and wait until they go on sale
Does not work. I tried 4 DVDs with different DVD writers and still doesn't work.  This stuff is junk.  In addition, the manufacturernever sent the rebate.  Don't buy anything from Velocity
not working. After one successful printing it didn't work at all. My printer is HP deskjet 712C. This cable seemed to be recognized correctly at first but kept from being connected
Bugs in firmware. The minor problem is that the user manual claims the user ID is "admin". Well, it is not. Frustration and wasted time will occur until you somehow find out that the user ID should be left blank to log in.The major problem is that the unit only works for twelve to 36 hours before it has be rebooted. After twelve to 36 hours it looses the connection to the wireless network. Once you unplug and plug back the power cord, it will work fine for another twelve to 36 hours. I am used to rebooting Windows every time it hangs, but I don't accept having a Wireless Access Point that hangs (I am not sure how Microsoft was able to convince me it is OK for an OS to hang). This box is going back. I already bought a Buffalo that works fine
MOUSE/VISTA. Don't buy this product if you are running Microsoft Vista. Microsoft has certified this mouse, but it does not bear the " works with vista" tag. Now you tell me, Microsoft certifies it, but it does not "work with". Steer clear of this item for now. No Support that will enable its operation. Also Globazar vendor sells non -retail packaging, with their own typed up (and misspelled) directions. Product looks either reman or used to me. Hope this helps..
the nays have it. Been working with mine for about a week, and am disappointed to report that the negative reviews are spot on.I too had trouble linking it to the PC. Ran into the hardware flow thing. Easy enough to solve after an email to customer support, but they were vague enough that someone less experienced with the windows device manager might have trouble.But the main reason I don't like it is that scanning is slow and not accurate enough. Really, you're better off with dragon speaking naturally, or just typing.The whole thing feels like it's 15 years behind the times. The interface is horrible. The PC connection is deadly slow. The software is junk. (Can we at least import notes into a text file? WTF is a .qnt file? Now I've got to screw around getting that into a program I actually can use!) One really has the sense that these guys aren't putting any effort into keeping up with technology. These guys should look at an iPod. Given how much they skimped on everything else (program, connectivity, interface, screen, memory, chip, etc) I have no reason to think that this is a particularly good scanner.A friend of mine has a C-Pen 20. That scans much faster, but has to be plugged in. C-pen used to sell portable versions, but I emailed their American distributer and found that they only have the wired one.Total disappointment. As a graduate student, this device could have changed my life. Instead, it'll sit in a drawer, reminding me of the money I blew on it.Bottom line: useles
Consumer Reports Best Buy Error. Bought one of these phones.  Like everyone else, followed ALL instructions EXACTLY.  After less than 1 year, battery won't hold charge and phone keys have to be pressed numerous times to dial.  Just bought brand new battery and followed charging recommendations before attempting use.  It doesn't work.  Headed for the garbage.  DON'T BUY THIS and waste your money
Shipping and handling. You charge too much for shipping and handling. I would have been better off going to a Retail Store
once again terribly disappointed. This was sent from Nextar as a replacement for a defective MacVision MP3 I ordered for my daughter, it took 3 weeks to send in the original(they don't return calls in 48 hours as their voicemail states) and then it took another 3 weeks for them to get me a replacement(which was a step down in price and options from the one it was replacing).  For about a week this player worked and then it started to do the same things the original did(would not play a full song and then goes into a starting 'loop').  I would not buy another product from this company
Not as good as my 8 year old Wacom. I wanted to get back into digital painting recently and so I planned on buying a new tablet and upgrading to Painter iX. Along the way of researching what new tablet to buy I ran into this brand and after seeing all of the positive reviews on this page I decided to give it a try. I was very disappointed. I have an 8-year old Wacom Digitizer II (its so old that Wacom doesn't have a single reference that it ever existed), but I assumed that my Wacom was less sensitive compared to the newer models even from non-Wacom makers. The real catalyst to buying a new tablet was that my new computer doesn't have the serial port that the Digitizer II uses (I told you that it was old.)I plugged in the Cyber Tablet and played with it for a while and I just couldn't get into it. It doesn't have as smooth a surface as the Wacom, plus the pen is almost twice the thickness. The worst part by far is the sensitivity differences between the two; when you lightly drag the pen across the surface it doesn't always create a light line, instead its very inconsistent. I adjusted the sensitivity levels for a long time and never found a setting that solved this problem. The construction is reasonable, but it certainly doesn't feel as quality as the Wacom.At this point I am sending back the Cyber Tablet and keeping my Wacom Digitizer II, even though it is a little banged up and I have to buy a USB-to-Serial converter to make it work. I was really excited about this lower-cost tablet after reading the previous reviews, but I am not convinced that any of them have used a Wacom before or compared them side-by-side. A Wacom tablet from 8 years ago (think 486 processors, floppy disks & serial mice) far exceeded the quality, sensitivity and usefulness of the new Cyber Tablet 12000
Timex XM radio. This antenna does not fit the Timex XM clock-radio antenna port.Therefore you must guess which XM radios it might fit
memory stick. I could not make my computer recognize it so therefore it is useless to me
Terrrible. This is not the product I wanted and would like to return it.  How can I do that?
There are better wrist rests. The seam came apart and the gel leaked out in the first 6 months. The non-skid, underside surface has a peculiar and distinctly unpleasant smell
Don't Every Waster your money. I purchased Gigbit 3COM 3824...Extermely Bad on Gigabit...Many Errors with applications...Exchange Server, Remote Desktop, Loop In Network, Ultimately replaced it with LINKSYS...Much cheaper..but excellent performance,,,I am happy no
Good quality, not so good software or sheet feeder. Was truly impressed by the quality of the pictures.  Was less impresed by the software in the printer to manage pictures and print - a bit confusing and slow.  The ultimate disappointment was seeing how at times the paper gets jammed, which makes you lose precious ink and paper...  Altogether I don't think I would recommend it..
Old Technology. I bought this radio to use while I workout.  The radio has a cicular dial (not digital) to change the station.  While you move, the station slips and will change on you.  You need to hold the radio with your hand to listen.Definitly not a good radio for excercising
Waste of money. I bought this cahrger and I was never able to use it!!!I even bought the correct tip for my laptop but I can't get it to work.I have no one to talk to at targus!!!Save Your money - STAY AWAY
Don't buy this shredder. If I'd read the reviews here for Fellowes shredders before buying one, I would have stayed well clear.  As it was, I needed a cross-cutter saw this one (P70CM) on sale and bought it.  It jammed on day 1.  It has jammed numerous times since.  Although the capacity states 7 pages, you're better off shredding just a couple of pages at a time, but be warned that they recommend the unit can only operate for 2min at a time due to shoddy engineering.  6 months after purchase, a document caused it to jam resulting in the motor shearing the teeth off the internal nylon gears (for an extra 10-cents these could have been metal...).  The other point is the wire basket which at first looks stylish, but oozes paper dust, and emptying is a struggle as the shredder jams into it - this requires some effort to dislodge which causes you exert and bend the metal basket even more etc.etc.  This shredder has now joined its own output.  The 1-star is for the 6 months of limited use I got out of it
Western digital? I have very little faith in them. After crashing two hard disks the same day for no reason, I lost all my confidence in this company. The sad part I lost my back up of huge file cache. All my MP3s, pictures, documents, legal docs etc.I bought seagate and Fantom drives. I am happy now
Bought two and both stopped working!!!. This is such a cute toy and my daughter was having a great time with it a couple of days and then the cd player just stopped reading the cd. Took it back and the same thing happen! I can't believe they allow this thing to stay on the shelves!I'm going to go with the Spongebob Karaoke which is made by Emerson, at least a brand I've heard of
Piece of Junk. This thing is a joke. It doesn't play loud enough except for low volume listening. There is no handle to make moving it easy. Cheap, flimsy construction and a door that you know is going to break soon, no battery back-up for the memory. I would rather pay more and get something better. I am going to return it
Before you buy. I just recieved my brandnew 256mb SD memory card from newegg a few hours ago. It came in factory packaging and I know is brand new. Immidiatly upon putting it in my card reader it said "card read error" I have put it in serveral other computers and cameras in an attempt to format it, this card is shot and i JUST GOT IT. This is not the first PNY 256 to do this to me, i gave one away previously in frustrastion thinking it was my computer, it was not. I tried to call there tech support but at first it gave me only the option of where to buy their products when i called again it was closed and offered no info on SD memory. I went online and looked for support for SD but wouldn't you know they don't have any FAQs on it. I tried to write them an email on it but there mail server crashed and my 10 minutes of typing to there tech support was in vein. I have read that many others have recieved cards that didn't work when they got them or failed after 1 or 2 erase cycles. IN SHORT don't by PNY, spend the extra money and get something that will work, if it doesn't work i don't think tech support will help you, if you want to roll the dice and take a chance and something that probably wont work than PNY is for you. If you don't believe me call their tech support 18002344597, you try to ask them about there fine SD memory, go to their website to, see what they have to say about there fine products, spend the 5 minutes to look into it before buying it on impuls
Not as good as the MHC-GX250. I thought this new model would be a good replacement to my old MHC-GX250 which was a bit big for my new smaller room. But I was the MHCEC70 Minisystem is truely "Mini" and inferior in quality to the older MHC-GX250 which was around $280 and was well worth it. This system does not deliver the 320 Watts compared to my older system which used to blow up the room. Moreover it lacks an auxilary and Game Sync, so you can't hook up your TV, IPOD or XBOX to it..
Unusually I discount negative reviews... Usually I discount negative reviews.  I think people may have sour grapes against a company, or not understand how to install or work something.  I somewhat tech savvy - I installed our wireless network that took a little doing.  I work as a technical recruiter, so technology doesn't intimidate me.  I like technology.So I had been nudging my husband for a print server so that I could print without going to the printer and plugging in.  He came home with this Belkin product and went about installing it.  Usually I like to research before I purchase a product, but he wanted to handle this.So, he installed it, and I went back and checked his work, and he had followed the instructions exactly.  I know he had some trouble, and had called tech support at my suggestion - I would never have gotten the wireless router hooked up without tech support.  The only problem is, that the printserver doesn't work.So, I tried installing the software on my pc, and trying to problem solve from there.  I called the tech support hotline back, and got an operator who promised to have a technician call me back in a short period of time.  I waited for 2 hours, then went out to run some errands.  There was still no message from a technician when I returned.This morning my husband needed to get some work done from home.  He created a document, and knowing that the print server did not work, he wired up to the printer to print that way.  But now, the printer won't respond to the signal, so he can't print that way either.  So we deleted the Belkin software and rebooted the computer.  He still can't print.So, I went back to my PC, and tried to delete the software through the control panel.  It won't delete.  I am getting an error message.  I can't print either.So now I am on hold with Belkin customer assistance.  Maybe it's a coincidence but as good as the english is that the person who refers to himself as an operator is, I swear I hear a little Indian accent.  That doesn't mean that customer support has been outsourced to India, and even if it is, that doesn't mean customer support is bad.  But my experience with this is that while I can get a real live person on the phone, he can't do a thing to help me except promise me that someone will call back.  When I tried to get my problem escalated, I overwhelmed him and he put me on hold.  I am still on hold.  I have been on hold for 35 minutes with no help in sight.I called back from my cell phone, and someone who sounded so much like the first operator I spoke to said he would escalate my call to a level 2 technician, and someone would call back in 1-2 hours. When I strongly protested, asked for his name, asked for a number I could call directly, he offered to transfer me immediately, and now, I have been on hold for for an additional 10 minutes on my cell phone.I am starting to sense a trend here. My husband - boiling over his inability to print an important document, has gone off to work to print it there. I am sitting on my sofa with phones going on in stereo, waiting to see if anyone in cyberspace is going to pick up my call.I usually discount negative reviews, but this is really my experience with this product, and if you are considering purchasing it, I would encourage you to think that through a little further.
What, secure?! You have to be an administrator!. I am giving this unit the lowest possible score for the reasons below.  The fact that this is product by Lexar is actually named "Secure" invokes the belief it really is secure.  However, I have been discussing this with Lexar for over two weeks now, without resolution.The problem is that the Encrypted Vault (the reason I purchased the thing) is not available except when signed in as an administrator.  Hello??!!  Why would Lexar build a unit that is smaller than some earrings my girlfriend wears if they did not expect it to be used as a portable device, meaning it would be used in many different computers?  So, if you go to the library, or at work on a network, or at your friend Billy's house, and you are not the administrator, YOU LOSE!   The only way around this is to put your most sensitive material right on the public drive, and not use the secure features of the drive.  Does that make sense?I was sent the software version by Lexar with no improvement, and have tried all of their suggestions, and now the unit will display the Microsoft Windows error screen and shut the drive down.To be fair, if you do not need to access sensitive material on any computer (without admin rights) then this unit could work for you.  It works great on my home computer, but I just have to admit that with a PORTABLE device I tend to want to PORT it around and use it on other machines and cannot.If you need to access your data on many machines, and wish to do so without admin rights, beware!  I suggest you look at the Lexar website and contact them to make sure this is possible.  I'm still wrestling with them, and am hopeful I can take them to the mat and pin them, and will be able to actually use this storage device as advertised.
Do not buy for a Mac!. With the Microsoft website clearly mentioning MacOS X functionality, I purchased this mouse for my iMac - fully intending to use the built-in Bluetooth for keyboard and mouse (no wires, free up a USB port).This mouse will not pair with the built-in Mac bluetooth (MacOS X 10.4.8). Even when you use it with the supplied Microsoft dongle (if I wanted a dongle, I would have bought an RF wireless mouse!), the supplied Microsoft drivers don't "see" the mouse and you cannot set the functionality for the additional buttons or left-right scroll capabilities
Never got it. Kensinton is a good product name, but is worthless if the supplier is out of stock.That is why the 1 star.  Ritzcamera was the supplyier
No antennae; Poor customer service. I ordered the Cisco Aironet 1231 the other day, and after it arrived, set it up, and...couldn't get a wireless signal. I called customer support and was told I would be called back by a technician (which obviously the first person was not) within an hour. We waited...and got online to try to figure things out. Turns out that in VERY small print on an obscure documentation page of the 1231 it says at the very bottom that two external antennae are needed for the 2.4 GH wireless (802.11b/g) to work. I was even more disappointed to find out that the required antennae were available online for only $16 a piece, which makes Cisco look really cheap for not including such a small but vital item with a $500 router.Although it took an astonishing twelve hours for customer support to get back to me, since I registered my complaint with them they have been very helpful. I really hope that they improve their web site-it really is not that helpful since you have to weed through pages of documentation before you can even begin to find information you need. I still haven't used this router since I'm waiting for the required antennae I had to order somewhere else. Cisco routers are supposed to be good, but as a warning to you, the potential customer, be aware that 1) you need to purchase external antennae with this product; 2) my initial experience with customer service was pretty disappointing
iPod Nano 2nd Gen - won't fit. This unit sounds ok.  And the sound-spa aspect is a nice difference.  However, none of the inserts that come with it fit the "new" iPod Nano.  I'm still waiting to hear from Homedics about getting an insert that fits..
2 major design flaws - Buy Kensington version instead. I purchased this product, but after 3 months of frustrating use wound up throwing it away.The first problem is that the structural support of the power tips between the laptop plug and the cord plug is the electrical solder!  The effect of this is that if you use the adapter on the road where it's subject to a lot of plug and unplug and varying mechanical stress, the solder breaks.  You then at best have a tip with an intermittent connection.  I replaced the tip twice before giving up and getting another better designed adapter.The second problem is that when I unplugged the power adapter from the wall, it would cause my laptop (IBM T20) to emergency power off.  Unplugged at the laptop plug was fine.  I understand this to be an issue between the T20 power system and a surge issue in the adapter.I replaced this with a Kensington 33197 120W adapter.  It looks almost like the same product (same OEM?) except they have stronger power tips.  It also didn't have the power-off issue.I loved the form factor, but the product just didn't work
junk. DVD player worked great for about a month. After that it stopped powering up.Don't buy
Too many major drawbacks. I concur with those who complain about finding music on this player.  It is cumbersome and timeconsuming.  Moreover, the screen is very small. In attempting to delete songs, the player frequently freezes, making it necessary to remove it from the USB port.  I regret buying this one.
AVOID IF YOU HAVE NEC 1300a. It will not work on this drive.   Period.  I switched to Maxell and Fujifilm disks, and now I'm a happy camper
Poorly Constructed. Space and pockets are great but it's not at all durable.  My first pack ripped out a seam on my first trip using it.  I returned it hoping it was just a defect.  The replacement lasted a couple months.  I'll return this one too, but not for another Wenger
Unreliable, poor online support, expensive, doesn't work. Shame on you Belkin, why does this product have so many flaws?? Firstly, the missing keystrokes, causing you to send emails with missing characters, meaning you have to spell check everything even if your spelling is perfect. But you still send 'an' instead of 'and'. ArghhOn one of the PCs I am using, on boot up, the keyboard NEVER works. I have to go into the device manager for that PC to uninstall the driver that is not functioning properly, and reinstall it, and if the PC gods are looking down favourably on me, the keyboard starts to work. Otherwise I have to resort to other methods to breath life into the dang thing.The firmware upgrade, I thought OK, maybe this could solve all my problems, but using a parallel cable, both of my PCs don't have a parallel port! Why not use a USB connection??? Arrgghh.If you are thinking of buying a 2 port switch box, do what I am going to have to do, look elsewhere
Don't bother....Microphone input generates high noise. I tested the product with both my desktop and laptop, and the recordingfrom the microphone generates tons of static...it's simply not acceptable.....just no way that I can use it to talk through voip... :(
No vista support. Returned it.  Wouldn't work with Vista and a Canon MP780 and it certainly won't work with Mac OS X clients (note: the product doesn't advertise support for Mac).Why is it so difficult for manufacturers to create a wireless print server that works with multifunction printers
Service was poor- not Prime as advertized when I ordered. I ordered based on getting 2-day delivery using my Amazon Prime prepaid delivery (I HIGHLY recommend doing this if you buy 10 or more items a year on Amazon - ). However, the confirmation showed 3-7 days delivery. When I tried to cancel with the provider/vendor, my request was ignored (never a response) and Amazon had no way to help me out of the order that I needed much sooner. I finally got the order within that much longer window. I like the product, but am apalled that Amazon let this vendor play the switch game on the delivery. I notice Amazon pulled the Prime statement, but that did not help me. I had to buy on the outside to get the product in time and now have double the number I needed. DO NO USE THIS PRODUCT UNLESS YOU HAVE A TON OF TIME TO WAIT AND CAN NOT FIND FUJI (a 100% clean set - never a miss vs 92%-95% reliability on Verbatim
Great Features, Unreliable Connections. I like the features.  I'm satisfied with the sound.  The user interface could be more intuitive.HOWEVER, my overriding complaint is that the docking port (as many other reviewers have mentioned) is not reliable.  The connection is poorly constructed, so just walking by the table on which it sits is often enough to make it think the iPod isn't there any more.  If they could fix this quality problem, it would be well worth the $100, but since it is very hard to get it to recognize the connection reliably you just can't justify it at any price
Not worth it - terrible product, major vendor issues. I bought this product as a gift for some friends - following the directions carefully, they were only able to get one of the speakers to work and that intermittantly - after I got the speaker system back from them, I gave it a try - bad results, worse this time - only static from one speaker - I double checked to make sure that I had installed everything correctly including making sure that the correct power adapters were attached to the speakers - no go - and, then, when I went to return it to the company from whom I bought it in Canada, I got the royal run around - finally after lots of phone calls and mail issues (don't get me started on "customs" issues) I returned the product and got the price of the speakers back - however, no refund on shipping either way which amounted to about $89 total - so ... two things: [1] the product is shabby and not worth the price (go to Sharper Image and buy theirs - better product, cheaper price) and [2] never buy anything from Amazon.com that is not from an American supplier
Problems. Well I received it and I proceed to install following the instructions. Really very easy to install. I connected AverTV Cardbus to the cable. I did a SCAN for the cable channels, it worked for a while and then the blue light of the card turned off and no channels could be see. I removed the AverTV Cardbus from my notebook and blue light came back again for maybe 1 min or less and turned off again.It looks that it is maybe damage, I think the problem appears when it gets hot. I made work the following day and it worked for maybe 5 min. and card light goes off again.Maybe I received one that has problems
Be very careful. I was (wrongly) advised by tech support to buy this instead of waiting for a new supply of power supplies from Voodoo.  Be sure your computer is supported, because Targus tech won't give you any info about voltage , amperage or wattage on this thing, so you can't safely maake it work with an unsupported computer.   So Amazon, As usual, graciously took it back.  Love Amazon.  I just now read the other reviews and now consider myself lucky I didn't keep it and try to make it work
Disappointed. Big disappointment, more so because it was a gift.The first word we looked up wasn't in it!Bigger nuisance than help
Nice idea, but nightmare to print. I love the idea of this product, and I loved working with it. I created a great layout that looked fabulous on screen. But unless you have an Epson printer, it is very difficult to print out a great copy. My hp deskjet could not handle the supplied photo paper, so a friend printed on his Lexmark for me. It worked better, but still had a few problems. More paper should be included in the package in case of printing problems because after several printing problems, we ran out of paper and I could not find the same photo paper in any store; I ended up buying a second package just to get more of the same paper.Next time, I will make a book using the ofoto site -- much more professional looking (2-sided) and just as cheap
another case of buzzing sound. i bought my monitor yesterday and found to have a buzzing sound at lower brightness (&lt;100%). just scheduled an exchange LCD
It's okay... Alright, first off this piece of crap will randomly stop playing. It started off when I'd just walk around that it would turn off, but now sometimes I barely TOUCH IT and tilt it to the side to look at the song and it turns off.  It is NOT easy to use if you're a HOLD button person... if you have it on hold while plugged into your computer, it will not let you delete or add music, which made me panick at first and fear for a permanant playlist.Also, the headphones that come with it are REALLY not worth it, they are really really bad, so go buy some nice Sony ones.AND, the song switcher thinger is a little defective... it's neat, but you can push it down and it'll hit something inside of the MP3 player that makes the songs skip and be all crazy... so it gives me a fear of damaging the insides of my MP3 player whenever its in my pocket or something.I think thats about it... I wouldn't recommend it, unless you want a cheap piece of s***
Poor product / technical support is even worse. If you are looking for a reliable, quality switch, look elsewhere.  The first switch we received was DOA.  Tech support turn around was more than a week, and they ship UPS ground.  As a result, we had to rely on an old hub  for over two weeks!  The new switch worked well, for about two weeks.  Then  it too failed.  If you need a reliable workgroup switch, look somewhere  else. We gave up and replaced ours with a Bay Networks Netgear FS516 switch  for about the same money and we can rest easy with good support.  So far it  hasn't broken either
why do these require battery. I did not like the fact that this microphone needs a hard to find battery which is not included in the box it was sold
Unusable. After every five minutes or so, the signal would cut out. Control would usually be restored some seconds later, but not after whatever combination of pressed buttons had been sent continually to the game, often times forcing me to run into a pit, fire till I was out of ammo, or whatever.I read the manual and they recommended hitting a button on the controller to change the signal frequency, in case I was getting some signal interference. Same problem.I then read up on user reviews and heard there are line-of-sight issues, so I tried plugging the USB receiver in to different ports on my computer. Same problem.I then tried getting a USB cradle which allowed me to place the USB receiver around different parts of the room, allowing better line of sight  with the controller while unfortunately rendering the wireless nature of the controller redundant. Same problem.I then different combinations of removing and updating the manufacturer's drivers. Same problem.I then exchanged the item for another (same model). Same problem.I then returned the unit and got a Logitech. Problem solved!!
No  cable. I just received the printer. In trying to set it up, I realized there is no computer to printer cable included, nor any explanation  of what kind you need. You have to bail out of the setup and solve that little dilema
Unresolved problem. I am still awaiting resolution of a problem I have with these drives. In writing DVDs I get verification errors. This proboem arises if the drives are used in an external firewire enclosure. The drive works fine if internal in your computer attached to the IDE bus, but there is an issue if attached to your computer by firewire
DOA. After a couple of E-mail exchanges with manufacturer's tech support, card was determined to be defective.  Replaced by retailer with 5 port version (which was in stock).  Card continues to work fine
Overpriced ! Get the Sonnet instead at half the price!. I don't understand why people spend money on this charger, when you can pay half as much for the same thing. I bought an iPod charger for my 5G iPod video from Sonnet Technologies and I am very satisfied. It is small and the connectors retract for easy carrying around.Search Amazon for "Sonnet USB Wall Charger for Ipod with USB-to-Dock Cable" at about HALF the price. It comes in black or white to go with the color of your iPo
It didn't work for me. I wish I could return it but I broke the warranty by using the hack described elsewhere.   I imagined listening to my computer on a dedicated FM station throughout the house.  The best I ever got was terrible reception in the kitchen.  It may work in other parts of the country or other parts of the world, but it did not work for me in West Palm Beach
Terrible... Either the item is faulty or my television is too old but it didnt work for me. I needed to use the component from vga to avoid taking up my s video and dvi openings on ym video card and the television never picked up the signal. Instead if you have a component open for video just use the s video converter not from this item.
PIECE OF JUNK!!!!!. Does not consistently work! I have a toshiba a15 (Win XP Pro) and sometimes this works, but usually it doesn't. Lately, it either works perfectly or it gives me a blue screen error and restarts the computer. It used to have problems where i would restart the computer and it would say card not found, which forced me to reload the driver. But lately it's just been giving me a blue screen. I have used PCMCIA cards before and never once had any issues.D-Link needs to support their faulty product with a new driver! Bad customer service!I WILL NEVER BUY A D-LINK PRODUCT AGAIN!!
Broke within the first month. I decided on this item because I liked the idea of putting it in my cup holder and not having to worry about where to place my Sansa E250.  The MP3 player will sit nicely in the holder if you don't have a case on it, but I purchased the Speck ToughSkin which makes the player thicker.  Luckily you can pull off a cheap plastic template piece and still use it with a case, but it won't hold it very securely and it would pop off once in a while when I hit a big bump.  This thing worked great for a few weeks, great sound.  Then one day I tried to turn it on and it wouldn't power on.  I checked all the plugs, but it still wouldn't work.  I sent it back and am going to try the FM transmitter from Maximo.  I probably just got a dud, but they lost my trust
Car Adapter for GPS. Was sold to me as an accessory but wasn't needed because there was already one that came with the GPS.  Had to return it
Thumbs Down. The product could not be used with my rather standard setup ie MacOSX on Apple G5 with a Pioneer Burner. I was told by the vendor that I MIGHT get it to work by downloading software from the web. It turned out that the download was not a simple everyday variety but required a sophistication beyond my modest abilities. ( MY local Apple vendor and repair facility advised me not to use the download. They did not want to try it as well). The product vendor was reluctant to provide a refund. I might add that they dragged their feet for over about a two month period. Eventually they said they would provide a refund less a restocking fee. I put the issue in dispute with MC
Automatic turnoff is a real turnoff!. I purchased these headphones a couple of months ago even after reading the negative feedback.  I wish I would have listened.  The headphones really do automatically cut-off when the music stops or when the audio is at a low level such as a very quite scene in a movie.  There is also a constant low level hiss in the background.I know it is tempting to buy these because of the cheap price, but it really is worth it to spend a little more money on a higher quality set of wireless headphones
Compatibility Issues Galore. I previously attempted to use this device with my Mac Pro.  I run the machine with Windows XP and Mac OS X Tiger.With Tiger, the machine refuses to sleep when the hub is plugged into my Aluminum Cinema Display.  Simply unplug the D-Link hub, and the machine happily goes to sleep.With Windows XP, the machine does not recognize my Microsoft Ergo Keyboard 4000 until I disconnect the keyboard from the hub, then reconnect it.  Ironically, the keyboard works fine under OS X when connected to the D-Link Hub.I guess I got what I paid for.  A piece of junk 7 port hub for under $30.  I have reverted back to using my 2x4 Port "hockey puck" style Belkin USB 2.0 Hubs.  No problems with those
Unhappy buyer. I do not remember it's name, but the cable required to attach this printer to my computer WAS NOT included.  I had to spend an additional $10.00 for this cable.  I had bought this printer for my granddaughter, as I had bought the same printer for myself for the EXACT same amount, from Walmart, which DID INCLUDE THIS CABLE.  Makes for a poor buying experience caused by deceit.  Just an 'ole dog that keeps trying to learn all the new tricks
Bought a "recertified" E550 - Stopped Working Within Hours. I was very excited when I received this camera. I liked it very much, and thought I was getting a lot of camera for the money. Sure enough, the pictures looked great, very true color, nice to handle, Black & White setting. It was a little heavy and uses those XD cards, but overall I really liked it. Then, within about three hours of owning it - after less then ten pictures - something had gone awry. The zoom lens was stuck, it wouldn't move and an error message kept appearing. Then, the camera would shut off. That's when I referenced the manual and found out that it wasn't a fixable error. It had to be fixed by the manufacturer. I guess I know why I couldn't find a new one on-line, and why there were so many refurbished. I still really like Fuji cameras, but I wouldn't trust this model, especially a "recertified" one. I have since learned that I am not the only person who has found this out the hard way. Lucky, I was able to return mine for a refund.
Slide/negative scanning is poor. I've got quite a bit of experience with scanners, and was very happy with my slim Canon, but I wanted to scan negatives, so I picked up this item on a whim, thinking I could trust HP to make a decent scanner. That's the last time I'll make that assumption!I am using it with my iBook. I downloaded the most recent software from HPs website, which I recommend, since the software that ships with it is terrible.I am primarily interested in the negative scanning feature. I am disappointed. The scanner is slow, slow, slow, slow. Takes forever to warm up and scan. When it finally scans, the images end up either underexposed or overexposed, but never correctly exposed. I'll have the print in front of me, and it looks nothing like the version of the photo the scanner generated from the negative. I have tried tweaking various options, but to no avail. Besides, you shouldn't have to tweak a lot of options to get a decent exposure out of a negative that you know is correctly exposed.The Mac software is somewhat bloated and poorly designed. There are ELEVEN different applications installed where only one is required. iPhoto already does everything 99% of people need to do and comes pre-installed on every Mac. Why is HP trying to replace iPhoto? To make their product easy to use, they should do one thing: scan. Let iPhoto take care of the rest.I just tried to scan a photo while composing this post, and am sorry to report that the software is non-responsive and won't launch, either by double-clicking the application or by pressing the buttons on the front of the scanner. What a fiasco.I am going to try to install the scanner on my PC and see if the results are any better, but I am not optimistic, especially given the other reviews of this product.So, I am disappointed and am now considering spending considerably more money on a true film scanner.Bottom line: AVOID
no noise cancelling effect. These headphones have a dececent sound but genuinely no noice cancelling effect.  The battery powers the speakers a bit which does make them a littel louder, but nothing special.  As you see, the price is down to $22.00 which is probably a good price for these (unfortunatly, I bought them at $50.00 and had to return them
Canon  S530D Review. This printer prints fast but the quality is poor. Consumer reports rates it a best buy but I disagree. Pictures come out very graney and its almost worthless to have a 2 megapixel or higher camera because the quality will not be seen with this printer. I do not recommend this printer to anyone. I bought the Cannon to replace a Hewlett Packard deskjet 932C and it was slow but the picture quality was superior to the Cannon. This purchase was a real dissapointment
Bluetooth. I recently bought this product and it was not working on my printer and computer. I am not sure why, it is considered plug and play. I sold it on ebay recently
Wait for more information before buying. Works with my MacBook Pro 15" with powered devices but was very sad to find out that it does not work with my 2.5 inch firewire external drive which is powered off of the computer. There is a power input (no help in knowing how to work it) on the side of the device. Adding power from a USB port lit up the drive but would not spin it up. I don't know if it is a power issue or an interface issue with the firmware on my external drive. Belkin's site is useless as there is no support info, extremely limited info on the product, and they don't respond to email. I would have rated them even lower but I have to take responsibility for buying it right out of the chute
Don't waste Your time. The only possible attraction to this gizmo is the price.  With that said it is still over priced.  I purchased my Coby player from a local sporting goods store because I didn't want to pay a lot for a new mp3 player.  I just had a really good one that I spent maybe $49 dollars for, stolen.  And when I went to buy a new one they were priced around $80, $90 and up.I went with this cheapo item and paid about $36 hoping that if I lose it or get it stolen again it wouldn't be a big deal.  Now I'm begging someone, please take it.  I used it for a few days and did not like the difficult screen menus. You have to scroll with a toggle switch several times just to get to a menu that enables you to play music.  The toggling is not intuitive and you have to jar it several times before it actually moves once.  The view is less that an inch tall and so you really can't see what your playing.Long story short before anyone got a chance to steal this one it stopped working completely in a couple of weeks.  I just took it back to the store for a refund of my money.  It is well worth it to spend another 10 or 20 dollars and get a decent MP3 player
Stopped working 3 weeks after Christmas!. My daughter got this for Christmas and it stopped working three weeks later!  For the price, I expected it to work more than 3 weeks.  Plus I have a very disappointed 6 year old who doesn't have a CD player anymore
I bought 2 and had the same problem. I had the same problem as Sergey, except that the connection would work for a few minutes and then would shut itself off.  Very poor product, compared to the WRT54GS with the High Gain Antenna (that's what I'm going back to).  Don't waste your time or money on this surprisingly crappy product (strange, because Linksys products are usually pretty good)
Expect more from Sony. When you buy a name like Sony, you expect to get decent stuff.  This DVD Recorder failed miserably.  No S-Video inputs in the rear so you have to run S-Video to the front panel (which my 2 year old loved to unplug).  Nice editing features if you have the time.  Unit malfunctioned within a year and is currently in getting warranty work done (who knows if I will get it back).  I replaced it with a Lite-On DVD recorder (at less than half the price) and am very happy with it
a sloppy piece of junk. This is one of the best ways to add a major security hole in your network.  The MVP allows full filesystem list and read access to the entire computer running the media server.  There is no way to disable this "feature".   Also, the remote interferes with my Phillips television (most manufacturers test their IR scheme for interactions to prevent this sort of thing).  although it looks like it should, the mvp does not have any hardware display.  it also does not show song names from internet radio streams and requires streams to bounce through your computer.my experience with tech support was not good either
Didn't Work!. It crashed the first time while loading some data and never worked again. I had to send back. It has been a few weeks and I have not received a working one yet
This is the worst phone I've ever used. It was time to get a new cordless phone and I bought this because it was on sale, and featured hard number buttons -- I find it more difficult to dial phones with soft, squishy buttons. Bad decision. You can't hear anyone even with the volume set to maximum, the answering system is just as bad in terms of registering voices, and apparently no one can hear me. I plugged in my headset to the jack, and they can hear me, but I can't hear them. There is static everywhere -- you can't use it in range of fluorescent lights, TVs, computers, speakers, etc. In a small house with compact fluorescent bulbs everywhere, try that! This phone is worthless and if I can return it, I will
They would sound ok if they stayed in!. My first complaint out of the box with these headphones was the smell of the rubber.  They smelled like rotton meat!My main complaint is the fit of the ear buds themselves.  They do not fit properly in my ears and constantly fall out.  If I try to re-position them for fit, they hurt my ears.Sound-wise they do fine for the podcasts I listen to.Overall, avoid these like the plague
A real bummer. I'm a big mac user, usually love their products, but I gotta say . . . this mouse has turned out to be a disappointment. Two reasons:1. The right-click/left-click technology has never worked.2. The scroller just stopped working today . . . after owning it for only a matter of months. I can no longer stroll down, just up and side-to-side.I've just ordered a new mouse
Coby Portable DVD Player. When I first got the Portable Dvd player I charged the battery and when I inserted a dvd and after a few minutes it would freeze and skip certain parts of the movie. I tried to restart it and tried other dvds and it kept saying "Wrong Disc". So anyone who is looking to get this Portable dvd player I advice you not to becuase it will cause a lot of problems and its just going to be a waste of money
Poor Quality Control. Bought various capacity Lenmar AAs (2000MAH, 2400MAH, 2500MAH) and the only consistent thing about them is their inconsistent quality control.  Probably 10-15% are DOA and never will accept a charge despite using various chargers, including a Maha MHC808 which has a rejeuvenation and diagnostic function and shows them as nonfunctional.  Another 10-15% leak and fail prematurely, then the rest work OK, but just OK.  I've had better success with other brands
Not worth the money. Pictures taken in average light and inside are very poor.  May be ok for outside pictures. Software and ease of use are good.  You have to remove the screen cover to properly use it
Man if they send it I could rate it its been 9 weeeks already. Order-soon to be on an first come first serve order and they go fast
Poor Video and Audio. I purchased this product to share my DVI monitor and Logitech Bluetooth keyboard/mouse between my two main machines - the exact use promoted by the manufacturer.  I successfully patched the firmware to eliminate the incessant beeping, but am extremely disappointed with the DVI video at 1600 by 1200 (severe streaking and noise), and the audio is totally unuseable given the severe hum and noise.  BTW, I am using Belkin KVM cables.Don't even THINK about purchasing this unit
Buyer Beware. I wanted to like this product.I really wanted to like this product.But I am severely disappointed.When I purchased the iAudio this past summer, I quickly learned that my unit had problems.  When I moved an mp3 file onto the player, about 85% of the time there would be these weird skips and electronic noise associated with it.  Sometimes deleting and reinstalling the file helped.  Often it didn't.So I contacted their customer service, and updated the firmware as instructed.  The problem was still there.  So I returned it to Cowon, and they insisted that the player was fine.I sincerely doubt that random electronic noise is a feature, but once they say that there isn't a problem I don't know what else to do.  So they sent it back to me.  I've tried it out again, and the problems remain.On a lark tonight, I looked them up on the Better Business Bureau website.  Their rating is an F.  Go figure.I would not recommend this product
the worst device i've ever seen. if you can make it work or if you are lucky to get a non defective unit:it can only read 1 card at a timeneeds specific usb power requirements (needs the usb power be +5v and not +5vsb) else you will get "USB hub power exceeded errors" the worst part is that the mainboard i tested is +5v... and still didn't workthe cards inserted on the lower card slots have to be inserted upside downfrom time to time you can get the message usb device not recognized...contacted support... service there = average/not so good (support forum has several topics complaining about this product)couldn't get a replacement since 30 days tigerdirect warranty have expired, can't send the unit to ultra because currently I'm outside the US and as i stated customer service is not good.bottom linedon't buy this item
Doesn't Work. i got this and installed it.  it can't read cds or dvds.  it can't write cds.  it can only write dvds
Doesn't work with any of my four computers. It's bad enough that this doesn't even attempt to be compatible with the Mac, but we can't get it to work with our PC, either. There are NO instructions for getting it to work in the owner's manual and no help online either. It's nice and small, and records well, but no good to me if the file can't be put onto the computer.
Not Good. only a few channels worked and were fuzzy,sound never worked,remote worked once then never againcheap product dont buy i
Don't Waste Your Money!. These speakers, in one word, suck.  I made the mistake of buying them because they were so cheap.  I guess I forgot the old adage "You Get What You Pay For", didn't I?They worked "okay" when I first installed them.In a week, I got bad signals and the speakers didn't work properly.Worse purchase I've ever made!!Don't make the same mistake I did, please!  Spend the extra money and get quality speakers
Telezapper. Worked great for about a week, then i seemed to get an average of 12 telemarketing calls a da
5ml hahaha. 5 ml for $20. I would refuse to buy any printer that used this cartridge on principal. Die in a Fire, HP
2 months, then nothing. I loved these earbuds for the first two months. I raved to my friends. I bought pairs for several people at work. Then, about a month later, my boss came to me and told me one of the earbuds stopped producing sound. I thought it was because she was rough on them, but then quickly thereafter, my earbuds did the same thing... then another coworker had the same problem... all withing weeks of each other after purchasing them around the same time.I know they're cheap. I know they're comfortable, but seriously, you're going to spend three or four times the amount over the course of a year just replacing them, so you might as well buy something slightly more expensive and get more wear from them
15" Mac Book Pro. I was expecting at least a degree worth of difference, it did NOT help at all!Absolute waste of 50 dollars
very dissappointing. I was excited about this product from reading previous reviews. However, I did not find the product satisfactory. First off - it's very difficult to place the Ipod into the device. It requires the Ipod be placed in a rubberized sleeve and forced into a narrow slot. It is very difficult to properly connect it or remove it when done. The sound quality was much less than expected - it was distorted and grainy at higher volumes. The price is great - which is what attracted me. But if you want any quality at all you're going to have to pay more
Amazon sent the wrong product. Amazon sent me the 32F46 not-flat CRT TV.  They would not honor the price they advertised for the 32DF46.  I didn't want what they sent me.
Poor quality on all accounts. They may sound good and look good, but look somewhere else for earhuggers. Aside from being uncomfortable, they're unsteady and one-size-fits-all in two plastic wraps that easily come loose from your ears, as well as the  actual earbuds dropping from their holders. And apart from all of that, the  sound quality is horrific. You would be best doing a search again and  finding a new pair
Techman. I purchased this radio and charged it for two full days and got 10 minutes of listening pleasure. I called their 800 number to find out what was wrong. They indicated that I am supposed to charge it for 3 days (The booklet fails to mention how long to charge it yet has instructions in many different languages for your convenience). I did that, and enjoyed a full 75 minutes of play time.  This was far from their 4 hours estimated play time. I returned it to the reseller and got another figuring it was a fluke. Charged it in great anticipation, and got about 70 minutes of play time for 3 days of charging. I called the 800 number again. Eton offered to replace it, but I had to pay for the shipping. I didn't think that was fair and tried to return it to the local reseller after my 30 days from the original sale was up. Luckilly the reseller took the radio back and refunded my money. Two bad radios just a fluke? Maybe so. But why penalize the the customer and ask him to eat the cost of shipping to fix Eton's problem? Plus the design is such that the bottom of the radio is rounded and the unit cannot stand up on its own. Eton said it is meant to be left in the electrical outlet. During a "blackout", I'd want it to be portable and set it just about anywhere. Go figure.
Yes - worst product ever... I wish I read the reviews before I bought this thing, unfortunately.  Extremely user unfriendly to connect and disconnects itself often; kills batteries even in sleep mode.The size and precision is good when it does work, but definitely not worth the money.  I exchanged it for a new one thinking it was just the first unit, but still terrible
Terrible Sound. I've now returned two of these for the same problem - a terrible screeching sound.  The first unit did it constantly and the second did it intermitently, especially between songs.  One unit is a quality problem.  Two units is a design problem
Poor quality, poor service. I bought a sharp lcd tv from j& r in new york last Jan, after a year and half, when powering on the tv, sometimes works, sometimes not. after unplug in, wait for a while and plug back, worked for a couple months. Send it to service center to checkup, was told that the lcd control board needs to be replaced. when request to get back the replaced lcd control board, was told that sharp does not give back the replaced board, it has to be shipped back, otherwise, you have to pay additional fee to get back the replaced board.. it's rather strange to hear such a lousy policy from any vendor..But, if you do want to get a sharp, better get a long long warranty..
Avoid Westinghouse -- Not worth the savings. I purchased this Westinghouse 37" 1080p monitor (LVM-37W3) because I was very impressed with its ability to be used as both a high-res monitor for work but also an HDTV for play (with an Xbox 360). The product itself is pretty good--the picture is great, colors are wonderful.But if you have any kind of problem with this product, it is game over. Westinghouse Digital has no online support to speak of. I've sent numerous emails through their site and have received no responses over a month. I finally got in contact with a customer service agent through my extended warranty service and it turns out Westinghouse has NO LOCAL TECHNICIANS to even examine your machine. You have to ship it to them (at your cost) for them to examine, and they said it will take 6-8 weeks or more before they will get back to you. This policy is completely egregious--2 months time to fix a quickly depreciating machine and it costs the customer shipping??Do a little research and you will see all the customer service horror stories with this product after people have had it for a while.  Go with a real manufacturer with local repair technicians
Works great - for about 4 months. I bought this card based on its capability of range and speed.  When I first bought it, it lived up to its promise.  I got great range and speed out of the card.  I could go waaaaaaaaaaay across the yard and surf the internet at blazing speed with no problems. It could go through two floors, a few walls, concrete, etc. without any issues.  Like Superman.  Life was good.After a few months I noticed the card started to "hang".  I thought it had something to do with my p.o.s. laptop, so I would just reboot and live with it.  Another month goes by, and I notice that the card is not very stable.  It stops working after about 30 minutes, but it seems to work just great at Panera for unlimited time.  I once again chalk it up to my cheap computer.Now, after 4 months total, the card barely works anywhere.  It gets very hot when using it, and I am lucky to get 5 minutes out of it, at Panera or anywhere else.  I tried it in another computer, same problem.I wasted $[...], and now I am using a 3 year old slower Netgear card.  But guess what? It works.If you are wealthy, buy 10 of these cards and just throw them out as they fail (they work GREAT for about 2 months).  Otherwise, keep shopping
They Didnt Last for 3 Days. This product costs too much for being such poor quality, I can literally just pull the cord apart bare-handed without using barely any force at all. And after it's torn apart there is no hope of repairing it, no matter how much time, effort, and thought you put into it, it's impossible. I'm pretty sure that it's inability to be repaired is just a marketing ploy so you will buy another. The only good qualities these earphones have is their sound quality, and their comfort. The sound quality sounds a little better than the normal iPOD earphones and you can keep them in your ears for a very long time without your ears getting sore. But if you plan on using these while you're leading a busy, active life, I GUARANTEE that they wont last a week. I heard that these earphones are the best...I found out that they are indeed some of the worst...and sadly I found that out the hard way..
Wrong Protection Plan. Amazon recommends the $59 Apple Protection plan for the Ipod Shuffle --2nd Generation  ----  Be advised the Apple store offers a $39 2yr plan for just the Ipod Nano 2nd Gen and Ipod Shuffle 2nd Gen.  Both plans work great, If you have one of these two new machines save yourself $20
DVD operation is very poor. While the price for this HTS is very nice, the performance is substandard.  There's a hissing sound when the unit is off.  The DVD player has trouble playing DVDs.  I have a large DVD collection & most of them don't play.  The surround quality is also very poor. It's a stretch to call it surround sound when half of the speakers don't put out much sound.  In order to get this serviced, I have to send it out for up to 3 months.  I bought a progressive DVD player, put the audio through the Phillips HTS 3400 and the video to the TV and suddenly the picture was better and the sound was better.
Worst battery I have ever seen. Battery discharges only in 30 minutes of talking. I personally never recommend this item. Answering machine is good but battery is worst
Inability to fax multiple pages. If you like a machine pulling multiple pages through at one time and being forced to feed each page before it shuts off, then this is the machine for you
Connections are TOO TIGHT!  What happened to Monster quality control?. What has happened to Monster's quality?  In 2003-04, I had a discount on Monster cable through my employer and purchased close to $1000 (retail prices) worth of their cables for wiring up my home theater. I have been using the Gamelink with s-video for my PS2 and that works great. Here it is 3 years later and I buy these Gamelink 400 for use with my new HDTV with component inputs. When I tried to install them I thought I was going to snap the connections off my TV because of the amount of force I had to exert. With much determination I got them to connect. I switched on the PS2 and experienced no video just sound. I had even a harder time removing them. When comparing these cables to my older s-video Gamelinks the differences are the new wires are lighter, rigid and the connectors are definately too small in diameter.  In hand, they feel cheaper compared to the heavier more pliable older wires. I will no longer buy Monster cables and I do not recommend these to anyone. Audioquest is much better.  Too bad they don't make gaming cables
Design Defect Makes Unusable. I knew this cable was on the "economy" end of Monster's product line, but I expected it to nevertheless be a quality product due to the Monster name.  The cable simply doesn't work.  Because the terminals are not "split," they do not hold tight on the connections on the video component.  You put them on and they just slide off.  This was the case on both a new DVD player and a cable box, so it wasn't a question of the video component being out of spec.  Monster should pull this off the market and fix the design defect
Poor sound quality. I recently bought this radio, primarily for my car, but also got the home dock. It was easy to set up and install both types of kit. Unfortunately, the sound quality was very poor in both configurations. The FM modulator for the car was pretty close to hopeless. It only has maybe 10 channels. I found one that was free, luckily. But even with a clear channel, the sound had a terrible hiss, that went up and down in volume at apparent random even when everything was stationary. The occupied channels actually worked about as well (still lots of hiss)- except when the underlying channel broke through. Even disregarding the hiss, the sound quality on the music was not very good.I thought the problem was probably with the FM modulator, so I tried it in the home dock, connected to a *very good* home hi-fi system. The hiss was gone, but the sound quality was completely unacceptable. For whatever reason, this particular receiver doesn't like the compression artifacts very much. Satellite radio quality is, AT BEST, about like an average MP3, with highly compressed signals (some channels better than others). This receiver seemed to exacerbate the effect, and it sounded a lot like a tin can and string "telephone" most of the time. It was vert irritating very quickly.The form factor (about the size of a modern walkie-talkie) was fine, and pretty easy to fit in the car. It also seemed to be pretty solidly built. But all of that is completely moot if it doesn't work properly.I returned the receiver and both kits the next day.
Nuulooq, not so hot. I bought this item with great expectations but was disappointed enough to return it today.  One big caveat on performance however, I am running an older 800 single processor Mac G4, which, although I use it in a professional graphics capacity every day (Photoshop), is a bit pokey by todays standards. After downloading Tiger 10.4.6 which is required for the tooldail app. I got the thing going. This is what I found  1)  Evan after setting all the Tooldial prefs to the fastest speed I got slow and jerky navigation w/ the nav ring... Overshooting the area I wanted to see because of a delayed response.  Also, to pan upwards on the page requires reaching over the top of this 2 inch tall device to press (with a firm pressure), on the far side of the ring, which requires a repositioning of the entire hand.  Poor ergonomiics in my opinion, seems like they went for a sexy look/concept instead.  2) An Ipod type dialing motion is fine on an Ipod,  but on this device took many rapid circles on top of the tooldial to effect much change in Brush size etc. and seemed much less sensitive and intuitive than a rub strip on a music synthisizer or a waacom pressure pad.  3)  The trigger points funtion, but require surprisingly  heavy pressure to operate,  at least 6 to 7 times the pressure of a mouse click. This kind of treatment 8 Hours a day would send my aging wrists to the glue factory within a week....  There may be a device out there that will someday "revolutionize my workflow", but this isnt it, Back it goes...
Better players are out there. As a heavy gym user who has sweated several MP3 (and headphones) into the trash, I thought this was the answer. But after using it for several weeks, I hate the thing. My biggest gripes:1) The Sonic Stage program seems not to be able to find and import the vast majority of .wma format files that I have never had a problem using on my other players. The program seems like a shill to force you to use Sony's Connect Store. Cheaper MP3 players allow you to drag and drop files direct to the player, I don't want another program just for this device.2) The entire industrial design of the player depends on one small keyway on the back of the plastic case, which in my case was deformed after one week and would no longer hold the player in one position. Without the keyway, you have a round player that is free to spin in the round holder which make this impossible to use without tying up both hands.3) Even when the keyway was working, the controls are not easy to use when you are working out. The armband positions the player so that the rear of the twist knob digs into your arm and makes it hard to navigate the controls with one hand while running.It is almost like no one actually tried to use this while running in the design phase. This is a case of a cool looking industrial design that does not serve the market it was meant for, avoid this player!
Barely adequate. Good first attempt at the task. The second generation model, CTZ900 Telezapper II uses the THREE tones necessary to remove your number from all of the current computer lists
JVC Wireless Stereo headphones. What I don't like about these is the way you have to position them in the cradle to make sure they charge.  I bought these for my elderly father and he's having a hard time positioning them correctly - and if they're not positioned correctly they won't charge
GE 7-5300B Spacemaker CD/Radio IS JUNK. I rate this "0". I bought the GE 75300 CD/Radio to replace an older model GE 74290A. The CD player crapped out on the older model. I have a GE kitchen and was some what happy with the older model. The GE 75300 is difficult to adjust the volume, the CD player skipped at the slightest disturbance in the room and I was totally not happy with its performance or sound quality. DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY. THERE ARE BETTER PRODUCTS OUT. The only good point with the GE Spacemaker Under Cabinet Mount CD/Radio is the "light". I will mount the GE 75300 in the garage and use it as a night-light.I replaced the GE75300 with a Sony FM/AM CD Kitchen Clock Radio IFC-CD523. The Sony sounds awesome (IT ROCKS), does not skip even with the volume all the way up, is easy to operate, can easily turn volume up and down, can turn Bass on and off (I could never find a way to turn the Bass off on the GE). The Sony has no light, but I can live without the extra light. I will NEVER buy another GE CD/Radio for the kitchen.
Faulty Unit & Software. After just 6 months of minimal use, the camera lost its green reception, so now there's a only purplish red and blue image. Tech support says send it in for a repair (shipping paid by me), though I don't think it's worth it. Also the software/driver conflicts with my Creative Zen mp3 player, and caused problems with start-up. I don't recommend it
Die, Mute button, die. This phone is not all smiles and laughing and gumdrops:  the mute button makes me crazy.  Oh, the phone is all "la la la I love its range and clarity," as other users report, but my face hits the Mute button as I talk.  Unaware that my calls are muted, conversations break down into two kids with crappy walkie-talkies:  "Hello?  Hey, you there?  Hello?!"I don't suffer from Fat Face, nor am I mashing the handset to my cheek.  The phone is otherwise excellent.But I'm going to destroy mine
Gone are the days of solid HP printers. I have owned the printer for one year.  The only reason I gave the printer two stars was because when it prints (only reliably printing via USB) the pictures are beautiful.  The copy, scan, and fax features work.  I have not used the duplex.If you want to print via a network, then almost all print jobs will sponsor an error message, "This document failed to print."  A single print job may eventually print out with multiple error messages and printing line by line with many pauses during the printing process.  I usually cancel the print job, drag the USB cable to the PC I want to print from and restart the print job.When first purchased, I made multiple calls resulting in many hours on the phone with technical support.  Mostly they suggested that I reinstall the HP software. The last call asked I reinstall Windows which I was unwilling to do.  A few months ago, I did however purchase a new HPdv9000t notebook and freshly installed the HP pinter software on it, which did not work.  (Love the notebook by the way.)  Regular and escalated/next tier support was offshore.  Each person tried hard, but was unable to support beyond reading from a script, having little real technical knowledge.Gone are the days of the solid HP printer product
Well constructed, Very Low Volume!!. This is a very well constructed cable, and is probably one of the best mini-to-RCA Y cables.  However, I have found the sound from the iPod to the receiver/amplifier to be VERY low; much much lower than the signal from a CD player (1/5 of the CD output loudness).  This forces you to turn the sound level way up, both on the iPod and on the receiver/amplifier, consuming lots of battery power on the iPod.  If you have a low power receiver/amplifier, you may not be able to play it loud enough.  The sound quality is adequate, but not great, as one can expect for this type of Y cable, regardless of build quality.  I also purched the NYCO iPod Stereo Link for comparison, and the sound quality is much better with a much louder output volume (3x louder than the Monster mini-to-RCA cable).  The NYCO is also more power efficient as it drains much less power from the iPod.  It does not go through the mini-jack, and also bypasses the volume control (a good sign if you care about sound quality).If you don't need to recharge your iPod while you play though the cable to a receiver/amplifier, I would definitely go with the NYCO Stereo Link Cable.  I am an audiophile enthusiast, with quite a bit of experience in high-end audio
On my 3rd cable in 20 momths!. Warning: Stay away from this Terk SIR-EXT50 extension cable, I've had to purchase 3, thats right 3 cables in 20 months.After the 1st died (9 months) I brought it back to Best Buy for an exchange. Was told I must exchange with Terk. Returned to Terk by certified mail, never received response or exchange Terk does not back this product up. Went to Best Buy & purchesed another, died yesterday after only 10 months of use. Now I'm on my way to Radio Shack to try out the MONSTER sirius 50ft Extension Cable. Wish ME Luck
Erroneous description. I found this paper on Amazon as an accessory to the Olympus Camedia P-400 Printer.  This paper does NOT fit the P-400 because this paper is TOO wide.  Thus, with the P-400, this paper is useless
Amazon rip off. Don't buy this product from Amazon.  I bought this product because I thought I was going to receive ten blank vhs tapes instead I received one.  The picture that they have is very deceptive.  It clearly showed 10.
OMX70 a big disappointment. I have used Shure, Sony, Ultimate Ears, etc. over the years and these are properly one of the worst fitting ear buds I have ever used.  No matter how I tried, I just can't get them to fit right, let alone use them for when I work out.  I am a big Sennheiser fan but this was a big disappointment
The worst power inverter I've seen yet. First off, this thing was almost too long to fit between the "lighter" and other parts of the vehicle.  I bought this to power my laptop on a trip, and it worked fine on the way out.  On the way back though, the power kept cutting out randomly as said in another review.  When I unplugged to, it fell apart.  For the rest of the trip it kept falling apart, and eventually I lost the internal spring and couldn't re-assemble it.  It was the worst thing I have ever bough
Just a comment about the different circuits. This is not technically a review, although based on what I've read I do plan on buying one of these.  However, I found something on smarthome.com which will inter-connect the two main circuits that most houses have, thus allowing devices like this (and X10) work from any outlet to any other.  This is not yet tested by me, but is at least promising.Device is here:http://www.smarthome.com/4816b2.htmlExplanation is here:http://www.smarthome.com/images/4816dgm_big.jp
Poorly designed. I bought this case for a few reasons: I wanted something that fully protected my iPod from scratches; I wanted something that would not interfere with the aesthetics of the iPod; and I wanted a case that was fast and easy to get the iPod into and out of. The Dioshield performs fantastically on all three counts.Nonetheless, the case only rates 2 stars, as there are some significant design flaws. Before I discuss these flaws, however, I should mention that the hold button problem that others have mentioned in their reviews appears to have been resolved. My case arrived a few days ago, and the cut out for the hold button was more than large enough to allow free and easy access. If I want to, I can use my thumb to engage or disengage the hold switch while the iPod is in the case. However, this does bring us to the first of the aforementioned design flaws: the cut-out hole for the headphones. It is, admittedly, the perfect size for the jack on the Apple ear-bud headphones. However, I have Shure E2C's, which have a slightly wider jack, and they were not able to fit through the Dioshield's headphone cut-out. So if you have after-market headphones, especially ones with a 90 degree angled jack, or one that is particularly thick, you may run into compatibility issues. More alarming, the jack on my AV cord wouldn't fit into the headphone cut-out on the Dioshield, either, meaning that I'd need to take the iPod out of it's case if I wanted to watch a show on my television. I managed to work-around this problem by enlarging the hole with a Dremel, but still... it is annoying, and if you don't have a Dremel, or are reluctant to take it to your new case, then you might be s.o.l. when it comes to AV cables or better quality headphones.Okay, onto the second design flaw. I'm just going to quote a fellow reviewer, H. Park, who articulated this problem most succinctly and clearly: "The bottom of the case leaves a hole for the sync/charge cable. However, because of the proximity of the hinges, it's almost impossible to use the Apple-provided USB sync cable, since this cable is the locking variety with the unlock buttons on the sides of the cable plug. Once the sync cable is inserted and the lock engaged, a narrow object like a knife blade or ruler is required to disengage the cable."  This is super-annoying and a puzzling oversight. Why even have the hole there? It's like some kind of cruel joke, reminding us of what we could almost have if only we had bought a different case.Finally, and this is just a matter of personal taste, and not design, that whole lanyard thing just seems stupid. The iPod with Video is simply not comfortable to wear around your neck for any period of time, plus it bounces around everytime you walk. It is really annoying. I ended up cutting mine off and throwing it away. No one is going to use it that way, and I'm betting that even a modicum of market research would have revealed that. But that's just me. However, I stand by the first two criticisms I made - those are substantial design flaws that make an otherwise excellent product into a merely mediocre one. Yes, you can use better headphones if you take a Dremel to the case, and yes, you can charge the iPod if you take it out of the case, but the whole point is, you shouldn't have to do either of those things, and a case that requires you to do so is substandard.I doubt I'm going to replace this case with anything else. I have it now, and while I'm not overwhelmed by it, I can go so far as to say that I am whelmed by it. It does what it's supposed to, and I can cope with it's deficits, but I would not buy it again nor can I recommend it all that strongly. Two starts
Short on features. The Britannica Concise also comes in a downloadable version which if you have a good size sd card it would prove more convenient than whipping out an extra card dedicated only to the Britannica.I have both the Columbia down loadable Encyclopedia and this B.E. All around I much prefer the Columbia. It is much easier to navigate, it has plenty of options (the B.E. downloadable only has four/ beam,delete,fonts, and resolution) and is much funner to use. The only advantage this Britannica has over the Columbia is over all it has a few more entries...but not always more detailed.The B.E. claims to be 2006 but looking up "Israel' for example it stopped at the end of 2000 after Israeli troops abruptly withdrew from Lebanon. The Columbia on the other hand went up to the Israeli conflict with Hezbollah in July 2006. The newest article I could find on the Britannica was 2005
Poor picture quality!. It is almost impossible to get a clear picture on any channel and the sound quality is poor.  Buying this handheld was a big mistake
Doesn't Cut It. I bought the product with the intention of printing from across my house.  The room I'm printing from and the room with the printer aren't separated by any walls, so there shouldn't be a problem.  Checked the manuals and it said there was a range of 30m.  Took the measurement and found it to be only 50 feet, about half the distance that was advertised.  I reconfigured their positions, and still nothing would work.  The printer didn't have a problem as it's brand new and ideally should work, but nothing good has come.  I resorted to the old fashion USB way.  Another miss by HP
What a piece of junk. I have many cameras, network and otherwise, PTZ and fixed, and this is by far the worst one.  It has difficulty focusing, it's noisy, doesn't hold presets well, and the image appears to start "melting" every few seconds, then snaps back to clear.  The wireless connection is pretty reliable, but that's about all I can count on.  The API support for this thing is nil, along with the options they give you.  Tech support is usually no help at all.  I just purchased an Axis 213 PTZ, and it completely blows this thing out of the water.  No more DLink for me
Poor quality and the worst customer service. Had the printer for just over a year with light use.  I started getting numerous error messages, then the printer would stop printing in the middle of a page or I couldn't get it to print at all.  Spent over two hours in a hp chat session that made little sense - (was told to push buttons my printer doesn't have, and when I told the rep that nothing happened after a procedure to re-set the printer, she replied "great, that means it worked.")  Was then offered the option of getting the printer serviced for $290, the same price I paid for it a year ago, or upgrading to a C6180 for $300, which is $20 more than the current price on Amazon.  This product has been a waste of time, money and energy
There are better options that cost less. I'm sorry to say that this product failed to meet my expectations.ProsTight connection to laptopCons-Too easy to accidentally change the combination which makes it difficult to set the combo and remove the lock.-This product is built to fit on the right side of a laptop.  If you're laptop is like mine where the plug is on the left side, you have to turn the laptop around in order to unlock it (unless you don't mind doing it backwards)
One fan made a scraping noise. You're money is better spent on another product.It's made out of plastic so it feels cheaply made.  A nice thing about the product is that the fans are incredibly quiet, damn near silent, if it isn't damaged.  I had one fan made a scraping noise.The fans are designed to draw the heat from the laptop, but I've found that these coolers are less effective than the laptop coolers that blow cool air in.
Slightly disappointed. It doesn't play well with my stereo system. It is either too amplified or too low for the switch options under the turntable.  Other than that, it seems to be a nice turntable and seems to work fine
1 shortcoming only. Cons:Defect: the backlight does not work.Shortcoming: has Palm OS 3.1, an early version for Handspring Visors.Neutral:(expedited) Shipping time: 5 daysPros:PricePS: Vendor customer support contacted me and provided a replacement unit with a working backlight, free of additional charge :)
CHEAP. I got this with the cd player and they broke after two weeks.  They just aren't durable.  Make an investment and buy good headphones that don't break
The worst DVDs I have tried so far. I have used three other brands of 16x DVD-Rs and none of them have been problematic with my new (Tivo) dvd burner. This is the first brand that just hasn't worked. These discs were a waste of time shopping for, they were a waste of time dealing with failed burns, and they were a waste of money. I am not even going to attempt to sell the unopened package in the Amazon marketplace since it wouldn't be fair to other buyers. For your information, I have had no problem with Sony, Fuji, and Verbatim
Incompatibity issues. I bought this machine to replace a Sportrak made by the same company 2 years ago. I liked the features of the unit itself: larger screen, much brighter, better battery. It's main problem is that it is not compatible with a large library of software maps (Mapsend) made by the same company that I had purchased for the Sportrak. There was no bridging software to make the images compatible. You are basically forced to buy the same maps again at a higher price. That seemed unfair to me so I returned it
Two Failures and Zero Response from Sandisk. I had a 1GB Titanium Sandisk Cruzer at work fail.  I tried several times to contact Sandisk, including through the selling vendor with absolutely no response.My wife's Cruzer just failed as well (the power light comes on, it is recognized by XP, and the light goes out, the system can't ID the device, so it's useless.  It does the same thing on all of the XP systems in our house).  I've tried front side USB connections, rear connections and hub connections.  No dice.I'll never buy another Sandisk Cruzer.  And I was going to order another 100 for the office.  Their loss
Horrible sound. These earbuds are great for the retractibility feature. It works quite well. But that's IT! They have probably the worst sound I've ever heard from any earbud style headphones, and I've tried quite a few.Don't bother
Waste of money. The range on this product is no where near what was advertised.  I purchased (2) units and neither will work consistently beyond 4-5 feet from mac.  Attempted to improve operation by relocating mac, using USB extension cable, and changing ID on transmitter with no improvement.  Extremely disappointed
It crushed so often on Vista. The drivers can't be installed. Very unstable on Vista
TomTom doesn't provide much customer support. I bought the original Tom Tom Go back in November 2004.  Since then, my attempts to reach their customer service have all met in failure.  My last attempt, 10 days ago, was an effort to buy updated maps for my product.  Yes, their website will offer to sell you maps, but there is no way to determine the date of the maps you already own, and no way to determine the date of the maps that you would be purchasing, in some cases for a large sum of money.  If you try to find a telephone number on their site that you can call, you will be disappointed.  I am disappointed and would advise you to look elsewhere if you want a product that is supported
NO SUPPORT. Let's be honest.This product ain't cheap. It's not something you can just throw away if it decides to stop working.I bought mine at cpenusa.com. Delivery was great, only took them a couple of days. However, my c-pen cable was damaged. The connector to the c-pen was, for some reason, cut in half. Without it, you can't recharge or connect the c-pen to the pc.I called their main office all the way in Sweden during the office hours. NO RESPONSE. I sent three e-mails to cpenusa. NO RESPONSE.I don't care if the product itself is great(I'll never know now, will I..). If you're unable to receive support when you need 'em, you're screwed.If you're just interested in electronic equipments, just want to try things out and don't really care if you're on your own, go ahead and try it. Let me know how this thing really is. Otherwise, buy a product that you can trust on with respect to after-sales support
Uncomfortable but it does work. Bought these to use with the XM Myfi. They are not comfortable to use. They put pressure on your ears. Now the good news, they do get decent reception, I tried them in my office in NYC which has a northern exposure and it got good reception
Terrible. Go for the Wireless Laser Mouse 5000 instead. Terrible ergonomics ... thumb button that's too far forward, and a "pinky" button (or thumb for a leftie) that is unusable. NO tilt-scrolling! That's right, no 4-way scroll wheel. It has the same shape as the Comfort Mouse 3000, which I like ... so for $20 or more less, get the Comfort Mouse 3000.Trust me ... search for the Wireless Laser Mouse 5000. Nice shape, also for left- and right-handed users, 4-way scrolling, same high resolution laser technology, same sleek black look, and larger, better placed side buttons.Microsoft missed the mark with this loser. Don't even bother with it. If I could give it ZERO stars, I would - simply because Microsoft offers better wired mouses for less, and better wireless mouses for the same price.
Compatabilty Problems. I just bought a 25 pack of these along with my new liteon dvd burner.  To bad only half of the cd players in my house can even read them.  I dont' think its the lightscribe side thats causing the problem as it doesn't seem to matter if I "lightscribe" them or not.The burner works fine with all of the other media I've tried so I'd avoid these discs like the plague
Don't bother using the software that comes with this kit. The main reason I bought this kit was for the label applicator, the software was secondary. Good thing that I didn't care about how good the software would be, because the software for this is, in a word, deplorable.It doesn't have support for ANY other label sheets other than the memorex brand, which leaves you stuck with their labels. Its got some nice features in the software, but their poorly implemented. For instance, it can automatically resize an image to fit a CD/DVD, but if you've rotated it before that, the rotation is lost. It has a lot of minor quirks like that, and they add up to an annoyance to use this.If you get this product, find a better labelling program to go with the label sheets and the applicator
Useless with a Tivo. The unit was 20ft from the receiver, in the same room, in direct view of eachother...Tivo wouldn't connect
Worthless Unit. I went with this unit based on the Magellan name but have been very disappointed. The Magellan name doesn't mean what I tought it did. It worked fine for a week, then became very sporadic at holding a signal. Tech support had me ship the unit back for repair, and it was returned two weeks later with the same problem. That led to more calls to tech support with long waits on hold only to be told I had to ship the unit back again for repair. I'm hold again now as I write this. Bottom line is that I've owned this unit for nearly two months and have gotten maybe 8 hours of use out it. Save your money. Buy another brand. Or just get a map.
not worth it. The Styra is only OK as a replacement stylus.  It's not as nicely finished as the original T|X stylus -- it's a dull, textured finish instead of the shiny -- and it doesn't have the nice heft of the original.  The soft working end isn't as soft, either.  The pen seems fine, and is the only reason to tolerate the thing.  If it cost half as much I'd be less negative, but it's too expensive for what it is
hum noise. it makes a low humming noise.  if you listen loud enough, you won't hear it, but at low volume it's annoying.  also, when it is "off", then you still hear the hum
BAD firmware and BAD firmware upgrades. In the past, I have good impressions of DLink products with the combination of features and price, but this particular Router is one to stay away from.  Dlink should have tested the product much more extensively before releasing it.The original firmware (Jan 2005) is full of bugs, and two attempts at v1.2 upgrades made the router unusable.  DLink support attempted to be helpful, but it seems that they are not aware of the problems with this particular router, and the responses I received were not helpful at all.  After going through two routers, I returned them to the store and bought an Airlink SuperG AR420W at half the price (on sale), and worked flawlessly the first time around.I like the feature set and the web GUI is pleasant, but the bugs are too severe and make the product unusable:1. DNS doesn't work after a short period of time   2. Incorrect  listing of DHCP clients  3. Upgrade of firmware cause the web application on the router to "die"
dont waste your money. Grossly over-priced and useless - Sony's $10 headphones sounded just as good.  The headphone fit in the ear s uncomfortable at best
not all that. It's ok at best.  The ugly white cord and white antenna make for a real eye soar, I can't see how it would look good anywhere except your kitchen
APC 350ES - Very poor UPS. I had the same experience as the reviewer on 11/17/2005.  I tested the UPS by shutting off the power at the breaker.  Within a minute, the UPS software shut down the computer (I had set for 4 minutes, so obviously the battery wasn't going to hold up long.  Only load was computer, monitor, and router).  At any rate, the shut down was successful.  But upon power-up, about 30 seconds into the reboot, the UPS beeped and cut power to the battery-backup outlets, which killed the computer mid-bootup and killed the router for a second or so.Absolutely worthless, as the whole reason I wanted the UPS was to prevent shutdowns during the occasional 2 minute power blips I have here
Short Life. I bought this thing because I lost a memory mod to a power surge.  It worked fine at first but now it has no battery life.  Recently the power went out and my computer shut off immediately - like it was not on a backup at all.  Of course the alarm was still screaming but so what - my computer was already shut off without any warning.  I had this thing for two years but I will be going with a different brand next time
Bad quality and bad service. I bought this drive a little over one year ago and with 2 years warranty. Around 8 months period, the system cannot boot from the drive and the test software provided by WD also proved it's dead. So I mailed it back for a replacement, and (surprisingly) I got back a re-certified one with only 3 months warranty. Literally, my warranty plan was cut to 1 year. I didn't bother to call them to get a new replacement. Unfortunately, another 2 months after the warranty expires (from the re-cerified one), the disk went dead again.I would not recommend this model to anyone, since within 1 year, 2 went bad. Also, I don't like the way they handle the replacement within warranty period.
Material OK but the software is terrible. These labels are of good quality and the print on them is OK.But the program that comes with the package is horrible.  It is antiquated, inflexible, and downright poorly designed.  You have to view the page sideways, there is no align feature ... the list goes on and on.If you want to use these inserts, be prepared to use a program like power point and spend the time to measure the paper to align it on the page yourself.  The software that comes with this package sure isnt going to do the job right
Awful. The fan is so weak, it makes the product useless. It may be able to cool a small flea. Perhaps an ant. Maybe a centimenter of human skin. Don't waste your money
Gets the job done...technically. It's a battery charger; it charges batteries.  It's called 'compact' because the bottom part accordians out to reveal 4 additional slots for batteries.  It feels cheaply made, and doesn't hold the batteries very securely.  Also, you have to charge two batteries at a time (or sets of 2), and they are inserted in opposite directions.  So, if you're charging 4 batteries in 2 sets of two, they would be + - + -.  I realize that's how most devices are set up when you insert the batteries, but I shouldn't have to worry about that when inserting into a charger, especially since (according most warning labels on batteries) inserting it in the charger backwards may cause an explosion resulting in injury or death.  That's a lot of pressure for someone who just wants more juice for his Gameboy.Ultimately, it does what it says though.  So, if you're looking for a charger to use until you find a real charger, go for it.
When it worked. The Micro has some excellent features at the right price. But it fails to work all the time. First it was the firmware, then it wouldn't connect to my PC, now the hardware has failed. I am going to buy an I Pod, despite Apple's refusal to allow other forms of mp3 downloads.
Hasn't worked for a while. Briefly, I have four stations and they never really worked right, I presume because of the need to be on the same circuit. I want to replace them now but I'm not sure I'd buy this brand again.
Very Basic, a map has more information. This is a waste of money. Garmin wants you to spend up to $100.00 for a map that will give you any information. If you need a basic map, save your money, stop at a rest area and get a free one
probably the worst armband ever for the nano. i dont know what moron created this but it makes no sense.  you cannot see the screen of your nano.  i thought this thing was made for the nano as well as the shuffle but apparently it isnt.  im sure the rest of it is fine it just sucks you cant see what the hell you are playing or doing if you have a nano
Happy I got it 98% off!. unimpressive...glad I didn't pay the full $949.00 List Pric
A complete disaster. I could use this product as the DVI plug did not fit on the DVI outlet of my computer.AVOID!!
OK. This privacy filter is great for an airplane like 3M advertises, but when I'm at home and my laptop is on my desk the person standing behind me can see the screen just as well as I can.  I think it is a bit pricy too.  If this piece of plastic was around 15 dollars, I'd suggest buying it
Defective-Returned. I was initially pleased with the phone, except that the caller ID is not backlit so hard to read.  Then I discovered that if a call was answered on another phone in the house, the person picking up this phone to join the conversation could not be heard.  Did troubleshooting with Panasonic customer service and they determined phone was defective.  Returned to Amazon for refund - chose a different phone
Unreliable - Requires frequent reboots. After just one week of use and installing the newest firmware, this router began showing sickly signs requiring a daily reboot. By week two it began needing to be rebooted every 15 minutes. This now seems typical of previous experiences I have had with other Netgear products.  So much for plug and play.My recommmendation: leave Netgear to the passive routers and use another brand for firewalls and DHCP serving
No workie. Unit apparently does not work with older magnavox VHS.  Wasted my money
Hidden Ink Cost  -- very deceptive. This printer only printed about 10 DVDs and ran out of ink.  The replacement ink cartridges cost more than the printer.  I called Epson on two different numbers to try to get the facts about the ink quantity in cartridges and no one seems to know the answer.  They gave me a third telephone number which is not an 800 number and it doesn't work.  The qualtiy of printing on DVDs is very good but the printer does not function well and has to be restarted at the beginning of each print job.  This is a very time consuming process.  I could live with this but the ink cost is too high (about $120.00) for a printer that is available for about $60.00
Only Works Half the Time. Very frustrating experience and I am returning to Amazon (their return policy is the good news).  After a lengthy set up process I thought I had the thing running, BUT 1) to switch from linksys to computer speakers (or my hardwired system) you always have to exit out of Media Player and restart it (despite the lynksys software telling you you're disconnected), 2)to get back to the Linksys I find you always have to restart Lynksys as well as Media Player, and then it only works a quarter of the time, 3)Rebooting the computer works sometimes to get it hooked up and other times after multiple reboots of everything I just give up and listen to the note book speakers.  This might seem OK if I could just leave it connected but it's wouldn't be because 5) the thing starts acting up and dropping out the music whenever I leave it running for more than an hour or so, I have no idea why.In short a great idea, but until it works it's useless, I suspect most problems are software related.  I am running a Centrino computer with Windows XP SP 2 on a Wireless G network where internet and print server work just fine.  Note that the Lynksis does not support Mac at all
Junk - Horrible support. I got the 650 coz it was an ATI card and I have built my last 3 systems with ATI cards.  This card is not ready for prime time.  I could not get this POS to work with my SapphireTech x1600 Pro HDMI card.  I did a clean install of MCE 2005, downloaded all the latest drivers and even bought the 'required' amplified antenna.HDTV - signal through MCE showed 4-5 bars yet "TV signal could not be found" error message, tried with Catalyst MC and got nothing but macroblocking.  ATI's support suggested that I had 1. overscan issue, 2. BIOS issues and 3. finally suggested that I try a 3rd party software vendor.  Well, I'll try a 3rd party hardware vendor until ATI figures out their issues.I build PCs as a hobby and have never had such headaches as I did with the 650.  ATI pulled these cards for a reason and re-released them with the requirement of an amplified antenna (look to spend an extra $75).  Support slow and inept.Look elsewhere unless you feel like spending the extra money for an amplified antenna and paying for someone to come out and sort through ATIs driver issues
do not buy these... well, what i said above pretty much sums it up. Do not buy these. I got these before the summer of 2006, im going to say around may. They stopped working by november. I didn't even wear them around... I used them with my computer, and my DVD player when my roomate was sleeping. POS, and a waste of money. they look nice, but that is all. do not use you money on these. Skullcandy should be ashamed of themselves for producing such a piece of garbage
DO NOT PURCHASE FOR ITS XVID/DIVX SUPPORT. The feature that originally sold me on the DSM-320 was its support for the XviD and DivX formats.  These, however, are the two formats that are supported the least, and a slow, jerky, framerate should be expected.  I at first thought it was a bandwidth issue, and proceeded to hard wire it to my computer using a crossover cable, the framerate improved, but not enough, in my opinion, for this device to even claim support for these file types.  If support for these two formats are the selling feature for you, be warned, you should look elsewhere
your mileage may vary. I bought this TV base on its positive reviews.  And I was pretty satisfy with its performance.  Both picture quality and viewing angle are comparable to much higher price units.  Unfortunately my TV died within two months.  The unit won't power on and I'm force to deal with olevia support.  Olevia say they will ship out a power unit to me and then I have to call back to schedule a tech to install it.  It's been 3 weeks and I still don't have the part.  And get this, I live within 10 miles of Olevia's warehouse! Olevia support's hold time is at least 20 minuts each time you call.  I say buying a olevia is more of a roll of the dice.  If you get a working one then you're fine. However, if anything goes wrong with it, then be prepare to be without your TV for a long time
Do not order from Ritz Camera - wrong item. Do not order this item and expect to get what you see.  I ordered the Super High Speed card (RPSDH01GU1A) and what I got was a low quality High Speed card (RPSDK01GU1A).  Seems to be some kind of a scam that Ritz is running with Amazon's blessing.  Buyer beware.  This has happened to me before when you order from one of Amazon's partners, and Amazon will do nothing to help you
Buyer Beware. Don't buy this product.  It has been nothing but trouble.  It will reinstall it's driver every time you reboot, which will cause conflicts (you will be like WTF).  Also, the hardware will only work when connected to the USB port you originally used the installation disk with.  I hate this piece of junk and will replace it ASAP.Perhaps there is something I am ignorant of in terms of networking, but I don't expect to have an MSCE to use a simple NIC.  This product is flaky at best
Network Connection Defective. This printer works fine as a USB printer, but it does not connect to a network. HP will not replace, says it must be something wrong with my network. Nevermind the 2 other printers, 2 Macs, and 3 WinXP computers connected to it.No more HP for me
Crappy Tuner. I`m very Dissapointed with this boombox. The FM tuner has too much interference The FM is fine if you listen to a strong station but If you tune to a weaker station and your close to a downtown area you will hear 4 or 5 strong stations bleeding through the weaker ones. I`ve tried ajusting the coils but this model has no ajustments for FM only AM the AM has bleed too so if you try to pick up distant stations at night you may hear the strong station next to it. For example I live in Atlanta GA so the strongest AM signal is 750 WSB so if I try to tune into 780 WBBM at night I get 750 bleeding through I have had other Panasonic boomboxes that don`t have this trouble with AM. So If you listen to the radio like I do please check it out you`ll see what I mean. I hope Panasonic will correct this on future model
delivery of the product. We did not have all the mounting screws-- hardware in the delivered box.I had to call the manufacture who responded right away and mailed us missing parts but they were not correct and complete.Very frustrating!!!!!
Non-functional. In reading the reviews I can only surmise that I received a lemon.  I bought the device because it looked exactly like a device I had purchased for work for over $30 more which was very effective.  The best I could achieve with this device was 33% operation.  Either the mouse positioner worked or the slide advance wheel, I never got the mouse buttons to work.  I tried it on 3 different computers and followed the instructions about changing channels, all to no avail. I took it to work and when it failed alongside it's more costly look-alike I sent it back
Poor sound, no charge. I bought the Tomtom GO710 purely for the handsfree functionality (which is pretty bad) and the iPod control. I viewed the navigation part as a bonus. An iPod control box from Pioneer and a bluetooth handsfree solution from Sony Ericsson would have cost me about half not including installation. Things were looking good until I plugged in the iPod. It sounds like an old turntable with a dusty record. I thought there had to be something wrong so I contacted Tomtom. They said it had to be my windshield mount. They sent me a new one. No help there. Then they wanted it sent in for service. I did. It took 5 weeks. No help there either. I am thinking it is a software fault in the operating system, or the CPU in the unit is just not up to the job. Now for the second big let down. It doesn't charge the iPod!!!!! So in winter, if you forget to bring your iPod in from the car, it'll be out of juice in a very short time
Don't waste your money. I bought this at a department store and that should have been my first clue that it would not be the greatest in quality. I should have just gone to a store that only sells electronics, but now I am stuck with this piece of junk. Don't do what I did!! The radio NEVER picks up any of the stations I used to get on my other radio, which I am now having to use again. My cds constantly skipped, and forget about playing a burned cd, that will never happen. It's just junk, that's all. Don't waste your time or energy.
Defective product. I ordered this product and put it in my Nikon D200.  The product was improperly manufactured, and caused the pins in my camera to bend, rendering it inoperable.  I had no idea what the cause was, and went to my camera store, and ended up damaging one of their cameras as well.We took a quick look at the card, and the holes were obviously improperly aligned.  The damage to the cameras was repairable, and the replacement card I received worked ok, but this is really not an acceptable situation for such an expensive piece of equipment
Good router if you don't play online games. Don't get this router if you plan to play online games like "World of Warcraft" for example. You'll get frequent disconnection for no reason. Otherwise, the router is great for anything else (downloading large files, browsing, checking e-mail, etc) other than gaming. Gamers, stay away from this router
Misleading Description. My first and main complaint about this product is that it does NOT fit the 60gb iPod Video.  The 60gb model is thicker than the 30gb, and this case won't close around the 60gb iPod.  A secondary complaint is that, though the case is sturdy and the foam lining will adequately protect a 30gb iPod from shocks, there is no protection for the screen.  It's just a hole in the case (like the hole for using the wheel), and I just require more protection for my video iPod.  A third (minor) complaint is that there's a non-removable knob on the back of the case, for attaching the belt clip, and the knob makes it uncomfortable in a shirt or pants pocket.  I'm returning mine for all of these reasons and going with a clear hard plastic case that protects the screen, too
Very Very Unhappy. My daughter bought this for me so I could see my grand children who live in other states.  I have spent 6 days and almost $450 trying to get it to work. I even hired a computer repairman who charged me $184 and could not get it working.  If it was not a gift I would send it back to get my money back.  I called the help line, lots of times and usually got someone who didn't speak English very well. They would end up telling me it was a problem with the router.  Then I would call the router and they would tell me it is a problem with the D-Link.  No one wants to take responsibility for getting it working.  I even went on the support page on the internet and read pages of things that could be wrong.  Tried them all in six days and I still don't have it working and has cost me alot of time and "money".  Good Luck if you buy it you will need it
Someone from Case Logic PLEASE read my review along with the 2 before me. I will admit that hands down case logic is THE BEST cd wallets you can buy.  They are (usually) constructed with great quality and you actually feel that you get your money's worth.  Even the protection it provides for the cd's that you put it in it is outstanding.  I'm a scratch freak and I've noticed that Case Logic wallets do not put any scratches what-so-ever on your cd's or dvd's.  Not even those little really light ones that you only see in bright light.  Nothing bad to say about them at all, it was pretty much everything a CD wallet should be, at it's finest.  BUT!, new this year is the redesigned version of these wallets and they are TERRIBLE!  The previous models were superior to any other cd wallet out there.  Now they have BROWN STITCHING put against black koskin leather.  The handle looks completely cheap and it comes from inside the wallet.  Letting you know that there is no telling what is holding it in place.  The mesh screen IN the handle is gone, so no more labels can be placed in it.  They are seriously terrible and that's all you can find when you go out shopping for one.  I found this out and quickly rushed to my favorite local electronic store and bought the last (previous model 320 koskin) cd wallet that I was lucky to find in the very back of the shelf.  The rest were the new UGLY and cheaply made ones at the SAME PRICE.  I bought that wallet just in case I needed it within the year and good thing I did, because I needed it, and now need another.  I'm now out of space and in desperate need for a new cd wallet, but I refuse to buy one of these new ones.  It doesn't matter if you get the koskin leather (which is my favorite) or the fabric ones, they are both repulsive in this years model.  So now I sit with old spool casings that used to hold all my blank cd's now holding my real cd's and dvd's until case logic comes back into focus and sells a better quality and improved (this time for real) cd wallet.  This is pretty much everything that the previous 2 reviews say.  I just COMPLETELY agree with everything they say and I'm hoping that somebody from case logic or word gets out to the people and they notice a huge slump in their sales this year.  Please Case Logic, no more brown stitching, poor quality handles and less features in your next model design of these wallets... my fingers are crossed
Blue Screen!. I've just purchased these cables, guiding myself on the good reviews. I set up the dvd and tv and to my surprise the movie looks blue!, i feel like i'm watching the smurfs. If I try different combinations I get black and white, red and blue. I connected the cables correctly so I don't know if my cables are defective or whats the problem. And thanks for robinw who pointed out the problem:robinwI've experienced this problem before. It's actually caused by the DVD player, not the cable. By changing your DVD player's output into "Component output" (it's somewhere hidden in your DVD player's menu) should solve this proble
The shipping is slow as dirt!. I ordered this ram two weeks ago! They haven't even shipped it yet
Wireless doesn't work, picture quality is poor. I spent two days and couldn't get the wireless to work.  With the camera configured using wired ethernet cable, the unit worked fine.  Picture quality is poor and doesn't work in low light.  I used two infrared light sources and the camera doesn't pick up a picture.  PTZ is kind of cool, but it doesn't provide any value if you can't get a decent picture
Bad idea. Stay away from these devices!  I bought 6 of them and 3 of them are already having problems, 1 unit alone has logged over 92 errors and I can't get imation to DO ANYTHING about it. They come with a 1 year warranty, you MUST email them for support.  I have emailed 20 times with no response.  If you call the IMATION HQ in Missouri, they will NOT accept support calls for this product, you MUST go though the email / website, so in my option I wasted over $600 on this product, it ain't worth $10..
Mailing was good and fast but the product is so bad. I had power point presentation before and I like to purchase new one, however this microsoft power point presenter was so bad.It works so badly. bad mouse movement, it doesn't go to next slide even though push several time right in front of the receiver.Try not to buy this product. I thought price and range was good but it doesn't really work at all.By the way, the seller sent me the product pretty fast and good condition
Do no buy this item. I was trying to duplicate HI-8 tapes and the ADS Tech Video Express USBAV-191-EF is not a viable solution.  It drops frames and there are nothing that can be done to improve its recording.  The installation is buggy.  I ended up buying a Sony VRD-MC1 and am extremely happy with it
Ink Consumption is Unacceptable. Beware - This is the most expensive printer you'll ever own. My wife went through $120 of ink in less than a month - and she doesn't print that much, just text, no pictures. I had read the other reviews about excessive ink usage, but it is much worse than I imagined. I'm going to throw away a perfectly good printer because I refuse to pay that much for ink.This printer is also noisy with a lot of vibration. The HP printers I've owned are practically silent compared to the Epson 260.I will never buy another Epson printer.
Junk - Don't Buy. Fell apart within about 5 weeks of mild use.  When tuning veneer cover pulled apart and splintered.  Not worth $10
It was surprise for me. Before I bought this reader I considered 2 models 12-in-1: Lexar and SanDisk. I decided to buy Lexar.I bought this reader to use mostly with Memory stick. I have 2 cards: 128 MB and 1 GB. I had no problem with 128 MB card.But I could not insert My GIG card into this reader. It just did not go. I tried hard trying not to break the card - no success. It was a surprise for me. May be because my card was made not by Lexar - by SanDIsk...? I contacted Lexar but did not get any explanation of this problem.Any way I had to send it back and buy 12-in-1 SanDisk Reader.
On/Off. It is the year 2005. The 21st Century. We've put men on the moon. We've launched space probes to the edges of our solar system. We can even remotely drive little vehicles along the surfaces of other planets.But we can't design a simply on/off button.The on/off button for the Blue Logger is one of the most insanely stupid things I've ever encountered. Some mentally-challenged engineer somewhere decided that you have to hold the button 2-4 seconds to turn it on, and 2-4 seconds to turn it off.It doesn't *sound* that difficult to do, but in practice it is infuriating, especially when you are trying to turn it on but end up turning it off. Right now the Blue Logger is sitting in front of me and I cannot turn it off. It simply will not turn off.Oh, and I've had lots of problems connecting it to my Bluetooth adapter, and have yet to get Street Atlas USA 2005 to recognize it
Do Not Buy This Item. My company, L3 Communications, purchsed 2 FVs338's through amazon to provide a VPN/Firewall to connect two locations via the open internet. Using a bench setup with the FVS338's connected through a hub, the VPN/firewall shut down after about 5 minutes, requiring me to power cycle both 338's to restart. A web search showed that others have encountered this and related problems. The NETGEAR web site suggests a command line procedure to change the timeout values. I did as suggested -- it had no effect. I really would like to give it zero stars
Nice remote... just can't use it!. Before you pick up any Harmony-series universal remote, make sure it's compatible with your ISP.That's right, your ISP.I spent several hours trying to figure out why I couldn't get past Logitech's login screen. Time after time, I received nothing but session time outs and ASP errors. After diving into their user support forums, it turns out these errors aren't that uncommon. There seems to be a problem with the way the Logitech webservers handle proxies. Some people have overcome this by switching proxies or connecting through a different ISP. I've had no such luck after toying with dozens of different proxy servers and my dialup backup.Why Logitech doesn't let their software configure the remote, or heck, offer the option of manually inputting remote codes is beyond me. Having to be at the mercy of their servers, for lack of a better word, just plain sucks..
Poorly described. The "LP-to-Digital Recording system" is nothing more than a record player. Just a vanilla, run-of-the-mill record player. You still need a sound card in order to record your LPs. Most builtin (on the motherboard) sound cards have very poor audio input, so this product is not suited to its advertized function.I am reminded of the "solar clothes dryer" product of a couple of years back - the box contained a rope and some clothespins.The software is awkward and hard to use, not at all intuitive. It also requires the user to register on the net and donate their privacy. Any buyer would be better off getting Audacity (freely available on the net), which is easy to use and has the same features.I do not recommend this product.
Cleaning machine... didn't repair. The machine does fine for quick cleaning of your cd's/dvd's.  I can't give a complete review of the product because I only tried to repair 1 dvd... and it did not repair it
Not everything. Read the plan carefully.  Not everything is covered under this plan.  They will use any excuse they can to say that the product broke under unusual circumstances so they don't have to pay.  Too many exclusions for an "everything is covered policy"  Don't waste your mone
6 month fan life. I had this unit for about 6 months one day smelled somthing getting hot. Reached behind the computer a touched the power supply and it was hot enough to blister my finger. I don't think I need any more of these
Shipping packaging needs improvement. I recently ordered two of these antennas and have not yet had the opportunity to set them up on my CB radios for a test run.  However, I did want to comment about the packaging for the products which I purchased from Amazon.com.  The antennas arrived inside their original Mgf display packs which had been placed inside a narrow rectangular cardboard box with a strip of plastic air bags on either side for packing material.  However, this did not prevent the cardboard box from collapsing & bending during shipping, which in turn bent the stainless steel antennas inside their packaging about 20+ degrees.  I have spent the last couple of hours trying to straighten the antennas - the stainless steel material is not easy to straighten by hand, and I still am not done working with one of the antennas.  It would have been nice if the packaging had been better (and/or the boxes marked as fragile) so this would not have happened.  I am confident that these units will preform very well, but am not happy with the shipping - thus the 2 star rating.
Panasonic has unresolved Error "F61" issues with this system. BEWARE OF THIS PRODUCT!  As soon as I put the system together and tried to put in a DVD, the display showed "F61" and the player would not close.  Apparently, my problem is far from unique . According to a internet search on "F61", many people have experienced the this error code with their panasonic home theater units (and other Panasonic produsts), which indicates a faulty or shorted out power supply. Every time the unit powers on I get the error message. Sometimes the F61 problem takes a year to show up, so I guess I am lucky that my system was broken from the beginning-at least I can return it.  Check them out for yourselves with the Better Business Bureau - Panasonic has an "Unsatisfactory" rating based on excessive UNRESOLVED product quality and repair complaints.  From what I've read so far Panasonic is not helpful in trying to resolve this. I returned my system to Amazon, and will be purchasing a different brand
Did not care for it. It was bulky and if needed to be plugged into a computer.
Incompatible with Muvo2. I purchased this card and the Sandisk 512 CF.  Simpletech wouldn't format in the Muvo2.  The Sandisk worked like a charm.  Previous experience had this card fail in a week.  I should have known better.  I have never had a problem with Sandisk, but have been bitten twice with SimpleTech
Be careful. I have had three of these drives fail in the past six months. Two were on a Mac G5, one was on a Linux system.On a positive note, Western Digital has a very efficient replacement policy.If you are still shopping, I would strongly recommend spending a little more and buying an enterprise-class drive. If you have already purchased this drive, you should stop what you doing and back up your data
CD worked 5 days. Really won't use the TV, but the CD only lasted 5 days and I use it everyday--had to buy something else
Don't Buy This. Please don't be fooled by it's inexpensiveness. I am a victim of it. I already bought this card and within 2 weeks I started getting read and write errors. I formatted the card and it now has 2 MB of bad sectors.  Unlike the other reviewer I did had 2 GB to begin with. But I think it is bad quality product and thats why it is dearth cheap. It is not at all reliable.  Now I am contacting their customerservice to replace this card for me
Cheap Hunk of Junk. This was the worst purchase of any type of computer hardware that I have ever made. It felt very light and flimsy, the definition of cheap plastic. Not just the construction but the performance was terrible. It would work perfectly for about a half hour and then go on a break and do NOTHING for about 10 minutes. This was very very frustrating. Maybe I was just unlucky and received a defective one, but I wouldn't take that chance again.I wish I could give this device a worse rating, somewhere around -4 would be much more appropriate.
It's a Sony !. I should have hear other rater's advice...but then I've said to myself..."hey, it's a Sony, they wouldn't release such a bad product, or at least, they would stop selling it after 3 years" (the first review dates Feb 2004)...I already have 9 coasters and counting...Now, before I buy any Sony product, I say to myself: Don't buy it..It's a Sony..
Harddrive Crash after 90 days, other reviews same problem. Player only Says "HARDDRIVE PROBLEM" Worked fine for 90 days then crashed, Now being charged $25.00 to have it looked at by Creative labs, since it is after 90 days. It's says 1 year warranty, but after 90 you have to pay $25.00 to get it fixed. Still cheap. Tech support took over 48hrs to reply, and when they did they try to sell you stuff for a broken player. This is in the tech email. "Please be patient and we'll figure this out. In the meantime, feel free to visit our website and see the entire line of accessories that we have for the Zen Vision:M. They will definitely help you get the most of your music experience. Here is the link"The only thing the Zen has going for it and why 2 stars is the picture is nice and clear. Will not buy any creative labs again, this is the 3rd product, the others being speakers, all have broken or poorly manufactured. I have had better luck with lower end products.
Junk Software. The software is confusing and doesn't use the USB port on my Magellan GPS!!!  I can't believe they let such junk software ruin their reputation. The program insist on using a old serial communications port.  Well guess what?  Many newer computer don't even bother to include this port since it;s so old and nothing works with it!Look elsewhere
Decent, but not what I would consider good for CDs/DVDs. Well the quality is really that great.  The zipper felt like it would break off if I pulled it a bit too hard.  As for some commenting on the smell; yup, it smells.  It smells a bit like chemicals (I assume that is because the outside of the case seems to be made with nylon or something).As for 96 CDs/DVDs; I don't think it's impossible to get 96 in there, but I wouldn't recommend you put 96 of your most preciouse CDs/DVDs in there as it gets really cramped.  Right now I am using mine for copies of old software, old mp3 backups, etc.  Basically stuff that I wouldn't be worried if it got hurt.  The pages are too short from the edge to the inner part of the binder, and that is what makes it hard to fit 96 in there.  The case get's really cramped and you aren't able to flip through the pages very easily.I give it a 2 based on the fact that it is usable, and I got mine from Amazon for a really great price.  IMHO, I wouldn't pay more than five bucks each for these; I didn't when I purchased , and that is why I got them.
No 2-way power. While the specs above say:2-Way power supply offers plug-in power with selected Sony or Aiwa portable recorders; battery power for use with all other recordersThis is NOT TRUE.  There is no battery unit shipped with this device; you can see it in the instructions, but it isn't in the package.  So, unless you are using it with a "selected Sony or Aiwa"  device, DON'T BUY THIS.  It won't work.BTW, I am a slow learner.  When I bought the first one of these, I thought it was defective because it didn't have the battery pack.  I returned it and got another one, which was absolutely unopened -- guess what!  THERE IS NO BATTERY PACK IN THE BLISTERPACK
Great Switch For the Price. This switch works really well.  I use it between a Windows XP and Windows 98 operating systems.  When switching to Windows 98, control to the mouse and keyboard is switched nearly instantly.  However, when switching to the XP OS, control time varies from nearly instantly to 3 or 4 seconds.  I also like the fact that it controls both the mouse and keyboard with one USB port on the PC.  It frees up a port.  Using the Numlock key on the keyboard is the hot key to switch.  It also has buttons on the device itself to select which PC to control.I rate this product 5 stars.  When I posted the first time, I thought I put 5 stars; but I must have accidentally selected 2.  I recommend this switch to anyone who wants a good product at a low price
beware, re- bate not honored!. i knew the cash back offer sounded too good to be true...and sure enough they rejected my upcs (i kept copies) only have hounding them and contacting the better business bureau did they say 'whoops a mistake' i have a fleeting suspicion this was intentional
Dead on Arrival. I got this pen after we did a case study for this product in our class. I was all excited when the product arrived, but it would not even charge when I plugged it in. I just shelved all plans to digitize my writing, I will stick to my good old scanner for now
Pray it doesn't break. I bought a MV2010 in October and installed a second hard drive to back up the first.  The first annoying issue was that transferring the files from an external hard drive using the USB port on the media vault was very slow....  After about 6 weeks of use, the primary hard drive went down.  I used the online support and was told to send the entire unit back for service.  After about a month of not hearing anything, I contacted the service center by phone.  Here, it took about two weeks of calls to figure out that the unit should not have been sent back and that the online service representative was not qualified to deal with the media vault in the first place.  The case was then sent to a Quality Case Manager who said that the first couple of service technicians messed the case up (duh?!) and I would be sent a new unit.  I received a new unit about a week later, but it did not contain a hard drive.  So another two calls to the service center and a drive is sent out.  I installed the drive, and surprise, it did not work!  Another call to Johnny my Quality Case Manager and I find out that the unit that was sent was refubished (perhaps a bad sign that refurbished units are available only 3 months after the unit is introduced).  Another couple of calls and I get a new unit-a full two months after sending the original unit in.  Happily this one has been working for the past 2 months--we'll see how long it lasts
Where is it???. I ordered an HP printer, which does not come with a cable, on Oct. 17th.  Based on advice in the ad for the printer, I ordered the subject cable, also made by HP, in the same order.  The printer shipped on the 19th of October.  An ink cartridge for the printer arrived today, Nov. 15th, but still I still have not received the cable.  I do not know how to rate the printer or the cable and I have already lost 30 days on the printer's warranty!!  I sure would like to be able to rate the cable and printer.  To date the order is 2 weeks late since it's estimated shipping date of Oct 28 - 29.  I have not even been able to find a way to contact customer service to see if there is going to be a long lag time, in which case I would know that it would be wise to cancel and order from someone else.  Bottom Line:  Not satisfactory at the moment
good machine, but outdated. good device, but needs an update to the 4th edition of the scrabble dictionary
STAY AWAY FROM THIS BRAND. I've not found anything from Memorex that works right, try Maxell products from Amazon, you can't find better products and the best customer service on the net.
Not That Great. What can I write that hasn't already been eloquently and accurately written here already?  The idea was a good one but the execution is poor.  I bought this for my eXplorist 210 hoping that these reviews were a little exaggerated.  Not so much.  The May 7, 2006 review by netzotic "Tech Head" (Salisbury MD USA) sums it up quite accurately
Not good. I got this product a while ago.  It would work, then it'd stop.  Then I'd reinstall everything, it'd worok again, but soon it would stop working all over again.It seems that I can get it to work whenever I want, provided I completely reinstall the software whenever I need to reboot my PC.So, it sits there unused.  It's a piece of junk.
Not worth it. I thought this device would be the answer I was looking for, allowing my wife's computer and my laptop to print to the same printer.  I've had it for almost a year and as far as printing goes, it has never worked from my wife's desktop (XPSP2) and only works sometimes (rarely w/out a reboot) from my laptop (XPSP1.)  I can only get three ports to show up, but it does work just fine with the other devices (a memory card reader and a thumb drive).  Tech support has been no help the one or two times I've actually been able to get them on the phone.  My advice, save your money and buy a Network Attached Storage Drive with built in print server
Kingston 2 GB SD Memory Card. This SD would not work in my  Nikon  Coolpix S6 camera (but the Fuji and Sandisk product did
Cleaning machine... didn't repair. The machine does fine for quick cleaning of your cd's/dvd's.  I can't give a complete review of the product because I only tried to repair 1 dvd... and it did not repair it
No choices. I thought this item came with or you had a choice of color. It did not. It is silver with black trim. It is also not very portible, you have to play it while its sitting on a flat, level surface.
WORST PURCHASE I HAVE EVER MADE. I bought 2 mintek dvd players because I got such a "great" deal at kohl's department store.  I ended up getting each one for about $150, which was a great price compared to the original price. Within the first 3 months I had the same spinning of the disk and "no disk" message come up when there was a disk in it.  I immediately returned the one to Kohl's.  I kept the other one, to my dismay.  I had a hunch I should of returned it.  Sure enough, after the 90 day warranty, it began having the EXACT same problems, definitely a MINTEK problem.  I have emailed, made phone calls..several times with absolutely no human contact or response.  This company needs to be reported because they sell JUNK and back it up with absolutely NOTHING.   I figured I was already out a bunch of money, I just wanted to get it fixed so it was usuable...Can't reach anyone to do that.  There is a reason you can't find anyone...they know their products are WORTHLESS!!!. DON'T BUY ANYTHING FROM MINTEK ..WORST MISTAKE YOU WILL EVER MAKE..AND TAKE A LOT OF YOUR MONEY WITH IT...
Technology not up to date. I wanted to stay with Linksys and the 4 ports would have been a perfect fit but unfortunately I had to return mine. The USB port is not compatible with a lot of HP printers. (HP 1022 in my case) Linksys could not troubleshoot the problem and had nothing in their system about my HP printer. Hard to believe when random consumer comments in amazon have better info than a manufacturers knowledge base. I wonder if they know who HP is? HP eventually helped confirm Linksys needed to update this product. Better go with another brand. The replacement 1 port IOGEAR was a little harder to set up due to a fixed IP need but it is doing the job
A waste of money. I bought this as a replacement for a slightly older Microsoft wireless keyboard that was stolen.  The other board/mouse used bluetooth, and was great.  This one uses a different system with a long cord & reciever unit, as opposed to a small plug in USB.My main complaint is that it frequently drops a letter or number here and there.  This would not be a big problem if you are writing a letter to your Aunt Margie, but if you are entering financial data, it is a very big deal.Varying the distance from the reciever to the board makes no difference.  Ditto with fresh batteries, even Duracells.There are plenty of other good board out there, so do not waste your time on this one.
Warning!  Buyer Beware!. I just shipped my HP 3052 back off to where it came from.  I either have to really like something or really hate something to write a review on it, and I really hate this printer.  I purchased the HP 3052 after reading some reviews on the HP 3055, and deciding that I didn't need the fax capabilities of the 3055 which didn't seem to work well for most people anyhow.  Apparently, it's not just the fax feature that is faulty, but the scanning and copying leaves a lot to be desired as well.  I purchased this to replace my aging, but still working, 10 year old NEC SuperScript 860 laser printer.  I needed something to make decent copies, and to scan in documents.  Well forget it with this!  You WILL REGRET buying this electronic "Made in China" garbage if you are planning on using this for anything other than a printer.  This has changed my opinion on HP, as it will yours if you buy it.When I first power on the unit, I tried copying the Vonage advertisement that came with it by running it through the auto document feeder.  The first thing I notices was that the ADF was loud.  This was fine since noise isn't too much of a concern, just as long is it functions well, and there isn't anyone else around to be disturbed by it.  After examining the copy, I realized the Vonage letters were stretched out about 1/8" about 3/4 down from the top of the letters.  To make things worse, there was a 1 1/2" oval shape on the Vonage ad, which this printer distorted one entire side of, almost as if someone had tried to trace it with a pen.  I tried several copies through the ADF with the same results over and over.  I thought that maybe the stretched letters were due to a problem with the auto document feeder, so I tried copying the Vonage brochure on the flat bed.  I did not see a problem with the Vonage letters being stretched when copying on the flat bed, but there was still distortion on the oval shape again.  Next, I tried copying other documents with similar bad results.  Copying bar codes revealed that when printing lines close together, the black bleeds between them!  Edges on copied fonts were a rough as well.Next I tried connecting the 3052 to my PC with USB 2.0.  I ended up with an installation failed message on my first attempt at installing the software.  Looking in device manager, I found a problem with installing the driver for "Generic IEEE 1284.4 printing support."  I tried uninstalling and installing the drivers several times to no avail.  I then tried a 400MB full download of the latest full driver release from HP, and had the same problem.  Next, I tried a smaller 40MB driver release on HP's site.  This time I kept getting prompted to locate files that the installation could not find.  After performing a search on my hard drive, I located them in c:\temp, where the installer must have extracted them to.  I had to keep navigating the installer to this directory numerous times during this install.  Much to my amazement, this install attempt actually ended up working.Now I wanted to test the scanning functionality.  The included scanning software is very basic.  It does allow you to setup custom profiles for scanning resolution, destination, and paper type.  I first tested scanning with the included Vonage advertisement again.  The results were to say the list, shocking and very disappointing.  First, the color scans were washed out.  Second, the black on white text had extreme orange and blue halos around the edges, almost like looking at a 3d movie, without the 3d glasses.  Third, there were some visual artifices, scanning inaccuracies, and scanned objects appeared wavy.  Fourth, I got the same results as above when using the ADF for copying as I did scanning.  I wish I could include a sample image so you could see the atrociousness for yourselves.  Lastly, scans are slow, and I found that when scanning in 8 1/2 x 11 documents, they would often be scanned in skewed, no matter what paper the originals were on or how I adjusted the auto document feeder guides.  Furthermore, when I scanned documents with print on both sides, the print on the opposite side would bleed through.  From my experience with photo technology, my hunch would be that the cheap imager in this needs an enormous amount of light to scan, so that images on the opposite side of the page bleed through.I really don't want to say anything good about this printer, but I will say that printing looked very good, and it gets 1 star for this.  Printing was crisp and clear, even with small fonts.  B/W photo printing was on the other hand was mediocre, but who uses a B/W laser printer for photos anyhow?My advice would be to look elsewhere for your scanning and copying needs.  This might do for a cheap printer/scanner/copier for your kids, but not for a professional environment.  I might purchase the Dell 1815dn as it has received good reviews, purchase a separate printer and scanner, or hold out until something better comes along.  I hope this review has been helpful, and can save you from the hassle and expense of a return
Needs Redesign. Mouse does not glide smoothly on some surfaces due to the large depression on the bottom of the mouse designed to hold antenna.Mine would not glide smooth on rubber mousepad or plastic nor my corrian counter top. The idea is good however because when you insert the antenna the mouse turns off. This being said it may deserve 5 stars if the correct surface is used
It would it being great if D-Link implemented RAID better. I recently bought this product and returned almost immediately after I find out that D-LINK implementation of the RAID was very unreliable.This unit would it being great if you can start with 1 drive and set is as RAID enable so in the future you can buy another drive switch to Raid 1 and the device automatically knows to reformat ONLY the new drive and start mirroring with drive 1. Instead the device only let you run single drive configuration while you had only one drive and if you want to add another drive in the future as Raid 1 it will reformat the old drive so you will lost all your data unless you backup first. Most people buy this device as storage because they don't have more space on their desktop PC so it make no sense to force the user to backup what they had stored on Drive 1 because they won't have were to put it.If you don't care about RAID configuration then the device may work for you, because you will be running 1 or 2 drives independently on single drive configuration. However be aware that every time you upgrade your firmware the device warns you that you should backup your data because it will reformat the drives, what in the world D-Link was thinking?The device format your drives using Linux Ext2 file system so you are not comfortable with this avoid this device. There are free drivers on the internet to allow Windows to mount Ext2 drives so if something happened with the Device you can recover your data from windows, but so far these drivers don't work under Windows Vista and are not recommended computer users that are not familiar with File systems or Partitions.
DON'T BUY ME. I suggest NEVER buying an Adesso product...The product I bought NEW came USED... not with all of the pieces... and then afterwords they wouldn't even let me return it.  Want to try talking to a customer service rep?  Go ahead and try calling any one of their business numbers... because not one of them is going to be answered
Great idea.  Terribe product. This is my first review and I am writing it because I am compelled to let others know that this is not a good product.  I spent at least 10 hours trying to configure the device and at least one of those hours was spent on the phone with Linksys.  I have experience with networking and quite simply this device does not work as intended.  I was able to get it to work for periods of time but it stops after 5 minutes or so, or, I have to reconnect.  Don't waist your time or money on this
ATi Radeon 9550 256MB AGP 8X. I bought one of these cards at Christmas and my wife bought the 9550XL they look just alike and both are a terrible card for the money we paid. She paid $100.00 at Newegg and I bought mine at zipzzoomfly for $89.99 we both paid to much for these cards. I just upgraded last month to a new Nvidia 6200A. I paid less for the card and it outperforms it in everyway. I would never buy another of these even if all I did was surf the web. They run hot a cause lockups and ATi when I talked with them said they were aware of the problem and recommended a fan. Why did'nt they put one on I asked, and they said it was due to cost. There technical support is the worst I have ever seen. As for gaming my daughter runs a 64MB 4X SIS 315 made by Elite group and it smokes this card. I know this because I used Aquamark to bench test it. Pay less and buy a Nvidia card with a factory fan and be happy. I am ordering another one of the Nvidia 6200A's for my wife
Reviews I read a year ago were great. What happened?. I always read costomer reviews before buying anything. I did just that with the Pixma MP780 and was confident in my purchase.  14 months after purchase, the thing cant print black. Now when revisiting the reviews there seems to be a comon complaint.  CANON PIXMA MP780 WONT PRINT BLACK.  Keep in mind when buying an all in one printer, that without black printing what good will it do.Wish I would have seen this complaint before. Maybe I did and thought "it wont happen to me".  Seems like its happening to over 30 of these (currently) 200-ish reviews.
Stay Away from this Device. I read the other reviews, some glowing, others well.. not so glowing.  The price was right, ($149 - 50 rebate) So I thought I would take a chance.  I read the other reviews so I have no one else to blame but myself.First off, I am only interested in playing videos from my computer, so I have no idea how well the image viewing or MP3 playing works.I also notice other people reviewing this product had all kinds of problems with wireless connections.  My house is fully wired with CAT5, therefore I am using this product wired, not wireless.I was able to get the device connected to my network and reading files from the media server within 10 minutes of opening the carton... so far so good.   The first thing I did was check for updates.  An update was found and updated successfully.I then had the DSM-320 look for media servers.  It found the tversity server right away and I was able to see the contents listed.  This unfortunately is the end of the good news.  It's all went downhill from here.1.  Neither server, tversity or the Dlink were smart enough to view a folder of VOB files as a movie.  They listed them as VOB_1, VOB2 etc.  So for example, I clicked on my Casablanca folder, I would then need to click on VOB_1 to start the movie.  When VOB_1 ended after about 20 minutes, it did not go to VOB_2.   I needed to use the remote and manually select the next item to play.   arrrgghh!!  P.O.S. thing.2.  As another review stated, the FF simply does not work properly.  Oh, sure if you press FF the movie will fast forward.  But there is no way to stop it.  If you press play while the movie is FF'wding, the movie starts to play from the beginning of the current VOB.  more, arrrrgghh!This alone is enough of a nuisance to return the device.  Which I will be doing first thing in the morning.My final advice to any prospective buyers:  S T A Y   A W A Y !!!!My final advic to D-Link, Great idea, but your product absolutely sucks.Oh one more thing,  Someone mentioned that their tech support was very freindly.  Yes the two ladies I spoke to were both very friendly, their English was terrible.  (Guess which county you call for tech support... oh come on, just one guess)  It also sounded like each of the tech support personnel are sitting shoulder to shoulder to one another.  I could hear at least 2 other tech support people communicating with their clients.  Which made it very difficult for the lady helping me.  She needed to ask me to repeat myself over and over.  Sheesh,  I must have read my phone number to her at least 4 times before she got it right.One last interesting tidbit, on the packaging, they mention Nero recode CE.  So I went to the nero site to check it out.  Nero has a list of Supported Media Players listed.  And you know what, D-Link is NOT one of them.  I will return this D-Link junk and purchase one the Nero certified product instead.I bow my head in shame, As I had read the reviews but I bought the product anyway.
DVI version sucks. cable won't fitPower supply cable covers other connectorsmouse does not not workincludes flash update cable but web site has no flash imagesIf you don't plug a keyboard into it sits there and just beepsWhat idiot designed this trash.
Good hardware spoiled by bad drivers. The Creative drivers are dreadful.  Even the signed Creative Inc drivers crashed my brand new clean Vista x64 installation.  Do a web search on "ha20x2k.sys BSOD" and you'll see all the users who had the dreaded "Blue Screen of Death" from these drivers.  I've had to disable much of the functionality and use just the generic Microsoft WHQL drivers.  I won't ever buy another Creative product again.  As enticing as their hardware features are, their poor driver quality just ruins everything.
Don't waste  your time. I purchased this yesterday. After only using it for 30 minutes I have decided to take it back.1. It will stay attached to my Zune.2. It has too much static.3. When there is little static the sound is not clear.
Great product! For two days!. When this adapter first arrived, I thought it was great. The sound quality was excellent, and free of all the distortion and interference I get from using an FM transmitter-style adapter (there are few open frequencies in the SF Bay Area). The first day, I used it for about 20 minutes total (didn't have far to drive), and it worked great. The second day I had a bit farther to drive. After about 30 minutes, it quit. Hasn't worked again since.I didn't expect it to last forever, but less than an hour?Yes, it has a 1 year warranty: just send the unit back with a money order ($6) to cover the return postage. Of course, then you're spending more in postage than you originally spent for the unit..
very not satisfied. very very not user friendly.... no instruction to install. worked after it got installed but doesnt work with the wireless internet in my house. Decided to resell it. could be its only because i'm apple-illeterate...
Do not buy!. I made the mistake of ordering one of these.  I took it out of the box and laminated one page that came out with a bent corner.  Luckily, it wasn't an important document or anything, so I printed another page and tried to laminate it.  The machine would not feed at all.  I called the manufacturer who stated I would need to mail it in at my expense and they would take a week or two to fix it.  So, I exchanged it instead on Amazon and got a new one.  It worked for about three weeks (still often have problems with corners being bent) and then it got stuck with a page half way through.  Needless to say, don't waste your time and money getting aggravated with this machine.  It's too late for me to return this to Amazon, so I'm basically throwing this away and buying a real laminating machine
Disappointed... On my laptop it took over an hour to transfer between 10-15 photos.  Read the fine print in the leaflet that comes with the reader and it states that it won't necessarily work with all computer systems.  Mine is a pretty common Dell laptop with brand name components.  When I transfered the same photos from the laptop to an external hard drive it took about 30 seconds...
Will not record. I finished up my last batch of these discs bought some time ago, without a problem. BUT the next batch purchased most recently will not record on my Philips CDR 765. There are too many different types of media discs and not labeled properly. Should be an industry standard that the consumer can readily see that they can use them. Not sure what to get now or if another brand will work properly
It's what you pay for. I purchased this anticipating using it with my mp3 recorder as well as my camcorder.  Ordering and shipping was great through Amazon.When I received it, I tested it with my mp3 recorder. My test subject was the television about 8 feet from me, playing at a normal listening level.  My first test, I got very little sound; so I adjusted the input level of the recorder to it's highest level.  The resulting level was enough to hear.  Since I was planning to be able to record lectures at 3-5 times the distance of my test, I knew that this mic alone would not handle the task.  Yesterday I tried it out recording the children's Christmas pagent at church.  The difference in sound over my camcorder's builtin mics was amazing, though there was a low level hiss.  However, there were two things that made me decide to return it.  The first was that there seems to be little or no accoustic isolation of the mic elements and the microphone body; it picked up the slightest touch of the camcorder and even normal touch on the tripod.  It even picked up the motor noise that the internal mic does not.  The second is that it is highly susceptible to electrical interference.  With the mic off, I got a radio station, and when I touched the mic, I heard a buzz.  I removed the mic from the supplied cable, and even the noise I got touching the connector end, wasn't nearly as loud.  I really expected more from Audio Technica, even for a mic at this price
hates sleeping computers. This switch works pretty well until one of your computers goes to sleep or the display sleeps, then you have to power cycle the switch to get it to display anything after waking up the computer or display.Same problem occurs when you just turn on the computer.Windows is especially bad about thinking it has no display if you boot Windows when it is not the selected computer.If your computer never sleeps and never sleeps the display, then the switch works fine. Otherwise look for something else
Squeal of Death. I own one of these, it came packaged in my Dell XPS Renegade. Sound in a Windows environment is good, as indicated by other reviews. But in a gaming environment for example World of Warcraft, and not just this game, I and other user's have experienced the squeal of death, wherein the sound will become replaced with a high pitched squeal, and may hard lock your computer. Either way this can only be corrected by rebooting. Check out the forums before buying any creative labs products. BUYER BEWARE!
Flimsy is an understatement. DVDs stored on this shelf would get seasick - the whole thing wobbles like crazy.  Wood is okay, but materials that hold the wood together are terrible.  Don't buy, even for the low price
Bad Disc Error - possible fix. BAD DISC ERROR - possible fixAfter about 8 months just like the other reviewer it stopped working.I kept getting bad disc error on a new DVD I bought. I tried good discs that worked before but now got the same Bad Disc error.This is not the first time I had problems loading. Previously, unplugging and plugging it in again sometimes corrected the problem.This time after two weeks of Bad Disc errors, I was about to toss it when I decided what the heck, I'll check inside to see if it's dirty or something.FIRST I UNPLUGGED THE UNIT.I removed the 6 screws holding the cover. You may have to pull the sides out a bit if it catches to lift it off.With my expertise knowledge. *eyeroll* I nudged the lense mechanism. It apparently slides to read the discs.I plugged the DVD in and loaded a disc again to see what happens. The lense slid under the tray and started reading the disc. I'll take the elation of dumb luck over the satisfaction calculated knowledge any day! lolSo hopefully this will last a little longer. But at least I can use it again for now ...I am downrating it to 2 stars solely on the bad disc error. The viewing quality and performance is decent and covered by other reviewers
Nice output duplexing is poor. I like the output from it and the networking is very nice, but the back side of prints are offset about .5 inches from the front side. HP's support was very bad (although they did send me a new duplexer eventually which still did not solve my problem). After awhile I gave up on trying to get it fixed. All and all I wish I had purchased something else because duplexing is the only reason I got this printer. For someone who does not care that much about the duplexing option, I am sure it would be fine though.
A Piece of Junk. My daughter really loved getting this item for Christmas.  Unfortunately, the CD player is not reliable.  It freezes (sometimes for several hours), unfreezes unexpectedly (especially great in the middle of the night), skips repeatedly, or just plain refuses to start at all.  The only thing that works well is the radio.  We already have a radio, so the purchase was a big waste of money.  Terribly disappointing.  I strongly recommend that potential buyers look elsewhere.
Inventory Number Problem!!!. Cobra HG A1500 High Gear CB Antenna has an Item model number: HG A1000 and the Cobra HG A1000 High Gear CB Antenna has an Item model number: HG A1500.So clearly it seems the inventory numbers are erroneously swapped-Called two weeks ago- no fix and called today.  Hopefully it's corrected since I can't settle with the lower wattage rated antenna
failure. these headphones were great at first, but then failed (right ear stopped working) after 3 months.  I sent the orginal pair back to the manufacturer for a replacement, but the replacement pair also failed with the same problem after a couple more months. Stay away from these
Yes - worst product ever... I wish I read the reviews before I bought this thing, unfortunately.  Extremely user unfriendly to connect and disconnects itself often; kills batteries even in sleep mode.The size and precision is good when it does work, but definitely not worth the money.  I exchanged it for a new one thinking it was just the first unit, but still terrible
Came broken and tried it anyway!. The door hinge was broken so door wouldn't stay on, but we decided to try it anyway as we had a 40th surprise coming up in 2 days and "needed" it to keep 30 kids entertained!  Borrowed my neighbors little Hawaiian Ice maker as back-up.  The little machine ran circles around this big "fancy" one!!  This one made 1 snow cone to the 64 snow cones the little machine made in 45 minutes!  VERY disappointed!  Emailed company and still waiting for reply after 2 emails and 2 weeks!  Thank goodness I had the Hawaiian Ice for back-up!
Don't buy. These blank discs are defective. I was never able to record any pictures or audio data to them.The Maxell blank discs that I have did the job fine.
Love Hate. USB 2.0 is wonderful.  PCI Cards are very easy to install.  Unfortunately the card is odd shaped and does not fit well into all PCs
Too good to be true. I purchased this item to record LPs into my computer thru the input on this device.  It sounded worse than recording through the mono microphone input that was built into my laptop.  Had same experience with LOUD right out of the box too - startled me out of my skin!  Mine didn't come with any disk although the box mentions software.  Then again, I bought this from an Amazon 'partner' from Amazon.  Spend your money wisely and get an iMic.  I'm going to
NOT UNIVERSAL. This piece of junk will not work in all cigarette lighters. It works in a Nissan Quest but not in a Lexus RX 300??
Pathetic, doesn't work, waste of money. Beware of this product.  It always freezes up half way though the download when transfering photos to my computer.  I have another USB 1.0 card reader that works perfectly.  I upgrade to get the speed boost with USB 2.0, but this product is fundamentally flawed and buggy
works ok, but no wonder. I've had several UPSs now for a while. Belkin UPS quit after about 3 years of work. I understand that this may be long enough, but I have several from APC and they are still working. One UPS, I think, now has been in service 7 or 8 years
Do not buy. I received the router and tried to install it. I got up to the point where the router was to verify the connection and I lost my internet connection. I then found out that it deleted my IP address. Called Belkin tech support with a sad result. Bottom line is that I lost My IP address 3 times. Had to go to my server to restore it each time. Belkin tech support needs to be recycled. Talked to 12 repres. with no success. Will return this junk in a new box
Disappointing. I read something close to a rave review in Walt Mossberg's technology column in the Wall Street Journal, checked the reviews on Amazon. and concluded that it was a good bet to provide extended coverage for my house.  It might have been a good bet beforehand, but one can lose a 'good bet' and I did.Setup was virtually instantaneous and the two XE104s started talking to each other and the roving laptop I was using to test achieved a good internet connection (about 40 MBPS) through its direct ethernet cable connection to the "its" XE104.  That was while we were in the same room; then things went downhill quickly.  Many of the other outlets in my house barely got a connection with the Netgear utility showing as low as 1.05 MBPS!  Like another reviewer, I think Netgear overestimates true throughput;  I think actual throughput was much lower than reported given the time to transfer a file from my laptop to my desktop.After testing a number of outlets, I concluded that this product is not the answer for me.  The reviews have been very good ... why did I get such a bad result?  I concluded it had a lot to do with my house wiring.  Outlets that were close to each other and on the same breaker box seemed to perform acceptably (but not better than wireless G).  Outlets that were further away and/or were on the second breaker box in my house did far worse.My advice to anyone buying this is to make sure you can return it without penalty if it doesn't work out.  If your wiring is old and especially if you have more than one breaker box, be wary of the possibility that it won't work for you.I suspect the Netgear XE104 will work satisfactorily for far more customers than it it will disappoint, but regrettably I'm in the latter group.
Very Bad Product. None of the port in this USB is working properly. Whenever I connect a thumb drive, the system hangs and it will lead to restart the system. Don't ever go for this product
Serviceable, but not worth the money. The sound quality is fine if you are in range.  The dual headsets work as advertised, in other words:1.  You cannot talk on both phones at the same time (instead, you can transfer a call to the other phone).2.  The range is not great (though I have no complaints with the sound quality when in range of about 30 ft)3.  The voicemail alert system sometimes indicates voicemail even though you have none.Other than that, it's a phone that only needs one phone cord and works for a small household
1 GB not 2. The previous post is correct about it being only a 1 gig SD card. Total BS
This TV doesn't exist (at least not yet). Like another person here mentioned, this TV does not exist. I bought this TV from Amazon and they sent me the W version (the one without the Integrated ATSC Tuner). After almost a month after I bought this thing, I'm still waiting for my refund. Do yourself a favor, stay away from this. Hopefully Amazon will take down this product listing so nobody else has to deal with this BS
Thimble. Another typical ink jet consumable, very small, runs out fast, and costs way too much.  Just will have to wait for the 3rd party knock-off to come on the market
Not acceptable in my application. My interest in this product was only to provide a high quality stereo audio link between a TV and amplifier - distance of only 20 feet. I never looked at the video transmission capability but found the audio link unacceptable due to interference from both a wireless telephone (800Mhz) system and wireless LAN (801.11g) also operating in the house. I returned the unit for refund
Horrible. There is essentially no sound amplification.  The sound levels are barely different with the thing on as opposed to having it off.  Sort of a "what were they thinking" product
Doesn't work. Don't buy this. There are deaf toddlers who can record my voice better than this microphone
Pass, On This One. Purchased this for use during travel, but screen is NOT viewable outdoors and barely viewable indoors.Reception is poor, unless outfitted with the Xium antenna.The only positives include rugged, handsome case and jacks for external devices, including external antenna.This would have been a much better product if they had included a cowling for the screen; not sure how it can be packaged and advertised for use outdoors when it performs so shabbily under those circumstances
Don't buy these if you are a runner!. These are a huge waste of money -- don't buy them!  I used them on one three mile run, and they must have fallen out of my ears 20 times.  I came home and tossed them in the trash. Save your $$
Not for Macs. In a nutshell: If you own a Mac, do NOT buy this machine. I struggled with Brother's tech support system several times to make it work with my iBook running OS 10.4, and still have not been able to scan a thing. I've also begun having problems sending faxes, as the machine eats the documents. Last time I had to send an important document, I went to an Office Depot and paid to send it for fear of it being eaten by this machine. Buyer beware--especially Mac users
BUYER BEWARE. I was so excited for this unit, only to find that it wasn't the quality I expected.First, the FM transmitter only works in the Car Dock (not included) so if you want to use it at home, make sure your stereo has audio jacks or an aux jack.Second, the product was defective. My songs on the MP3 repeat sometimes and the headphone jack is faulty causing the sound to cut out and sound bad unless you hold the cord into the unit. This happens with both the MP3 and the XM sat radio - so I know it isn't reception.Samsung offered to repare it but the tech support is awful and unknowledgable. We'll see what happens
Junk. Didn't work with my multi-function, then died a little over a year later. This was my first, and only, purchase of a Linksys product. I unhappily discovered that it would not work with my multifunction printer, then hooked it up to another printer, only to have it die just out of warranty. A completely worthless piece of Chinese made technology that is so bad the manufacturer doesn't even stand behind it
Not as good as you'd expect from Microsoft. I have diabetic vision problems and thought the Laser 6000's capacity to magnify small areas of the screen would be useful for maps, data sheets, etc.  I've decided to return it and get a larger monitor instead.  This mouse moves eccentricly and you move over the page or screen in fits and starts.  Once you turn the magnifying function on, it can be quite difficult to turn it back off.  In one case I had to reboot.  Lastly, it screws up some other functions like delete and highlight.  It's a great concept and I'll try subsequent versions when they come out but this one ain't ready for prime time
Don't bother with the alarm clock. If you want a wood cabinet radio, buy the Model 1. If you want a great alarm clock, read on.. I purchased a model 3 about two years ago.  I loved the wood finish and like the old-time look of the controls, and the sound quality of the radio is very good.That said I have been remarkably unhappy with the product overall (this is my first ever review on Amazon because I felt so strongly about this product.)The initial, and less significant complaint, is that the low-contrast (grey on brown) printed numbers on the control panel are basically illegible in all but very bright and direct light (not what you typically have on your nightstand). I'm a guy in his early 30's with good vision, so this is not your grandpa complaining about this detail...Next, the light in the clock was so bright that we kept a hanky on the nightstand to cover it at night.However, the real, and totally unexpected Failure of this product is the alarm clock itself:1. The alarm itself must be set by rotating a bezel ring that is pretty stiff and requires a good deal of force to turn (my girlfriend hates it).2. The alarm is on a 12-hour cycle, so it will go off twice a day if you don't remember to disable it by one of a couple of different button-pressings & knob twists required to disable/enable the alarm.3. And the clincher:  The snooze doesn't work like any other alarm I've ever used:  If the alarm goes off (whether waking to music, or to an alarm tone) and you press the snooze button after more than 2-3 minutes of music, the snooze WILL NOT WORK (!) and you will actually be shutting off the alarm altogether.Often, if I have a very early flight for example, I will wake to music, which will take a few minutes to really wake me up, at which point I may want to snooze once (for 10 minutes) before getting up & going.  To my knowledge, this is pretty common alarm clock usage.I discovered this flaw when I missed an early morning flight from SF to NYC, because I did just that: I pressed the snooze button, once, after what could not have been more than 2 minutes of music.  -What I had really done was shut the alarm down altogether...Needless to say, after scrambling to get a later flight, and rearrange meetings in NYC, I called Tivoli to tell them my radio was flawed (I'd bought direct).  The girl in customer service told me the radio was behaving normally: that the snooze would actually serve only as an "alarm shut off" button if I waited more than "about 3 minutes" (her words) into the alarm to press it.She also told me that this was normal, and it's "the way all alarm clocks work."I've owned at least a half dozen alarm clocks in my life, and have stayed in at least a hundred hotel rooms.  Never have I seen a snooze button that really just shuts the alarm down and let's you oversleep.Tivoli touts themselves as a high-end, high-attention-to-detail manufacturer. They acknowledge that this bizarre snooze system is in fact "the way it works" and go on to claim that this is normal for alarm clocks in general.I can scarcely express how unimpressed I am with this company & this product.I've now moved the TIVOLI MODEL 3 to the kitchen and purchased a BOSTON ACOUSTICS RECEPTER for the nightstand.  The Recepter's alarm & tuning controls are truly excellent (especially the preset functions) and, aside from the audio being slightly bass-heavy, WE LOVE the Receptor!!!Oh, and the snooze works great!!  :
Very sad about this... The card worked fine for my son's graduation and a family holiday but became corrupted during my brother's wedding and I lost all the photos from that event.  I still can't believe it happened.  If you have an iPod, or other, remember to back-up your photos as soon as you can to try and avoid this
Street Atlas 2005 HH provides wrong route and hard to use. I bought the blue logger and both Street atlas 2005 and SA2005 HH for my Dell X50V. No problem with the Blue Logger GPS but my complaints are as follows:1. Delorme did not include the Blue Logger Manager software on the HH. Now they want to sell it separately for additional $39. Very Weird marketing strategy indeed.2. The software for the pocket PC is very difficult to use, not very intuitive. It seems the hand held software was developed as an afterthought from the software for the pc. It is poorly designed, and appeared was not fully tested by normal users prior to releasing to market.3. It is very cumbersome and slow to determine a route. Even with a 620 MHz Axim, it is slow. Worse yet, the route is often wrong. FOr example, this afternoon I use SA2005 to determine a route to a friend's house. Had I followed that route, I would come to a dead end street and have to back track about 10 miles to get to another correct route to my destination. Luckily, I decided to use my paper map. Later, I tried Microsoft Mapping on the internet and it actually gave me the correct routing. Last week for another location, SA2005 found the wrong location for a given address which would take me about 4 miles off. Luckily, I knew where it was and ignored the routing from SA2005 HH.4. Many other mapping softwares for HH will allow one to use it with 1 hand and often with the finger. But not with SA2005 HH. After 2 weeks of using it, I found myself going back to my old paper map. For example, if I had not calculated a route and just simply use the GPS and map to travel, the software only show the street I was on but no name given and no street name shown for upcoming cross streets. It does not help when you are lost.5. SA2005 maps seems to be several years old and not very up to date. I guess that's why Delorme does not want to clearly advertise this issue.I am seriously considering giving up SA2005 and consider this as my $50 learning mistake, and looking at Microsoft Street & Trip 2005 or later in 1Q 2005, IGuidance who is supposed to have the latest map.I am not alone in this as several other users have also complained on delorme user forum. I wish I had read that forum before buying Delorme software. Well, Live and Learn.
ECM-CS10 does not have battery power capability. Despite being advertised otherwise on Sony's site as well as many vendors, this unit is plug-in power only ... it does not come with a battery clip to permit operation with non plug-in power devices.  I purchased and had to return
don't like it. my sister bought this for me for xmas. i'm not crazy about them. there okay but you can't talk on both at the same time, which stinks for my kids talking to grandma. they do have alot of static and the range, if you can say they have any, is horriable. i can go farther with my older cordless phone. these i can't even walk outside.  my old phone i can go anywhere outside and it works great. i would not recommand these phones. you can get better phones for the same price or less. keep looking
DEAD ON DAY 2!. This is the first mp3 player I ever bought. After much researching I decided on the iaudio U2 512MB as it fit my needs and the reviews rated it as excellent. On day 1 I figured out how to load CD, which was relatively simple. On day 2 I used the player, it worked and sounded great, simple to use. I decided to load in some more music- I got 1 CD on- then it stopped working. DEAD. Won't turn on- just DEAD. Does not seem to be the battery, unless the battery life is the 45 minutes that I used it and it won't recharge
not recommended. The holes giving access to the thumb stick, volume buton, and zoom button are horrible.  The case shifts a little and pushes a button or, most commonly, presses the thumb stick one direction or another.  For example, my case liked to push the thumb stick down.  The volume button got pressed somehow and my rhino went mute.  I promptly cut the plastic away from the buttons.  Problem solved.  Only other problem was fogging between the display and the transparent plastic.  Solved by cutting away more plastic and using adhesive screen protectors.  Messed up the fit a bit too.I recommend just using adhesive screen protectors.  The rhino might get roughed up, but the screen will stay OK
A real Troubled Lemon! Stay Away!. I purchased this unit about 18 months ago. After the warranty ran out, the unit first quit working with -R media. Then there is an issue with finalizing the DVD, which makes the dvd unusable. Unfortunately, this is after you record your show. Then all is lost. It started making squawking noises like something is very wrong. It never remembered the language or channels. Panasonic never did anything about this. After reading others with these same issues, I would recommend that you buy from another manufacturer
almost useless. After trying this unit on a trip over christmas holidays, I tried to put in adresses to 12 different destinations and it would only allow 3 of them. The keyboard wont let you put in a complete address.The keyboard erases letters as they are being entered and shows several simelar street names in different cities other than the desired destination. That was very frustrating. When I did get to a destination it would input it  when I would save that location. What good is that after you are already there? That is no good to me. After I returned home I returned the item to the store and got my money back.It will be quite a while before I buy another one. I will wait until the technology catches up to where it will accept most all addresses and I can get one for a reasonable price. I would hope that the more expensive ones can be more useful. I certainly wont buy another one unless I can try it out first
SAVE YOUR MONEY. I WISH I WOULD HAVE READ THE EARLIER REVIEWS ON THIS MOUSE. HAD I DONE SO, I WOULDN'T HAVE PURCHASED THIS ONE. NO SENCE IN KICKING A DEAD HORSE BUT I CONCUR WITH ANY AND ALL OF THE PREVIOUS COMPLAINTS. FRUSTRATION IS THE WOR
Mount is too small for my handle bar. The thing wouldn't even fit around my handle bar; I had to zip-tie it on.  A waste of $$.
NOT FOR TEXTBOOKS. I wish I never bought this because it was not sturdy enough for textbooks.  If you put a textbook on it and turn the page, it collapses and or tears the page.  I wouldn't even use this for a notebook.
Had To Be Replaced After 2 Months. I'll begin by saying that I definitely do not recommend this hub. After about 2 months it completely malfunctioned. My pc no longer recognized devices that were connected via the hub. The indicators also stopped illuminating. I replaced it promptly with a D-Link DUB-H7 and have not had any problems. The D-Link has been in service for about 7 months.I'll end by saying that I definitely do not recommend this hub!!!!Good luck with your search..
Don't waste your money - it doesn't work. I have an HP Photosmart 8450 printer that is bluetooth capable with the HP bt300 bluetooth wireless adapter.  However, that particular adapter is no longer available, so HP told me I could use the bt450.  NOT!!  I purchased and returned 2 of them.  My computer 'saw' my printer for about 20 seconds - that's it.  After that it was no longer visible.  I tried everything - including making a ton of changes to my system (as told to me by a couple of their techs), only to have had my entire system just freeze up.  Thank goodness for system restore.  HP is too proprietary with their products. They just don't like to "play nice" with other manufacturer's products.  I won't purchase any more HP products.  Their technical dept. was not helpful at all!  Buyers beware
You can do better... I bought this for my god-daughter for Christmas.  I actually thought that I was ordering a Schoenhut baby grand, but for some reason I ended up with this.Anyway, it is not a piano.  It is a toy, it doesn't sound like a piano, it doesn't play like a piano.  It just looks like one and that is about it.Metal rods for the sound, doesn't sound good at all.  You hit one key and get multiple notes with very little clarity.  And I have to pound on some of the keys to get it to work well or have a clear sound.All in all, I really wish I could return this item get my money back and spend the another 40-50 dollars on a Schoenhut or other good brand of childrens piano.  But the day I received it and checked to see if I could return it I could not.I got ripped off.  By something else people, this technically isn't even a string instrument...and definatley won't really help in teaching a child music in my opinion
No Cash Back Here!. Please don't expect to get the cash back from this purchase as promised!  To date, I've been denied twice.  The second time they said the U P C number was invalid. Only, it's the original U P C barcode!  I was meticulous filing the paperwork, yet they state, "All required products were not submitted."  Meanwhile, I have phoned AMAZ0N to lodge a formal complaint.The product itself is average.  I've used better and worse.  That said, it's definitely not worth the full asking price
May be good but you have to get it working first... What company would make a router that you can set up wired and then take it wireless and it won't work. Incredible. My experience mirrored exactly that of many who have already written. It just shouldn't be this way.When I finally did get it working, after tweaking some settings, and spending all freaking day on the Linksys forum it had virtually no signal in a very modest house.I do have to say the their forum is top rate. The people were very helpful and very friendly and a great place to turn if you don't want to go through scripted support suppliers.Product wise a very disappointing experience. People wise very good but long gone are the days that you put up with an inferior product because the people are so good
Love affair gone sour. I have owned this little hub for at least a year. I have an older PC which came without USB, so I added a PCI adapter. I soon realized that I needed more ports, and more convenience, than the two now located in the backplane of the PC on the floor.I shopped around, and this item looked appropriate. As for the short cord, I solved that issue by getting a USB extension cord at the same time. Besides solving the immediate problem, this approach gave me the option of moving the hub to my laptop at some point, and using the extension cord for some other purpose.For a long time it did exactly what it was supposed to do. I attached an external hard drive through it. I used it for a compact flash card reader, and a digital camera. I connected an inkjet printer. Everything worked, once the drivers were installed and everything was set up correctly. (This was all with Windows 98 SE.)But after a while, things started getting less reliable. The system would tell me that various "drives" (on the flash card reader, or the external hard drive) were not available. Or the digital camera would not stay connected to its software. And the printer even started disappearing.Playing with the cables and connectors would sometimes bring devices back to life, and eventually I deduced that there was something wrong either with the connectors themselves being too loose, or with wiring inside the device. Either way, it has finally become a big problem, and I am shopping for a replacement.Most of the devices I connected were self-powered, that is, they did not need to draw power from the hub or the PCI channel at all. The hard drive, camera, and printer were all powered by batteries or AC adapters of their own. And the flash card reader, which did draw power from the hub, used to work fine. It does not matter what combination of devices I try, sooner or later the connection goes bad.It is of course possible that there's something wrong in the PC -- but that would not explain why things are improved by messing with the connectors or the hub itself. So I have to recommend against buying it. I suspect it is discontinued and that this advice won't be necessary for much longer, but I want to prevent somebody from the bother I've been through, just in case
No Mac Support, No Dice. Having grown up with Rand McNally maps on seemingly all my classroom walls, in the family Atlas, etc,. I was predisposed to like the Magellan GPS system. However, the lack of even the slightest intention to support the lonely but (from what I can gather) creative and pro-technology 2.5% of us that use Mac's, back it went. I guess those guys are still living in the world of the classroom wall, despite their venture in GPS land. Tom Tom and/or Garmin here I come
Not up to the Task--Miserable Tech Support. We had this printer less than 6 months before the cartridge slider began to jam. We would get an error message, and then would have to reset the printer and reboot the computer to get it to work for a short while. We finally ended up sending back the printer on their exchange program, after I had to ask to speak to a supervisor. (The tech support wanted us to install a free ink cartridge when I had already installed several before contacting them) We have had the replacement printer less than two months and are already experiencing problems again. The ink cartridge is pooling ink under the cartridge rest area in a very heavy amount, and the cartridge slider again has begun to jam. Tech support has had us clean the plastic tape that pulls the cartridge carrier back and forth, and for now the unit is working. We still haven't addressed the excessive ink leak which probably has something to do with the jamming problem. I hope HP reviews comments on this website occasionally. I would like them to know I have believed in their printers and used them successfully for years, but my latest experience has caused me to reexamine that position. Also, HP tech support is very difficult to deal with at best. I talked to several overseas tech support reps that spoke almost unintelligible English. I am one consumer willing to pay a little more for a product that is well supported. HP are you listening
Do NOT buy this router!. First of all, I am a dyed-in-the-wool techie.  I design products like this in my job.  I know what every single one of those "what the heck is that?" settings in router set up screens are.  So I do take a bit of umbrage when one reviewer called the many (most) who have had trouble with this router "MORONS".Yes, I got it to work.  It will work right out of the box IF used with most pre-N wireless cards and, definitely, if they are Linksys pre-N cards.  That covers about 1% of those who would buy this router.  After three hours of tweaking a dozen plus of the settings from default, I succeeded in getting it to "hand-shake" with b and g mode cards most of the time.  It would still randomly lose the IP requiring rebooting everything.  Not something my customer would accept nor would I sell.Some of the techie specs are a long way from what Linksys claims. Linksys marketing obviously wrote the specs and ads then engineering tried to design to both.  They failed.  A non-techie spec important to everyone is range.  It has 20% the range of an old b mode Linksys router I had sitting right next to it.  Adding encryption dropped range in half again!  The wired router portion of it works out of the box, no adjustments required.  But you're buying this for the wireless function.Yes, I could have tweaked some more and probably managed to get it stable enough to live with.  But Linksys didn't used to be that way.  I used to buy only Linksys considering my time worth too much to putz around with unreliable equipment to save my customers a few bucks on hardware.  This is the third Linksys router in a month (the other two were g mode) that have been unstable or DOA.   Then why did I buy this one?  It was on sale and I wanted to give Linksys one more chance before they lost my business for good.  They've now lost it for good.  I exchanged the router for a Netgear and it worked right out of the box into a network running both b and g mode wireless network cards.  Plus it was a lot less money.Has Cisco ruined Linksys?  Got me.  Did all the good engineers cash out?  I wouldn't be surprised.  Are they rushing unfinished bug-filled product to market to meet quarterly profit numbers for Wall Street?  You bet!  I'll stick with Netgear and Belkin from now on.
Poor quality control--bad product. I received my first unit and noticed the low volume noise problem.  I returned it to the repair site at my expense and received a replacement--red sauce on the speakers and the CD would not even power up.  Obviously, no one had even looked at it.  I received a second replacement unit--CD would not even spin and I received "error message".  Called again and they are shipping my third unit.  This is very frustrating as the repair service has very poor quality control and the unit has significant problems as I am not the only one with these problems
Use caution with this item. I have two of these things.  When used with a car lighter outlet, they cause my Legend Cx to overheat.  When used with a true 12v. power source, they work fine.  Most cars actually run at about 13.6 to 14 volts instead of 12.  Garmin is trying hard to help me resolve this, but in the meantime, be aware that certain units may experience problems with this system
Think about it. This appears to be a great product, however, I haven't had mine long enough to find out.  This will be the second time I have had to send it back because of a faulty FM modulator.  At ~$30.00 a trip (Electronica wants it back in 7 days and the bill to send it there is on you.) any savings you might get from ordering online, is eaten up fairly quickly.If you require an FM modulator for your vehicle, I would recommend purchasing local so that you can return it without the hassle, and price.
Please Read this before you invest  your cash in this product!!!!. First off let me state for the record that I only buy Sony , but I have toadvise you against the purchase of the bean walkman. I purchased one in March 2006 and returned it September 2006, as I had purchased replacementinsurance and was able to return it because it broke. It is hard to turn off and the usb port cover always pops open, not to mention the headphonesalways pull out. The FM receiver is hard tune in the daylight as the screen is invisiable. Save your self the hassel!!!!!
gamble. My card started with 10% corrupt pictures from Nikon d200. After a few months it is no longer recognized in the camera or card readers. Emails to transcend have gone unanswered
PAINFUL. I purchased 2 sets of these earphones for a 2 hour flight. My husband and I both used them, and we both took them out of our ears after 20 minutes. They were great at first, but after 20 minutes they really started to hurt our ears. The inside of my ears were so sore I couldn't even adjust the earphones when they started coming out, that's how bad my ears hurt. I had the foam pad over them too, and it made no difference. I would not recommend these
Not so happy. I bought this product thinking a Sony drive should be a good one, right?  Wrong.  The drive claims to be 18X, but even with high-quality expensive media, I couldn't get the drive to burn any faster than 8X.  To make things worse, I was looking forward to the fast CD read speed so I could copy music to my iPod.  It turns out iTunes will not play CD's from this drive.  I can use Winamp, MusicMatch, and Windows Media Player to play CD's from this drive, but not iTunes.  What a disappointing product
Nice potential, not all good though. Awesome product if it worked well.I have a 5th generation iPod, the 30gb iPod Video. When docked and playing a movie, or scrolling through a title, the radio makes funky noises out of the speakers that are really annoying.I dislike that if I set the Volume at 6, and wish that when the alarm goes off in the morning, it would stay at volume 6, and not bump up to Volume 15 which is quite loud and dont wish to wake everyone else up in the house.Just gets bad feedback off of all iPod functions and all.I got it for christmas and I dont even use it, it sits on my desk with a piece of paper covering the extremely bright blue screen, with my iPod in it charging. I use my cell phone for my alarm in the morning.-Andrew Foxwel
Nice, small, but EXTREMELY fragile. I own the 2GB version of this drive. It is tiny, but still fits nicely into a USB port, but I have noticed a serious problem. The flash stick itself is actually smaller than the casing it is in (you can see it on the bottom). I have been very careful with how I store my super stick and careful in inserting and removing it from USB ports. Regardless, the plastic shell around the memory stick is breaking across the width at the top, and the bottom corners of the plastic shell (that go into a USB port) have started snapping off in little chunks
Missing Items Too!!!. Received my camera today (05/22) and all items are not in the box.  I am missing hand strap, Ni-MH batteries, Battery charger and Cradle adapter.  Worse part is I DID RECEIVE A USB CABLE BUT IT IS NOT THE RIGHT SIZE AND DOESN'T FIT.  This is very frustrating.  How do I get the missing items
Expensive Rabbit Ears. This is no better than the old fashion rabbit ears. The "powered" portion of this antenna does NOTHING to boost the signal. I found this item to be almost useless since it does not pick up any analog signals very well at all. As for the digital signals, you will have to adjust the antenna whenever you change the channel.If you spent your hard earned money on a HDTV, why are you going to buy a junkie antenna?
painful set-up, poor range. Having had very good luck with two Belkin G routers, I thought that the G+ would be a no-brainer. NOT. First of all, the router would not install at all from Windows 2000. I called customer support, and after interminable waits and two tech support people (who were very polite), we finally decided to install from another computer with Windows XP. All seemed to be going along fine--the router installed--but did not allow me to set a security password for the wireless in the regular set-up process like their G-router setups did. Only when I logged on wirelessly, it let me set a password----meaning had any of my bandwidth-thieving neighbors tried to log on before me, it would have been THEM setting MY password (which would have effectively locked me out of the wireless!). It also came without a user's guide (though that is listed on the box contents) and the CD-ROM also was supposed to have a user's manual, but when I clicked on the "user manual" tab, nothing came up! After all was said and done, I did manage to get my XP system connected, but the Windows 2000 would not connect even with a cable (it was working fine on a Linksys direct cable before). Overall--a very painfully long installation that was not Windows 2000-compatible (or perhaps a firewall problem), items left out of the package, and a big step down in ease of installation from their G router. And if that isn't bad enough--the signal strength was no improvement over the Linksys G router I was replacing. Belkin, sorry--this product was below your previous standard. This one's going back to Best Buy
Locks up the computer. Total waste of money. Once plugged in it locks up the computer. Got in touch with Seagate, and apart from an e-mail welcoming me to the Seagate "team", I've heard nothing since.TigerDirect, with which I've had good success up to now, will not accept a return - must go through Seagate, so be careful if you buy from Tiger
almost good. I must have really funky shaped ears because the right ear is just about perfect and the left is just painful. Add to this the fact that the cord is about 13 inches long (exaggeration) and this set is a bad deal
Reminds me of a quarter horse race. Great performance but only for a short time.  Don't get me wrong, I loved this dvd player (when it worked).  It had great features, crisp picture, and good control over the search and pause features.  Yeah, there were some downsides to it that have already been mentioned through other reviews.  For example, when listening to music or other media, it only shows things like "directory", "root file", and folder numbers.  Makes it hard to browse...but I found this to be of little inconvenience.  The main problem was that it broke within a year.  Now I'm not unrealistic.  I know that electronics wear out, but I also know that most last much longer that this.  I'm not expecting it to last as long as my VCR, a JCPenny's brand we got during the 80's...but one year?  What a rip-off.  Just as others posters mentioned, I got the infamous "H02 Error" message and then nothing.  Didn't even bother calling the company since the warranty was only 90 days.  I already knew what I was going to be told.  My advice...keep looking.  With this many similar reviews, there must be a design flaw with this model somewhere and it's not gonna get fixed by a company whose only concern is the bottom line.  Do some research 'cause when it comes to pricey electronics, you wanna hold out for a thoroughbred
computer brain blew it. Computer Brain sent the wrong product right before Xmas so the present that I intended had to be shipped back and it is Jan. 16 and I am still awaiting the right one. So I don't even know what the product is actually like yet
Truly frustrating!. Like a '54 XK120, this thing is beautifully styled, and utterly unreliable. It randomly loses connectivity to both my Intellimouse, and my MS USB keyboard. 30 - 90 secondes go by and then it reconnects, sometimes to redisconnect within seconds, sometimes it'll stay connected for half an hour at a time. Weirdly, it seems to maintain connectivity to the Monitor - though often as a generic display rather than as a flat panel Samsung. I used an IOGear two port KVM successfully until I got the third machine going, but I got sucked in by the style. my mistake! I give it 0 stars for performance, 4 stars for style, average, 2 stars
Typical Monster Cable rip off. Despite all the bad reviews I read for various Monster Cable products, I bought one of these cables.  What a mistake.  The RCA plug flanges kept working loose shortly after purchase.  The first time I tried to gently squeeze them back together, one broke, only to reveal the cheap metal used in the connector.  Now it's loose all the time.  So I'm replacing it with a Belkin AV20500-15 cable, available right here at Amazon for about 1/4 the price of Monster.  Thankfully I chose other brands for all my other home theater cables (digital coax, optical, speaker) .  Avoid all Monster Cables.  All overpriced, all mediocre quality.  Do your research, you'll see I'm not alone.
"PLEASE WAIT" (flash....flash....flash.....). Great features, unreliable POOR design. OK, lets not mince words....it sucks!Hey, I'm a big fan of Panasonic, but this unit appears to suffer from many problems. Right out of the box, the DVD player hangs and only a complete restart will solve the problem, also the remote has a bad habit of completely freezing which requires you to cycle power to the unit. Not good. But my biggest complaint is the alleged "One Touch" recording...this feature does NOT work at all, and the alternate method requires a PhD. in Rocket Science so this unit is going back to the store. Not to mention how slow this thing is. I've never seen any home electronics device that prompted you to "WAIT", well I cant wait to get my money back.To Panasonic's credit, this player/recorder has all the right features and outputs like HDMI and Optical audio, and the upconversion to a digital display is quite good, even from old VHS tapes that appear to be near DVD quality. However, this machine is very buggy and the manual (as I have read) is absolutely worthless. If you can follow it, then you don't have to take the Mensa entrance exam, you're already in
I Am Thoroughly Disappointed over the Confusion of Operation. I have been a loyal Sony product user for over 30 years.  However, their Compact Disc Recorder RCD-W500C/W100 is the most confusing piece of equipment to operate that I have ever seen.  It reminds me of apparently the latest manufacturing thought about anything high tech- incorporate as many bells and whistles as you can to accommodate everyone's tastes.  For instance, why does it need a remote?  How many people will be cutting CDs from their easy chairs?  I have a call in to two friends who I hope can rescue me from my dilemma
Waste of time!. Program would not work, updater would not work, tech support was not available because of overload.
Buyer beware. Worked great for about a year of very limited use.  Visit the manufacturer's website forum for issues with this product.  Previously purchased models failed on or about the same date.  Something about the 2.4Ghz transceivers messing up.  I cannot confirm the date because I was inbetween gamming rigs at the time, but I tried to use this joystick after getting my new rig fired up and was set back when I encountered the calibration issues.  There is no fix for this and if you hadn't put in the warranty card, then your out your investment.  Go with wired untill the manufacturer takes some responsibility
Returned It - Screen Went Blank. I really wish this product had been better designed because I loved the fact that it's a tablet style and it's a lot easier to hold and watch, especially when you are sitting in tight spots like a bus or plane, and space is at a premium.Alas, my unit had several problems and I decided to return it.  The biggest problem was that after about 3 days of use, the screen went blank on me when I turned it on.  I had to fiddle with the battery pack and plug it into the A/C adaptor to get the screen picture to come back on.  A few days later, it happened again, and then again.The other big problem was that it really didn't like playing DVDs that I burned myself.  It played regular store DVDs well, but when I played my own burned DVDs, whether it was DVD+R or DVD-R, the player's picture would constantly freeze.  It just couldn't handle the slightest imperfections on the disc, and since home-burned DVDs aren't burned in the same fashion as commercial DVDs, this player was just too sensitive to successfully playback home burned DVDs.The final concern was the fact that it didn't come with any kind of case, and there is no way to protect the screen while transporting it.  I was very concerned that over time, the screen would get scratched and damaged.  You would seriously need to consider buying a 3rd party case for this unit.Design-wise, the tablet style is a great idea and I hope that more manufacturers start making tablet style units in the future
Ritz Camera SUCKS. I'm sure this product is fine. But don't order it through Amazon, through Ritz Camera. They just cancelled my order without warning, having listed that the bag was available. Freaking idiots
Don't buy from Philips!!. This system is quite sleek, easy to fit in a cluttered living room.  Assembly takes about two minutes.  The instructions are very clear.  The sound is amazing, especially when you put on your favorite loud, bass-heavy film.  Why then do I give it one star?It skips.  Like nobody's business.  At first, my wife and I thought it was the disks we were putting in as many of them were scratched.  But then we put in new disks.  No difference.  When exactly does it skip?  Impossible to tell.  Sometimes a little.  Sometimes every frame!  Sometimes it'll tell us that disks are bad.  Then the next time we put them in they magically work -- until they skip.So I called Philips and they said that not only would we have to pay for shipping, but they could not guarantee that they would fix it, and it would take up to a month before they'd ship it back.Save your money!  Buy from someone else
The REAL Truth!. Alot of the reviews I read here are misleading. Most of these complaints are related to not knowing how to use the GPS correctly. However certain problems do exist with the RoadMate 3000T / 3050T units. Here are some pros and cons I have observed.First, the Pros...1) Better than reading a map (LOL).2) Easy to Read Screen and Large enough to handle big fingers with few mistakes.3) Built-in MP3 player.Now, the Cons...1) Unit often freezes up. More so after having updated the Firmware!2) You can have EITHER music OR directions (not both at same time).3) Photo Viewer is TERRIBLE! (Don't care much about that feature though).4) Cannot use an FM transmitter to play music/directions over the radio due to severe interferrence.5) Maps are NOT as accurate as they would have you believe!6) NOT GOOD for commercial drivers, as excluding certain roads is a PAIN!Apples for apples, I think the TomTom would be a much better buy. I have been quite disappointed with the Magellan RoadMate 3000T. The price has dropped significantly since I purchased mine, so if you want to resell the unit later, you will lose alot in the investment.You ONLY get the car charger for it, so you might want to buy the AC adapter (especially if you want to transfer music onto the SD card). The GPS unit uses a different format on the SD card (memory card). Once you put it into your GPS, it can't be used with your computer, digital camera, etc. You have to use the Magellan software included with the unit to transfer MP3 files onto the SD card.You will most likely also need the external antenna for it to avoid freeze ups. Finally, the map software is out of date and Magellan has yet to update their maps.Save yourself the headache and look elsewhere
Terrible Sound, Garbled and Disappointing. I design consumer audio professionally. I bought the iGroove for premium sound in my bedroom, to listen to while my girl and I are getting it on. This system sounds terrible with my iPod. I tried a variety of different music. The differen levels are all garbled, there's no crispness at all, no distinction. The bass is fuzzy even at medium volume levels, forget about high volume, it sounds awful. The remote is oversized and shaped oddly, it's curved and doesn't sit flat. I am going try and return it. Really not a high end stereo at all. I'm going to try something else.
WARNING : Long delays in shipping. I ordered the Aquos in mid-December. The shipment has been delayed twice, first through the end of January, and now more recently through the middle of February. Given that the date has slid twice, extending the delivery of the item by more almost two months.Perhaps the unit is fine... but the practice of repeatedly delaying shipments is annoying at best, and deceptive at worst
Love the way it works, but be WARNED... I'm on my third Mighty Mouse in 3 years. At $50 a pop, I expect them to last longer! Inevitably, after about a year or so, the trackball stops scrolling in one direction or another. I tried cleaning it with compressed air, but no luck. I always admire the MM's functions for 12 or so months, and then BAM! It chokes
Doesn't work well with XP. If you thought the Windows 2000 install and performance were bad wait until you try it under XP!I should have spent the extra dollars and gotten a decent card.:(
dreadful. I have had the T5 now for about a year. I am surprised that I put up with it for so long. It constantly freezes. The web program is buggy. Today I lost all my settings. In short what you read here is correct. This is a flawed product and should have never been released. Stay away from it
Good and Bad. There is problem with this TV and I had to return. The price is lowest of somewhat 30-40% of in-store and free delivery. service of Amazom is excellent, fast, free and professional. I will stay with Amazon as long as they have the one I want
Just a comment about the different circuits. This is not technically a review, although based on what I've read I do plan on buying one of these.  However, I found something on smarthome.com which will inter-connect the two main circuits that most houses have, thus allowing devices like this (and X10) work from any outlet to any other.  This is not yet tested by me, but is at least promising.Device is here:http://www.smarthome.com/4816b2.htmlExplanation is here:http://www.smarthome.com/images/4816dgm_big.jp
I bought this instead of the iPod. This is a huge regret for me. The iAudio is more an expensive portable hard drive than anything else. The navigation sucks, there is no way to organize your music etc.(like, the songs are all there but they aren't seperated by artist/album/etc. it's just a big list. as someone who has over 20 songs, that's a problem!), the provided program is full of glitches and despite many calls to customer service, I could hardly get anything on it, the folders would appear on the drive of the iAudio, but it would not let me open them. I consider myself to be a computer savvy person and if I can't get this machine working for me, I doubt the average person could either. After a month of frustration, I gave it to a friend who could not get it working either, past getting a mess of unorganized songs on it. 2 months later, it broke and customer service was no help at all. Currently it's sitting in a drawer somewhere.what a waste of money!Yes, this iAudio LOOKS attractive and offers more than the iPod for less, but it's not worth the hassle.the only positive thing I have to say about this player is that the audio quality is great. But it doesn't make much difference on a player that doesn't do what I need it to!I am not a fan of apple, but I got a second hand iPod for cheap and I am very happy with it. I also purchased the creative zen visionM and I love it!!! (I am kind of obsessed with music) After A LOT of research, I'd stick with creative or apple.don't make the same mistake I did
Don't expect the A1500. I ordered the A1500 and received the A1000. I opted not to send it back when I read the other feedback on this page. I didn't want to lose shipping costs and not get reimbursed (as the other fellow did below). Amazon is usually pretty good, not this time, and not on this product.If you want, you can call them at:1.800.201.7575 (Toll free, US and Canada)1.206.346.2992 or 1.206.266.2992 (Outside US and Canada)1.877.586.3230 (Canada only)UK customer service: +44.208.636.9200
Cheap, but cheap. This is the lightest mousepad I have ever felt. Doesn't even sit flat on the table
DO NOT LIKE THE CHARGER and 8 HOURS. First of all the charger takes !!! 8 hours !!! to charge 4 aaa batteries. I do not know if you have kids but that is terriable. So you push the slider up and down to squeeze the batteries into it's jaws to charge it. Then ... gravity comes into play. There is hardly any friction to hold the charger slide in place. So after about 15-30 minutes the slide, well of course, slides down and then it stops charging. Yeah.. now i get to start all over again. So in other words check out their 15 minute version... yeah that's right 15 minutes.. not 8 HOURS.***************** RANT STARTED *****************Why would they even make an 8 HOUR version.. sigh never mind .. back to the store.. all yeah and of course the down put in big letters "ONLY 8 hours" like the other "ONLY 15 MINS" live and learn...****************** RANT OVER ******************
Coby TV350. The price was reasonable, the screen size is great, the few channels that did come in had a great picture and the sound was great.My only problem is it automatically tuned into channels so my local channels did not all come in. Only the spanish stations came in clearly and I do not understand spanish. It does not have a dial for you to go to channels and that is a big draw back seeing our 20 yr plus old portable tv has that feature and all my local channels come in on that one. This TV would be perfect if they can make one with a dial for channels and not auto tune
Don't buy, mine didn't last long. I bought a PV-D4744 about a year ago,It worked for a while, now it won't read old disks and,even with brand new disks, the chance ofit being able to read the disk are not good,about 90% of the brand new disks I have triedit won't read.I will never buy another panasonic product again.
Just plain bad. Reading Erik Mann's review above was just like living my own experience. I bought these headphones for their noise canceling ability, attractive price, small package and easy folding capability. All these features definitely get a big thumbs up from me.The sound, however, is very disappointing. I used these with my 5G Ipod and took a good lot of time to try and adjust the sound various ways so I can enjoy it, but to no avail. The Ipod stock earphones sound a LOT better, even on a plane if you lock them into your ear by twisting them so the pieces of wire shooting out of the ear buds points up towards your temples.I guess I will just keep looking for better cans
Buy Warranty From Sony. You can buy your sony TV from any place you like. Then call Sony and buy the extended warranty directly from Sony. a 5 year plan for $1000-$1500 item is only $149.99 plus tax
This phone does NOT work with VOIP. This phone seems to have great potential, but does NOT work with VOIP (Internet phone). This is a known issue - perhaps because Siemens sells a VOIP-adapter version of this phone (you use that phone with the built-in VOIP adapter). I loved the color display and the phone number list was easy to work with and easy to use. Drat that it wouldn't work with my VOIP setup (which is why I bought it). Also - watch for steep return / restock charges - it was cheaper for me to give this phone as a gift than to return it
Glitchy software and more!. ---VERY IMPORTANT----The software supplied converts your mp3/wma files to an alltrac format only usable on your computer and your sony netmd!!! (I think they do this for copyright purposes, but what if your mp3 files are ones you recorded in a studio yourself?!?!?)I do not recommend this product as the software railroads you into buying from their site(connect.com) in alltrac format, which is the only format the netmd players play!!! Thats right, it does NOT play mp3. It does NOT play wma files. It only plays files converted into alltrac form!
Where is it???. I ordered an HP printer, which does not come with a cable, on Oct. 17th.  Based on advice in the ad for the printer, I ordered the subject cable, also made by HP, in the same order.  The printer shipped on the 19th of October.  An ink cartridge for the printer arrived Nov. 15th, but I have not received the cable.  I do not know how to rate the printer or the cable and I have already lost 30 days on the printer's warranty!!  I sure would like to be able to rate the cable and printer.  To date the order is 2 weeks late since it's estimated shipping date of Oct 28 - 29.  I have not even been able to find a way to contact customer service to see if there is going to be a long lag time, in which case I would know that it would be wise to cancel and order from someone else.  Bottom Line:  Not satisfactory at the moment
The worst brand I've tried. I've got a LITE-ON DVDRW SOHW-1673S burner (Revision JS02) in my fast G4 Mac running OS X Tiger and burning with Toast Titanium 7. Although my burner is nominally 16X-capable, it only burns at about 6X in my setup, probably due to the slow (ATA 33) bus it's on.I've used a number of different brands of 8X and 16X disks, both +R and -R, and have had a verification failure rate of less than 2% -- so few, in fact, that I often don't bother verifying video DVD's anymore when burning TDK or Maxell discs. (I always verify data DVD's, since errors in those are not ignorable.) But with Memorex, I've gotten about 20% failures, including a couple of aborted burns! In one case, the disc had a blank band between two burned ones!The Memorex discs I'm referring to have Manufacturer ID "CMC MAG, AM3". According to videohelp.com, these are sold under at least 7 different brand names. The reviews there are rather mixed, which is not IMHO good enough!I have not, BTW, have had any problems with the Memorex DVD+R discs I've tried. But I stopped using them because one of my players won't recognize the +R format
Regrettable purchase. From all outer appearances this item looked like it would function well in my office. The day I received it I eagerly placed paper in it only to question if I was using it correctly. I discovered that this item requires an hour or so to warm up before it will shred anything as fed.But here are some suggested ways to work around it: First, you can leave paper in the mouth and it will sit inactively for 40-60 minutes before it arbitrarily shreds. The noise level is comparable to a sink disposal. A second alternative is to feed the paper from bottom up and hit reverse because that is the only working function available from the get-go.
Why Pay $650 for something I can get from my Cable Provider for $8 a month?. I am surprised there are not more reviews on how ridiculous the prices are!  I really did enjoy the ease of Tivo from Pre-HD days and wanted to go back from my Comcast HD DVR.  I then saw the pricetag and, unlike the other people... I can NOT justify spending that much money for a DVR!  It is definitely not worth it for something I get for $8 extra a month attached to my cable service.  Yes... i do love the Tivo interface and searching, but I will not pay that much for it.  It feels like business suicide for Tivo to want to sell that product at a ridiculous price.  Knock $700 dollars off that retail price and I might change my mind
Geko only!. Overpriced piece of plastic that will only fit the Garmin Geko unit though the description mentions that fact nowhere
DO NOT BUY. Tried customer support to resolve a hook up issue and did not return emails for five day, have almost given up
Low Range. I left behind my D-link DWL 132 (108 mbps) when I was on vocation which work great for me over a year. After read all the reviews, I decided to give this one (WUSB54GS a try).  The signal range was dispointed (D-Link DWL132 have much better range).  Setup with push button with Linksys Secure Easy Setup is easy with Linksys router, BUT I lost connection on my other Laptop PC which is not Linksys wireless adapter. I go back to re-setup my laptop than this adapter on desk top lost connection because of changing setting on the linksys router. One way or another, I spend 4 hours still unable to make both adapters work with Linksys 54g router.
Poor. The top half of this spool were terrible.  I ended up throwing every one of them away.  It kept reading "bad media.
A Waste Of Money. I was given one of these as a gift. I replaced it in my Dolby Digital DVD to Amp signal path. It sounds no better than the cheapo Wal-Mart video coax cable I had been using for a couple of years. Then I thought, isn't that the whole reason to go digital in the first place? 1's and 0's don't know the difference between Oxygen-free copper and regular wire! Save your money
Defective product. I am returning it.  The bluetooth signal keeps fading in and out every 45 seconds or so.  When it worked, it was great, but not a single song went by without the dead air problem for 3-4 seconds then it would reconnect and start playing again.  I contacted Logitech customer support and they sent me an email 3 days later with suggetions about a completely different product.  Then I called long distance to them and stayed on hold for 14 minutes only to be told that it sounded like it was defective and I should return it.  Not very satisfying customer service experience; I had high hopes for this product; I may order another one later and see if my luck is any better then.
Worst mouse ever. I just bought my first iMac. I love the computer but hate the mouse (it came with it). It is always jumping all over the screen. It is hard for me to control it. The scroll function works okay and the design is nice and sleek. I am definitely going to get another mouse before it drives me nuts
the Mouse From Hell. I purchased this mouse 5 months ago and it has been total frustration ever since. The buttons on the sides are not easy to access or use. But most frustrating is the way the two main buttons perform. When I clicked on them they end up double clicking which caused a lot of problems with retrieving my email messages. I know some may be thinking I haven't configured the settings correctly but I went over it several times and couldn't get it to work right.  What's even more frustrating is the support at Razer is non-existent. They never responded to my email questions which I submitted several times before giving up. I ended up buying a Wacom Intuos 3 tablet which works amazingly well and gives me so much more. I am a commercial illustrator so it is the perfect mouse/pen tool for my needs.Don't buy this product. I would have given it a negative 5 stars if that were an option. At $43.65, it's a steep price to pay for the frustration and a complete waste of time and money
Not a good buy. I bought this item despite the bad reviews it had gotten because I absolutely adored the styling.  When it arrived, I unboxed it and checked everything.  Clock worked great, radio was so-so, but not a big deal, and the CD had good quality sound for the price.  Though I found setting the clock and preset stations a bit complicated for my tastes, overall, I was still pleased.  The next week, the radio quit working--still no big deal--since I bought it more for the CD and alarm clock.  The week after that, the alarm quit working.  Then this week, the CD quit as well.  I can't even get it to power "ON."  Of course, by this time, I had long ago discarded the box, so returning it was out of the question.  What I am left with is perfectly functional clock that keeps great time, but nothing else.  Save your money and don't get sucked in by the design the way I did.  They clearly need to make some MAJOR improvements on the function before I will EVER buy another one of these!
Good Luck with it. I spent hours on tech support with Linksys, and was told to send it back: the product was defective.  So I did, and Amazon gave a refund.  I lost only my time
Don't buy from Philips!!. This system is quite sleek, easy to fit in a cluttered living room.  Assembly takes about two minutes.  The instructions are very clear.  The sound is amazing, especially when you put on your favorite loud, bass-heavy film.  Why then do I give it one star?It skips.  Like nobody's business.  At first, my wife and I thought it was the disks we were putting in as many of them were scratched.  But then we put in new disks.  No difference.  When exactly does it skip?  Impossible to tell.  Sometimes a little.  Sometimes every frame!  Sometimes it'll tell us that disks are bad.  Then the next time we put them in they magically work -- until they skip.So I called Philips and they said that not only would we have to pay for shipping, but they could not guarantee that they would fix it, and it would take up to a month before they'd ship it back.Save your money!  Buy from someone else
Noisy!. A nice idea that doesn't provide adequate audio quality in my experience. The unit would pick up "noise" from the operation of my CD player, resulting in a background squealing that was especially audible between tracks. In addition, on trips I had to frequently flip through the various frequency settings to avoid conflicts with radio stations
Very Fragile F-Pin connectors. Beware, the F-Pin connectors are very fragile. Even a small amount of tug applied to the connectors will pull it right off the cable. For the amount of money I spent on the Monster Video  Cable, they should have been stronger. I picked a cheap length of cable at my local hardware store and the connectors were virtually indestructable. Monster Cable should manufacture a more robust product
Doesn't stay tuned!!. I was so disappointed in the fact that the guitar didn't come with any picks or a strap- I didn't realize it when ordering, or I would have ordered that, too.  My son had trouble holding it without the strap... when I finally got around to buying those items, I showed the guitar to my brother, who has been playing for 30 years, and he said it didn't stay tuned.  once you play a chord, it goes out of tune.  I'm not thrilled, to say the least
USA Mapsend TOPO 3D with Magellan Explorist XL. I puchased the USA Mapsend TOPO 3D (98061109) to use on my laptop. My goal was to download route/track and waypoint data from my Explorist XL GPS to store and view on my computer. There was trouble from the start. My GPS only has a USB cable, while the software will only read from a COM port. Once I got the data into the computer, I had to translate it so the software would recognize the format (these were supposed to work together!). The detail for tracking through the woods was totally unacceptable. Also, I have to always have disk 3 installed before I can even run the program. There was supposed to be an option to not require the disk during installation. I guess the program ignored this... The Explorist works great! If possible, I would return this software and recommend to anyone NOT to use it!!
Do NOT buy any of the Belkin Wireless Products!!. After several hours of telephone support conversation, Belkin told me that there was simply too much interference in my apartment to allow for a connection between my Belkin Router my Belkin wireless notebook card. Mind you, I live in a one-bedroom apartment in Queens, and the distance between the router and the notebook is no more than 40 feet. On top of that, I don't have any cordless phone. So there I went and bought a range extender to place between the router and my laptop. Since then, I have spent several hours of technical support ON A WEEKLY BASIS, because the way they tell me to configure the connections and the wireless bridge just doesn't work! Oh, how I wish I had just bought a very long internet cord instead...
i'd love to review this product. but i ordered it and amazon sent me an entirely different product. I got ordered the leapfrog and received a generic product. pretty deceptive actually. not happy
Don't be fooled. I bought this speaker about one year ago from Best Buy, very disappointed.  The sound quality is terrible, I have two presence channel $15 KLH speakers that sound better than this.  No high end speakers have cabinets made of plastic, hence why Bose is not  high end.  After a year of misery on my ears, I've replaced this with a Paradigm center speaker that only cost $20 more, and the difference is not even comparable.  Do not buy this, or any Bose product at all.  Save your money and buy Paradigm, B&W, or similar, most of the time they cost a little bit more, but sometimes actually less and are actually high end speakers, and you will get your money's worth
Total junk. After about 4 months of using these cables they are starting to flake out.  My screen will start flashing and one of the colors will go completely out.  Have tried hooking it up to different inputs on T.V. and used different sources with same symptoms.  If you dont mind jiggling the cable every other day then these may be for you
A piece of garbage. Four months after purchase, the Receiver misfunction and shut down. It was impossible to contact Sherwood Electronics which had no service Centers in the State of Wisconsin. Therefore the warranty was not worth the piece of paper it was written on. Check out  a Sherwood Service center in your state prior to purchase
Don't buy this stuff. The sound quality is really awful!! I gave it a two star, because I give credit to the other aspects of the product like the casing, the gooseneck support, and the fact that it is easy to turn it back on when it loses its power.  HOwever, the most important thing is the sound quality, which really is very, very poor
Batteries Not Included. The description advertises no power cord required, and the box has large print stating "No AC Power Needed".  Smaller print however notes that if you want the caller-id (which isn't back-lit) to function, that you need to provide 3 AA batteries.The last thing I wanted was one more thing that required batteries
This junk died and erased 100 images. The is perhaps the lease durable item I have purchased in 40 years. It lights up just fine, and it is a reassuring led gold, but it refuses to do anything with my xd card. It worked just fine for 3-4 days, then erased about 100 photos, all of them irreplaceable. Cheap yes, but Cheap Junk.
It Does not Work with Macs. They totally misrepresent this product. It does not work with Macs. I feel cheated and lied to by Memorex, shame on you
There's a reason its discontinued!. This unit is absolute garbage.Forget the moronic design, lack of features, etc. The actual construction is terrible.  The allegations as to battery life are utter fabrications, the buttons don't always work, but, get this, IT SPONTANEOUSLY ERASED ABOUT 20 GIGS OF MUSIC.Pretty sure Toshiba got wise and took this junk off the streets.  Anything you buy has been sitting in a warehouse somewhere since 2003.Spend the extra cash and get a reputable unit. Toshiba does not know how to make media players
Do not buy this PDA!. I got a whole six months use out of this unit before the battery would no longer charge.  This is apparently very common for these units.  Check out some of the forums around relating in particular to the battery problems.  I checked with Palmone and it will cost $120.00 to replace the battery plus shipping (they will only replace at Palm).  What is the point in buying a $200.00 unit if you have to spend another $120 after six months? You are better off buying a Zire.
Utter Disappointment. My Adesso Cybertablet was very disappointing.I had to have the computer-guy come in to install the software.And the only way he could was by downloading software that wasn't even given to us with the tablet.But even after that, the software would have to be reinstalled every time the tablet was plugged in to a different computer.Over a short period of time, the tablet started to lag and it would draw messy, grainy, and skipping lines. It was almost impossible to make one line with one single stroke of the pen.To accomplish one grainy line, you would have to use the tablet very, very slowly.In no time at all, the mouse was broken and the pen was doing wierd tricks with my photoshop. If you pressed the pen down against the tablet surface, a gigantic pattern would appear on the page. The pattern resembled a slinki.I thought it was really wierd.Eventually, the pen's cursor would get stuck up in the top-left of my screen, near the applications menu. So I couldn't do anything.I am now in the process of e-mailing Adesso to ask some questions about what I can do.
Worked fine--for a month. I bought these as a birthday present to myself to replace a set of well-used Monsoons which finally bit the dust. I'm not a gamer or an audiophile so I thought these were just fine for what I wanted--decent sounding, small enough to fit on my desk, and a name brand. And they were all that--for a month. I used them before bed one night and the next afternoon I went to use them and there was nothing but a loud buzzing coming out of the left speaker. I fiddled with all the cables and connections. Nothing but buzz. I turned everything off & on, still nothing but buzz. The right speaker seemed to work just fine. In frustration, I turned off everything til the next day. Fired it all back up and the buzz was still there. Thankfully, I had kept the receipt and packing material and returned it within the 30 day time limit. I had the opportunity to upgrade them for the newer Bose Companion set and I chose to go with a Logitech system with small speakers and a subwoofer I can hide under my desk.  In the month I'd had these Bose, I'd decided that I was really still a kid at heart and I missed the thumpa thumpa of my Monsoon subwoofer. I never got that from the Companion system
broke twice!!!. I bought this 18 months ago and while I had some problems with the set up, I got help from the store where I bought it.  It has really nice sound, but it has a serious problem: not once but TWICE, when my children inserted DVDs in the player they would NOT eject!  Since no one could service it locally (I went to 3 places, and each claimed they could fix it but then later admitted they couldn't since they would have had to open it up), I had to send it to Bose.  That cost a lot, plus Bose charges a minimum of about $240 (I forget the exact amount) to even look at it.  Now, the exact same thing has happened (this is the second episode)!  They say you can repair this easily but I went through the recommended procedures with a Bose technician over the phone and it didn't work.   There's NO WAY I'm sending this machine back to them; I'm getting something else!  Any recommendations?  Finally, lest you think the kids are somehow to blame, let me note that they work daily with other DVDs, CD-roms, CD players, and personal computers and have never had any problems with any of them.  I normally don't like having to pay extra for a warranty, but if you insist on getting this product, I'd recommend buying it from a place that sells it with a warranty
Bad Compatibility. I have the older, larger version of this product. However, it uses the same software. The labels are great and the spring device that is used to apply the labels is great, but the software is awful. There is no direct Macintosh program; rather there are templates. They were written for old versions of software and really don't work right. The Windows side includes an actual Print Shop-style program which works awfully. If you do get this, make your own template on AppleWorks or PowerPoint
not a solid item. I didn't like it, first I asked for a nano ipod holder and when I send the sellers a mail asking if my nano will fit, they never answer... now I have it and of course is to big to hold my ipod nano... it isn't for "all ipods" like the web said, and it isn't a solid item also it brokes easily
Most Difficult Piece of Hardware to Install. I agree with most of the reviews regarding the difficulting in installing this wireless access point.  I am no IT expert but have quite a bit of experience in installing and administering networking equipment in a large corporate environment.  I was able to get a connection without any encryption but could not get the device to work with WEP or WPA.  I eventually had our IT consultant configure the device but it took him about four hours.  He had previously recommended that I go with Linksys but I didn't listen.  I regret that decision
Beautiful but..... This phone is lovely to look at BUT...1. The numbers on the touch pad wore off within 6 months.2. The touchpad completely ceased to function within three years of very light use.( it was a second phone used maybe 1- 4 times a week)3.  The receiver cord is EXTREMELY short.
Fast service, but "compatible"?!?. I ordered 3 original Canon Twin Packs (ASIN: B0001Z5YTG), and received 12 "compatible" cartridges. A fast service is useless if you can't get the right items to the customer. I complained via Amazon, and I am waiting for the seller's reply
Total P.O.S.!. Don't waste your money on these things! You can get a far better pair of headphones for comparable or less money spent. These things are nothing more than a marketing scheme to sell a look and fashion accessory. These headphones sound terrible and are very uncomfortable. TOTAL P.O.S.!!
If you plan on listening to music with this, think again. Two big problems with this DVD player.  One, based on experience I stupidly assumed all DVD players display elapsed time while playing disks.  This one just shows the track number.  If you want to know how much of a movie you've watched (to mentally calculate how much is left) you're out of luck.Two, this thing STINKS for playing music.  Regardless of how your CD is encoded, it will pause two seconds between EVERY TRACK . . . which can be irritating when you're playing a CD of allegedly-continuous music, like an opera or the White Album or Dark Side of the Moon.  I called Toshiba to ask about this, and they were confirmed this.  They said ALL Toshiba DVD players pause between music tracks, and that basically I was stuck.So, I'm warning you, and frankly I think they should print a warning on every box.  (Something like "Won't play music properly!  Just going to make you mad!")  And I'm not buying Toshiba again
BEFVP41 and Microsoft PPtP Servers. As you may have read elsewhere, this router has a problem with the GRE protocol used by Microsoft for their PPtP server (see Alan Bryant's May 27, 2004 review).This will stop you using it with the built-in PPtP VPN client/server which is provided with Windows 2000/XP.Here is the text of a complaint I have submitted to Linksys..."I am attempting to operate a Microsoft PPtP server behind a BEFVP41 (firmware 1.41.1). I have PPtP Pass Through enabled and port 1723 forwarded to the fixed IP address of the server but the router refuses to pass the GRE protocol used by Microsoft (Protocol 47).In answer ID 737, you suggest forwarding port 47 presumably in a belief that this has something to do with GRE. It does not and is therefore not the solution to this problem. GRE does not use TCP/UDP port 47, it is 'Protocol 47', something entirely different.It seems that the the writer of answer 737 has neither tested this scenario nor has a true understanding of the nature of this problem.I and others have investigated this problem extensively using protocol analysers at the client and server ends and can only conclude that the present version of firmware in the BEFVP41 (1.41.1) is incapable of handling the GRE protocol correctly.Can you please advise when a fix will be implemented? This is seriously devaluing an otherwise good product.I also suggest that you amend answer 737 as it is misleading and will frustrate others less versed in IP protocols than myself."I await a reply from Linksys as I write this review.Having said all that, if you have no interest in running the Microsoft PPtP server, the BEFVP41 may do everything else you require.It functions okay as a basic NAT router and it's stealth capabilities are good (Steve Gibson's 'Shields Up' reports 'True Stealth' as long as you forward port 113 to a non-existant host).The in-built IPSec tunneling works well. I am using one to provide permanant tunnels to a number of BEFSX41's very reliably.The web interface is a little odd at times but it does do the job reasonably and you do get used to it eventually.To summarise:A reasonable basic NAT router.Very good stealth.IPSec tunneling works okay (at least to other Linksys products).Microsoft's PPtP server will NOT work with the current firmware version.
not a good subwoofer. this subwoofer is weak, very weak. My computer subwoofer did a better job than this. When the bass was heavy, the subwoofer cannot handle the bass, the air blow out from the subwoofer make noise rather than giving a solid bass, abd it ruin everything.
NO ANTENNEA FOR THE TV!. This portable TV sounds great except they made a few mistakes in the design.  They don't tell you that there is NO ANTENNEA nor that the TV will not work without an antennea!  The portable DVD player is great. THE TV IS HORRIBLE.  When we did get an antennea the tv worked but we went to numerous stores and the all the antenneas we found were big and bulky plus had to be hooked then unhooked when we wanted to put the unit away without an antennea sticking out to get broken.  DON'T BUY THIS FOR THE TV!  We ended up purchasing a different product that had the antennea built in.  This one was a total waste of money
RECEIVED BAD SERVICE. AMAZON FAIL TO DELIVER ITEM WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME.  THE ITEM FAIL TO ARRIVE AND THEREFORE WE NEVER RECEIVED THE GOOD
bad sound - frequency response is horrid at the low end. I'm looking into returning these things just a few minutes after opening the box.I plugged them into my bookshelf stereo and everything sounded horrid.I'm no audiophile, my bookshelf stereo is a $150 unit, and I'm pleased with it.I don't expect bass out of these ceiling speakers, but I honestly had a hard time getting any sound out of them at frequencies lower than 1000 Hz.I had to put my ear inches from this speaker to tell that it was on at lower than 300 Hz, and I noticed serious attenuation of sound until well over 1000 Hz.  It sounded like I was only getting about half the sound out at 600 Hz.  It seemed to keep up just decently above 2000 Hz, though I didn't test too much at the high end.The advertised range for these speakers is clearly very far off.I don't think that this problem could be fixed with a sub woofer.  These speakers simply suck.  Even at $15 apiece.methodology: I used the program "NCH tone generator" to play specific frequencies through my PC into the stereo and out to my speakers.  Left to one of my bookshelf speakers, also 5.25", right for one of these audiosource ceiling speakers.  By switching the balance back and forth on the stereo to play either my bookshelf speaker or this new one, I could detect a very serious volume drop at all frequencies below 1 kHz, getting worse as it got lower, and almost complete silence below 300 Hz.
Looks like a nice little print server, but may not work for you. This print server will not work with all kinds of common printers that you may have.  I bought the unit to unhook a particular printer from a PC that it's hooked up to and make it a shared printer.The printer I wanted to hook up is required to be hooked up to a Windows PC to function.  This is apparently a common configuration for a printer where much of the smarts to run the printer are in the PC (especially for cheap ones which was the case with the printer with which I planned to use this print server).  Definately check out the Netgear support site to make sure that your printer will be compatible.You may be better off to just buy a new printer that has an embedded wireless print server.  Printers keep getting more and more capabilities and the prices tend to drop as well.  The printer manufacturers make the real money of the ink cartridges
Junk. My old 2.4ghz radioshack phone works better.  The range on this phone is pathetic.
BAD CABLES. I HOOKED UP THE CABLES AND THEY WORKED ONE DAY. THEN I HAD TO GET RID OF THEM. BAD CHOICE ON MY PART. IT WOULD HAVE COST ME MORE TO SEND THEM BACK THAN WHAT THEY ARE WORT
not for all ipods. this product does not hold the smaller ipods well at all, only should be bought by people with the bigger model ipods.
Great Shaver but missing advertised refills. Received shaver and it is wonderful. So smooth and improved over my existing Braun that I thought it was not cutting. But it was!Received shaver as promised but the advertised refills were not in the shipment.
BEWARE of Kingston REBATES!. Beware of KINGSTON rebates!Of course, I hope your experience would differ, if you were to buy Kingston product(s), but mine was terrible.I bought a Kingston CompactFlash card that offered a $50 mail-in rebate.  I promptly (as in, the day AFTER I received the item delivery) went to photocopy my rebate certificate and UPC code and sales receipt; then sent it all on its merry way.  Yes, I was well within the rebate period, both for the purchase AND for the postmark date.  My purchase was a valid retailer (think HUGE online e-tailer).The rebate REQUIRED sending THE ENTIRE ORIGINAL UPC label, which was like the entire outside package for my CF card, about the size of 1  business cards when flattened.  No problem.About TWO MONTHS later, I get a letter saying "your rebate request was denied because you failed to furnish the appropriate ORIGINAL UPC code as required by the rebate offer."Well, now  WHAT?  I can't RE-SEND the original (it was already in their possession).  I called, and they insisted on repeating what the letter said.  I re-sent my PHOTOCOPIES and they said a photocopy is invalid proof of purchase.After another 6 weeks of pursuing this, I figured this is their scam.  They simply wouldn't honor the rebate.  And without the ORIGINAL UPC in my possession, I couldn't really submit to their requirements.If you're looking for a RAM upgrade, I'd suggest you look at a quality company like OCZ (the BEST!), or Patriot, Geil, or Corsair.  If you're looking for a value Flash Memory Card, I might suggest SanDisk.For one, Kingston does NOT make the best products, they are VALUE-driven products.Two, there are competitors to Kingston with just as good or better value-to-performance ratios at the same prices.Three, Kingston will not stand behind their customer as I have experienced.I urge you to, please, be cautious of Kingston and their rebate scams
Bad product!!!. I bought this SD card from J&R Music last week. I thought I would get the authentic card from PNY so I just used the card with my camera and threw the package away. A couple days later, I took the card out to put all the picture in my PC and realized by that time, the card is only 1GB. I contacted the customer service department and they said they won't deal with me unless I have the original package (which I don't anymore). They adviced me to contact the PNY store. So I did a little research and found that the exact same card is from Toshiba (Model:SD-MO2G) and J&R or whoever their suppliers are just put a PNY label on it to sell it as a PNY. If you don't believe me, just type Toshiba SD-MO2G on Google and the picture is exactly the same except for the little lable. I really don't care if the card is made by Toshiba or PNY as long as it is 2GB, but it isn't. And that would make it really tough to recover your loss from any party (PNY, Toshiba, or J&R). I already contacted my credit card company for a dispute. Little advice for everyone, STAY AWAY FROM THIS PARTICULAR CARD AND J&R STORE and also check the card validity with your computer as soon as you get the item
Targus does not issue drivers for my Viewsonic v37. It worked OK for 2 months, but the KB kept on falling off. When I complained, I was told that the KB was not compatible with my Viewsonic v37. Yet, it was advertised as compatible with the VS PPC 2002. The worse came when I upgraded to PPC2003 and the KB stopped working. I contacted Targus and was told that they do not have plans for upgrading their KB drivers for this VS PPC.I do not believe that this should be permitted. If you sell something, stand behind it.Very disappointing
Very Uncomfortable!. The sound quality of these headphones is ok.  There was a pretty constant buzz or hum in the background. I like the feature of using regular batteries, no dying and waiting for them to recharge.  The headphones are very uncomfortable!  The self-adjusting strap is constantly pushing down on my head and pulling up on my ears.  I couldn't wear them for very long without them giving me a headache
DID NOT WORK. I WAS VERY UP SET THIS WALKMAN WAS A GIFT. IT COST $90.00 6 MONTHS AGO. IT DID NOT WORK RIGHT I COULD NOT GET GOOD RECEPTION AT ALL IT WAS COMPLETE STATIC ON ALL STATIONS. I THINK IT WAS DEFECTIVE BECAUSE I ALWAYS BUY SONY PRODUCTS, AND THEY WORK GREAT I STILL HAVE THE WALKMAN MY GRANDMA GAVE ME 11 YEARS AGO AND IT STILL WORKS. BUYER BEWARE DON'T BUY WALKMANS FROM AMAZON ON LINE. I SUSSPECT AMAZON MAY HAVE SOLD ME SOMEONE'S RETURN ITEM. ALTHOUGH I CAN'T PROVE IT. YOU'LL BE BETTER OFF GOING TO TARGET OR BEST BUY. IN CASE A REFUND IS NEEDED. SHOPPERS CHECK ALL YOUR PURCHASE'S WITH IN A 30 DAY PERIOD SO YOU WON'T GET STUCK WITH SOMETHING THAT DOES NOT WORK. IF I DID THAT I COULD HAVE GOT A FULL REFUNDGOOD LUCK FRIEN
Not for Ford Expeditions. Well, I thought that this was going to be the answer for getting a decent XM signal, but alas-foiled again. Ford Expeditons(2004 and up...) have a built in antenna in the rear passenger side windwow. The XM transmitter is not powerful enough to send a decent signal all the way back there to a lousy antenna idea. Anyway, I peeked through Crutchfield and used their compatability engine for my vehicle-it said that this item would work w/o and special equipment. I took apart the dash, peeked at the radio antenna input and was surprised(well not really, it is a Ford after all...)to find that Ford uses a proprietary antenna plug. So far, I am unable to find an adapter that will let me use this adapter in my vehicle. Hence, the 1 star. Nice concept...too bad I shelled out $25 bucks for something that doesn't fit my vehicle
Scratched my Macbook. As long as its on, it will prevent scratches, but its tough to get off, and that act can scratch your laptop.  It scratched my Macbook when I pried it off.  The guy at the Apple Store who snapped it on a Macbook beause I requested a "demo", couldn't pry it off, and after 10 embarassing minutes, he called a colleague over, and they pried it off together.  And, to be honest, this makes the MB look ugly - kinda like putting a veil on a supermodel.  ;--
satalite code. cannot find the satalite code for my direct tv, the other codes work for the tv,vcr and dvd. please solve this proble
PRODUCT KNOWN BAD BY MANUFACTURER!!!. I purchased a copy of Magellan Worldwide Basemap. I installed it in my computer but it would not run. When this also happened to a second computer I installed it on I contacted Magellan Technical Support. After asking me about the relative positions of stickers on the back of the CD jewel case I was told I had a defective disk and was offered a replacement in 4 to 6 weeks! Since I will have returned from my trip to Europe before the replacement arrives the product is totally useless to me. Don't buy this product until they have "good" disks available. The good ones have the stickers on the back of the jewel case in an "L" configuration, on the bad disks the stickers are parallel
Does not work in a DSL phone line. I received this phone and it looks great.  We connected it to the line where our old 900mgz phone is connected to and it brought down our DSL line. I contacted Motorola and they explained their phone can not be connected to the same line my computer is connected, it will not work with a DSL line. I am very disappointed a brand new telephone not compatible with DSL is illogical.  I am returning the phone, we only have one phone line into the house the old phone works just fine
The darn thing locked me out the first time. This product needs serious help.  What use is it if the first time you try it your computer is locked and won't open no matter what you do?  Don't buy this product.  It's too unreliable.  Fortunately, the thing was locked to my desk, and not to a library table.  Hopefully, I can spend twice what I paid for it to get the damn thing back to where I started
Horrible Customer Service. This was given to me as a gift.  The owner's manual and rechargeable battery pack were missing. The case was the wrong size and the DVD player did not fit.  All I wanted to do was exchange the kit for one that was complete.  When all the 3 different stores told me they were out of stock and did not know when more were coming in, I wrote the company hoping to get the problem fixed.  I never recieved a response and will never buy a MINTEK item again.
RUN, Run  Forrest; Run fast, take it from ME!. .............Is not functional................ .If you are reading this then you are Gump-y! And, you and I must be family.First, I love Amazon; they are the consistent type of e-merchant.  And that's good! But but but but, why?:  would a designated (by me) upper "echelon" merchant like Amazon carry this Sandisk 2gb compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768). It simply is not functional information that I stored Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768) is gone, or not readable. I am surprised that Amazon did not catch-on/up with the problem.The product won't retain any info then I had to store less and less information on the card, so that my info is able to stay on the card another 6 hours. I decided to contact Amazon, they were very shortly, and cordially sent me a replacement Sandisk 2gb compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768), with the paperwork for returning the original Sandisk 2gb compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768).Then I got something that:A.	Did, have the shape of a 2gig Sandisk CF card;B.	Did, have the Sandisk label that says Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768)......;C.	And did have the original shiny factory Sandisk package. None-being the-less 3 different computers later and 2 hour had passed couldn't recognize what is inserted into the CF reader.D.	The brand new replacement card I got with the original factory wrapping, that's brand new and untouched and unrecognized by computers. One may safely assume (pardon the facetiousness), Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768), is yet to be recognized.From Amazon, twice in the mail, I got a Sandisk 2 GB compact which flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768). Both cards I received had a problem. And therefore, it is safe to assume that Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768) production have a major glitch. I mean, the memory card cannot be used for memory purposes. I have to yet see what or for what, other than memory, can I utilize a memory card. I beg your pardon, but in essence I am trying to imply that... The Sandisk products were a joke! :-).Being the consistent e-merchant that Amazon always been, Amazon agreed to return them. This was not a surprise (coming from Amazon).In essence, I strongly urge any person that makes a living, and tries to have some fun with their hard earned living to:1.	Not be fooled. If you see Sandisk, run away as fast as possible,2.	You'll lose it all in a matter of a day or so.3.	Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768) is not compatible with data storage! or even short transfers of data, from a home computer to work.4.	Spend the extra.... on an alternative brand.5.	That's the only way you'll get a CF card that is correctly labeled; and, serve intended functions.6.	I strongly recommend, as well as urge individual who is thinking of  getting that "other" brand of 2-giga...... cards to make sure do so:................7.	Use Amazon only, and don't be fooled by any other e-merchant who's not as high of an echelon as Amazon....... Amazon!8.	Had it not been for Amazon, I would have lost all I paid. :).God bless Amazon for their extreme timely tentativeness, I also pray for Sandisk, so that god renders it with the power to accomplish the purpose they stick onto their product line.God bless, and keep on shopping.
Failed in a few months. Installed it to my Nissan Xterra. First it was working fine, but after a few months the channel switching knob stopped working (twists free, but the channel number remains 1), making the whole thing kompletely useless
one word: Annoying. f*cking annoying. There are _NO_ controls on the radio itself, you _HAVE_ to use the remote. Your remote battery died? too bad, the radio is completely nonfunctional without the remote (can't even turn it on/off). Also, aux-in is a headphone jack instead of the standard red and white on all stereos, you you have to buy a special (headphone plug on both sides)cable to hook up a computer or ipod to it
Manufacturer's Defect. The CD changer would not open to receive the CD's. A call to the Company's customer service resulted in their decision that it must be a manufacture's defect so it was returned to the supplier for a replacement. The replacement is in progress.  Attention from the supplier has been satisfactoty
Run don't Walk away from this thing!!!!. I have tried three of these MyBooks and each one has the same problem...file errors.  The problem is it turns on and off by itself and if you leave it on and then decide to copy files over it will copy the files and then won't allow you access to them!  It is a real piece of garbage.  Western Digital should be sued over this useless, hack of an external hard drive.  Don't trust your data to this because you will be sorry
This phone sucks!. I've owned Uniden products in the past and have been generally happy with them, but quality control really dropped the ball on this one. I bought this phone because it was reasonably priced and had the 5.8 GHz technology. I was gravely disappointed. I can't sit 2 feet away from the base without getting mind numbing static! My old rotary dial phone can do better than that! DON'T BUY THIS PHONE
Don't Buy It. Consider another receiver before buying Delorme's. Delorme's receiver works only with their software (the receiver does not conform to any standard, unlike most other receivers.) The Delorme software itself is not very accurate. Just in looking at the area of a few blocks surronding my home, I found 3 instances where a facility was shown as being located several blocks from where it actually is - but Microsoft had no problem locating the facilities properly. Finally, with the receiver I have, even after the device as been initialized, Delorme's software sometimes is unable to find it. (I suspect that is because the cable on the GPS side sometimes pulls slightly out, but fiddling with it doesn't seem to accomplish much). Real irritating out on the road, as it is when you find one of their printed atlas has been misbound and lacks several pages
Uncomfortable, Light on Bass. OK, the only headphones that I can compare this to is the sennheiser hd500 which I paid $100 for in 2002. My dog chewed the line and I had to buy another set, so I decided to go with the Zalman Surround Sound based on reviews I read starting when Doom 3 was released in 2004.Sad to say, these headphones don't have ANYTHING on the Sennheiser HD500. The Zalman headphones are very uncomfortable becuase they sequeeze my ears too tightly. My ears star hurting after 15 minutes whereas with the sennheiser hd500, I could wear the 24/7 and gain only comfort. I'm used to heavy, intense bass from the Sennheiser headphones where I can crank up the volume and be blown away. With the Zalman headhones, I find myself lowering the volume because everything is so high-pitched.The surround sound aspect are almost completely identical between the two, imo.Also, the left ear muff was detached when I opened the box & putting it back on has been unsuccessful. I'm supposed to be able to just twist it on, but even though nothing is broken, it wont fit back in place.I'm disappointed with these headphones & I only bought them because of the reviews here. I guess most people haven't heard what it's like to listen to games and movies through qality headphones.Alas, I guess I can only blame myself for this purchase.My advice for anyone looking for genuine quality: Skip these and go elsewhere
Does not live up to its promise. I had high hopes for this, but three major flaws contributed to it being returned:1) The display is extremely bright. I ended up covering it with a t-shirt, just to be able to get to sleep.2) Even though bright, the display cannot be read unless you are close and at the correct angle.3) The sounds quality was surprisingly bad. I knew this wasn't a fancy, expensive model, but the sound was unbearably distorted, especially at lower volumes (e.g. you want your ipod music on in the background). I though my ipod battery was dead at first, but apparently the speakers on this unit are just that bad.So it fails as a clock, and as an iPod player. I never tried the radio function, but even if that was excellent it would not have saved the product from being returned
Weak power supply. Antec has dropped the ball on this one.  My power supply came in DOA.If you read reviews there are lots of reports of short life on power supply.The case weighs 25 pounds.  It is a major hastle to uninstall everything and mail it back to California.It is a pretty case with some well thought out features, but not worth reliability hastles
Philips gives poor customer support!. After we used and liked the phone for two weeks the handset developed severe static.  When we contacted Philips' customer support they agreed it was a defective handset and gave us an address to which we could return the handset for repair or replacement.  Our poatal service record of receipt indicates they received it on October 21, 2006.  For more than two months we made numerous phone calls, spoke to many different persons, and were promised callbacks that never came.  Finally a "supervisor" assured us that a handset was "in the mail."  That was more than three weeks ago.  We plan to keep trying to get some satisfaction, but meanwhile we have lost any shred of confidence we ever had in this manufacturer.
Guaranteed to break. I bought one of these and it broke the first day I used it.  Amazon replaced it for free, but for no good because the second one broke soon after I got it too.  Very poor laminator.  I went to Office Depot and bought one from Xerox and it works much better
Good features, but for one serious flaw ... I bought this receiver to use as a preamp in my system.  I based my decision on information as stated on the Pioneer web site, and the attractive price compared to some of the other options I considered.This receiver does have a number of good features, but has one serious flaw.  It will not display on screen status messages for daily operations, like volume and sound mode, unless you have a Pioneer display, and run another special cable from the receiver to the TV (As a side note, Pioneer needs to understand we want to run LESS cables to our display).  That means you only get to see the simple set-up screen on your non-Pioneer TV, which you will probably use when you first set up the receiver, and very infrequently after that.  (The set-up menu lets you set things like assignable inputs, and audio calibtraion.)Sounds like a small deal, but in many home theaters, including mine, the electronics are not in the line of site (mine are in a closet just outside the theater with an infrared repeater system controlling everything.)  This not uncommon, many have thier electronics isolated like me or behind cabninet doors, and it means I have no idea what the volume is, what sound mode I am using, or anything beyond the set-up menu unless I go into the closet. BAD, BAD, BAD!  This seems to be a marketing ploy by Pioneer to get you to buy Pioneer TV's and projectors, and it is beyond stupid.  If this was not the case I would rate this receiver much higher, but it is a SERIOUS flaw.  It makes using this unit extremely tedious and difficult.This limitation also means, if you have mulitple displays, I have a plasma TV and projector in my theater, you need to run thier special cable to both displays, and both have to be Pioneer.  Again, I have to say BAD, BAD, BAD!The other features are as stated on the Pioneer website, but they are lying when they say this unit has on screen display, and this will be a major drawback for users that do not have the receiver in the line of site when using thier systems, unless they have a Pioneer display with SR+.  (Oh yeah, your Pioneer display has to be also be equipped with SR+, thier way of linking the two units.  If your Pioneer display is not equipped with SR+, you are again out of luck.  Did I mention this is BAD?!)25 Feb 2007 - addition to reveiw:I called Onecall and they will take unit back, but at 15% restocking fee, plus paying for shipping both ways.  While Onecall really did nothing wrong (Pioneer is lying about the OSD!), it is one of thier vendors and not the customer's fault either and the customer should not pay for this kind of fraud.  Buyer beware from Onecall, thier customer service on this one was not good
Incompatiblr. Incompatible with my iBook; Apple has such a phobia against providing 'System Requiremts' for their accessories; finally found the list on a vendors website.  Amazon did not have this list.  One has to do major resarch to find the info Apple won't provide !
A real disappointment. My #1 use for this scanner is for public safety scanning - I have family in law enforcement & we like to listen in.I own a Uniden BC248CLT, & for years I owned a BC80XLT handheld. My BC80XLT was recently damaged & needed replaced. I ordered this BC72XLT, & am ready to return it also. It is not anywhere near the quality my prior Uniden handheld was. My 80 picked up as well or better than my 248 does here at home. This 72 picks up maybe 50% of the traffic of my others--whether in the house, outside, or even right in town. The buttons on this are awful, too. I have to go through multiple steps to do things that took only 1 button press on the 80. The reception, though, is my biggest concern AND complaint.  I never had to purchase any extra antenna or such for my other Uniden handheld to get the better reception. Also, the volume, even at max output, is only "normal" listening level--so if I am in a noisy environment, I cannot turn it up to hear it better. My old BC80XLT had much better volume.An additional warning - Uniden's Support has gone down the toilet. I thought Uniden was a company that would at least *acknowledge* my complaint, and maybe even have some suggestions of a better product - all I got was an auto reply that I should hear from Customer Service in 2-3 business days--and then I never heard a thing. I checked my support question on their site, and it was marked "closed." Good luck
Didn't Work. Apparently, the remote control I got was defective - and the only solution was to send it back.  I chose to get a refund rather than a replacement because I was so disappointed
Incompetent garbage which cannot be shut down. Pro ---* Compact enough to fit into a jacket pocket, yet opens to a comfortable working size with full-sized keys, including a number row.For those who do serious number entry to spreadsheets, this is decidedly a deal-maker over the Stowaway keyboard which requires alt-key combinations to access numbers and symbols. The full-size keys require no revamping of typing habits as does the miniaturized key spacing on the Freedom Keyboard.To my knowledge, there is no other folding bluetooth keyboard on the market at the time of this writing which has *both* full-size keys *and* a number/symbol row.* The bluetooth connection is clean, lag free, and accurate.Con ---* The software for gaining a connection is a bit cumbersome, requiring entry of a checkmark into a box with each use, and then an access code on a second screen with each battery replacement (see below).* Flimsy Locking Mechanism / Not Usable on a Lap.The manual tells us that a lock is provided to keep the opened keyboard flat "while on your lap or on a non-flat surface".This "lock" is a single piece of wire about the thickness of an undone paperclip, which travels 7/8" along the top of the board from the left half into the right.Even when locked, the keyboard doesn't lay flat, and with the center of the board hovering over the empty chasm between the user's legs, held in place only by one thin piece of wire, the two halves bend to an increasingly exaggerated "V" shape after any amount of light-handed typing.HP could have saved themselves the trouble of this useless bit of cosmetics. A user must find a solid flat surface to type on, such as a book. And of course, when sitting on a flat surface, the lock isn't needed.* The manual correctly tells us that one reason to use a wireless keyboard is to "enjoy the convenience of a wireless bluetooth connection up to 7 meters away from your...PocketPC". Unfortunately, the designers ignored this consideration when conceiving the non-removable cradle.A quick look at the Freedom Keyboard's pull-out cradle offers HP a lesson in how to do it right.* The keyboard ships with no case, as do most other portable keyboards with non-rugged exteriors. The attractive brushed metalic exterior of the folded case thereby scratches easily in a jacket pocket containing loose change or a set of keys.* It doesn't turn off.Yes, you read that last bullet correctly: You can't turn this thing off. There's no power switch.The button in the upper right corner of the keyboard is to establish and disengage the wireless connection between the software and the handheld; it's not a power switch.What this means is, even when folded and not in use, even when appearing to be dormant, and even when the software shows that there's no bluetooth connection,  the keyboard is still eating your batteries.The automatic "sleep mode" simply disables the wireless connection; it does not power down the keyboard.Two weeks after putting in a fresh set of batteries and not using the keyboard, you'll return to find them dead. Not the coolest way to walk into a meeting full of executives expecting you to take notes.The only way to power down the keyboard is to open the battery cover and remove the batteries. The battery cover, need I add, breaks easilly.Sound unbelievable? Go to the major websites dedicated to PocketPCs, and do a search of their forums using the keywords "bluetooth keyboard". This is not a case of a know-nothing customer who needs to read the manual. The manual, such as it is, makes no mention of an absent power switch.For the mobile user then, in addition to the keyboard itself, one need also travel with something stable to rest the board on, to have something to prop the handheld against if distance is desired, to carry the batteries separately, and to re-enter the access key into the software after reinserting those  batteries.Although the folded board will fit easily into a jacket pocket, the additional loose paraphernalia negates any usefulness of this mobile keyboard for the mobile user.Add to that the marred exterior and bent lock after minimal use, the HP iPaq keyboard is worth perhaps 1/3 it's $100 retail price, and then only if a consumer absolutely requires the full-size keys and number row.How HP ever expected anyone to sit still for this kind of idiocy eludes me.All potential buyers of iPaq handhelds should take this keyboard as a reflection of what, if any, emphasis HP places on quality of design and the integrity of iPaq name.It reflects also the degree of respect HP has for the intelligence of their customers. One might easily forgive a negative design attribute like the non-removable cradle, or the parsimony of not including a case. One might even forgive the useless locking mechanism.But when HP is either too dumb to include an on/off switch, or they expect us to be so dumb to not notice or care, then I must seriously doubt the usefulness of other products bearing the iPaq name.If HP is content to offer this marginally useful toy to consumers for $100, then I cannot believe enough magic exists in the world to suddenly make them sharp enough to produce a sophisticated device like a PocketPC for $300-400.My next handheld upgrade, I'll probably stay with Fujitsu-Siemens Loox (I currently use a Loox720, a truly excellent PPC), or maybe go with a Dell Axim. I won't even consider an iPaq.The HP Bluetooth keyboard is quite simply an offense to any consumer with even the vaguest and most forgiving sense of quality.Those at HP responsible for protecting public perception of the iPaq brand name should be truly ashamed of themselves.
Piece of junk. I had to return this boombox as soon as I opened it because the CD player didn't work.  I got the new one in a few days and it worked for 3 days, then stopped.  It is heavy and cheap and not at all user friendly.  I have never purchased a product online that was such a huge waste of time and money.  I realize that it is an inexpensive, low-end item. Even so, it didn't even meet minimum expectations
BEWARE SAMSUNG DLP DESIGN FLAWS!!!. Consumers should be aware of serious design flaws which exist in Samsung DLP televisions.  Cooling fans and color wheels are highly susceptible to failing.  (As a non-techniocal person I should have no idea what these parts are, but alas, I bought a Samsung DLP)  Expect these to fail within 1-2 years.  Expect to pay approx $400 to replace the color wheel and $200 to replace the colling fan.  That is, if your service technician can find them in stock anywhere.  These parts are commonly in a national backorder because of the very high failure rates.You should also expect the lamp to fail sooner than advertized.  Many people need to purchase a new lamp between 1-2 years, and some more often than that.  The lamp costs approx $150-$250 depending on your model, but you should be able to replace it yourself without too much difficulty.  This cost will be in addition to replacement costs for the color wheel and colling fan.  Please remember that these maintenance costs are recurring, and you will have to fix them again in another 1-2 years.While I was very satisfied with the quality and performance of my DLP, my color wheel failed very early.  I called tech support to report a grinding noise, and was told to "turn it off", wait 15 minutes, and turn it back on like this would fix the problem.  After doing this for a while, the color wheel finally failed, actually shattered!  Now I am out of warranty, and Samsung wants nothing to do with me.  I have even tried ordering the part myself from two different online vendors, and they are both backordered indefinitely!  It has been 6 weeks and they have no estimate for when this part will be available.  Samsung cannot even give me an estimate when the supply of replacement parts is expected to meet demand.  I have had my TV for 18 months, and apparently there is a national epidemic of them breaking at the same time!I have a 42" Samsung Plasma which is a beautiful set along with a 26" CRT.  Both are wonderful products, but Samsung is selling DLP LEMONS and will not stand behind them.  DLP is a great bargain up front, but a maintenance NIGHTMARE!  You will pay in the long run, and by the long run I mean every 2 years.  If you still want to purchase a DLP television, PLEASE BUY THE EXTENDED WARRANTY!  IT WILL SAVE YOU A TON, BUT YOU WILL STILL HAVE TO WAIT FOR THE CIRCUIT CITY TECH TO FIND PARTS WHICH MAY TAKE MONTHS!I expect Samsung to abandon their design flaw riddled DLP sector, and focus on their beautiful plasma line.  Expect DLP prices to drop even further, but please...LOOK BEFORE YOU LEAP
Buy the Cheap ones!. Using the component input on your TV can make a huge difference in picture quality, but the differentce between the lower priced monster cables and the most expensive monster cables in not noticeable. Save yourself $50 and buy the cheap ones
Doesn't  really work. Didn't seem to make the FM reception any better, except for the fact that when I was trying to get the classical station from NYC, to my horror, I got loud and clear, the local Christian station. Not what I wanted. The AM reception was completely gone; I went back to the antenna which came with the Onkyo tuner, which sort of works. I didn't have much luck with the "pin the dot" tuning system. More gain just made it more static-y (with more pain).Bottom line will be an attempted return to CC; we'll see how that goes
Arrived in Pieces. They would be very wonderful jewel cases except they must be very flimsy because more than half of them arrived broken
It's ok, nothing too special. It's ok, nothing too special. There are better ones in the marke
All delome products. Designed obsolescence is the word that best discribes Delorme No support!!!!!!!!!
Avoid It. The quality of sound and manufacture of this unit is unacceptable.  It was made in China.  Although it has an attractive design, the outside is made from the same inexpensive plastic that my $29 Panasonic DVR is made from.  The recorder has two modes, SP and EP.  SP is the highest quality, but playback still sounds cheap at the highest quality.  There also are two microphone settings, Dictation and Conference.  In Dictation mode, the microphone can only pick up what is said within about 12 - 18 inches.  The quality is audible, but not great.  Conference mode only works when one person is speaking in a completely quiet room, something that is not realistic with people shuffling about.  Any background noise will render the recording inaudible.  Even in a quiet room, the quality is muffled and unacceptable.  The high price for this unit definitely is not indicative of its quality, which appears to be low.  I have other, less expensive units, that are better built and have a higher audio quality.  I do not understand the other reviews, other than to believe someone with less experience using DVRs would have a different expectation.  Perhaps it works better with an external microphone or when used solely in a closed environment (such as a quiet, closed interrogation room), which I believe defeats the purpose of a small pocket-sized unit meant to be carried around.A 1 MB XD card gives 168 hours in SP mode or 358 hours in EP, which would be great if the product worked.  Similar to other brands, the controls are not intuitive, but can be learned easily and are not a drawback
Absurd!. Lured by the attractive price and high storage I decided to step outside the world of CF cards and try the microdrive. As a professional photographer who shoots primarily studio work I disregarded how fragile these cards are whispered to be, after all I'm not even walking around with my camera right?After the second week I noticed a CF ERR pop on my Canon. Hmm, probably just an oddity. Two weeks later a longer CF ERR, had to pop the card out and back in - I lost about eight shots.Well, today it's dead. I don't mean not fast (which it never was), I don't mean buggy (which it always was), I mean dead. D-E-A-D.Of course Amazon won't take it back because I just passed my 30 days! Yay.What a waste. I will never buy another Seagate product again
OK performance but can be dangerous. To be short, the performance is less than great but OK, but I can live with that since I have dozens of them, I don't care if it runs out faster. But what I couldn't stand if that it also set my charger on fire since one of them leaked, I couldn't imagine what would happen if I didn't come to my desk in time
Extremely poor quality product. I have purchased and returned two sets of these headphones. The first set overheated and fried itself as soon as the batteries were installed. The second set worked for a little over an hour before developing constant hissing and popping. Also the head band adjuster would not retract on one side, making it impossible to fold them up for storage in the travel bag.I consider the quality of this headset one of the poorest I have ever seen. Even frayed bare wires were visible on one side.I recommend you avoid Taurus products completely
It's not a scratch repair kit, just a scratch kit... When I paid somewhere between $20-$30 a couple of months ago for the OptiFix Pro Kit, I made the wrongful assumption that a high price tag would entail good craftsmanship in contrast with some of the cheaper radial cleaners I've owned before.  The package's description made it seem promising enough and I've had mostly good experiences with Memorex in the past, so I just had put it to the test immediately after taking the product home.  After reading the instruction guide carefully before use, I'm positive the product was being used properly, but unfortunately, the OptiFix Pro just couldn't deliver the goods.  In fact, not only could it do nothing to restore any of the discs I inserted, it worsened the scratches it was supposed to repair!  What's more frustrating - two of the discs it served to further damage are out of print and therefore irreplacable.  I hope fellow CD collectors will sympathize with my message and steer clear of this particular Memorex product
When it plays, it's fine, but poorly designed and counterintuitive. I have several issues with this player:1) The case-open slider is along the side of the player is situated where the cords come out and it is difficult to open the player as a result.2) The buttons are too small. They seem designed for infants or people with abnormally small fingers.3) It will sometimes shut itself off for no apparent reason. I will turn it on, then wait for the first track, and instead of playing it, it will sometimes shut down.4) If I hit PLAY twice in a row it makes a continuous high-pitched beeping sound that is at the actual volume level. It is unnecessarily loud and obnoxious.5) The velcro is not very sticky and so far has failed to adhere to the dash. I plan on using 30-minute epoxy to affix the velcro patches.6) The fast forward will only go at what seems like 2x meaning it takes longer than necessary to speed through a track.Overall, this design gets an F. Its quality is well below what I would expect from Sony. It actually plays the discs fine, but it usability is severely limited by poor design choices.Addendum: Now it won't play at all. The tape adapter apparently is broken, although I cannot see where. My car tape player now rejects it. At least I can still listen to regular tapes
Dual Tuner Problematic. Two problems have surfaced using the TIVO unit. The first is the lack of a 5 pin serial port for connection of the tuning cable which causes the use of the funky light attachment at the front of the unit when hooked to a Direct TV box. Sometmes the tuning is inaccurate causing misfires when programs are recorded. The other problem is that internally the TIVO unit looks for a basic cable signal erratically for the second tuner. I have replaced all of the cables with new shielded cables so I know that is not the problem. I am replacing it with a Direct TV DVR. When the TIVO works, it is great, but it is not reliable enough for me
Be careful of remanufactured equipment. The multifunction center worked correctly for exactly one week.  Then it developed a loud grinding sound.  So much for buying remanufactured equipment.  Spend a little more and buy something new
Memory did not work. This memory did not work. Still have yet to receive refund from seller
trash. I bought this unit and thankfully found out that it belonged in the trash before the return period had expired. It did not accurately pick up my position anywhere, and also had problems picking up signals. I actually punched in Miami and the unit came back with "address not found" several times. Trash. I would not recommend it to anyon
Unsatisfied. This product is unstable.  I have spent numerous hours on the phone with Belkin tech Support to no avail.  One time they left me on the phone on hold for over three (3) hours.  I need to pack these items up and mail them back or to Belkin.Gladwin Baile
Very Bad Product. I wish I never bought this phone!Like some others mentioned; it was a huge waste. The landline connection works but it is very difficult to hear the other person on the line, sometimes it is very loud, sometimes you can't tell what he/she is saying. The volume controls are difficult to balance. The menus are very badly designed makes you feel like the phone is a kids toy or something. When dialing a number you will be faced with the number being pressed twice or sometimes it wont appear on the screen, this is because of the lousy design of the keypad.I have hooked it up to my pc and at first it worked and the pc recognized it and it was ok, the second time I unhooked it and then retried connecting it and the pc didnt find it, I unloaded the software reloaded but nothing.Believe me if you like using the yahoo voice features stick with a set of headsets and mic, if you want to get tacky maybe get some bluetooth gear, but this phone is not worth a cent.
What Cheap Can Buy. I won't beat around the bush, this is a terrible product.  I was looking for something to allow Mic level recordings on my computer (Macbook Pro) and I wasn't sure I wanted to spend the money on an iMic.  I found this remarkably cheaper device, and decided to try it instead.  When I got it, the first thing I thought upon seeing the packaging was how un-professional it looked.  The box looks like something someone printed off their computer, and it even had spelling errors on it.  When I popped the device out of the box it came apart in my hand.  Right then I knew I had made a mistake.  It comes with a minidisc that 1. doesn't fit in a mac, and 2. only had PC software on it.  Of course the box and the product page don't say what platform this device is for, and indeed my Mac did recognize it when plugged in.  However, when I switched over to USB audio out, my ears were nearly blown out.  There was absolutely no way to control the volume.  Upon plugging in a Mic, I found the device didn't even respond  The audio in channel lights up half way as though it's picking up some signal, but it doesn't make a sound (tested with Line In and Garage Band and no response).  This is a shoddy, unprofessional product that should be avoided at all cost.  Don't be cheap, I'm sure the iMic is loads better
Junk. Here is why it is junk.  1.  creates a buzz on the line  2.  Not enough room in back of phone for the cord if you wall mount 3.  The LCD is pathetic. Can't see it in a normally lit room.  THis should be back lit, and numbers should be bigger.  4.  All in all, a real dissappointment and it is going back
Worked great at first, till it only started taking left turns... I was impressed with this controller at first, and found it to feel comfortable, and work well. It was played with once and a while for about a month (total 10 hours max). Some time after that, the next time I went to use it, it would only go left in a game that used the left joystick. I could not get it to center (or even stay still), it would just keep either steering the car (like Burnout3) or whatever the left joystick would do for the game no matter what. I tried it several times, and it has never worked since. I fire it up once and a while to see if it's still doing it, and it does. I am very dissapointed in this, and I was pretty careful about getting this newer version of the Logitech controller. I think I paid about $45 locally for it, and I just bought a Pelican Extreme edge from Radio shack on clearance for $19.99 that works and feels as good, but is less than half the cost. I don't really feel like going thru a warranty claim, if it's even covered, but it still annoys me every time I look at it in my Xbox 'drawer' of extra stuff.I was going to go totally wireless (4 units) and luckily didn't run out and buy 3 more of these Logitech controllers. I instead bought some extra Microsoft S controllers, as they are still one of the best feeling controllers out there. If the Pelican holds up, (model PL-2050 version 2.0) I might go get some more if I can find them locally.
Western Digital My Book Premium 500 GB External Hard Drive with Dual Interface. Now what, .... I have saved all my data in some unknown scrambled format and can't do anything about it.I was hoping for a storage device that would give me the option of recognizing what I saved and being able to change what needs to be changed at a time when I feel it's necessary.Now I have to wait till doomsday arrives when I have to reinstall all my unidentifiable scrambled files?Way to much money for nothing!
A worthless piece of junk. Not worth one star! Lasted about 1 week, and then started emitting a high pitched whine loud enough to wake people in the next town. It is now officially DEAD and USELESS. Even the short while it "worked" it was almost useless. Switching speed and mouse response was frankly terrible, the keyboard lagged several characters behind my typing and fitting the cables into it was simply not possible. DO NOT BUY THIS. Don't even THINK about it.
arrived broken. It's still usable for the purpose I bought it for - for waking up a 7 year old for school.  But it is disappointing that it arrived broken, the light for seeing the clock at night does not work, and the 'increase time' button for setting the time or alarm does not work, so I always have to set everything from the  'decrease time' button.  My mother sent it to me over-seas so it's a real hassle to try to return it, so it will do for now. At least my child has a clock to wake him up for school.  In a few years I will order him a better one.
Chill It - Luke warm at best. Great idea that doesn't live up to it's hype.  Two issues, it steals the USB ports completely and often causes problems with one's computer.  More importantly, it doesn't cool down drinks, or even maintain them.  They usually warm up to room temperature within an hour, whether on the coolIT or not.  Disappointing performance
Damn Mouse. This was a bad purchase.   Mouse touch is very hard to control; tried adjusting a number of times but to no avail.   Also, the screen says mouse battery is weak (and opening programs by clicking doesn't work at times), so I've changed the battery and moved the pickup unit closer to the mouse, but I still get the same problems
Docupen, all looks, no serivce. This letter is a summary of my experience with PlanOn for the past 6 months.It all began innocent enough, I saw an article about the Docupen, and saw immediate possibilities for potential use.  Over the summer of 2006 I was going to order the DocuPen 800 Pro, for I was going to have great use in my teaching environment with Worcester State College as well as Becker College, both located in Worcester, Massachusetts.From a technological perspective, I was intrigued, so began my research of trying to learn more of the product.  I searched the web for reviews, personal opinions, etc... and well all in all, things seemed positive minus the software interface and the fact the system shuts off after EVERY one page scan.Anyway, in early August I decided to order a Docupen, even though on the website it said orders were taking 2-3 weeks to fill.  I called sales, and was told that do to manufacturing delays, it was going to be closure to 4 weeks for fulfillment or I could just call back in September when the Docupens are to be in.I placed my order on September 15, 2006 for a DocuPen Rc800 Pro, standard color $349.00 order number:XXXX.  Now all I had to do was wait.  Two weeks went by and no word from PlanOn in regards to the status from my order.  Now school has been in session for a week now, but that is ok.  When I called, I am told that the shipment didn't arrive do to manufacturing difficulties.  At this point, I am willing to believe customer service.  Two more weeks go by and still not response from customer service about the status of my shipment.  I attempt to call the 1-888-507-3926 and keep getting the answering service.   I tried on-line chat-support, only to find out that an order that was suppose to take 2-3 weeks, is now going to take 6-8 weeks.  The kind lady from customer service offered me a carrying case for the scanner when it arrives.  I really didn't care about any carrying case, I just wanted up front honesty about where the heck my scanner was and when was it going to be delivered.3 months go by and finally, the Docupen scanner arrives, was it worth the wait, NO!  In total, the delivery time took over 3 months.  In such time I was able to find another product that better met my needs for the purpose of scanning documents.  Even though I had decided to purchase another product, I was still looking forward to using my PlanOn DocuPen.  All I have to say is that I was sorely disappointed at the scan quality, the poor software options and overall experience for PlanOn.  So with no hesitation, I requested to return my DocuPen under the 30-day money back guarantee.Was that to be the end of my frustrations with PlanOn, NO!Here is a time line of various correspondences in the attempts to get an RMA and refund issued.December 4, 2006 - initial request for an RMADecember 4, 2006 - I receive standard RMA procedureDecember 4, 2006 - All required questions from RMA questionnaire have been answered and emailed backDecember 11, 2006 - receive RMA sheetDecember 12, 2006 - send back Docupen according to PlanOn specifications with tracking # and signature confirmation, emailed RMA department to inform of statusDecember 14, 2006 - receive email from RMA rep saying that they will be looking out for the packageDecember 18, 2006 - receive email verification (from Post Office) of signature confirmationJanuary 8, 2007 - I email RMA rep to find out statusJanuary 14, 2007 - I email RMA rep again to find out statusJanuary 18, 2007 - I receive an email from the RMA rep informing me that the package had indeed arrived, and that the credit would be issued in 5 daysJanuary 25, 2007 - I still have not received any verification or communication that my credit is being processedJanuary 29, 2007 - I call PlanOn and have the following conversations "called PlanOn today (1/29/07) I spoke with a Harmony from customer service.  I was told that April McKnight is the credit manager.  Apparently the credit manager has been out of the office for the past week.  Though that doesn't explain the email from Nick on 1/18/07 explain that the credit will be issued in 5 days.  Here over two weeks after that email, apparently the credit is still sitting on April's desk.  I was told by Harmony that it will be taken care of this week."So I have been more than patient in regards to waiting for reply and follow up from anyone from PlanOn.  Every time I contacted someone about the request for an RMA, I was the one that had to follow up (4 times) before receiving a reply to my request.  I have now emailed three times in regards to receipt of my returned docupen.Needless to say, I find the product not worth the time or the money.  The company has  miserable customer service.  But I should have been aware of this when I first placed my order and was told it would take 2 weeks and it arrived 3 months later, and the product was a piece of junk
Sony- stick you at every opportunity- ZERO Stars. I paid $250 for a voice recorder and couldn't find the CD when I replaced my laptop. You'd think Sony would offer a download or replacement through support- but NO. You have to BUY the software all over again. The $250 recorder is now useless because of their proprietary format, but I'll be darned if they are getting another penny of my money, and they shouldn't get a penny of yours.
Feel so lucky. 1) The remote control is broken;2) When the TV is on, a high-pitch noise is also on;3) There is a fissure on the left side of the cover;4) Feel so lucky that it still takes cable and displays
Not Compatible. These discs do not work with my Canon Camcorder. I think the label should inform people they may not be compatible with certain devices
Hello? Can I hear you?. I bought these because I just could not stand the headphones that came with my CD player (SL-SV570). They were extremly uncomfortable. So, I went ahead and bought them. I pluged in the headphone, and I couldn't hear anything. The volume was around the 10-15 area, and the player only goes to 25. I could hear music on 20, but it was still too quiet. I put it on the highest volume, 25, and automatically I heard distortation. I was very unhappy with these headphones. They are just so quiet. Just save yourself the money and don't buy these headphones
TAPE WASTER - Big Time. This labeler will waste a lot of that expensive tape. If one prints a 1" long label, 2" are wasted. But hey, this is the trend. They want to make the revenue on tapes, not on the printers. They learned it from HP and other printer makers
Don't waste your money. Don't waste your money on this.  I sent it back to Amazon.com for a complete refund and didn't pay a dime to return it.  It is defective to the max. Read the reviews. It won't close.  It strongly stinks. When I bought mine, it was on sale for 10 with a rebate of 10. I paid no shipping because I have prime.  I did not appreciate being insulted with such an extremely low quality defective item, so instead of going for the rebate, which would have taken weeks to get my money back (to make it a "free item") I immediately sent it back to Amazon to get a refund.  If only Amazon would offer a zero star option.... as many of it's customers have requested for years
Faulty product, unresponsive customer service. This is the only card that has ever failed to work on my Palm Tungsten C, so I know it's not a hardware problem with my PDA.  The handheld device recognizes the card and FileZ shows that the programs and databases are present and available, but the program doesn't run -- the only response I get is "Loading from card. Please wait."  But nothing happens.  My repeated queries to tech support via its Web site have gone unanswered.  Don't count on any help from the company if you also get a lemon
Poor execution of good ideas. This phone has many features that I really wanted--ability to add addition hands sets, shared phonebook, speakerphone on each handset, 5.8 Ghz DSS.  I didn't find any other phone w/ these features even though, to me, they seem like minimal features in a modern phone.  Anyway, I am really disappointed.  Each feature is poorly executed such that it is really a pretty lousy phone.  The shared phonebook is a nice idea but so hard to access and find the number that its really quicker to dial the number yourself.  The voicequality of the handsets is inferior to every other phone I've used.  The only (sorta) exception is that the handset speakerphone voicequality is even worse.   5.8 DSS is nice, but the range is short (doesn't reach out to my driveway even though my baby monitor works fine in that location).  I recommend that you not buy this phone.  Wait till another company implements this feature set in a better phone
Don't be fooled, this one is junk. The write up sounds good, with many options and features, but after closer examination I had to take it back. First thing, it appears that the front DV plug was an after-thought for Panasonic, it's a rinky-dink plastic flap on the opposite side of where the main AV/S plugs are located. This is often done at the last moment of production where they add a newer feature to an older designed unit, retro fitting it in wherever. The tiny "button within a button" toggle switch for fastforward, reverse, etc looks like it's glued on, it won't last long with normal use, and it's hard to use and in a bad place on the upper corner of the unit. The menu interface is difficult to navigate. The remote control is horrible, a real bad design for those who want to navigate quickly without looking closely at the buttons to figure out what button to push for each of the basic and most used features. You might want to pass on this one, remember the saying "if it sounds too good to be true, it probabily is
locks up, no support, buy something else. We bought a Magellan 6000t and it started locking up right away.  We had to reset every day loosing all info.  Called Magellan after 30 days they won't send me a new one or return money.  It locked up 10 times on the way to Florida and when it was working the touch screen would stop working.  Tried to take me down countless oneway streets in Tampa.  The worst electronic product and support of any product/company I have ever experienced.  Wish I had bought a Garmin.  I have two Garmin products on my boat and they have preformed flawlessly for years
Save your money!. Beauty is deceiving. The worst thing about this radio is that the plastic on/off button will be rendered useless after one trip to the beach. Get near a grain of sand and it will cause the button to stick. Keep it inside the house and it is a marginal radio at best, and confusing to use. The plastic body is very cheap as well and seems to disolve when it gets near sun tan lotion. Thousands of these must be sitting in drawers, silenced by the elements! Junk...that's why so many ended up in the bargain bins at retailers
Bad experience. Product needed to be returned.  The transmitter is very poor and even after turning up my car stereo volume all the way I could barely even hear the music. I thought it might be something I was doing, but after checking all the settting it turns out it's just a poor product. I had my mp3 player volume turned up, the transmitter was powered up, the transmitter and my car stereo were tuned to the same frequency, and the frequency I was using doesn't have a radio station on it - still nothing! I would be careful ordering this product. Maybe the one I received just had problems, but it doesn't appear that I'm the only one experiencing these problems after reading other reviews
Ink Cartridges. Epson's 3600 is a "nice" 3 in 1 Printer, Scanner, and Copier, but the Ink Cartridges "SUCK"! This is my third and last Epson Printer.Robert H
Don't buy for Steaming A/V From Internet - Overpriced Underpowered. I bought this gizmo to watch and listen to streaming audio video direct from the internet. I listen/watch a large number of programs on internet radio stations, international TV news and from the US network TV websites. The PR says that you can listen to all formats and cannect up to the web with OPERA. They do not tell you that OPERA on Archos can not do the simple function of streaming.What kind of WIFI Media Player can not direct stream from the web? Archos! Even Palm can stream and it is not a Media Player.You are going to spend over $500 before you are done and tech support is either nonexistant or not helpful.Save you money an double check that it can do what you want it to do before buyin
A spastic GPS. The best thing about the Magellean 3000T is the large screen.Sometimes this gadget works like a charm--other times it just seems to pay no attention.  Actually, the touch screen function decides not to work.  You can sit there and touch, rub, hammer; to no avail.  I got tired of the whole process and was ready to send it back to Amazon.  First, I called Magellan's help line (the phone number was hard to find); apparently you go to the diagonostic page and touch each touchscreen icon.  If you hear a click, it's okay.  Finally it works most of the time.  Damn bunch of trouble and frustration for a machine designed to reduce trouble and frustration.
Doesn't Appear to Work with eXploruist XL. This is a "qualified" bad rating of this bracket because it doesn't appear to work with the XL model of the eXplorist GPS.Just took delivery of the "Vehicle Mounting Bracket -P/N 702210" which is widely advertised to be suitable for the Magellan eXplorist GPS series.  Well, I can tell you that either something was left out of the package or more likely, this bracket is NOT suitable for use with the larger eXplorist XL GPS.  I hope someone can provide directions as to how this puppy will hold the XL GPS, but until they do (I've asked Magellan for clarification as to the suitability of this bracket with the eXplorist XL model), be very carefull if you plan to use this bracket with the larger eXplorist XL GPS.NEXT DAY UPDATE:  Response from Magellan to my question about suitability of P/N 702210, Magellan Vehicle mounting bracket for explorist(tm) GPS, for use with eXplorist XL was to recommend that "... I request you to get the swivel mounting bracket for this unit.  ..."  I read that to mean the eXplorist XL will not work with this product.  Magellan Case #209051 pertains.
If you want extensive POIs or clear bluetooth, this is not the unit for you. I had the TomTom Go 510 for about 5 days before I decided to return it.  Overall, the user interface is great, and very easy to understand and configure.  The setup was easy, and I also thought that the windshield suction-cup mount worked well, which I know a lot of other people complained about.  The items that led me to return the unit are as follows:1) Bluetooth hands free- the clarity on this wasn't bad on my end, but the anyone I talked to on the other end of the phone couldn't hear me well.  I had the external mic on my visor, so it was probably no more than 2 feet from my mouth.  Unless I was holding it in front of my mouth, the connection wasn't clear.  I also had problems where my Motorola RAZR V3 would simply disconnect from the TomTom for no reason, or send a call straight to voicemail rather than letting it ring through the TomTom.2) The Point of Interest database is lacking.  I had read this in other articles, but didn't believe it could be that bad.  I was wrong! Basically, when it comes to restaurants, it only contains fast food, and aside from that, anything retail related is lacking.If you are just looking for navigation where you aren't relying on POIs and don't need hands free calling, this unit would work fine...but then again, without those features you could get something much cheaper that would get the job done!  Overall, this product is not worth the money
Not practical. I have bought 5 of these for me and my friends, some were the 1gb version.Only one of us is still using it with no problems. The skin of this flash drive starts to wear out and sometimes break. Its more of a show than it is practical.Also, the side with the whole in (To attach to your mobile or whatever) broke for two of us
A poor choice. Sounds good- except the phone has a permant cord that allows you to move about 2 feet from the wall. It probably would never work on a desk/counter. This is not worth the trouble that it takes to unpack it and not to mention to add the batteries(not included).
Very Poor Quality Device. I normally don't like to write bad reviews; however, I'm compelled to do so for the Linksys WCG200 version 2 due to the chronic instability of the device.I'm truly sorry I bought this device and I'm frustrated at Linksys since they do not appear to be offering any firmware updates to fix the issues.Both my wife and I work from home, so device outages are readily apparent.  We have a Comcast broadband connection that has proved reliable since we got it in 2001.  Until we bought the WCG200 , we were using separate devices for the cable modem, router, and wireless functions and decided to upgrade to the WCG200 since it has all three functions integrated.Below is a list what I have observed in the last 4 months of using the WCG200.  I've found several Internet posts that detail similar issues for other folks.  There seems to be a correlation of these issues with Comcast users; however, that may not be conclusive since Comcast has such large market share.1. Frequent crashing of the device when wireless users are connected.  The device will often stop responding and require a reboot.  When we're using its wireless capabilities this occurs several times per day.  If we don't use the wireless, the crashes still occur; however, they are markedly less frequent.  I've also noticed that changing the wireless security settings seems to change the frequency of crashes.  The device would crash hourly when using WPA or WPA2 security.2. The administration pages stop responding after the device has been running for some time (usually about a day or two).  In this case, the unit will still process traffic; however, I must reboot it to get into the administration interface.3. The administration pages (when working) sometimes stall for 30-60 seconds.4. The modem log doesn't always work properly.  I've cleared the log and had old entries come back after a reboot.To be fair, Linksys does make other devices that work better.  I've been a Linksys customer for several years...while I've seen quality issues before they usually come out with a firmware upgrade to address them.
Website misleading. On Amazon this product stated it was compatible with the Sansa e200 series.  I ordered with that expectation but it does not work.
Generic chip. I thought I was getting a PNY 512 SDRAM chip, got a Generic 512 chip that doesn't work in anything, I won't do it agai
It Worked...At First... When i first got the MP3 player it was great, it worked fine and i was very pleased with its battery life. But then only 3 weeks after i bought the product it broke and unfortunately for me i threw away the box and everything that came with it once i thought it was working satisfactorily. Oh well. All i have to say is if given the chance i would NOT have bought the product in the first place, and regret doing so now
hardly even zip the case when all 96 disc is in. for the price of the rebate, it is a good deal.Though don't expect you get an easy use of the case, especially all 96 discs are in case.With a big force to squeeze the case together, finally able to zip it, and you will get probably all the disc bent especially the outer sleeve onesIt is a bad design by having the same dimesion sleeves sew together in the center.Probably having 48 discs case would be more proper instead of 96 disc
broke after 1+ year. Overall the recorder worked OK. A moderate inconvenience was that once in a while the recorded DVDs could not be finalized for unexplained reasons.However, that is irrelevant now. A few weeks ago, the unit stop working. I does not turn on at all. What a waist! It is out of warranty now
Never worked properly, died after about 10 uses. This unit never really worked properly from the start.  I would get the fearsome little balloon in the bottom right of XP that said "Delayed write failed" fairly often.  Then, one day, I plugged it in, and XP would not recognize it at all.Tried in in three different computers (Linux and XP), and still didn't work.  Popped out the drive inside, hooked it up to the computer directly via the ATA cable, and the drive works find.  So the enclosure was the culprit.Bad
Terrible, terrible product and evidently not made by "Sharp". I bought this travel alarm at Target.  It was shoddy from the outset, but for $10 I managed to use it despite the dim display and tinny alarm for one trip.  Then I realized the battery only lasts a few weeks.  I would have spent more on batteries than the clock itself in the first year.  It also began to literally pull apart at the seams.  I mailed the clock to Sharp's corporate headquarters in NJ with my complaint and received a letter back saying it wasn't one of their products even though it clearly says "Sharp" right on the front.  So either they are lying and producing terrible products or they are not protecting their trademark and allowing other companies to manufacture shoddy products and market them with the Sharp name.  Either way I could never buy a product with the Sharp name on it again.... how could I ever be sure if it would be backed up by Sharp or not
Quality control?. The second disc in this package was faulty, which I did not discover until I spent two hours recording a movie.  There was what appeared to be a half inch bare spot on the outer edge of the dvd+r.  Not what I expected from Memorex which purports to be the best.I have switched to Maxell
One fan made a scraping noise. You're money is better spent on another product.It's made out of plastic so it feels cheaply made.  A nice thing about the product is that the fans are incredibly quiet, damn near silent, if it isn't damaged.  I had one fan made a scraping noise.The fans are designed to draw the heat from the laptop, but I've found that these coolers are less effective than the laptop coolers that blow cool air in.
The worst product ever. Disclaimer - this is my first webcam. It may be my last, if they're all like this one.I ordered this product and received it quickly. That is the only good news. It is all downhill from there.The installation froze and had to be rebooted twice before it would work. The second time it also froze, but I unstuck one of the reboots and got the other to work.The camera itself does not securely latch to a flat-screen monitor. It falls off easily. The microphone headset is flimsy and does not stay on my ear.The webcam software freezes over and over and over again. It freezes most when trying to hook into Yahoo IM. The only support provided in the tutorial for the "Broadcast" function is (quote): "You must have downloaded Yahoo Instant Messenger 6.0 for this function to work." Absolutely no idea how to troubleshoot from that point forward. Every time I launch Broadcast, the entire program freezes.It gets better.Even when the program is not frozen, it almost always shows a black screen with the phrase "The Creative Webcam is temporarily unavailable." The screen eventually shows a brief still photo from the webcam, then goes back to black screen.I visited the manufacturer's website. Support has 3 options. 1. Email - I have received no response after 24 hours. 2. Phone call - the website advises looking into your product manufacturer documentation to find a phone number. There is none. There is a phone number on the website, but it charges $12.99 per call. Phone support is free if you purchased within 60 days, but in order to contact them, you have... you guessed it, find the phone number in your documentation. 3. online documentation. This is totally useless and did not provide any help for the myriad of problems this product faces.In short, this is a piece of junk. It is already on its way back to the website. A combination of shoddy manufacturing, buggy software, and horrible customer service spells doom.
Never received it!. This item was promised to me as a free bonus for my purchase of Casio Exilim camera, but was never delivered. Now Amazon wants me to review it, so here your are..
***WARNING FOR GEN5 IPODS***. After reading all the reviews I could find online, I thought this would be a perfect solution for a work related application.  I have a 5th generation 30GB video iPod, a model which their website claims it supports.  My first purchase turned out to be a dud or so I thought and I exchanged it for another.  Only after I called their customer support did I find out that the 5th gen 30GB video iPod is not supported.  Not yet at least and that a new firmware is needed and is being worked on and will be released SOMETIME next year.  Needless to say, I'm EXTREMELY annoyed that nothing like this has been stated by the company in ANY way
You're better off with the cheaper tower. I bought this antenna to replace a Terk tower antenna I had in my office that wasn't able to pick up AM stations very well.  It turned out that I was MUCH better off with the tower.  This thing didn't pick the AM stations well at all.  I immediately returned this thing and went back to the tower
Very Limited Life. I bought the ear buds to replace the ones that came with my iPod. I used it for about fifteen minutes and then the left earbud would not transmit any sound. Sending these ones back. I must say that the earbuds kept outside sound out very well (Much to my Mom's dismay, she couldn't fuss at me :-P ). Oh well.
Junk. Tons of static and I have a direct line running from this into my car stereo (NOT FM TUNER). It chares fine and cuts off ipod when I turn off engine but the amount of static makes it unusable. I would have been better off with just a  cheap charger for the car
Two single packs CHEAPER  than One double?????. I cannot believe they WILL NOT change the price.  2 single packs are cheaper than 1 double pack.  I HAVE TOLD THEM several times that www.staples.com has it for $60.99 and www.officemax.com has it for $59.99 and with a $50.00 order-free shipping too.When they can meet or beat this price, I'll buy from them-amazon.com.  If I run out before, I'll go elsewhere.
Problems Ejecting USB Mass Storage Device with WinXP. It worked file with Win 2k, but as soon as I switched to Windows Xp, this device was rendered utterly useless to me - it won't shut down or eject, and windows explorer won't see it.  Grrrrrrrr .....
Defective Product - Prevents use of docking station, a/v out, iTalk mic. Warning - your iPod may already be stuck! Good luck trying to get your iPod *out* of its case once it gets into it.  Why, you ask, would you want to get  your iPod out of this sleek looking case? Perhaps because, like me, you realize that the case's thickness prevents the use of the docking station (but not the cable by itself), Apple's A/V out cable (which goes into the headphone jack), and Griffin's iTalk voice recorder.If you only plug headphones into your iPod, then the case is great. If you have any inklings of a plan to use any accessories beyond just the headphones, avoid this case.
won't fit your ipod -  don't bother with this product. i purchased the DLO action jacket (neoprene for 20 & 40GB ipods) for my wife for use on walks, etc around town.  However, the ipod doesn't fit in properly.  The circle that is supposed to line up with the ipod's doesn't.  The plasic part covering the ipod is awkward and doesn't align either so you can't press the play button.  So, since the ipod doesn't fit in the case overall, this product is useless.  pls save your time and money and consider another ipod case
If I'd wanted shorter wire... Both 100' spools of this wire came in TWO pieces.I discovered that I'd have to splice it halfway through a difficult install. URHHHH!!!! Avoid these problems by buying other vendor's products
crappy. I use this type of flash drive for my research and more than half the time I can never view the images on the computer or get the flash drive to work....not worth buyin
Incredible rip-off. $99.99 list price?  Over $70 actual price?  You've got to be kidding!  I never accuse companies of raping consumers, because we are free to choose what we buy and how much we spend, but this smells of taking advantage of consumer ignorance.  If you want to connect your iPod to your home stereo, get a $7.00 "stereo mini-plug to RCA plug Y-adapter" at Radio Shack.  That's all you need.  Because you already have a recharger (it came with your iPod), the only additional capability this kit provides is holding your iPod upright. I have this item (it came free with my 40GB iPod) and, although it offers a slight convenience over not having it, the price is a terrible rip-off.
CHEAP. Price reflects quality.  Poor sound quality, NO features, not that easy to use.  Don't waste your mone
Great when it works. When the Inno works it is great, receives strong signals in NYC and easy to operate.  However, my commute is around 90 minutes each way and the battery has died on occasion.  Once every time I switched to the mp3 player it would shut down, I had to restore it and load and set options again. Now, it works in the car, through my stereo but not head phones.  I get noise like an AM radio.  Hopefully it will get resolved in a timely matter
Panasonic CD player is not continuous. The Panasonic CD player has a good sound quality, but does not automatically change from one CD to the next. It requires manual switching via the remote control to change from one CD to another. This feature was not explicitly stated in the specifications, and is misleading to a buyer who is seeking continuous playing of all five CD's
this thing is useless. Delivery was fast and transaction was good. However, the battery icon never got to the fully charged state so there is no way to tell whether it is functioning properly
It's a great item!. Only problem is, that it is only worth 19.00, which is the TRUE list price
How much ink do they put in these things?. I run out of cartridges much faster with my HP using this cartridge than I used to with my old Epson.  I feel like I'm being gouged (ripped off), having to buy cardridges so often
Don't buy if you own an Intel Mac. After I purchased and opened this product, I have found that Macally does NOT offer updated drivers for intel based macs.Buyers beware, this will not work with your Intel based Mac
Worst Phone. This is the worst phone that anyone could ever buy. there is constant static and clicking in the background, making it hard to hear the person on the other end. To make it worse it only has room for 10 programmable numbers and only two choices for ringtones, both obnoxiou
Ok...for short periods. I have used this mouse for 3 months with my laptop.  Look/feel and general use are fine for short periods of time (~&lt; 1 hour).  However, I am currently shopping for a replacement as this mouse has one problem:  Intermittently, after clicking/double-clicking, the mouse will go into a "move to the left" mode...and will continue to move until it reaches the edge of the screen.  Sometimes it will move to the upper-left.  This is so inconsistent as to be unpredictable.  I will often (at least 10 times in a 30 minute period) have to give the mouse a wiggle to stop it from continuing.  Frustrating if you are trying to click through a multi-level menu, for instance.  Another example is if you working on any CAD-type or image editing project where you need to insert a line one segement at a time (mouse will move when it feels like it).It was ok for a while, but now it is annoying...going to buy a replacement.If I have to buy a replacement for a product because of how the product performs at an early stage in its life, it gets no more than 2 stars.  It could be just this one particular mouse, but then that points to lack of QA at the manufacturer end...again, 2 stars
Don't like it at all. I think this is a very bad wireless mouse. It didn't work wireless for me even though I charged the battery for more than 4 hours according to the manual. So I had to connect the recharging cable with it all the time. That makes it a WIRED mouse!!! The buttons on the receiver and mouse are so tiny that you have to use a pen or something to press it. The battery cover is hard to open. This mouse does NOT have a sensitive signal. The motion of the cursor lags behind your mouse. Terrible mouse!!
Maybe a night light !. I ordered this item thinking that it would be useful when on the road in hotel rooms to light up my work area.  WRONG !!  The light is so DIM, the only thing it might be good for is a night light! This lamp is a good idea, but much too weak to be of any help
Looks Pretty in the picture. Would of been great to receive so I could of gotten some use of i
Broke in less than a year. The player stopped working after only a few months - it would accept DVDs but not play them and refuse to eject them.  That behavior started out as intermittent, but it finally gave up the ghost and swallowed a DVD and never let go.  We had to take the player apart just to get the DVD out before throwing the player away in the trash.  Our previous DVD player lasted over 5 years before it started skipping.  This one lasted less than a year before it stopped working altogether - what a waste.  Save your time and money and buy another machine
BEWARE SAMSUNG DLP DESIGN FLAWS!!!. Consumers should be aware of serious design flaws which exist in Samsung DLP televisions.  Cooling fans and color wheels are highly susceptible to failing.  (As a non-techniocal person I should have no idea what these parts are, but alas, I bought a Samsung DLP)  Expect these to fail within 1-2 years.  Expect to pay approx $400 to replace the color wheel and $200 to replace the colling fan.  That is, if your service technician can find them in stock anywhere.  These parts are commonly in a national backorder because of the very high failure rates.You should also expect the lamp to fail sooner than advertized.  Many people need to purchase a new lamp between 1-2 years, and some more often than that.  The lamp costs approx $150-$250 depending on your model, but you should be able to replace it yourself without too much difficulty.  This cost will be in addition to replacement costs for the color wheel and colling fan.  Please remember that these maintenance costs are recurring, and you will have to fix them again in another 1-2 years.While I was very satisfied with the quality and performance of my DLP, my color wheel failed very early.  I called tech support to report a grinding noise, and was told to "turn it off", wait 15 minutes, and turn it back on like this would fix the problem.  After doing this for a while, the color wheel finally failed, actually shattered!  Now I am out of warranty, and Samsung wants nothing to do with me.  I have even tried ordering the part myself from two different online vendors, and they are both backordered indefinitely!  It has been 6 weeks and they have no estimate for when this part will be available.  Samsung cannot even give me an estimate when the supply of replacement parts is expected to meet demand.  I have had my TV for 18 months, and apparently there is a national epidemic of them breaking at the same time!I have a 42" Samsung Plasma which is a beautiful set along with a 26" CRT.  Both are wonderful products, but Samsung is selling DLP LEMONS and will not stand behind them.  DLP is a great bargain up front, but a maintenance NIGHTMARE!  You will pay in the long run, and by the long run I mean every 2 years.  If you still want to purchase a DLP television, PLEASE BUY THE EXTENDED WARRANTY!  IT WILL SAVE YOU A TON, BUT YOU WILL STILL HAVE TO WAIT FOR THE CIRCUIT CITY TECH TO FIND PARTS WHICH MAY TAKE MONTHS!I expect Samsung to abandon their design flaw riddled DLP sector, and focus on their beautiful plasma line.  Expect DLP prices to drop even further, but please...LOOK BEFORE YOU LEAP
Wanted to like it, but... When I first started using this, I loved it.  It worked fine in my car cassette deck and had decent sound.  In fact, I bought a second one for my wife.  Then, after about two weeks, it stopped working.  It would no longer play in my cassette deck, which ejected it as soon as I put it in every time.  I tried contacting Coby's support on the Web, but they were unresponsive.  Luckily, Amazon took it back for a refund.  Note that they no longer sell these directly.  Bet they had too many returns..
Sony Battery. The battery life does not even come close to the advertised listing. Save your money and wait until Sony does a better job. I am a big fan of all things Sony and this is my first big disappointment.Mar
Doesn't Work With Every Vehicle. This adapter would not work AT ALL in my 1996 Ford Ranger.  The vehicle's cassette player kept ejecting it.  However, it DID work in a co-worker's 1993 Ford Ranger.  It also would not work in a 1993 Monte Carlo...same problem
poor quality control. I have had various WiFi networking solutions in my home and office for several years.  While some Linksys units have worked for me, more often I have found them undependable.  In particular, the WPS54GU2 set up fine, but I almost always had to cycle the power to get it to work each time I printed.  Not worth the hassle
Not Good. The sound was great, but the DVD would lag every 10-15 seconds during any and all movies.  It drove me nuts. I had to return it.
Notorious Base Problem. After having installed the unit for 43 days, the suction cup snapped off the plastic mounting.  This was a spantaneous break while driving sending the unit "Flying"! Very dangerous!!Tomtom would not replace the unit, as the claim that paart is warranted only for 3 weeks! buyer beware.  See the TomTom forum for description and picture:[...]and other links to the base issue
waste of money. I thought I could save money by printing some photos on this less expensive matte photo paper.  Big mistake.  Quality is so poor that   I'm ready to just dump it.  Can't figure what else to use it for.
DID NOT WORK. This did not work what so ever.  Don't, please don't buy it and waste your money on it.Vance William
Not very reliable. I had to go through five disks in order to write two recovery disks for my PC.  At this rate, I might get 20 good disks out of the 50
Woof. The radio dials are not accessible when the radio is in the case -- I cut slits in the case with a knife to be able to tune the station and volume when in the case; I can't believe the case didn't come this way -- and that's just the start of the problems. The dials are fussy and it's not easy to carry this radio, even in the case, without nudging the dial to the point you must remove it from the case -- if you haven't cut any slits in it -- and re-tune your station.In Minneapolis-St. Paul, WCCO AM radio comes in fine in a suburb 15 miles from downtown. But that station has howitzer power. Forget about tuning in virtually any other AM station in the city. Granted, I didn't buy this to listen to FM or shortwave. It was to be an inexpensive radio to listen to baseball. With the Minnesota Twins having moved from WCCO, that won't happen, as this radio is incapable of pulling in the Twins' new AM radio home, or any othe AM signal in the area. That's really difficult to imagine, being other radios I own -- even chintzy giveaway promotional radios -- can pull in most any station in the metro area.If this is an example of Grundig's work, I'd say they rely more on their brand name than their products.
It was a nice set , until they service the warranty. Over a week ago I noticed my 9 month old Olevia LT37HVS locking up and shutting off by itself. I callled Syntax-Brillian Corporation to take advantage of the warranty, They said they would ship the parts out right away and then send a technicain over to install them. I checked back with them 3 days later and they said they would ship the parts out tommorrow.The customer service is abominable. This is my second Olevia set , such a shame because when the Olevias work its a great product at a very competetive price. I will tell you this based on my experience with the warranty in the first year, I would not by an extended warraty from Sytax , I am shopping for a third party ,one that can give me quicker service.  I will edit this when my set is restored
Used once until the batteries died. The battery compartment is nearly impossible to open without breaking the latch that holds it in place.  After great difficulty, I was able to open the battery case exactly once and load my first set of batteries.  Some stroke of luck prevented the tiny plastic tab from breaking this first time.  After the batteries eventually died and had to be replaced, I wasn't as lucky with the cover.  Inspecting the broken pieces revealed a number of basic latch design flaws.  It seems the designers of this product failed to take Snap-Fit Design 101.  Engineering design review anyone?
Disappointing. This is not a dictionary you can download onto your memory card. It comes on its own memory card, which you have to insert into your pda to use. You have to carry this dictionary card around with you and when you want to look something up, take your card out of your pda and then insert this one. It's impractical. For me it was a waste of money.
Includes all necessary hardware?. This mounting kit will be perfect for you... as long as you have a stud exactly in the right place.  Unlike most kits that include a cross bar to affix to studs on either side of the desired mount location, this kit has two holes in the plate.  You can thus mount it directly to a stud, and nowhere else.  So if you're trying to center it in a precise spot, you better get lucky with the stud finder.  (Or have a masonry wall
Cheap materials. The tent pops up with wire frame, but not all the way.  It only opens 80%.  The back drop material is all wrinkled
Powered?. They mislead me into thinking the power for the signal booster comes from the my existing cable, great! What is actually needed is to plug in the supplied AC/DC converter and install this 6" length of powered cable inline with the antennae cable, crap
Broken within hours. JUNK!. I ordered this item after reading the positive reviews here. BIG MISTAKE. Upon setting everything up, it all worked great for about two hours... then the dreaded "UNPLUG/PROTECT" screen came up. Now it won't turn on but for a few moments before returning to protect mode. (and no, it's not a short in the wires or overheating... it protects even when stone cold, and with no speakers plugged in) I called sony and they say it is a short in the box. So now my two options are to unhook everything, repack EXACTLY the way it came to me and reship back to the online store I bought it from (with enormous hastle and expense) or take the receiver in to a sony authorized service center (which happens to be across town, and only open monday-friday, 9-5pm. So much for being convenient). This thing is brand new and already needs repairs!!On top of that, even out of the box, NONE of the video inputs worked. Audio was fine, but video was dead as a doornail, right from the start.And even on top of the fact that this machine CAME broken... it sucks even when it works right! The DVDs take forever to load, and it comes with HDMI out, but NO HDMI IN! So if you're an HDMI user, I hope you have multiple HDMI inputs on your television... one for your cable box, one for this crappy system.This is a piece of junk. For the love of god, don't waste your money
Is Slightly Better Than Old One. The sound on the Sennheiser phone changes a lot. Sometimes the music is loud and sometimes low. The volume knob is not that good. The only good thing is that it partially stays in your ear. I cut off one piece because the two different cord lengths were annoying
Scratched my Macbook. As long as its on, it will prevent scratches, but its tough to get off, and that act can scratch your laptop.  It scratched my Macbook when I pried it off.  The guy at the Apple Store who snapped it on a Macbook beause I requested a "demo", couldn't pry it off, and after 10 embarassing minutes, he called a colleague over, and they pried it off together.  And, to be honest, this makes the MB look ugly - kinda like putting a veil on a supermodel.  ;--
not usable due to SonicStage. Hardware awesome, software a flop. Since you HAVE to use their software the package is destroyed. I will give you the final nail on the coffin for me. I tried to put Podcasts on the device using the latest SonicStage 4. No chance. It wants to be able to find each "artist" in the Sony library. This was bad for the odd bit of music it could not find but obviously it can not find the podcasts in their library.I had bought one of these and had considered one for the girlfriend - no chance now. Shame as the hardware was A1
Look for other alternatives... I bought four of these and returned them immediately. Two were dead out of the box. A third had horrible sound.After searching the internet and reading a variety of reviews for similar products I finally settled on the 900 Megahertz Wireless Intercom from Radio Shack. (43-3102)Beautiful sound. Well made and about half the price of the Reporter. Pretty much the same featues but it only claims a range of 300 feet as opposed to 1000 feet. So if you need more than 300 feet for range it's something to consider. Better warranty than the Reporter as well and for 8 bucks you can extend that warrarnty for another year.Anyway I couldn't be happier with the RS intercom. I just can't recommend the Reporters given that 3 out of 4 units that arrived were faulty
Poor Product and Terrible Support. I wish I had read the other reviews before buying this product. Indeed it does not work on my WinXP PC. The program will not even open and run. The Magellangps.com site has a downloadable patch for the product but it did not work either. What a waste of time and money. If Magellan ever answers my support requests, I hope they will send me a working copy of the program.
didn't work for my dvd player. This was listed as compatible with daewoo dvd players, but did not work for mine.  Customer support said that I would have to ship the remote to them and they would re-program it, which didn't seem worthwhile for such a cheap product
zero stars actually. Sounds like two paper cups on a string, no tone quality at all.It doesn't matter which channel you broadcast on they all bleed over each other.I can't believe I bought something this bad. Oh yeah it humms when you move it around trying for better reception.This is the first bad review I've EVER WRITTE
Okay with "regular photos". Try doing something other than copying or scanning (both work quite well actually) and you are in for a terrible time.  The settings are simplistic "High print quality vs. Standard" (Oooo decisions, decisions)  Don't try to print anything with vivid colors!  You will get terrible results.  Couple that with the in package software's inability to create 8X11 photos that are centered, and you have one poor printer.  I don't know why they stopped making the IP 90.  Why mess with perfection?Don't get me wrong, the scanner and copier and fax are great if this is what you wish to do with this device.  As far as photo printing goes, there are far better on the market for a far cheaper price
Major problems with trying to watch any type of movie-video. Viewing the internet this monitor was great. When I tried to play a movie, DVD DISC, MPEG, AVI, ANYTHING. The picture was terrible. Very bad pixilation. I was told it might be the video card. I bought a new card XFX geforce 7600 gs, for another $150.00. Same quality on films. I tried latest driver from XFX, from nvidia, etc. Changed screen resolutions, everything you could think of, I tried. The picture for viewing movies was terrible. I hooked my old 15 inch monitor back up, the picture quality for movies is great. I have returned this monitor, now I have to wait for a refund before I will try a different monitor. The black light bleed is very bad. If you watch films on your monitor, you can't help but notice it.PS. Amazon was great about refunding shipping. Amazon is the best online store there is
Bad Choice!. I bought this Mp3 player because it was just a few bucks cheaper than the Ipod and I ended up paying dearly for it.  It is a piece of junk that stopped working only after a couple months.  The firmware decided to stop recognizing songs, albums titles, and eventually that there was even any music to listen to.  Now I have a 200$ dollar mp3 player with no music on it that will not interface with my PC.  Customer service? Don't count on it.  So if your into extensively troubleshooting, highly frustrating, pieces of junk, this is a great product.
The easier way to do it. I mean seriously guys, is it really worth forking over to those greedy peeps at Sony over 40 dollars just for a silly memory card. There is an easier way to do it ya know. For your psp, if the game is really important to you and you can't save it. Just press up on the power switch real quick the screen will go off..it will go on hold and next time you wanna play it again.. just push it back up..and hopefully if you did it right you'll have the game right back in the place you left it..hey it saved me 50 dollars..and it can do the same thing for yo
I hate this drive. I bought it thinking it will be a sturdy drive, and Lexar anyway had a good name in flash drives.But to my utter dissapointment, barely 2 months after use, it started behaving funny. It won't copy data(1 file) more than 20-30 MB. While copying back (more than 100mb) data from this drive to my laptop it will hang and then computer will not be able to read it (I tried with 3 laptops!). Maybe it has bad sectors, but its as good as a floppy disk for me now. And I'm using it only for sharing keeping small amount of data.Highly dissapointed ...
Seems like a good idea, but... The DUB-CR200 seems like a good idea.  8-in-1 card reader and two more (net) USB 2.0 ports all in one nicely styled unit.  Great for your laptop, right?  Okay, as long as you have some place to plug it in.  It comes with and requires an external AC power adapter.  Other card readers are happy to be powered by the USB port.The first unit we bought managed to corrupt the file structure of a 1GB CompactFlash card, rendering it unreadable, in addition to being generally balky.  The computer would sometimes not mount the card reader drives.  Tech Support had us exchange it for another one.  The new one does not work very well either.  It can lock up Windows Explorer when you try to transfer files from a memory card, and has difficulty "ejecting" the card, a problem I have not had with other card readers.  Sometimes it will not transfer the files at all.  I have tried the device on several Windows XP computers with similar results.Maybe you will not experience these problems, but I did, and consider the device too unreliable to entrust with irreplaceable digital files
Would be great if it was usable. I was excited to receive the product however it did not fit my laptop.  Everytime I opened the lid a POPPING sound would occur.  Turns out the rear right back panel was rubbing the lid casing.  I took the laptop out and placed it back in thinking it was not properly installed, same issue.I'm not telling anyone not to buy this product.  Just be cautious.. and I hope you have better luck then I did
Total Junk, Avoid. Just like all other DVD media Memorex offers, this is total junk. I can't believe CompUSA would carry such an inferior product. Yes, the discs worked great for about a year. Then the dye totally disintegrates, after only 10 erases and re-writes. As you can you see, the warranty is only a year so I wasted my money. Memorex should state on the package "Discs will only work for year or after 10 re-writes". What a scumbag compan
Expensive and hard to find. The suspicious side of me wants to believe that HP did a promo with their Deskjet 612C - i.e. they sold the printer cheap or with big rebates as part of a system deal and decided to make up for their loss leader by limiting production and raising the price on the cartridge replacements.  I would be surprised if there is any difference between the 612C black replacement cartridge C6614 and the much more common cartridge for the 660C other than a little plastic tab on the cartridge case
Weak!. This light is very weak for a LED light.  Consider the Coast Digitac II if you are looking for a high quality flashlight that uses a single AA battery.If you don't mind using 3 AAA's, the Coast Tactical Power Chip 7736 is the best there is for a small flashlight.If you want rechargable, get the Coast Digi Tac Focus Rechargeable
Clock fine, radio lousy. The clock itself works well. It did take till sometime during the middle of the night for the atomic time to connect (we set a backup alarm the first night). The idea of utilizing atomic time for an alarm is a fantastic idea, but why would Scott put such a lousy tuner in an atomic clock radio?  Doesn't make sense to me.  Granted, I live in a rural area, but I am able to receive both AM and FM stations from as far away as Fresno, some 50 miles away, on other radios in the house (including a small portable, battery-operated one), and we do have a local FM station.  The tuner is so sensitive that I had to use both hands to steady the dial when trying to tune in a station.  I am unable to receive one static-free AM station, and I eventually, very gingerly, dialed in two fairly clear FM stations (one Spanish-speaking from Fresno, one local), but neither stay tuned in overnight..by morning when the alarm goes off, nothing but static.  A strange thing though...once, while trying to locate a station, I received a fairly clear one from SALT LAKE CITY....wow!  I plan to return the product
Disappointment. The product didn't do what it said it would. I cut the power to use it in my car (I shouldn't have assumed it worked properly) so I couldn't return it and ended wasting $50. I was extremly dissapointed in this product
Decent when it worked right. Not sure if I just got a lemon or what but would never purchase this player again. It worked right most of the time, but found that at times it would confuse the change disc button with the eject button. I would have to turn the unit on and off to get it to "reset" and work correctly.  It's now about 9 months later and the unit decided it was time to stop working.Bought it because it was cheap and I guess I got what I paid for. Fork out the extra cash and purchase another brand
LOOKS ARE DECEIVING. It looks great and has a great price, but when I got this one in the mail and keyed in the code it worked to turn the t.v. on and off, but after I threw away the box and everything and then tried to actually use it to change channels and change the volume, it would not work.  The company which sells this is very good and gave me a credit for my purchase.  I will do business with them again
Good piano but the stool breaks easily. I bought this last Christmas for my three year old and five year old.  Thesound of the piano is a little off, but all in all the piano is nice for the price.  The leg of the stool breaks very easily.  Don't buy unless you can fix
Routing bugs, reluctance to fix them. I was a user and fan of iGuidance v2, but I cannot recommend iGuidance v3 until iNav addresses these issues:On a recent trip between Boston and Buffalo, iGuidance v3 plotted a route that paralleled US Interstate 90 instead of taking it - check any roadmap to see for yourself how silly this is. (And no, "Route Options" not set on "local" - the route it plotted never varied no matter which of the 4 available Route Options were selected.) When I passed a highway exit it wanted me to take, iGuidance should have simply recalculated the route, but instead it locked up my PDA. Finally, it repeatedly advised me to take illegal u-turns on the Official Vehicles crossovers.I work in software development and I know that every application has bugs. The concern comes when a manufacturer doesn't want to fix them. When I notified iNav of this problem, they repeatedly insisted that it wasn't a malfunction, it was just how their algorithm worked.To be fair -- finally, reluctantly, iNav Support agreed to check their code. But I will remain suspicious of any software developed by a company that claims that their algorithm is OK even when it fails so obviously in a real-world situation.
Didn't Work. I followed the install instructions to the letter, but the install program started giving me an error that I couldn't get past.  I downloaded the latest install from the Linksys web site and got past the point where I had been getting the error, but I couldn't get the print server to connect to my wireless network.  When I had the print server connected to my network via an Ethernet cable, it detected the attached printer but couldn't even print a test page successfully.  This product was a complete waste of time
Not as good as it should be. I was disappointed that you need special disks, but even after that, the printing is mediocre, just below standards that is should be. The software is not that user friendly, frankly might as well stick with the black magic markers, for the money spent, a true dissapointment.
defect!. I bought this item and not even three weeks later it quit working, the power won't turn on and it completely quits on you, don't order it
Not what is in the picture......... Although description does not mention TV tunning,the image is misleading since it shows "TV" besides AM and FM. Future buyers should know; what you see is not what you get. I will have to buy another unit with TV tunning for the gym
Lousy radio.....do not buy. Reviewing the FR-300 weather / news radio.  Do not buy this radio.  It is cheap, made in China, and is a lousy radio.  You cannot tune it into a station...it slides all over.  The tuning capacity is zero, reception on any band is terrible.  The T.V. settings are all mixed up...again, reception lousy.  Weather band too.  This radio is really the worst....do not buy it.  Waste of money....and very overpriced.  It does NOT live up to what is written about it.  Rating "horrible".....do not buy
Not for home use. My wife and I have a small business and we bought one to use at the office.  It seemed to work fine there (I don't believe I upgrated the firmware at our office), and I decided to get one of the same for our home as well - thinking that would make setting up a VPN easy.  I did upgrade the firmware at home.  Our home network has all kinds of internet connectivity problems now.  These problems don't really manifest themselves when using the Web, but when we get all kinds of disconnect problems when we try to do large downloads, use our Vonage phone, play online games, or access online streaming content like music or videos.  I believe the router is closing our ports and not delivering packets like it should.  This product should be avoided, and if you do get it, don't upgrade the firmware to 1.52.10.  I'm online now to get a different router for our home.  Shame on Linksys
One terrible product. I bought this because I have a Toshiba, and Toshibas are notoriuos for having bad air circulation (I didn't know this until I'd had the laptop for over 2 years, I thought it was just mine).This is a terrible product. Its cheap and plastic, there are three fans, but one hardly ever works, and the other two barely move. It isn't wide enough for the feet on my laptop to sit on it, so my laptop sits directly on top of it, not allowing for any type of air flow.Also, the fans are not placed very well. Nowhere near my computer's two fans.
Quality control?. The second disc in this package was faulty, which I did not discover until I spent two hours recording a movie.  There was what appeared to be a half inch bare spot on the outer edge of the dvd+r.  Not what I expected from Memorex which purports to be the best.I have switched to Maxell
Really not worth your money and its overpriced. I was very interested in buying this product even before it came out, but I have to say I am disappointed.  This product does not offer any thing that a digital watch timing your run, a play list that is constructed before you run and figuring our your miles before you run on the street and it is even less useful if you are going on a treadmill.  I say less useful on the treadmill because it keep track of the distance for you, and when running on the street its not that hard to chart out a running path for you before you go out and run.  This product is not the breakthrough that a lot of people think it is.I am a fan of Apple products, have owned 4 Ipod, 2 Ibooks, an Imac and a MacMini but after buying this product I have decided to sell it because it doesn't do any thing that can do on your own.  I don't think that my mind would change if they added a heart monitor because you know that they up-charge for that probably into the 60-dollar range.I have been running for the past 3 months on a daily basis, and have run 5K-10K and half marathons in the past.
Even gave it a Second Chance. I do not recommend this product.  I recieved my first Audiostation and the touch sensitive controls on the face of the unit did not work.  Both the volume up, volume down and source buttons turned the volume down.  The power did not work at all.  It played my IPOD (5th gen 30GB), but couldn't control it.  And despite reading a review about the large power convertor, it was shockingly big (others call it a brick for a reason!), I didn't know where to hide it.  I gave Logitech another chance, returned the unit for a replacement.  I was astonished to find that the second unit had the exact same problem.  I was looking for a no-hassle, 1-piece system, this did not live up to expectations.  When the Logitech played, it sounded good, but I lost confidence and ended up purchasing a Klipsch iFi (5 pc system, manufacturers refurbished @ &lt;1/2 price)and now know what great sound is.  As always, Amazon is the best. Hassle free shopping and returning - even though this product was not great, I do not fault Amazon for it, they made the process as easy as it could have been
Works at first but then dies at restart. I was very excited to try this product on my powerbook G4.. it worked the very first time.. but after a restart.. it no longer worked. was quite disappointed as i tried to reset it and try setting ut up again. it was fruitless. So I dont recommend this product as I'm truly upset with its performance
Beware No Mute, No Easy Ringer Off. No mute button?  Isn't that illegal?  How about having to drill down menu after menu to just to turn off the ringer?  Otherwise the phone works great and sounds great.  But these are biggies to me
Don't buy this piece of junk. It's clumsy, cumbersome, not great quality, and a bad idea. In addition to that, mine will no longer work after very limited use. Wish I could get my money back
Hate this clock!. The clock is a great size for travel, but I don't like it at all.  It doesn't synch quickly enough to the Atomic Clock, the instructions do not tell you which Atomic Clock to select, and changing the alarm time is difficult.  If you get up at the same time each day, it would be fine, but if you change your schedule, it's too much work.  Had an old Casio clock that was almost as small that worked much better than does this
Didnt Travel Well. While traveling in China I hooked up this charger to a Sharper Image voltage converter and had to through it away after it started smoking.  A much better buy would be the Sony charger with worldwide voltage and for 5 dollars less
walkie talkie. Arrived damaged and seller would not back the product.  Amazon stood behind the sale and refunded payment.  Beware of certain sellers
disappointed. Am is now making a clicking sound....very weak....looks great but not as strong as I had thought in terms of sensistivity.......I love poratable am-fm radios..........
I got this as a gift and I feel bad that they wasted $$$. Phone broke after minimal use.  Not a good shop phone.  The other reviews say it all.  Stay away
Disparate cord length- more than irritating. I read all of the reviews here and thought these would be the best option for easy transport AND low ambient sound i-pod headpohones without breaking the bank (I'm on a plane frequently). I wanted something that I wouldn't cry over breaking or losing during my many travels. I found that the uneven cord lengths are very irritating- especially if you like to use only one plug (like maybe at your desk at work). The weight of the shorter cord pulls on the longer cord and it is quite uncomfortable- even when sitting still. So then I thought these will be great workout headphones (won't be upset if I break or lose them), HOWEVER, the cords produce noise in the ear pieces everytime they rub on your clothing or your hand. The effect is very loud and disruptive to your music listening experience (even when you are sitting stationary at your desk). It is similar to wearing a stethescope, which defeats the point of wearing in-the-ear headphones (which are supposed to reduce the ambient noise). I do not recommend these headphones, because of this stethescope effect- I could get over the uneven cord lengths for certain uses (they are after all designed to wear behind the head). I'm on the hunt for better quality headphones
Mine broke after 7 months and 1 day. good while it lasted, POS broke yesterday for no reason, won't read anything i put in it, phillips customer service was no help, I have to buy and new dvd player... and it won't be a phillips
Not as per my Expectation and Price. I used this phone for four weeks and then returned it. The volume was really low and it was really very difficult to hear the person on the other side. Then the battery started discharging very fast and could not not last for more than 20 minutes off the base. Instead of buying a new battery, I chose to return the phone even if I was refunded store credit and not cash
Not Dependable. It worked great for a short time.  I had only used it about a dozen times when it started to work sporadically then a couple of days later didn't work at all.  It really is crap, you might need to spend a little extra for a better one but that's the best way to go
Far better than the other versions of this product. I've used several other versions of this product and this seems to be the one that works the best and is the most durable.  The design makes it easy to insert and remove IPOD (unlike the newer versions) and the elasticity of the armband makes it easy to slide on and off one's arm.  I would highly recommend this product.
Not worth it. I purchased this item Jan 2006.  It has already quit recognizing any of the items plugged into it.  My USB printer went beserk when I plugged it in - never could get a page to print, so I direct connected into my laptop and all was fine. Now my camera dock and PDA are not recognized. I have contacted the warranty people via email - told me to call. Contacted Belkin and they gave me an RMA # to return the item
Avoid this access point. I bought this to support just 3 users in a section of a small branch office that was too cumbersome to hardwire.  Unless you want to blow your credibility as a network admin, don't put this device in your network.It continually drops connections.  I have the users trained to unplug this thing when it decides to quit working which has been at least twice a week, but now it's every day, sometimes twice.  How embarrassing is that to have your users have to unplug one of you devices because Linksys didn't even have the commonsense to let you reboot it from the web interface??I've only kept this thing around because I've been waiting for a firmware upgrade.  (Current version is 1 year old at the time of writing)  Can't wait any longer, I'm about to lose my job.  Worst network component ever.
POOR SOUND. I HAVE ALREADY SENT THE T.V. BACK TO TOSHIBA TO HAVE THE VOLUMN REPAIRED, THE T.V IS IN THE KITCHEN AND YOU CANNOT HEAR IT AT MAX. VOLUMN 5 FEET AWAY. AFTER BEING REPAIRED?????, ITS NO BETTE
Don't waste your money on these headphones. I am on my second pair of these, thinking I had a faulty power connection with my first pair.  Within days of owning the second pair, I'm having the same problem.  You can be enjoying your music and next thing you know, you've got static sending you to the ceiling...gets very frustrating!
Tooooooo Sloooooooow!. Disappointed.  It works great in the suburbs if there aren't a lot of streets close together.  Way too slow calculating/recalculating in larger towns and cities.  Also, my unit's antenna stopped working after a month.  I bought an external antenna and it works fine, but I bought this unit for the compact size.  I wish I bought something else
Didn't help my player!. Can't say much about this item. My DVD player wouldn't even load it. Either the cleaner is useless or my DVD player is too far gone! =
Not real good!. Install and set up was a bit confusing. Had to contact tech. support (not real friendly or warm). We were looking to save time for data entry. We realized with much frustration typing was faster and more accurate. When scanning e-mail addresses the error rate was about 40% on a font size 6. Scanning 8 and above error rate went down to about 25%. Correcting the errors the pen made took more time then it was worth. The concept is great but does need  allot of improvement.
20 pounds max. I bought this mount because I wanted to be able to adjust both the vertical and horizontal alignment of my new HDTV panel.  The product description says this item can handle up to 50 pounds.  My panel is about 44 pounds and the vertical adjustment simply cannot handle the weight of the panel.  I used the "heavy load" bolt that's supposed to take care of this but it doesn't even come close.  The TV doesn't just slip down a bit.  It just sags against the wall.  I can't imagine this mount could hold up a panel over 20 pounds without assistance.FWIW, the mount does feel sturdy and it can hold the panel securely.  I'm using a block of wood to offset the bottom of the panel from the wall.  I'll replace that with a V-shaped brace that acts as a cable guide and will let the horizontal swivel function of the wall mount to work properly.Also, the screws included with the mount were too small.  They didn't fit my TV and the screw heads were so small, they slipped through the larger 100mm mounting holes.  The lag bolts provided had little hex heads meant to be tightened with the included allen wrench.  Terrible.  Who wants to screw nearly 3 inches of bolt into a stud with an allen wrench?!?  I replaced them with 5/16x3" lag bolts and used a socket wrench.  I understand they're trying to make a simple installation but there's no way to get around the fact that the holes for the mount need to be drilled into the stud.  Anyone who has a drill will have a proper set of wrenches for driving proper bolts.I only gave this two stars because, after a trip to the store for proper screws, and with the addition of a bracket to provide the proper offset, this mount seems like it will hold my TV off the floor and allow me to swivel it from side to side.  However, I wouldn't recomment this product for any panel over 15 pounds.  20 tops
CX4600 Epson Printer and Ink CArtridges. I've had Epson C82, C84 and CX 4600 Printers and they "ALL" have the same problems = INK CATRIDGES that don't work or tell me the right amount is left in the Cartridge! Printer dies due to Ink Cartridge failures!Robert F
could be better. i've come to expect a decent level of quality when i buy a microsoft product but this mouse seemed like it was just some generic rebaged mouse. the main problem is when it is on a slightly uneven surface, and i mean very slight or on one that is too shiny the laser won't track right. i had to open the thing up and shave down part of the optics assembly becuase whoever designed it didn't test it well enough. unless your willing to do that skip this one, it is not of the same quality as the first generation microsoft optical mice. i know everyone is doing what they can to cut costs but at a certain point your robbing peter to pay paul. but then again you do get what you pay for :
Very Disappointed. Received this as a Christmas present and was initially excited about it. The setup application worked well and I was able to enter all of my devices and create activities. After many hours of "tweaking" the activities functions I returned the device very disappointed. Here are the reasons I was disappointed1.	The letters/numbers on the buttons and screen were too small for me to read2.	The number buttons were at the bottom of the remote in a very inconvenient location3.	The buttons were too close together and too small making it difficult to press the correct button without activating adjacent buttons4.	When watching a DVD I sometimes use the TV for the sound source or use the Receiver for the sound source. Although I can program two activities (one for RCVR Sound and one for TV Sound) it can't automatically mute the sound of the device that you don't want to be the sound source. As a result it takes manual intervention to turn the sound down on the device you aren't using. This makes the remote entirely useless for my purpose as I wanted to be able to provide my spouse a single button to push for the "activity" she wanted without having to use other controls or remotes.So I'm impressed with the theory behind the remote I just think it needs some more work to perfect it
not good. I ordered this by mistake- I used them anyway- I just have to say I've gotten better batteries at a dollar store-  dont waste you hard earned money
Lexmark no. 32 Ink cart. After clicking 1 click order i found out that this cartridge was not shipped from Amazon [ I was going to order both black and color ]. I immediatly e-mailed the shipper to cancel the order [ inside 1 hour], I received a e-mail in return that the item was already scanned and could not be canceled. I kept the ink cartridge and went to Staples and bought the black cart. The same color cart was available at a cheaper price less than Amazon's private vendor. I probably will not use 1 click shopping again
Stay Away - Bad design. I purchased a white one of these for the holidays.  Less than 6 months later the connector for docking the ipod broke off from the circuit board.  Unfixable.  Really a bad design and very cheap.  Wasted my money with this device.  In addition, the clock radio features a gradual volume increase when the radio goes off at the set time.   Not a bad idea except you can't turn off the feature and the volume starts loud and gets so loud so quickly that it will wake the entire house up.  The worse part is this is the only way for you to use the wake to radio/IPOD feature.  Why you can't preset a constant volume when setting the wake time is clearly another bad design.  I would not recommend!
RUN, Run  Forrest; Run fast, take it from ME!. .............Is not functional................ .If you are reading this then you are Gump-y! And, you and I must be family.First, I love Amazon; they are the consistent type of e-merchant.  And that's good! But but but but, why?:  would a designated (by me) upper "echelon" merchant like Amazon carry this Sandisk 2gb compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768). It simply is not functional information that I stored Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768) is gone, or not readable. I am surprised that Amazon did not catch-on/up with the problem.The product won't retain any info then I had to store less and less information on the card, so that my info is able to stay on the card another 6 hours. I decided to contact Amazon, they were very shortly, and cordially sent me a replacement Sandisk 2gb compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768), with the paperwork for returning the original Sandisk 2gb compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768).Then I got something that:A.	Did, have the shape of a 2gig Sandisk CF card;B.	Did, have the Sandisk label that says Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768)......;C.	And did have the original shiny factory Sandisk package. None-being the-less 3 different computers later and 2 hour had passed couldn't recognize what is inserted into the CF reader.D.	The brand new replacement card I got with the original factory wrapping, that's brand new and untouched and unrecognized by computers. One may safely assume (pardon the facetiousness), Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768), is yet to be recognized.From Amazon, twice in the mail, I got a Sandisk 2 GB compact which flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768). Both cards I received had a problem. And therefore, it is safe to assume that Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768) production have a major glitch. I mean, the memory card cannot be used for memory purposes. I have to yet see what or for what, other than memory, can I utilize a memory card. I beg your pardon, but in essence I am trying to imply that... The Sandisk products were a joke! :-).Being the consistent e-merchant that Amazon always been, Amazon agreed to return them. This was not a surprise (coming from Amazon).In essence, I strongly urge any person that makes a living, and tries to have some fun with their hard earned living to:1.	Not be fooled. If you see Sandisk, run away as fast as possible,2.	You'll lose it all in a matter of a day or so.3.	Sandisk 2GB compact flash card type I (sdcfb-2048-768) is not compatible with data storage! or even short transfers of data, from a home computer to work.4.	Spend the extra.... on an alternative brand.5.	That's the only way you'll get a CF card that is correctly labeled; and, serve intended functions.6.	I strongly recommend, as well as urge individual who is thinking of  getting that "other" brand of 2-giga...... cards to make sure do so:................7.	Use Amazon only, and don't be fooled by any other e-merchant who's not as high of an echelon as Amazon....... Amazon!8.	Had it not been for Amazon, I would have lost all I paid. :).God bless Amazon for their extreme timely tentativeness, I also pray for Sandisk, so that god renders it with the power to accomplish the purpose they stick onto their product line.God bless, and keep on shopping.
Don't buy. I wasted a day trying to get this to work on two different PCs.  The first, a Dell M50 Precision laptop with 1 GB memory and a 1.8 GHz processor, would capture sound just fine, but only color haze for video.  I thought that it was because the M50 has underpowered USB 1.1 ports, so I wasted the second half of my day on my newer faster desktop (also 1GB memory).  The best that I got was audio with the sound speeded up (voices sounded like they were on helium) and the same color haze for video.  Apparently, it doesn't pay to scrimp in this area.  I will promptly return the product and look for something better. From the other reviews, it doesn't appear that wasting more time putzing with tech support would prudent
DO NOT BUY UNTIL YOU READ THIS. After calling in a (computer knowledgable) friend to help me install this print server; and spending 6 hours trying to install the Linksys PSUS4, we gave up and called Linksys Service.  This unit got two stars for the polite and hard work the service person gave to this situation.  After one hour with Mark at Linksys, we were told that this PSUS4 WILL NOT WORK WITH ANY MULTI FUNCTION PRINTER. Linksys gets zero stars for not printing this info on their box, installation papers, or the enclosed CD.  Linksys knows this will not work on most multi function printers, the most common today, but will not tell their potential customers.  Save yourself a lot of time and DO NOT do what I did, ordered this for a Multi funtion printer.  You owe me a beer for this.
Unreliable and breaks. I purchased several of these presenters to use at our agency.  I made my decision primarily based on the reputation of Microsoft.  When I first received the product, I was pleased.  It has a good weight, feels like a quality product and is easy to use.  HOWEVER, after only a few uses we found the USB component to be a total waste of money.  It breaks easily and then the presenter will not communicate with the PC.  We basically have 4 over-priced laser pointers because the USB portion of the devices broke.  I must add that the equipment wasn't abused or mishandled.  The USB portion is just fragile
this phone is NOT headset compatible !!. This may be a perfectly good phone, and I've had great success with other Uniden products.  But Amazon's specifications for this product describe it as "headset compatible".  This phone has no headset jack, and is most definitely  NOT headset compatible. Since I require a headset, you can imagine how happy I am with this product
Was great- but unreliable. I bought this shredder a year ago from Target, and at first, was very, very happy with it.  It's powerful, shreds great, has a window to see the basket, and is very convenient.But my euphoria did not last long.  After a month, the sensor died so that when I put it in auto-on mode, it always ran (instead of sensing when I was putting something into it).  Then tonight, after a year and very light use overall, the shredder seized up as I put 4 unfolded sheets of paper into it.  So now I'm in the market for a new one.Had it been reliable, it would have been a great shredder- but this one absolutely is not
Poor product, terrible support. I constantly lose connection with this card while my other Belkin card stays connected. Eventually I decided to get rid of this card and get another Belkin. Funny thing happened! The linksys card can't be uninstalled and it prevents the belkin card from being installed. Nothing happens after I run the uninstaller.I had to call them. They said they would send me a registry cleaner via email. It never arrived, even though they made repeated promises. I had to make numerous calls and wait in long line to get connected.I also had bad experiences with a Linksys router. I will never buy a linksys product.Update: I called them again and again. Finally I was told there was in fact no such cleaner for this model
HELP!!! From Camp Arifjan, Kuwait. Could someone please help me get some use out of this device.  I work in Kuwait as a DOD Contractor on Camp Arifjan.  This is my first player and I cannot return it to Tigerdirect. (They ship overseas but no returns.) I bought this player to enjoy movies while I travel.  It is too big for just music.  Every website I try that works with Creative Zen Vision W to download movies is not allowed to download in Kuwait.  Nothing!!! So I tried to add one of my DVD's to it and no, it doesn't work.  I tried software to convert it so it will go on my player.  And no! Please someone help me! I admit I am new to this and work 12.5 hrs 6 days a week so my time is limited to mess with this thing.  THANK YOU for any advice.  :)
disappointing. There were several disappointments with this product. First it shipped without a transformer, assuming one would use it only with batteries. Its controls are cumbersome. Sound is OK
Avoid MEMOREX dvd media if using NEC 1300a. Use Maxell or Fuji disks.  They work flawlessly
Polk 45's are awesome. I read the other reviews and was worried about the bass output but not to worry!  I hooked these up to my new Denon 1707 receiver and adjusted the bass and treble manually instead of the default settings and these speakers are awesome!  I can hear all kinds of background sounds and the bass is just fine!  Make sure you buy them on-line!  Listen to them at a store to see what you are getting but buy them at Amazon and save $$$$.  Great buy
BEFVP41 V1.0 no longer updated by Linksys. The latest firmware version available from Linksys for BEFVP41 V1.0 is dated 2003. Don't waste your money, and be sure to buy the more recent BEFVP41 V2.0 (latest firmware available dated jan 2005).Note that V2.0 of the router only supports 50 IPSec sessions
Prevented the computer from booting. The hub prevents the computer from booting.  Search on the web found that numerous others had the same problem.  Belkin was unable to provide any support and it seems the only solution is to purchase a different hub.  The hub is nicely designed and works fine once the computer is booted and the unit is plugged in
Too small!. I purchased this for my Deskjet 460C so I would be able to transport my printer and have it padded and protected-no way would it fit with the padding in place. Why bother with a case when a backpack will offer just as much protection for the printer. Maybe it shouldn't be recommended for this particular printer
DO NOT BUY THIS PHONE. I bought a KX-TG5100M and in 30 days, it died.  The phone battery not only died, but then it would not charge properly with an approved new replacement battery.  The base could not locate the phone handset.So, purchase #2... the exact same thing happened, except this time it lasted 33 days.The price for this phone should ensure that the thing works and works for a period of time more than a month
I've finally learned a VERY expensive lesson. DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT. There, simple advice I wish someone had given me before I bought two of these. With the first one the battery died 13 months after purchase. Since it was 30 days outside the warrantly, apple support told me "sorry, tough luck." I made the mistake of buying another one figuring I just got a bad one and there was no way I could have the same problem again. WRONG!Second ipod just died (same battery problem) - this one died within the warranty period but becuase it took me two weeks to get into the ipod store to see what was wrong and, of course, by the time I got in I was past the 12 month warranty period (who keeps track of the purchase date? I sure didn't).Other than the fact that your substnatial investment will be worthless in about a year - it is a fantastic product. I'm just sorry that it didn't last (twice!) cause otherwise I'd be a fan
not a good product. Don't buy if you plan on printing often...runs out very very fast.
sony should stick to TVs. These speakers are big in size but short on performance.  Except for the price tag, not much else excites one about them.  They make a good surround sound system with the Sony 3 speaker set for surround sound, but for listening to music you are better off with a set of good bookshelf speakers with a decent sub.  These speakers lack bass inspite of their size, and sound quality is poor at higher volumes
Disappointed. The good: Lots of bells and whistles; Bluetooth, mp3 player, custom points of interests.Nice options for pedestrian  and bicycle mode.   Although I am not sure it's waterproofenough if you get stuck in the rain.The bad:  For what you get, Garmin could have  done a better job.  Driving on the freeways insouthern  california, don't expect to hear the navigated directions with the window down.Same goes for trying to use the bluetooth in making phone calls.  That's even with thevolume cranked all the way up.   I can hear the radio just fine with the windows rolled down.Although it's a nice thought of adding custom POI's, such as for safety cameras out here.The directions almost require you to have a technical degree,  to upload them.Garmin if you are reading this,  make it easy on the novice and test your products better.If someoone wants to add a custom POI, make it easy by having an icon that will automaticallylog the location you are at as a custom POI.Also do a better job of testing the products for volume controls with the windows up and downin various traffic areas, conjested or not
A Nightmare! Don't buy from Electronics Expo!. A Nightmare! Don't buy from Electronics Expo! The 1st Sharp 52' LCD TV was late, had a smashed HDMI & 4 dead pixels.  The replacement TV had even more dead pixels & Electronics Expo, Sharp, Amazon & Visa all gave me a horrible time & no respect.  So I am stuck with 2 damaged TVs now & still fighting for a refund.  My advice to all - Get a SONY from a local store for perfection & no worries
Slow and Unreliable. The 2.0 GB SanDisk Cruzer Micro flash drive looked like a good deal when I saw it on display at Office Depot.  It was roomy enough for all of my data and configuration files, was rated for USB 2.0, and was reasonably priced.  My first choice would have been an larger version of the 1.0 GB Iomega I use at work, but, alas, such wasn't available.Unfortunately, I waited too long to put the SanDisk through its paces, or I would have tried to get a refund.  As many others have remarked, it is horribly slow.  While backing up my roughly 10,000 files, I found that it was taking about a second per file -- longer for the big ones.  This translated to around four hours to complete the whole operation.Bulk deletes take just as long to carry out.Using my Beyond Compare file synchronization software to *read* the SanDisk and compare its contents to what was on my hard drive went reasonably fast -- until, for no obvious reason, it hung on one particular Word document this evening.  I couldn't even get my Windows XP machine to shut down without yanking the SanDisk from its slot:  the usual "safely remove hardware" operation wouldn't work.  After three attempts to read the same file, and three reboots, I tried to delete it from Windows Explorer -- and this operation hung too.  Finally I was able to do the deletion from the DOS prompt.  Just like 1985!  I then recopied the file, and now Beyond Compare can finish its work without a hitch.But can I trust the SanDisk to deliver up my precious files when I really need them?  I dunno ....So, it's back to the drawing board.  Maybe by now Iomega has come out with that 2.0 GB model.  As for the SanDisk, I'm reminded of that painful adage:  you get what you pay for.Ugh
RIP-OFF: Doesn't advertise that you need an AC adaptor. I would like to believe that this hub works well- but I wouldn't know.  I bought it to reduce clutter on my desk from all my devices hooking into my powermac.  I hooked up my printer, ipod and digital camera and nothing happened.  I called Targus and they said I needed an a/c adaptor.  It doesn't come with one and doesn't say anything about one in the manual or instructions, or their website.  They said I could get it at radio shack and gave me the info (5 volt, 2.1 amp, center positive).  I've been to two radio shacks and online- they don't carry it.  I'm upset.  Any advice
Tried hard to like it. The software is terrible, slow and glitchy. I have to start and close it multiple times to get it to find the player. The operators manual is just under 100 pages, so have fun learning the intricacies of the controls. Granted, the hardware is cute and the variety of functions is impressive--assuming you have sufficient spare time to study the manual.
Awkward shape, avoid it. The shape conforms perfectly to the designer's hands, but unless you share the same DNA, I'd avoid this product. I've used many of these over the years and this is the only one I struggled with. Constantly shifting it to get it's high and low points in a place that was tolerable. I finally reversed it, pointing it towards me and it worked a little better. This just needs to be a simple pad. Instead, they've overdesigned it as a gimmick.
Where has quality gone?. Certainly not into the Uniden CLX485, thats for sure. I have owned plenty of cordless phones in my day and to be honest, I wish I could go back in time to buy up all the older phones.I am just one person and I dont know about everybody else, but what would be the very FIRST requirement for a "good" phone to have? Sound quality. Second? Battery life. Anything after that is icing.The sound completely sucks on this phone. There is a constant hum and the voices sound slightly distorted and low. Whle changing the volume does increase the decibel level, it also increases all the annoying sound coming from this phone.If youre looking for the same quality phone that your old 900/2.8 had, good luck. If you find yourself reading reviews about how good this phone sounds, think skeptically about who's writing it.I did not invest any money in this phone. It was a gift and I am embarassed that I will have to return the gift.
Unacceptable. TRASH. The button that sets the clock in and out of daylight savings time is right on top of the clock and is activated by a single touch. So you're fumbling for the snooze button and, SURPRISE, you instead set the clock off daylight savings time. You'll get a rude surprise the next morning when you're an hour late for work.Sony should know better than this, much better. Now I have to go to the trouble of sending the blasted thing back to amazon
disappointing. I bought 2 of these drives to set up a RAID1 array (mirror) and one of them continuously has errors, causing the array to be degraded. I called tech support and they said these drives do not support RAID. Big let down, I have to go for the server version which will end up costing much more
not happy. The picture quality is very good.The delay in changing channels is not a big deal, usually you will have a satellite or cable box hooked up anyway to avoid the problem.I've had this TV for 9 months now and generally very happy until 2 weeks ago.  For some reason the picture just cuts out after 10-20 minutes leaving only sound. If  you wait the picture can come back on by turning TV off and waiting, but then it goes off again in a few minutes.  Not happy with the service, still waiting for a call back.I REALLY WISH I HAD SEEN THESE REVIEWS BEFOREHAND
linksys BEFSR81 v.3 - PROBLEMS. I had an old Linksys 8 port router and it was a fairly decent router. As it got old it became quirky and I replaced it with a NEW BEFSR81 v.3.The v.3 was a piece of junk. It was unstable and unusable. I took it back for a refund. How disappointing that the new product is so much worse than the old one.
Creates new scratches, didn't fix the old ones. I bought this repair kit so I could watch a rental movie.  It had quite a few scratches and was skipping during the early parts.  After I was done, I had even more scratches and the movie skipped in the exact spot it did before
Maybe I got a bad one. My experience: I got this from FM, not Amazon. The DVD player rattled pretty loudly sometimes (but not always) when I put in a DVD. I tried several. The picture quality wasn't all that great and the screen got a horizontal line thru the middle after a short time that would not go away. Plus one of the other reviewers was dead on about the remote - the layout makes no sense at all! Very poor human engineering, IMO.  I brought it back to the store for a refund. I saw the same model under the Emerson name for &lt;$400 at WM but was hesitant to buy it.
Average performance. Installation was very easy. But I had later troubles with this unit. But after reinstalling the driver it was ok. Performace is average.
Serial to PS/2? No, just wiring. Don't expect this device to work for all types of mice. After you've got one, as you may find soon if your mouse does not come with a PS/2-Serial switch, then this device means money wasted. No internal hardware, except  some wires connecting the 9 pin serial connector to the 6pin Mini DIN  connector is all this adapter does. If your mouse hardware interface goes  out serial only, then this device is not what you need
does not work with Toshiba laptops. Beware -- this unit does not work with Toshiba laptops.   Tech support is non-existent.   You will never get through on the phone.   Email support is non-existent.   You will have to wait weeks to hear back.If it does work with your laptop, this unit does a great job of recording and playing.
Defective Design. This item, produced and marketed exclusively for the iAudio X5, is entirely useless. The carrying case does not comply with the measurements of the device itself. The ONLY way to insert the device into the limited size and shape of this carrying case would be to cut the case wide open with scissors. Even if one could somehow manage to squeeze an iAudio into the tiny case, the designers forgot to install an opening for the charger. I returned mine immediately. If you order this item you will be frustrated with a poorly designed, ill-fitting, unacceptable piece of worthless junk
please heed these reviews and don't support this product. I was extremely excited by the marketing of these waterproof headphones. WHAT A DISAPPOINTMENT.  The first pair was muffled and then broke within a week. They sent me another pair, but still, after hours of fiddling, cutting, buying wax, buying a swim cap, the sound was muffled and very poor quality.  Clearly they don't even think their product works as demonstrated by the exceptionally restrictive return policy.  Purchase this product at your own risk
Cool while it lasted =(. I purchased this 3 months ago and have been using it nonstop since. Unfortunately, after dropping it the thing no longer works, so it isn't very sturdy. The screen is bigger and it is much more watchable than the video iPod. One thing that really sucked about it (besides breaking down on me) was that the mp3 part of it was annoying. If you were listening to music and then watched a video, when you went back to pick up listening to your music you would have to start completely over in your playlist or annoyingly have to scroll down until you found your place.Anyways, overall I loved this thing while it worked, but definitely won't be buying another one! I don't want to spend $200 bucks on something that just breaks so easily
Compare for yourself. I own a Bose VCS-10 center channel.  I would say that it is a good speaker for certain applications.  You will find worst and your will find better.  A few thoughts.1)  Many indicate that the speaker will sound better by adjusting your receiver.  True.  And that holds true for any speaker.2)  It is a slim design.  True.  At the same time, you can find a few others that are just as small or smaller.  I would say that it is a matter of personal preference of style.  What I find is that the Bose VCS-10 works out great with my old Sony 36" WEGA from 5 years ago.  About the right size.  But switching to a 55" widescreen...it doesn't look right and not integrated.The best advice I can give is to go listen to the speaker for yourself and inspect the construction...and how does it fit in your entertainment center.  Compare to other speakers for sound and appearance.The biggest advice is in a home theatre...make sure to get an excellent center channel.  That is where most of the action is and which will make a difference.Bose is good, but I have moved on
Worked well until the DVD broke. The picture is good and the combo was convenient.  However, after 1 year, the DVD broke.  Now I have just a TV.  This is the problem with combos.  It is better to get components separately
Product appears to be mislabeled by Amazon- I checked the. manual and I cannot find that it supports SACD
Received a defective camera - Dlink bad decision. I bought this camera and just when I am out of the country installing it I get the tech support guys tell me to send it back, lost my money, never again buy dlink. This was my first and last dlink product
Had to throw half of them away. I'm not one to enjoy buying a pack of 50 CD's and having to throw half of them away because the drive can no longer read them.  They deteriorate quickly
Ripped off by Sony. RIPPED OFF BY SONY Just purchased this for my daughter at college. It records for less than a hour with the included 32MB card. ALL HIGHER CAPACITY CARDS ARE INCOMATIBLE AND ALL COMPATIBLE CARDS ARE OUT OF PRODUCTION.
Unfortunately, it's flawed... As expected the AudioStation sounds very good. However, there are some functional problems that ruin the experience. On the unit both volume controls turn down the sound level. Every time the iPod is turned on while in the Audiostation it defaults to shuffle mode, regardless of how you left it. The power supply brick was unexpected (I hate them) and it's too loose fitting; the plug falls out with the slightest nudge. I have no idea how this product made it through the quality control department!!! Shame on Logitech - drop this failure and start over
Awful. Do not buy.  This may be the worst product I've ever bought.  It has never worked properly.  I've kept fresh batteries in it, but it's still no good.  Within 10 feet of the laptop, I'll click three or four times and nothing happens.  Then, I'll click and the slides go in fast forward until the end.  It's quite embarrassing to be giving a professional presentation and have this happen.Awful product.  Believe the bad reviews.  It's worse than they describe.The only positive thing I can say about the product is that it doubles nicely as a cat toy.  My cat loves the laser pointer
I wish there were negative stars.... The DVDs are a rip-off, although I'm counting on the REBATE to at least break even (not counting my time).The DVD player completely fails to recognize them.  Even after extensive troubleshooting with Disk Management and ensuring my regionalization was not an issue....Just a poor product -- Velocity ought to be ashamed.  More Taiwanese junk.  (I'd recommend Verbatim's DVD+R DL product - made in Singapore)As a note I can get other DVD-Rs to work just fine...I haven't submitted the rebate yet, so no comment on the veracity of other negative rebate comments
Short lifespan. O.k., I purchased these batteries over a year ago and only opened the pack now.  These batteries will not hold a charge and my charger indicates that the batteries are past their useful lives.  I don't know what the normal lifespan of rechargeable batteries is, but these didn't last being on the shelf for a little over a year.  I will never buy this brand again
i dont like this mouse. I dont like this mouse, i brought, and never work, its useles
Try to find a port. I own a Sony VAIO computer.  In the computer, there are no ports to put in this cord.  Ended up buying something for [money] to convert it to a USB connection.  Then, I couldn't find a program that would be able to send and receive data to my eTrex GPS via a USB port.  Was definitely a hassle
HORRIBLE!. I bought this to connect via 1/8" Monster patch cable directly to my CD player. There is a ton of static and line noise introduced when using it this way. If I could give it zero stars, I would! Avoid!
Not needed. Cheaper to go to Radio Shack or most stereo stores and get exactly what you want of equal quality at a lower price
Old Adage is True "You Get What You Pay For". I was hoping for a great deal on these batteries, but like other reviewers I've found that they run out of juice incredibly fast.  I'm amazed that other reviewers have had such good luck because things like my wireless keyboard which uses two AA's ran out of juice in a couple days of normal use while my automatic sprinkler time that uses two AA's lasted only a week.Be warned that these aren't quite the bargain they may initially seem
Missing batteries. I am also missing the batteries and the charger. I tried regular AA batteries, but they die really quickly, and when they die, the lens doesn't retract. I have a feeling it is false advertizing on Fujifilm's part, not Amazon's because other sites list this remanufactured camera as coming with the same stuff
can not block the fans noise from my server. I bought this one to cancel the server's noise in my cube. Turns out to be waste of money. Not any better than the regular headphone I already have. Also not quite comfortable.
Important info not mentioned in product details. This player is useless if you own a Macintosh. You need the "safely remove hardware" wizard in Windows to modify the charging status. Even if you purchase a power adapter (sold separately) you will not be able to use the software for your player.Also, the buttons are too small for practical use, and look cheaply made. Overall the player looks like a children's cell phone.
It will let you down. There are many aspects of the T5 people want to count as negatives. For me I consider them annoyances but not killers. I would like to have WiFi with my PDA but I am not dead with out it. More memory is always good but the T5 isn't on the hurting side. It's not a good mp3 player with the memory it has. And even if you have a 2G card with mp3's it's not like this is what you would buy for MP3s. But as far as contact information, on the go applications etc.. I would consider this as good as any other. The problem as I have just found out is these are known to die. I haven't heard of this issue till it happened to me but it seems the T5 will at some point Die. It will lock up and even after all the resets listed from Palm it will not come back to even a factory state. You will have a Palm Powered logo screen with a small black line flashing on the top.There are a couple of fixes. If you are under warranty you can send it back to Palm for them to make it better. Or you can remove the battery and solder it back. This is a serious design issue that Palm is more than happy to charge you for.Until I ran into this I would have rated this a 4/5. Until this happened the device did what I expected it to do. I read the box before buying it and knew it had some lack of cool factor with the no WiFi. But it has one of the fastest processors (available at that time) in a PDA. Which was a different type of cool. The bluetoothworks well enough I haven't had any issues with it. You can surf the net with bluetooth so wifi isn't really that big of a deal.But if you can't trust your device is going to be working the next day it reallydoesn't matter what cool feature it has. This has been a very expensive let down.I don't want to buy another Palm after this experience but I am not sure what toswitch to...
Poor choice for Sony ICF-SW7600GR. I purchased this adaptor thinking I could use it to power my 7600. I was wrong. It makes so much RF noise I wonder why Sony even makes it. Still looking for a clean adaptor.
OK but not great. This has been a bit disappointing in regard to the signal quality I get for my Home Theater PC.  I got nearly the same signal strength from the free antenna that came with my tuner card.
Not ready for primetime. Purchased to do a full backup of my hard drive. Seemed to install just fine but backup procedure produces nothing but error messages. Wish I had tried the trial version first. Don't buy this until you know for sure it will work with your system.
card didn't work - poor customer service. I bought this card and the Belkin Pre-N wireless router in Nov. 2006 at a BestBuy store during Thanksgiving sale. The router worked but the card did not. I called Belkin many times. Everytime they asked me to re-install the drivers and software for the card but the card never worked. I wasted more than 4 hours on phone and re-installing drivers again and again. Then finally Belkin asked me to ship them the defective card to get a replacement. I pointed out that I should not have to bear the shipping costs because the card never worked to begin with but Belkin was not ready to cover the shipping costs. I have shipped them the defective card today and am awaiting a replacement to arrive
Poor battery life. After using these radios two months I can say that battery life is poor.A full charge doesn't hold three hours.Perhaps my batteries didn't come in good condition. I didn't use them on AAA yet... 10 mile range is not true in a normal environment, open sea or desert perhaps.Product works fine while battery las
I returned this item...not functional. This item was not practical. It looked good but not being able to zip the sides all the way down because of the cute water bottles was not very functional
Check compatibility. Thought this would work with my new iPod Shuffle, but no.   Super deal IF you have the right iPod.   I offered the two items as give-aways to co-workers, but I had a long line of folks who tried them on their newer iPods and failed to get them to work.  If you have an OLDER iPod, you're likely to succeed with these
Real Disappointment. I received this unit as a gift.  Rechargeable batteries work well for my portable electronics and I thought this 15-minute charger would be a huge improvement over the overnight charger I own.  It wasn't.  Like others leaving comments here, I found that this charger rejects many batteries I put in it with its annoying flashing red light -- including brand new NiMh batteries.  All of my batteries rejected by this charger worked just find in my overnight charger.I threw this charger in the trash where it belongs
Slow and noisy. I have this printer in my office and am considering replacing it with an Epson. I has a lot of features.. espcially for the price (i.e. direct input from a camera or a memory card),but it is very slow and noisy. The print quality is very good.. as are most ink jet printers in this price range. But it is very slow and noisy.  Did I say slow and noisy
HAs anyone else had this problem??. Heres a new one....I have recently bought two spindles of these discs, and my computer (Imac w/ Intel chip-hardly outdated) simply doesnt recognize them-like I never put in a disc at all.  The kicker is that this spring, I also ordered two spindles of these discs (exactly the same as far as I can tell), from which I burned one hundred discs (not a single faulty one!) for a freind overseas.  I have no idea what the deal is, but have a feeling that the issue is not the quality of the discs.  Anyone got ideas?
Product does not match Item Description listed on Amazon .Com site. Ships incorrect items.  Product recieved does not match Product Site Description listed on Amazon.com
Hmm. I had this unit for almost a year working perfectly.  Loved it.  Then one day the bluetooth just stopped working.  It will not connect and the blue light does not come on.  Definitely appears that somehow the bluetooth stopped working for some reason.Holux has no support number and they have not returned any of my emails to tech support asking for help, after several months of trying to reach them.  I am finally giving up.  I would not buy this unit, especially now reading how many people are having similar issues.  I like the look of the Holux 240, but the support from Holux is disgusting.
Disappointed. I was hoping to give this to my husband for father's day.  It would have been great for the many power outages we have.Much to my dismay, not one channel came in...so back it went!We do live in a suburban area, maybe a city would pick up some sort of reception
Blah phone. I sent it back. The price was right but the caller ID didn't function. When I got in touch with AT&T, they told me, maybe this phone is not compatible with the other phones in my home. (Stupid Response!) I then asked, why would AT&T put a phone on the market that's not compatible with my other phones, I didn't get a reply!!! They wanted to send me a replacement. I told them there is no point in doing that, if, the replacement phone was not compatible with my other phones! I guess AMAZON will be sending it back to AT&T
Ipod FM transmitter. Although very convenient, the reception was not good, and the device broke after a couple of weeks. I would not recommend it
Not worth it. Purchased this antenna to extend the range of my linksys compact wireless router.  Made no difference at all! Tried to return but could not get a return authorization number from the vendor. Also, I was surprised at the size of the antenna - it was much bigger than I anticipated and did not fit in the space where I had the router located
Bad Compatibility. I have the older, larger version of this product. However, it uses the same software. The labels are great and the spring device that is used to apply the labels is great, but the software is awful. There is no direct Macintosh program; rather there are templates. They were written for old versions of software and really don't work right. The Windows side includes an actual Print Shop-style program which works awfully. If you do get this, make your own template on AppleWorks or PowerPoint
Not worth the hassle. After receiving the item I installed it in my Explorer and gave it a test run while out Christmas shopping. The picture quality on the main unit was outstanding, however the other monitor had distortion and what looked to be signal problems. I returned the item and received another from Amazon, Kudos to Amazon for being so fast with the replacement. I installed the second item, and had the same problems. Needless to say we returned that one too and went with a different DVD player
Piece of garbage. The little box with a few lights arrived in good condition and on time which was the good bit.  I fitted it in my car even though the lead is highly sprung and a bit short so it kept pulling out of the cigarette lighter hole especially when I went over bumps in the road.  After pulling the lead tight and wrping it around the glove box door I managed to get enough slack on the wire to stop it pulling out and all was well.  This weekend I went on a long journey and passed many stationary radars. At the first one the little box didnt give a peep but I still had hope as the radar might have been turned off.  Passed another and another and still nothing.  I got my wife to drive and tried removing the box from the mount and pointing it directly at the next radar incase my mounting was not right, still nothing.  I tried using it in city mode because the piece of paper they laughingly refer to as instructions does not explain the difference between city and highway mode and still got nothing whatsoever.  I reread the box and the 'instructions' to see if I was missing something but only found out how to stick the mount to the dash board and turn the thing on.  I did notice that it said the box detects all types of radar gun, which could mean it only detects gun type radars and not the static boxes so I am waiting to see one of the mobile radars to test this but I'm not too hopefull.  I will continue this review when I have tested this out but for static radars it is completely worthless which is why I refer to it as a box with little lights on it rather than a radar detector. TB
I just paid $29.99 for 100 sparkly Frisbees from Amazon. This just don't make no motha^*(&^(* since. At less than a dollar per sparkly Frisbee, this is the best price I can find for Frisbees. They don't fly very well and they break relatively easily, but this is the best value I can find for 100 Frisbees in one place.A lot of people are disappointed because they expect to be able to use these discs as writable CD media. The problem with that is, they don't work very well for that either. I, too, tested this for myself.Using Nero Burning ROM, I tried many times to burn different kinds of data onto several of the discs -=AT 4X=-, just like you're supposed to. IT WORKED! It burned fine. Then it took 5 minutes to open a simple HTML document on the burned disc. Subsequent trials run with the "Verify Written Data" checkbox checked revealed that every other sector or so was unreadable after burning. It's like writing with a white crayon, except this is white paper. This persisted on several OTHER computers with different CD burner drives and even different software.I finally realized what great Frisbees these things are. Cheer up people: THEY ARE GREAT FUN! So grab your spindle, go outside, and start chucking these things at your neighbor's annoying dog.PS. I need to sue Memorex for selling this junk. These disc are just a form of abuse
Not a good product. The FM tuner would not bring in a clear station without interference from nearby stations.  The radio part, hence, was worthless.  The speakers are sub standard, no depth.  Without the remote, little can be done.  All in all, it is not worth trying.  My cheap 20 year old Sony boombox is of much higher quality
This thing is a hunk of junk. Don't believe the last review.  I had mine about a month before I tossed it out the window somewhere near Charlotte, NC.  Nothing but problems, barely recieved or transmitted and was extremely weak when it did.  I actually had truckers ask me to stop transmitting because all they could hear was squealing when I keyed.  Tossed it, kept my K40 antenna, bought a Uniden Pro538W and have loved it!  Much better radio!  Don't buy anything Cobra makes
print heads are duds. I have had this printer for more than a year.  At first, it was a great printer. Not anymore!!  It uses up ink like no other, yes, it is great to have the individual tanks(which is why I bought the thing) but now the print head isn't working right.  Do several deep cleanings and use up nearly all the full tanks up, and the problem is still there.  The pages have splotchy black marks and the texts are only partially printed.  Went to the canon website, they don't even acknowledge this printer ever existed.My recommendation is don't buy this model!!
Incredible rip-off. $99.99 list price?  Over $70 actual price?  You've got to be kidding!  I never accuse companies of raping consumers, because we are free to choose what we buy and how much we spend, but this smells of taking advantage of consumer ignorance.  If you want to connect your iPod to your home stereo, get a $7.00 "stereo mini-plug to RCA plug Y-adapter" at Radio Shack.  That's all you need.  Because you already have a recharger (it came with your iPod), the only additional capability this kit provides is holding your iPod upright. I have this item (it came free with my 40GB iPod) and, although it offers a slight convenience over not having it, the price is a terrible rip-off.
These DVD-Rs suck. I used a 25 pack of these doing DVD backups, and the last 5 or so failed. I thought it was my software, so I got new software. Guess what? My first disc out of the new package of 25 that I bought failed, too.  It's not my burner (as another reviewer suggested, implying that people should learn to read), as it's brand new and doesn't require the firmware upgrade they mention. They just suck and have a high failure rate.  So the consensus seems to be that TDK or Sony are best. I'm buying some now and save myself the frustration
I'd give it 0 if I could!. I went through no less than THREE of these Linksys "toys" trying to connect my second TiVo DVR to my (wired) network - the first one the hinges were broken, the second one just didn't work at all, and the third one was intermittent.  I kept trying them because a) my first TiVo box was (and still is) using one of these successfully, and b) it's the one TiVo recommends!I finally gave up and bought a Netgear USB adapter - it is MUCH more subtantial and worked perfectly, plug 'n play.WHEN (and I'm sure it WILL) the original one breaks (if I accidentally tug on the cable or something silly like that) then I will also replace THAT one with a Netgear.I cannot recommend this product at all
Lots of static. The phone has too much static unless you're sitting right next to the console, in which case you might has well have a corded phone
3 of 4 DVDRs got errors. They have no label on the top (hard tell which side is up).These are the worst DVDRs i have ever seen and used.The Speed is much slower than other brand DVDR such as Ridata.( although they are both 4X). 3 of 4 DVDRs got errors during burning. But Other brand DVDRs are 100% OK.I am going to return these package to Amazon.
There are three different versions with this model number. The original version of this router was version 1000, based on the same platform as Belkin's F5D8230-4 Pre-N and the Linksys WRT54GX routers using Airgo's v1 technology and a Broadcom engine.  It got an excellent review from Tom's Networking guide.Then Belkin put a whole new circuit bard inside the same case and called it Version 2000.  It used Airgo's v2 technology and a Realtek engine, and got roundly criticized on the equipment forums for being an inferior product.The latest version is 3000, which isn't even based on Airgo technology any more.  Now Belkin is using Ralink technology, and it's essentially the same router as the Airlink AR-525W, SparkLAN WRTR-300 or Compusa's store brand MIMO router, any of which can be found in stores for about 25 bucks.  The version 3000 technology bears no resemblance to the Airgo version that got such a good review at Tom's.  In fact, the router with the Ralink chipset (the Airlink) came in dead last and was the only one to receive a rating of "not recommended" in Tom's roundup.Of course there's no way to tell in advance which version you'll get, but it's a pretty good bet you'll get the latest one.  The only way to tell is to look at the sticker on the bottom of the box.This practice of changing the internal electronics without changing the model number is a really annoying practice.  It's hard enough to do all your research and decide which model to buy, so then to end up with something entirely different from what you thought you were getting is just maddening.  Your best bet is to just stay away from this one
alarms: what is that. the alarms don't pay any attention to the settings in sounds and notifications. they repeat twice and then quit. the light doesn't flash except the first time. half of the time they don't work. i sent it back for repair and they didn't do a thing to it but send it back to me the next day. same problem, it is the way it is designed but they won't admit it
WORST LAPTOP LIGHT. i have three reasons for my thinking. they are simple and quick so here it goes: it falls of my laptop very easily, it is not very attractive at all and it is bulky and in the way.hope this review help
Not "meant to be plugged in all day". Netgear is supposed to have a 5 year warranty (2 on the power supply).    I had one of these for about 18 months.   Over the last months it's been increasingly flaky, every week or two it just hangs and needs to be unplugged and started again.  It doesn't matter how much it's in use (it's done it when we've been on vacation with minimal network traffic).I called Netgear to get it replaced, but they told me that it's not meant to be plugged in all day, so they won't fix it.    Unless you actually unplug all your network equipement when you are not actively using it (I didn't think so), then I highly recommend avoiding Netgear products
Hawking Hi-Gain antenna not as advertised. I bought this antenna hoping that it would improve signal strength as they advertised 6dB on the box.  The performance was worse than the original 2dB antenna that came with my wireless adapter.  Back it goes
Buyer Beware!!!. I bought this TV to use during lunch breaks at work and to take to football games.  It couldn't pickup any VHF channels and could only pickup the same 2 UHF channels.  The next day I shipped it back for a refund
Problems from the beginning. I bought this device because I loved that I could use it for both work and personal fun.  I bought it in September 2004, and by January 2005, I'd returned it because the blue paint was peeling off.  PALM was pretty awful to deal with.  It was returned to me in April or May.  When they did return the device, it would not sync properly.  I called PALM and they gave me the run around, telling me it was my PCs problem, my company's problem, etc.  They wouldn't take it back.  Then the warranty expired and they wouldn't take it back, and quite frankly I was exhausted by the whole thing and stopped using it for a couple of months.  Finally, in January 2006 I decided just to use it for its organizational tasks and forget the syncking.  Now, June 7, that just broke and I am throwing it away
horrible mouse. I have had two of these. Both of them do not work. the first one lasted for about half a year then broke. the 2nd one broke the second i brought it home. it was still intact but did not work at all. look instead for something from logitec
Sucks!. It gets stuck just when you need a disk.  Stay away from this device. Missed ejected disk references.  You will feel really pissed off in front of a such piece of junk with no way to get your disks.  A hammer is an smart option as a recovery tool
&quot;It doesn't work&quot;. In my case, it was a total waste of money....&quot;It doesn't work&quot; After numerous calls to Command support and sending unit back for bench chk, problem was not rectified with no solution from manufacture...It will not auto switch to fax when online, which is the main reason for purchase.&quot;Doesn't work as advertised&quot; It went into the garbage
Temporary device. I would only recommend this product if you need something that only lasts six months.  There is a reason the warranty is only 90 days.  The performance (sound quality) steadily declines over time.  The ihome worked great when it was new, but it won't play songs from the ipod anymore, and the radio is a static box
Product Has Bugs, Customer Service Won't Help!!!. I purchased the 8GB Creative Zen V Plus player during the first week in February.  I am returning it and this is why:The package arrived from Amazon.  I loaded up the software on my computer, then hooked up the player through the usb cord.  I let it charge for 6 hours like the instructions state.   Then I proceeded to load some of my music onto the player.  So after the music was loaded, I disconnected the player from the usb cable and started to listen to the music.  The sound quality was good, the player is easy to navigate in the menus, etc...  The problem was about half the music I uploaded was not on the player.  I could see the folder and menu option for the artist or genre but the actual file was not there.  So I plugged the player back into the usb cord, and pulled up the file location on the player through the computer.  The file was there and I could play it just fine through Windows Media Player.  I tried to access it again through the player and it was not there.  Then I accessed through the computer just fine.All my songs, all 4,500 of them, are in MP3 format from 56kps for my audio books to 192kps for the songs I ripped from cd's.  The player just wouldn't read about half my songs.  There was really no rhyme or reason on whish songs it would recognize.  I would load an entire album of 15 songs and I could only play 6 or 7 tracks.  This happened with my entire music collection.So I thought maybe the firmware was out of date so I uploaded all the updates from creative which did include a firmware update.  It did not solve the problem.  I then uploaded some of the same songs that would not play on the Zen V Plus onto my 3 year old Rio and original Ipod Shuffle and they played just fine.  I was frustrated at this point so I called the Creative Customer Service.  It is strange because they do not post the number for there company anywhere on there website and now I understand why.  They have the worst customer service/tech department of any computer/electronic company I have ever spoke with.  After three calls, never speaking to someone who I could fully understand as English was definitely not a first language, more like a 3rd or 4th language, I arrived nowhere.  They kept telling me they were emailing document to me on how to resolve the problem.  No email ever came, checked the junk folder and every other possible place.  So I tried a fourth call.  This guy basically called me stupid from what I could understand, saying "I can't believe you Americans" and then mumbled something in another language.   I asked for a supervisor. He told me that he would escalate my call and someone would call me in 2-3 days.  Then he hung up.I was really amazed that a company would treat its customers in this nature.  They really have to respect for there customers and do not want to help them in any way.  So I am returning the Creative Zen V Plus player and I also don't plan on buying anything from Creative again.By the way, after all this, the problem never was fixed.Also, when doing research on this product, I came across a couple articles and reviews that stated this player would play DIVX files.  This is not true.  This player will not play any files without being converted first.  I took an AVI video that was 100MB and it converted it into a 1.2GB file.  The format they use is absolutely a waste of space.  If you want to upload an entire movie on MPEG or AVI format, it will end up taking the entire 8GB of space if not more.  I converted the movie Cars for my son on a short road trip thinking I could have my music plus his movie.  I was wrong, the movie took up 7.1GB after being converted.I would not recommend this product to anyone.  As much as I don't like the IPod, I would recommend it over the Zen V Plus because:  1. It plays all my music 2.  They have a customer service/tech support that helps you and cares about its customers.I hope this helps anyone looking at this player.Jeff
Great service if you never plan on canceling. I have been a subscriber for 4 years.  Back in November my account was turned off due to a billing issue. The week prior to it being turned off I started receiving 3 calls a day for payment.  I advised one of the reps to wait a week for the payment, payment was made.  Calls stopped for another week.  The radio was then turned off and the 3 calls a day started up again.  I explained to the bill collectors I owed nothing and when offered to reactivate the radio I told them not to bother, at this point I wanted nothing more to do with XM.  They offered me 3 months of free service to come back, anyone who cancels can get this by the way, and I refused.  The 3 calls a day continued for the next week, I was informed that it simply takes a week for your name to fall out of their automated system....2 more months go by and then I start receiving a bill saying that I reactivated my radio and owe for 2 months of service and all the late fees that go with that.  40 dollars.  I call in and state I never reactivated my radio, thus I don't owe for reactivating my radio and the 2 months of service that would have followed.  The customer service rep told me that it would be taken cared of, 2 weeks later I get another bill.  I call back and the rep tells me the same thing and apologizes for my inconveniences.  I even called back the next day just to make sure it was finally resolved, and that rep confirmed that I no longer owed anything.  So then last month I start receiving COLLECTIONS NOTICES. YOU HAVE ONE MONTH TO PAY THIS BEFORE IT GOES TO COLLECTIONS.  I called in and was promised they would look into it and call me back.  This apparently has taken care of the issue, though I never received the call back.  This week I called 6 times, 3 of which I was promptly hung up on for no reason, and was told each time that it had been resolved.  So hopefully this time it really is...  To anyone considering XM I suggest you just get an MP3 player.
"Improved"? The new version is garbage!. It's true, CL has "improved" this product.  In the process they ruined it.  For one thing, they removed several features, for instance the new version does not have the removable fast file and lacks the slot for a label on the handle.  Also, it is about 30% lighter, and obviously "cheaper" in many respects, e.g the sides are now lightweight nylon.  I would be surprised if one of these new models holds up for even 30% as long as the old one. And it's UGLY: brown stitching on black faux leather looks awful!There is one actual improvement in the new one - it was easier to open flat on a table.  And one possible improvement - the attachment of the handle is apparently different, but you can't really tell if it's any better because it is hidden on the new one.You can't blame Amazon - the new and the old one have the same UPC code (8585405012).  But they are different part numbers: old = #60 2233002, new = #63-2400017-A.I am disgusted with Case Logic for this crass and brazen attempt to squeeze a few pennies out of the production cost at the cost of huge loss of quality.  I'm not going to touch any of their products again - IMO they cannot be trusted
Tryed everthing can't get it to work. I have tried everything and I can't get this to work.  I have called the number to ask them but everytime I get put on hold and it is costing me for the phone call.  Sit on hold finally get frustrated and hang up.  If anyone knows how I can get it to work I am sure I would like it.  Right now all it does is sit there
HORRIBLE!. HORRIBLE is the only word I can think of to describe this product.  I'll preface my comments by saying that I do not consider myself to be an audiophile.  I am an average guy who wanted to be able to listen to my Sirius Sat Radio or iPod throughout my house and in my backyard while relaxing or entertaining.  Here was my experience with these speakers -I received them on Friday, they were very easy to setup, and connected easily to my Sirius receiver in my Office.  The first thing I didn't like about the speakers was that even when connected to the power supply they were not very loud.  At max volume in a quiet office, they were at a decent volume but not what I consider to be loud.  More of a background ambience level, not a pure listening volume.I then took the speakers into my backyard.  I set them on my patio roughly 20 feet from the transmitter, but outside of my brick house.  The sound quality was HORRIBLE.  Lots of popping, hissing and drop outs, while only 15 feet from the transmitter.  I opened my windows in my office, tried all 3 of the avaialble channels, nothing improved the reception.  When I could hear these speakers, at full volume they were barely loud enough to hear about 10 feet away from the speakers.  It was impossible to hear them at all in the furthest corner of my yard.  I tried moving the speakers to that corner of the yard and completely lost the signal from the transmitter about 50 feet from my house - nothing but static at that point.This morning I took the speakers into my Kitchen - roughly 40 feet from the transmitter with 2 walls between - the only place I could get a signal on the speakers was sitting them on top of my Fridge.  While there was no popping while in the Kitchen, the hissing was considerably more pronounced in the house.  The volume was good while in the kitchen and could be heard anywhere within that area - but that also includes hearing the hissing throughout the entire space.This morning I contacted Amazon to return these speakers since they did not meet my expectations.  To add insult to injury Amazon will be charging me to return the speakers as well as the shipping to send them to me.  Since they were over $25 I got the "FREE" Super Saver shipping.  I guess it's only "FREE" if you keep the item, if you return it Amazon will charge you.  Therefore, it's going to cost me about $20 to find out these speakers are HORRIBLE!As a solution for all of you who are looking for the ability to hear your music in every room of your house.  Do an Amazon search for "Whole House FM Transmitter Gold".  For less than these speakers you can buy a Whole House FM Transmitter and pick up your Sat Radio, iPod, TV, etc off of a crystal clear FM Signal.  I received one of these units yesterday as well and I am keeping this.  It produced a signal I could pick up on every radio inside and outside of my House including my Basement.  I will replace these Sony wireless speakers with an under cabinet radio for my Kitchen and a Boombox for my backyard.My recommendation is to AVOID these HORRIBLE SRS-RF90RK speakers
Install CD has viruses. I just recently bought this and when I installed it Norton caught 2 viruses on the install CD.
Pilfered shipment, damaged. THe container of DVDs had been cut open, apparently before packaging for shipment.  Over twenty discs were missing, and the remainder were covered with dust and debris.  The discs were packed loosely, and rolled freely inside the box.  Amazon sent me a label to print out for return shipping of the box for a refund, but it's been a week and a half since I mailed it back and I have yet to receive acknowledgement
Nice hardware - really bad drivers. Ever since I loaded the Targus drivers on my Tungsten C, the battery discharges quickly and won't take a full charge.I've removed the driver, with no change.  The next step was to do a hard reset of the Tungsten C and I'm hoping it will take charge.I'm taking this keyboard back for a full refund
Do Not Buy This Webcam. I gave a one star to this item only because I couldn't give a lower rating than that. The image quality is very very bad. We decided to return it in just the first half hour we started using it. It doesn't work properly with yahoo messenger and the image quality is very bad in skype
I just paid $29.99 for 100 sparkly Frisbees from Amazon. This just don't make no motha^*(&^(* since. At less than a dollar per sparkly Frisbee, this is the best price I can find for Frisbees. They don't fly very well and they break relatively easily, but this is the best value I can find for 100 Frisbees in one place.A lot of people are disappointed because they expect to be able to use these discs as writable CD media. The problem with that is, they don't work very well for that either. I, too, tested this for myself.Using Nero Burning ROM, I tried many times to burn different kinds of data onto several of the discs -=AT 4X=-, just like you're supposed to. IT WORKED! It burned fine. Then it took 5 minutes to open a simple HTML document on the burned disc. Subsequent trials run with the "Verify Written Data" checkbox checked revealed that every other sector or so was unreadable after burning. It's like writing with a white crayon, except this is white paper. This persisted on several OTHER computers with different CD burner drives and even different software.I finally realized what great Frisbees these things are. Cheer up people: THEY ARE GREAT FUN! So grab your spindle, go outside, and start chucking these things at your neighbor's annoying dog.PS. I need to sue Memorex for selling this junk. These disc are just a form of abuse
Lousy pins. I purchased this cable and the pins were weak and clumsy.  I could not even plug it in and one of the pins broke.  I threw it away.  It is a piece of junk
bad. constips extremely easy on carpet and if you have a lot of cds stacked at the toppoorly designed, it is a vertical cd rack that doesnt have individual slots for cds, so if you want a cd from the bottom of a stack you have basically pull the whole stack to get to itputting it together was a pain, the one i bought i had to break a piece of metal just to fit it in its guide holes.again..poorly designed... doesnt even fit cds that well, there are gaps, and the cd casses are loose fittingpros..........i guess it can hold a lot of cds....
Inefficiency. I ordered several ink cartridges at one time and was appalled when I received a slew of large boxes to deliver my order. The increased cost of shipping the cartridges separately made one magenta cartridge go from $9.35 to $14.93. All the cartrides arrived within a day of each other. I would rather pay for one shipment rather than separate ones.
not even... I haven't enjoyed the boom box because the antenna couldn't find a signal, after moving it to every possible south facing setting, to send to the boom box. I used this xm receiver in one of my trucks and it worked fine. not the case with the indoor set-up.
Measure studs spacement first!!!. Big dissapointment! I should have read the reviews more carefully.. I bought this unit because it was recommended as accessory to the Sansumg 42" LCD I was purchasing from Amazon....It turns out this is a very limited mount if you plan to fix it to a dry wall. You cannot slide the bars horizontally and the center of the openings are 31" apart with a little leeway both sides... If the studs are 24" apart, like mine, forget it. What a bummer....Amazon should place a caveat next to its recommendation as accesory
Don't bother using the software that comes with this kit. The main reason I bought this kit was for the label applicator, the software was secondary. Good thing that I didn't care about how good the software would be, because the software for this is, in a word, deplorable.It doesn't have support for ANY other label sheets other than the memorex brand, which leaves you stuck with their labels. Its got some nice features in the software, but their poorly implemented. For instance, it can automatically resize an image to fit a CD/DVD, but if you've rotated it before that, the rotation is lost. It has a lot of minor quirks like that, and they add up to an annoyance to use this.If you get this product, find a better labelling program to go with the label sheets and the applicator
Stay Away!. I have 16X Lite-on writer, and it keeps thrashing my writer drive when I insert this blank disk, and it only writes up to 99% then CRASHED! I don't have this problem on other brand
HAs anyone else had this problem??. Heres a new one....I have recently bought two spindles of these discs, and my computer (Imac w/ Intel chip-hardly outdated) simply doesnt recognize them-like I never put in a disc at all.  The kicker is that this spring, I also ordered two spindles of these discs (exactly the same as far as I can tell), from which I burned one hundred discs (not a single faulty one!) for a freind overseas.  I have no idea what the deal is, but have a feeling that the issue is not the quality of the discs.  Anyone got ideas?
Junk Monitor. I have owned this monitor for a little bit over one year and it died on me right after the one year warranty expired. The customer services rep told me that it will be $110 for a repair which I can almost buy a new one if I pay the shipping on top of that $110. I have other eight (8) LCD monitors in the house and no one has such a bad quality. I'll newver buy any Proview products ever. I will give zero star if there is one
Unusable, but perhaps so due to 802.11b wireless and apptmnt. The phone was unusable due to high static, yet it might be because of the number of wireless data networks around my appartment.  And yes i did charge the battery for 24 hrs before use.
eh. The silver "metal" paint wore off within a few months and the plastic clip broke off so it can no longer be clipped to a pocket.  Also, the turning mechanism that exposes the pen tip no longer turns without great effort.  I bought this for my boyfriend and he got a few months of use out of it, but now it's basically junk.  Neat design and fine quality of sound, but not lasting.
Don't buy this for home use. This clock looks good and has a nice feature set, but while it may make a nice travel clock (if your cell phone won't do) it's really not suitable for regular use.* While the time is displayed in nice large numbers, the contrast is low and the display is hard to read in all but the brightest light. The display is set comparatively deep within the bezel and tends to chop off the right side of the last seconds digit, unless you view it fairly straight on. The date and temp are small, and can only be read from fairly close up.* As others have noted, you can't read the display if you are looking up at it, as when it's on your bed's headboard. You have to sit up a bit, or twist the clock.* The clock is smaller than it may look from the picture, and the base is narrow. It's much too easy to knock it over when pushing the backlight/snooze button.* Unlike many alarm clocks, there's no button to push to turn off the alarm and leave it armed for tomorrow: You have to fiddle with a small slide switch each and every night and each every morning
Horrible!. When my Sony LCD monitor died, I had to replace it.  This Acer looked great in the store.  But it was too loud in there to hear that the built-in speakers are terrible (tinny and not nearly loud enough) and the whole unit emits a nasty buzzing noise that is driving me crazy (I'm not sure if it's due to this Acer's built-in speakers or what... but the Sony was almost completely silent in comparison).I will be returning this and getting something else
Poor quality control. I received a black and a color ink cartridge for a HP DeskJet 950C.  The black cartridge worked fine.  The first color cartridge flat out did not work.  The printer said it was defective and refused to even try to print with the color cartridge.  I sent the color cartridge back and received a second color ink cartridge.  This one worked, but about half of the cyan orifices did not work when the test page was printed.  So I sent this (second) color ink cartridge back also.  I am waiting to receive my third cartridge.The service and turnaround is great.  Emails fly forth on shipping dates and apologies for the defective cartridges
How about a hammer for a stylus?. This product stinks.  Typically, the documentation is not written in standard English, but in some cyber-patois that no civilized person understands.  Their support material is exhaustive and exhausting and solves no user problem.  I bought it primarily for book reading and, so far, have not been able to access a single one.  The &quot;desktop manager&quot; tells me the &quot;synchronization&quot; went ok, but that proves to be false.  The stories I downloaded are nowhere to be found.  I look under Franklin Reader and find nothing.  I look under Mobi Reader and find the same.  I don't need another calculator, or memo book, or solitaire game, or voice recorder, or mp3 player, or phone book.  I wanted a portable library for fiction, nonfiction, whatever, and this gadget will not give it to me.  If you remember the Seinfeld episode in which the foreign professor threw the electronic organizer out the window, you have an idea of what I feel like doing with this thing.  I bought it from a clearance company on ebay for 50 bucks, so it's not a huge loss.  But I did want an ebook reader.  Apparently, there are a lot of ebooks online for the taking (or buying), but I'll never see them, not with the Franklin ebookman anyway.  And I'm certainly not going in search of another device.  Once burned, twice shy
Sounds cool but a big waste of time. Here's the thing: it's not like you magically hook up your device to this and it charges from the sun. You use the solar panels to charge a battery which then charges your device. So you need to have this thing in the sun all the time to keep the battery charged - and then it will take forever to charge whatever device you have. As if that's not bad enough, it comes with 1.5 million pieces - so it's not exactly as portable as you'd hope.If you read the instructions, the manufacturer is clearly trying to sell this based on some environmental claims - you won't be using electricity to charge your iPod. But your iPod will take forever to charge, you have to carry around the little array, the battery, and whatever adapters you might need. Clearly, there's a better way to save energy. Keep your fridge slightly warmer, or adjust your thermostat. This is a waste of time
I WON'T be buying Memorex any more!. Creating a DVD, using iMovie to iDVD EVEN on a PowerMac G5 Quad (superfast, supergreat!) is a 4-5 hour process. A 10-15% FAILURE rate, due to POOR media quality is UNACCEPTABLE! The 'quality control' at MEMOREX sucks!It is NOT so much the cost of the bad DVDs, but, there are superficial scratches on the recording surface of 5-8 out of every 50 I have used, causing a failure to burn, after a VERY lengthy set up process.I will be using VERBATIM blank media  . .FROM NOW ON!
Poor Support. My new Nikon Coolscan V ED worked very well for the first six hours after I put it in use.  Then the film strip adapter which is needed for most of its operations broke down.  I shipped it overnight and asked for a replacement under the one year warranty.  They have had it in their shop for the last three weeks, but can give me no estimate of when they might be able to ship me a replacement.  I would pay the another $160 for a new film adapter if I could be sure that it too would not be likely to break down.  Not my smartest purchase
Disappointing and overpriced. This is an overpriced and disappointing product that is third rate at best.  The user interface is cumbersome and inferior to your average shareware product.  But this was not the worse of it.  Most disappointing is the detail of map details.  Tokyo, for example, has virtually no landmarks and one or two roads (this for a city of 11 million people!).  This seems to be consistent with other locations in Asia.  Even if this product was free and included when the unit was purchased, it would be disappointing.  In other words, it's not even worth it if it were free.I purchased it in December 2005 and it still required a patch to run on Windows XP Service Pack 2, more than a year after it was released.Consistent with Magellan's misguided restriction on not shipping any products except to a few countries, I had to have this product shipped to a family member in the USA who in turned shipped it to me.Clearly the "Global" in GPS does not apply to Magellan's approach to service and support.Magellan makes good hardware and should stick to that rather than trying to overcharge for inept software.Had I known the software support is so poor for Magellan products, I would have chosen an other GPS manufacturer such as Garmin
Attachment problem. I have been unable to use the Yoke because I am unable to attach it to my desk, drawer or anything else. The clamping devices are unrealistic. Either I have to build something to attach the Yoke on or cut apart the clamp units with a hacksaw and then attach it to my desk top with the center drawer opened. That will then put me at a great distance from my screen. In words of a syllable, I'm very disappointed in the product.....
Cords come out too easily. The usb and power cords come out very easily which ends up being dangerous for the hard drive file system. The power cord kind of sags in the socket.
Lexar Media 2.0 doesn't deliver!. The Lexar Media 2.0 cannot function smoothly with a one gigabyte card from Olympus. The help site explains how, with my Mac, I can reboot my computer in OS 9 Classic then, download the pictures, then reboot in OS X. Not a satisfactory solution. I felt screwed on discovering this after the purchase. I feel like I simply acquired electronic junk. There was no response from Lexar when I emailed support, which simply added to my feeling of being had
Can't really recommend this unless ya want a pretty light. I've had this product in my windowed Lian-Li PC-60 for about 5 months now.  I had bought it for 2 reasons:  to light up my case, and to help cool my 6800gt.  Now the former it does pretty well-it is impressive to look at through the window (and it's easier to install than a cold cathode light).  However, as an intake fan, it seems to bring in more dust than air (and my PC is in a finished basement that I try to keep tidy).  At any fan setting other than low, the VCool's fan noise is noticeable over my other fans (3 Aerocool 80mm, 2 92mm Thermaltake Silent Cats, and the 120mm cooling my Enermax Liberty PSU), especially on the highest setting.  But over the past month the VCool has started to do something particulary annoying-at bootup, the VCool would rev up to a very high speed, regardless of the setting on it's fan control.  The first time it did it, I thought a cable had snarled into one of my case fans-that's how loud it is.  I don't have the VCool hooked up to another fan control, and I'm just using a standard molex connector to power it, and there's a free PCI slot between it and my 6800gt, so there's no obstruction to cause the racket;  I'm at a loss for the cause of it's behavior.  It only did this sporadically at first, but within the past week, it has become a guarranteed occurance from a cold boot.  The fan does quiet down eventually, but I feel the noise it now generates, the fact that the intake is unfiltered, along with the fact that I now have an Arctic Silencer for my video card (the VCool can't reach the intake of the cooler, even with it's extension attached), outweighs whatever decorative purpose it had
Viewing angle problem spoils nice alarm clock. This clock has a nice design, easy to use and doesn't take up a lot of night stand space. But in order to see the clock at night when you hit the light button you have to be significantly higher than the clock. For some reason the LCD display is not visible when the backlight is on unless you are at least 30 degrees higher than the clock. Since our nightstand is level with the bed, it makes reading the time at night impossible
Did not work with Apple Airport Extreme and PSP LF-PK1. I could not get this unit to work wirelessly with the Sony Locationfree LF-PK1 and an Apple Airport Extreme router.I WAS able to use the Buffalo Technology AirStation Turbo G High Power Wireless Ethernet to stream TV to PSP wirelessly and across the internet.Tech support was fine, the device was just incompatible with my apple router
Annoying popping noises. I've had these speakers for about 3 years now and I'm really not happy them. There is some hissing but that is to be expected with wireless speakers. The most annoying thing is the popping noises. I have tried moving the speakers closer to the transmitter only to find that the distance makes no difference. I thought the popping noise was some kind of local interference so I actually walked all around the yard but the noise stayed the same. I got a warranty replacement of the transmitter because when I moved the attached antenna it caused static in the speakers and I thought perhaps the antenna was somehow not properly connected inside the housing but the popping noise persisted.I can't recommend these speakers. Best to consider others.
Don't Bother. Not a worth while purchase.  You will be wasting your money on headphones that work some of the time. When your tv is getting low volume feed (soft/whisper dialogue for example) you'll get nothing but static - imagine watching a movie and going through this every 5-10 minutes).  I was told from RCA that this is unavoidable and that I should consider using the headphones for listening to stereo music only.  Although this may be fine for some people...I wouldn't spend your money on a product that has blatent limitations.  Trust me when I say there are much less expensive products that tower in comparison
Wrong Selection for my laptop. I purchased this item mainly to view the videos in my laptop on TV but couldnt do so coz my laptop is not detecing the cable at all. Eventhough the product claims that it works with both 4 and 7 pin s-video but doesnt do so. Please be careful that you read the complete specification of your laptop before buying this product. I am going for a 7 pin s-video cable coz my laptop has a 7 pin output but this has only 4 pins
Not great - loads of static. I agree with the previous reviewer - there is a lot of static and interference with these things.  We actually hardly ever use them for that reason - our house is small enough that we can hear the music from the other room through walls and doorways, and at least it doesn't sound like an AM radio on a stormy day. Also, they do have huge "wall warts" - the big converters (?) on the cords.  Finding an inconspicuous place to plug them in is impossible, since all the inconspicuous places are behind furniture, which can't be put close to the wall anymore for the size of the things on the plugs.  I guess you get what you pay for - I would have paid more if I had known how bad these would be
waste of money. Not very user friendly, limited vocabulary, finally threw it away when it got stuck on Turkish which was a language I have no use for. Hope there is a better product out there as the concept is good
18 months and no longer works. Like other users have experienced, this unit is no longer functional after 18 months.  The wired base is still working but the wireless range extender no longer fires up all 3 led lights.  Poor product Netgear
not worth the $40. I recently bought my second of these. The first had a digital tuner. You had to get used to the feel. After about a year of use, one earphone went out. The one I just bought has an analogue tuner, and it is extremely hard to get any station other than the very high-powered pop (and around here, country) stations. The tuner requires extremely small movements to move way up the dial. I can't believe Sony is charging $40.00 for this cheap piece of junk
Circuit design problem. It keeps trying to jump up to the next frequency. Sometimes it will jump back down again, but other times it has to be reset.I have used scanning digital radios before (cheaper than this one) and didn't have this problem. At first I thought it was a reception problem, but when it happened on strong signals as well as weak, and seemingly at random, I knew there was no hope for this radio.I like the neckstrap and I use it with a different radio
Not plug and play. I got this mouse a few days ago, so I cannot comment on the quality of the mouse itself. However, this is the first USB-mouse I have ever encountered that MUST have an installation CD to work. After installing the software on my portable computer, I realized that my touchpad had stoped working. After a lot of consultaion (I have not advanced competence in computer skills) I figured that the software had unistalled my previous drivers, making my touchpad mouse malfunktion. I had to reistall this, only to realize that now my kensington mouse did not work. After a lot of trouble I finally got it to work, but this is not the way a typically plug and play product such as an USB-mouse are supposed to work in my mind!!
simply doesn't work. Same as above, will not work with Dell. Considering Dell's share of the computer market, don't you think Amazon ought to tell us this, even if the manufacturer and the retail store don't? Why doesn't Amazon check these customer ratings and refuse to sell products which get 1 or 2 stars across the board??
Too cheap to work well. The sound is a bit distoted, radio reception is OK. But the headphone cable is too short. The most anoying is that there is now way to keep the unit from changing stations at the slightest touch, CDs and iPods have a hold switch, this item keep going ot the next station with no way to lock it to a station. Also it does not store presets.
Poor Product. Despite not being written on the packaging or website my HP iPaq RX3417 was compatible with this keyboard.Unfortunatly the software supplied was extremely bad, clogging my PDA making it run very slowely. As well as this, it also flickered when in use making the settings for the keyboard very difficult to change.In terms of hardware, I found the size and position of keys to be the biggest problem. While targus does include all 5 rows of a standard keyboard, it shrinks the top row (numbers) and the bottom row (space bar). This makes it very difficult to use the space bar (which is for some reason split into three parts) and the numbers (which could have been made full size as there is nothing else in the way). I found myself constantly not hitting the right key or not hitting the right key hard enough for the key to register. In terms of key position, there is a gap between the keys on the left side and right side of the keyboard making hitting the keys in the middle very difficult. Some keys are also very small (e.g. the right shift key and backspace) making them difficult to use (strange considering they are used a lot on keyboards).One of the biggest problems I had with the keyboard was the lack of proper arrow keys. Targus includes an oval shaped four direction button that controls a mouse cursor that appears on the screen. This mouse cursor is useful, but needs to be supplemented with normal Up, Down, Left and Right keys which are needed when typing to go back to another part of the document. Using the mouse to do this is very frustrating.The final negative thing about this keyboard was the price. I paid AUD$149.95 for this keyboard. Doing some research on the internet found better models (i.e. Think Outside Stowaway IR Keyboard) available for less than half the price (around AUD$70) and bluetooth keyboards available for less than AUD$190. I think it might be about time Targus releases a new model PDA keyboard with a design and software that are suitable for the use the keyboard will get. No more tiny keys and no more than two space bars
Annoying scroll. In less than 1 year the scroll wheel starting sticking which means that when you want to use it for scrolling the computer recognizes it as if you are pushing down the scroll wheel.  The length of the wire is about 3-4 inches shorter than it should be
Not worth getting unless they fix the software first. This is for a  PowerMac G5, or so the label says. I haven't tried this on older G4 computers so I don't know if this really needs a driver that's built in a G5 or something.I got this for the heck of checking what it can do for me. Nothing really.1. First of you have to know that this adapter connects to the DVI port, not the old ADC port. What this means is that the Aluminum displays for the G5 model use DVI. This being the case, then you have a problem right there to fight over the port. Unless you have the high-end optional nVidia GT card with dual-DVI port, then the stock ATI 9600/9800 cards come with one DVI and one ADC. So I would think people with G5 have or are thinking of upgrading to the Aluminum display then you will be needing an ADC to DVI converter to hold the monitor and TV at the same time. That makes using the two "monitors" with respective adaptors. Why?! Unless Apple envisioned phasing out the ADC port soon, it makes no sense. And if they did envision to phase out the ADC then why release cards with the G5 that still have an ADC port if the new monitors use DVI and this adapter also uses DVI. Are they trying to make money selling adapters?2. I haven't seen a perfect computer to TV interface from major video card manufacturers the same way Matrox has perfected it. What Matrox has done for dual monitors with one using a TV is that it automatically routes the video signal to the TV. If it detects your playing a movie file, it just brings it out to the TV as a full screen. No need to drag your windows into that screen and then making it into full screen. This adapter and the software interface doesn't do it. It just makes your TV into another monitor with extremely low resolution, naturally. The point of adding a TV as a monitor is to obviously put make multimedia viewing experience more enjoyable and hassle-free. If you play a QuickTime file or a DVD movie in your computer, you would want it to be played on your TV. Nope, not here. You will have to drag it then make it full screen.But it doesn't stop there. Try opening another application and that full screen on the TV monitors automatically switches back into one within a window. Very stupid and annoying. So I believe they should follow the footsteps of Matrox and create a custom software that will allow to do just that. Put a check box if you want your video automatically output on the TV, on a window, in the first monitor, second monitor, etc.3. The above suggestion actually works with Final Cut Pro application. But if you're a video editor, you really wont even need this. You see once you connect your TV via this adapter then you can route your TV as your monitor which is good to check the actual picture quality on a TV screen. It is a cheap solution.  However, if you are editing on Final Cut Pro then it would be natural that you have either a video editing card that can output to a TV/monitor while keeping your dual computer monitor active for editing. Or, you have a camcorder with FireWire output or some other similar solution that you can use to route from the computer to camcorder to TV. Using FireWire is actually a better solution that this adapter because it DOES NOT allocate video card memory to the TV via the adapter. By using the adapter to connect to the TV you are eating up video memory between the computer monitor and the TV. So if you have 128MB memory then 64MB goes to each. This slows down the video information and will be evident if you are using big computer screens. By using FireWire the video card does not interfere and allocates full memory to your computer monitor.4. The OS isn't even perfect with interfacing to the adapter. You connect the adapter and you'll need to constantly restart the computer whenever you connect/disconnect it. Simply putting the computer to sleep and waking it won't work. Your video card still thinks the TV is connected despite having no TV nor adapter (after waking from sleep). Shut down the computer, remove the adapter then start to make sure all video card memory is allocated back to your computer monitor.So unless you have a high end video card that can afford to split the memory and an interface that automatically routes the video signal to your TV, this is pretty useless. It's just for fun to prove that you can output part of your screen to your TV with hassle and all. Skip until they improve the software
Not the best. 7 out of the 25 disks would not write.  I didnt much care for the product considering this factor.
May be nice features, BUT... I'm a tech. who recently tried to help install & configure the wifi printer server card which later turned out to be faulty. Installing this printer card properly can become a nightmare! It took over two hrs. with helpful (but SLOW ONLINE LIVE HELP) HP support to finally figure out the card was bad. There are also possible firmware upgrade issues on this wifi device to be aware of. Setting up the different profiles for this rig is not for the novice.
Do Not Buy This Product. I should have read the reviews.  If I had, I would have known this product does not work on Intel based Macs.  What a waste!!
Buy Sandisk Instead. I recently received this as a Christmas gift, and it didn't work from the start. After much time wasted with their "tech support" the device was deemed defective. Their tech support is very poor - all they could say, "try another Xd card". The device kept freezing my system, the driver that came with the software didn't work, a very frustrating experience. If the tech support was more informative or supportive, Lexar might have redeemed itself. I recently purchased the Sandisk 5 in 1 reader and it works like a charm, right from the start. Their quick start guide is much more detailed, and their software works! Save yourself a headache and buy Sandisk
Faulty Driver. I bought this drive only a few hours ago, saved very important documents to it, and all of a sudden, it doesn't want to open on me. It states that the drive needs to be reformatted, doing this would cause me to lose all of my data. Terrible, I warn you not to buy this product, not worth it
Minimal Range & $80 FCC License = Poor Value. This GMRS 2-way radio claims to have "UP TO 16 MILE RANGE".  However, on the back of the packaging there is a statement in very small print that reads, "Maximum range can only be achieved over water or open rural areas under optimum conditions."  I live in a housing development in FL that has one small hill running through it.  That small hill and the houses (all one story ranch) limits this radio's range to less than one mile!  That's no better than a non-GMRS 2-way radio!  The lack of range is reason enough to not recommend this radio. However, the real "kicker" is that in order to leagally operate these GMRS radios, you must pay a $80 fee to obtain an FCC license! Bottom line: Save your money. This radio's "long-range" capability is "incapable" unless you live in the "flatlands" or on a boat.
Total Piece of Junk. Don't be deceived by the sleek modern looks and digital tuning of this radio.  Although the AM/FM portion worked fine and dandy, it was the NOAA weather radio band that I was truly interested in (who buys a radio at this price just for AM/FM?).  To no avail could I catch ANY reception (pure static) with the NOAA radio station, even though I live less than 15 miles from their 1000 watt transmitter! At first I thought the NOAA station was down, but a friend came over with a cheap analog tuner and caught the station very clear due to our high reception area.  Therefore, this unit is absolutely useless to me.  It's a good thing I bought and tested the unit before extreme weather hit me, or else I could be dead today! So not only is it a rip-off piece of garbage, but it's a public safety hazard.  If you value your life, don't buy this
No Bass, awful headphones. These headphones have no bass whatsoever.  I would never buy these, please keep shopping as there are better products for the money out there.  The headphones that came with my MP3 player out of the box are WAY better then these
OUCH!  whose brainchild was this? It has no use ever being made or produced!. The 49A cartridge gives you about 2,500 pages of print.The 49X gives you about 6,000 page of print, for ONLY about 4 dollars more in price!The 49A costs about 33.5 cents per page printed.The 49X costs about 12 cents per page printed.Why would anyone buy the 49A cartridge and pay almost 3X as much per page of print?Where I work, I made sure our supply folks order ONLY the 49X cartridges.
No shuffle between disks. I will be returning my CD changer (while keeping the wave music system)The reason is that it does not have the capability to shuffle between disks.  i.e. It will randomly play songs within one disk and then move to the next disk.  It cannot play a song on one disk and then randomly switch to another disk.BTW, the reason these systems are expensive is that they are made in the USA.  A great reason to buy BOSE
Waste of time. I used this reader for a week before it stopped working. It worked OK for the week that it worked at all. It would not read xD cards though. It did not detect that a card was inserted at all. I tried inserting the card fully, partially and even tried jiggling it a little. It seemed like the contacts on the card were touching the contacts on the reader but it would not recognize that a card was inserted. It did, however, work with my compact flash card. Then, inexplicably, it stopped functioning entirely. I unplugged it and plugged it back in and scanned for hardware changes in Device Manager but the card was dead. I tried plugging it into another computer and it was not detected at all.  Lexar support left a lot to be desired. I explained the problem in detail and the response I got was a generic "Try restarting the computer, etc, etc." Then, they wanted me to pay for shipping to RMA their defective merchandise. I sent it back to Amazon instead and got my money back. I'm willing to assume that I just got a lemon, but the piss poor tech support convinced me to get a  refund rather than a replacement.
Creative's Horrible Customer Service. I really wanted to love this little player and for the first 40 days or so I did.  I like the Ipod too but I'm a big Emusic fan and I wanted a very portable player for my workouts that I could play my music with absolutely no digital rights management.  With the exception of the always klunky Creative software I loved this player.  Great form factor, good sound, and pretty easy to navigate.  Now the really bad news.  While hooked up to my computer one day it simply stopped working.  I could not turn it on.  A completely dead unit 4o days or so after purchase.  I contacted Creative and that is when I started to feel like I was hooked up to a machine that repeatedly kicked me in the groin.  First I had to undergo about a week of back and forth emails trying to get me to fix what I knew was an unfixable problem.  They strongly suggested I return it to the reatiler but Amazon said it was not returnable.  Finally I recieved an RMA number.  Then I packaged up and shipped at my expense their defective product.  After another week they contacted me and now it is time for me to pay a $25 RMA fee.  That is what you have to pay them for their defect.  So they give you a number to call.  Toll free?  I think not unless you live in Stillwater, OK.  Open on weekends to process their excessive fee.  Think twice.  So that is where I am right now in the Creative customer service jail.  Certainly the detainees at Guatanamo bay are getting better treatment.  Hopefully they will ship me a new player that doesn't break again immediately.  These guys will never be able to compete by treating their customers with such disregard
Such low quality for a high price.......... First off this is not a case, it is a pouch with a clear plastic front and draw strings at the top. Once in the case the controls are not that responsive because they are touchpads. Also it is such a tight fit that it is hard to get the player in and out of it and I feared scratching the display. The fit is so tight that after about a week the stiching holding the clear plastic in place began to come apart and in about another week there was a noticeable hole between the stiching and the clear plastic. Very low quality for the price.I love my Creative Zen Micro Photo, but hate the fact that accessories are so limited for it.
Garbage backed by a garbage company!. I ordered this player from Fingerhut and unfortunately didn't try to use it until the time to return it had expired.  IT HAS NEVER WORKED FOR ME.  The Power/Stand By light comes on and stays on and that is all it does.  It will not play anything.  I tried to call the Coby customer service and you never get through to anyone.  From what else I've read even if you get through they will charge $31 to replace the player which is more than the $29.99 it sells for new at CVS.  Don't buy it unless you want to be part of the class action lawsuit I'm contemplating filing against them
Only so-so. So going from the Delphi Skyfi to a Nexus here are my thoughts.I don't mind the passport idea, I like it. I used to have two accounts, one for the car and one for the house. Now I only have one and take the passport and unit with me. The ability to record XM is great, I setup a session to record Air81 on BPM. Worked great, small drop out in volume after each 1-hour set but I can live with it.Did not try loading mp3's, I don't really have any mp3's as I like XM to much.Now the problems. 7 days into using it, the unit died. All static if any output. I bought a 2nd unit, tested and found that the Passport chip is okay, but the Nexus unit itself went bad. I'm also finding that the passport chip gets VERY hot... almost unsure if it should be this warm but can't find anything online about it.I'd say, all in all. If you can find the new INNO on sale. Go for it instead
wrong item pictured!. The item in the picture is NOT the corresponding product for the description.  The picture is for the CF to XD adapter.
Incompatibility. This component was returned because it was not compatible with my Dell all-in-one printer. I was not alerted to this possibility by any information from the manufacturer, from the supplier, or in print on the package. I should have been
A disappointment. I was pretty excited about this player, having read about it in Runners' World. There are a lot of problems with it, however. While it is advertised as a sports MP3 player, in a lot of respects it isn't very convenient for someone who buys it for sports. My issues are:- Headphones are not at all appropriate for sports, particularly running.. they keep falling off, so I had to invest in a better pair of headphones. Kind of weird since it's supposed to be a sports player. Also, I spent at least five minutes everytime untangling them before I could use them.- Hard to change music while running, and it often ends up doing something I don't want it to. You can't change the music without removing the MP3 player from the armband, which is a major pain and is just a function of bad design that you can't tell from any picture.- Not easy to figure out the features of the player, such as the stopwatch, pedometer. Also hard to use once you do figure it out.- Software is a pain to use.- Organization of songs is annoying and difficult to maneuever on player.That being said, I still use it. There are some good features:- Long battery life, recharges super quick- Very cool-looking player- Very easy to carry around.. can slip it a pocket or a bag of any size.I would not recommend this player and if given a choice, I would not buy it again.
Highly frustrated. After my trusty Archos player's display broke, I figured I upgrade and get me a 60GB iAudio X5. As a journalist doing interviews, I was also very giddy to get the line-in to record interviews straight to mp3. A friend of mine loves his player, so I didn't even flinch when I saw the price.Ever since then I regret my decision.Apparently my player has a software problem. It speeds up all my mp3 files. I tried several different programs to rip the mp3s and always got the same thing. That is when I was actually able to upload mp3s, because oftentimes I received error messages and the player refused to do as told.So what then: Upgrade the firmware. Sure. If you can make it work and I couldn't. The description online is poorly written. But it's essentially like this: Start with a fully loaded battery. Unplug the A/C cabel and unpload the Firmware. Now replug the A/C cable and that should tell the player to update the firmware. Well all it does is conclude that the battery isn't full anymore so it better recharges and does nothing else.I.e. I couldn't get the firmware to update and I tried for the last hour.Therefore I'll take the player back to the store and ask for a refund. And I'll get another Archos - and continue to live with its misely 20GB
Do not buy this for your car. The PocketDock is much thicker than the standard plugs and it does not have a locking catch mechanism.So, if your ipod is in a case with a cut out for a standard plug, you need to remove your case to use the PocketDock.If you have not case, your iPod can easily become unplugged from the PocketDock because the plug does not lock.Lastly, the plug offers a USB LineOut, presumeably to power your iPod but in most cars there is noise from the cigarette lighter that affects the line out in the PocketDock.My solution, charge the iPod in the car and use the headphone jack line out, but only when the battery is dangerously low.  In general I use the PocketDock because the sound from the other end is so, so, so, so much better.The PocketDock would be a good device, if it 1. Where thinner, 2. Had a locking mechanism, and 3. Integrated a clean power filter from Car Cigarette lighters
Not ready for prime time. Overall, it works ok for turning on and off groups of components, setting the inputs and outputs and controlling the volume from the proper component. However, I hoped to replace four remotes with one when I bought this and this has not been the case. I've still got two remotes lying around and I'm not selling the others on eBay either! Even though it loads "all" of the functions associated with a particular device there are big mismatches between functions in the factory remotes and the functions in the logitech. This is the case even though most of my components are pretty mainstreem stuff (Sony KV-30HS420, Denon AVR-1801, Panasonic DMR-ES10, DirecTV H20) THere is no facility in logitech's online software to let them know that their data is AFU. So much for "continually updating our database"! Making this work has been a HUGE time sink. The software is stupid and beurocratic, sometimes asking irrelevant questsions (e.g. "What input does the DVD player use?" when you're setting up to watch the satellite.) While cheaper than some, the unit is  very expensive compared to other universal remotes I *should have* bought (e.g. Sony RMVL600
Adorable Decorations but they Sound Awful. These are irresistably cute but they sound terribly tinny and they are unbearable for more than five minutes.  I regret giving them to someone I love as a gift.  They are now sitting on his desk as a decoration and he's still using his old speakers.  I know you might not be able to stop yourself from buying these; don't expect a pleasant listening experience from these speakers.
Surprisingly serious shortcomings. I work on a helpdesk where our employer purchased a set of CS10s (along with a set of older-style lifters for which I cannot find a model number) to allow us to move freely about the office while taking support calls. While generally very functional, they exhibit a few *very* severe problems. We have gone through a total of nine of them without resolving these issues:The units will, seemingly at random, produce incredibly loud feedback to both sides of the connection. This seems to be related to the phono jack on the remote unit, but also depends on physical location (some areas experience this more frequently than others; so far, air conditioning seems a likely cause).The units will periodically bleed across channels. Changing channel on the remote unit or range on the base unit does not affect this -- you will be treated to static and the combined calls of all other units in the area, typically until you replace the remote unit (although the remote units appear to correct themselves after time).They also exhibit frustratingly poor lifter response (even after replacing our older lifters with HL10s). This appears to be a duplexing problem; when placing an outgoing call, the lifter responds fine, but if a call is being received, then the signal used to ring the remote unit (even if ringing is turned off) appears to block the lift signal, not only failing to answer the call but also preventing you from using the Talk button for 5-10 seconds afterward. When this happens multiple times in a row, it becomes entirely impossible to answer the phone at all.I am very surprised to read so many favorable reviews. After having replaced every single unit at least once, we still find them to be barely adequate for our operations. I do not believe that we have received defective units every single time, nor that our environment is unusual in how we use them. I recommend all potential buyers approach this product with caution
If only it could receive FM stations. I've been using this radio for about six months now.  I don't actually use it very often because of the poor reception; I have an old cassette walkman that gets better FM reception and gets used more often.  The good points on this radio are (1) simple to use, (2) small and light, (3) only uses one AAA battery, which lasts a long time, and (4) has weather band.  However, the FM reception is very poor. Signal separation is very poor, even when listening to powerful local stations.  Reception quality varies greatly with minor movement of the headphone cord.  In general, acceptable reception is only possible in open-air sites, with careful positioning of the radio and headphone cord, and while remaining immobile.  I plan to discard this unit and buy a Sangean
Interior decays... This is a solid case, but after some months of use, I have 2 complaints.  One is that the stylus falls out because of the way the case is designed.  The other is that while the soft interior is protective, it has begun to deteriorate, leaving "dust" on the Ipaq.  There are few hard cases out there, however, so I would purchase this again if I needed one
BEWARE SAMSUNG DLP DESIGN FLAWS!!!. Consumers should be aware of serious design flaws which exist in Samsung DLP televisions.  Cooling fans and color wheels are highly susceptible to failing.  (As a non-techniocal person I should have no idea what these parts are, but alas, I bought a Samsung DLP)  Expect these to fail within 1-2 years.  Expect to pay approx $400 to replace the color wheel and $200 to replace the colling fan.  That is, if your service technician can find them in stock anywhere.  These parts are commonly in a national backorder because of the very high failure rates.You should also expect the lamp to fail sooner than advertized.  Many people need to purchase a new lamp between 1-2 years, and some more often than that.  The lamp costs approx $150-$250 depending on your model, but you should be able to replace it yourself without too much difficulty.  This cost will be in addition to replacement costs for the color wheel and colling fan.  Please remember that these maintenance costs are recurring, and you will have to fix them again in another 1-2 years.While I was very satisfied with the quality and performance of my DLP, my color wheel failed very early.  I called tech support to report a grinding noise, and was told to "turn it off", wait 15 minutes, and turn it back on like this would fix the problem.  After doing this for a while, the color wheel finally failed, actually shattered!  Now I am out of warranty, and Samsung wants nothing to do with me.  I have even tried ordering the part myself from two different online vendors, and they are both backordered indefinitely!  It has been 6 weeks and they have no estimate for when this part will be available.  Samsung cannot even give me an estimate when the supply of replacement parts is expected to meet demand.  I have had my TV for 18 months, and apparently there is a national epidemic of them breaking at the same time!I have a 42" Samsung Plasma which is a beautiful set along with a 26" CRT.  Both are wonderful products, but Samsung is selling DLP LEMONS and will not stand behind them.  DLP is a great bargain up front, but a maintenance NIGHTMARE!  You will pay in the long run, and by the long run I mean every 2 years.  If you still want to purchase a DLP television, PLEASE BUY THE EXTENDED WARRANTY!  IT WILL SAVE YOU A TON, BUT YOU WILL STILL HAVE TO WAIT FOR THE CIRCUIT CITY TECH TO FIND PARTS WHICH MAY TAKE MONTHS!I expect Samsung to abandon their design flaw riddled DLP sector, and focus on their beautiful plasma line.  Expect DLP prices to drop even further, but please...LOOK BEFORE YOU LEAP
overpriced and tiny!. i was thinking about taking this unit to work, but i don't work in a LIBRARY!  the drone of machinery and my co-worker's radios will squelch this device's output leaving me straining to hear its contribution to the din.  do not doubt that this is a glorified transistor radio, it's light and very portable.  it does have handy appliances and it is pretty.  it is lacking both power and substance that the price demands.this "radio" strikes me as a gimmick gift for opening a bank account or filling out a credit card application.
Is this a joke?. This must be some sort of joke - to release this mouse for sale.It looks nice, and the hot-link buttons function well.As a pointing tool, though, it is utterly useless.  It is so sensitive that the slighest move sends your pointer to the corner of the screen.  At first I thought that maybe I needed to adjust to the new mouse, or better yet, perhaps adjust the sensitivity.Option 1: You cannot adjust the sensitivity.  On to option 2...Option 2:  Maybe it's just me?  Unfortunately not.  When the mouse sits, untouched, on my desk, the pointer is slowly drifting across my monitor screen.  Sometimes when I try to use it to select something, it is impossible.I junked this POS, and went back to my older Dell/Logitech mouse.
Good except the compact flash card gets stuck. I use this in conjunction with the SanDisk Ultra II 2.0 GB compact flash card.I like it, but the flash card doesn't slide in easily. Sometimes it get stuck halfway, as if the unit has not been designed properly and the sliders for the card offer enough give to slide the card to the left or right of the pins.To add insult to injury, both the reader and flash card are manufactured by SanDisk. Therefore, they SHOULD work seamlessly together, but pathetically, they don't.I'd much rather pay more for a reader that worked great, rather than save a few dollars for a reader that makes you work every time you use the thing.For comparison, my camera accepts the card perfectly. There is no give at all, but instead is an effortless process.Not a quality reader.Other than that, it works as expected. Surprisingly, the reader doesn't topple over as easily as I thought it would. It stands vertically and looks like it might fall over when trying to slide the card in. Sliding the card in a 2 handed process, so one hand holds the unit while the other slides it in.Removing the card is extremely easy. That's a one-handed process. "Eject" the card from the PC's drive and then remove it.Data transfer from the card to PC is very quick.Overall, I'm glad to have it, but it's an annoyance to use it. I hate the card getting stuck halfway in the reader
Buyer Beware. This product is the worst sony product ever because of the lousy software included (nero). it has never worked correctly even after downloading every patch and update available. Avoid this product at all costs
It's a small thing....but. Why not sell the thing with a battery, it's a special battery, not available in the boonies, so I have a choice....Drive 30 miles or wait another week for a battery to come in the mail.  Iknow, Iknow in the text it does say battery not included but who reads that?  So for the folks who read this... BUY A BATTERY TOO!!!
Piece of Garbage. This item is an all around piece of garbage. After about 3 months of light use, it is stuck in 45 rpm mode. I sometimes use my thumb to slow down the player to 33 rpm mode. Don't buy this piece of garbage, unless you like owning garbage, in which case this is right your alley, the Garbage Alley. I wouldn't even give this to a bum, because I would feel bad about it.
I hate this Palm. I have been using a Palm for the past 6 years and this is by far the worst.  It is constantly crashing.  I had to get rid of all my fun custom programs which is why I used to love the Palm so much.  The touchscreen is SLOW!  (I'm guessing because of the Flash memory)  It is hard to really  get good use out of it.  Even the most trivial things are wrong with this Palm, like there is no power light.  This means you can't tell whether or not it is charging.  I'm so angry about that.  It often takes several nights of me plugging it in, thinking it is charging all night only to wake up and realize that the cable (mind you, they got rid of the cradle) was loose.  It is a good thing that it uses Flash memory because I have drained the battery several times with this circus act.  I don't like the new big size.  It doesn't fit into my old reliable case which I had for 6 years and was very secure.  I like to clip the palm to my belt.  This thing is so big that it is constantly hitting my leg when I sit down and falling off.  So, I keep it in my bag now and don't use it nearly as much as I used to.I loved the old Palms so much, they were quick, adaptable, portable and decently reliable.  But this thing is a clunking pain in the butt.  I am really ready to at least investigate the Pocket PC's.
Scans well - hard to use images afterwards. I am glad I purchased my Cardscan 700, but there are some significant unfortunate missed opportunities and because of that some important functions cannot be done at all.  My impression is that this is the best product on the market, due to its scanning properties, which are quite good.  There are some serious deficiencies though in the rest of the software which would be nice to have fixed, and which in some cases render the device somewhat useless, since the output cannot be transferred to a useful place.PROs: It does a pretty good job of scanning.  The algorithm is well developed and is actually quite impressive.  Even cards that catch and rotate as they go through, producing a funny smeared image, have some of their contents scanned correctly.  The superiority of this recognition software is the strong point of this product.  There is also an ok database management product that one can use to maintain and look up cards.  Operationally the product is especially nice- I can just sit there feeding cards in and typing carriage return after each one, glancing at the screen to catch errors.  The card image is retained in the record in the Cardscan database, which is important.CONs: 1) the exit path has places that cards can hang up, and they can catch as they go through.  This happens fairly often unless the card is new and flat, so part of the operation is to try to prevent that, by straightening out bent corners ahead of time, and by adding a little force keep the card from catching and rotating as one corner goes forward and the other is stuck.  Quite needless- if the exit path was smooth and continuous, this wouldn't happen - the problem is in the rear of the plastic case.  2) Although the product retains the image of the business card, there's no way to pass that through to Outlook or export it to any other format.  This is very unfortunate.  I could laboriously do that by hand by cutting and pasting each one, except that Cardscan software does not permit copy / paste functions on the image.  Why not?  It's easy to implement.  3) Every time I start the program it harasses me about registering, even though I've been specific that I do not wish to.  It also harasses me about logging in the online backup facility even though I've asked it not to do that.  It therefore ignores the user wishes.  4) The data exchange function allows only extremely crude export to a file, in a simple text or csv format.  There is no way to create an Outlook format .pst file, which would simplify importing, and allow for the future option of including an image.  Outlook can hold an image in the comment section of the record, but apparently Cardscan folks aren't even close to thinking about this.  5) If I indicate that a data export for a file is destined for Outlook, the field names are not set up correctly, so unless I do some heavy editing of field names, nothing much other than the contact name gets across.  If I export directly to the running Outlook program, it isn't perfect, but it's close enough to be usable.  Why did Cardscan get one right and not the other??  In neither case can I send the card image over.  6) I was forced to install Microsoft .NET software even though I intended to do all my exports via files.  I didn't get a choice- if I didn't install .NET, the installer stopped and exited without installing any Cardscan software.
Uncomfortable Fit, Mediocre Sound. The Sony MDR-IF3000 headphones have average sound quality and are very uncomfortable to wear.  Perhaps, if one were an elf or a small child, they would fit properly; however, if you're like me, a mere adult mortal, they probably won't fit you.They would be okay for simple stereo listening, but not the kind of superlative sound experience suggested in the description.  If you're looking for a solid pair of headphones for casually listening to music or watching your favorite movie, the SONY MDR-IF8000 are vastly superior headphones and well worth the extra money
Not  completly worthless. after changing this antenna out several times with the motorola stock  antenna on my wifi card,the results are, this antenna was a complete waste of money and is not as good as the stock antenna that came with the card
Not sure about the durability. YMMV, but my 80GB drive died after 6 months.  I found this be very handy to have around to transfer large files between work and home, but I expected it to last longer than 6 months given that it was well taken care of.  I'm glad I back up my data in more than one place
Please Read this before you invest  your cash in this product!!!!. First off let me state for the record that I only buy Sony , but I have toadvise you against the purchase of the bean walkman. I purchased one in March 2006 and returned it September 2006, as I had purchased replacementinsurance and was able to return it because it broke. It is hard to turn off and the usb port cover always pops open, not to mention the headphonesalways pull out. The FM receiver is hard tune in the daylight as the screen is invisiable. Save your self the hassel!!!!!
bose put their name on this crap?. I admit I am a brainwashed Bose fan and love their products.  i got a $25 gift certificate for best buy and I bought these for around $80 out of pocket.  These things suck. yes, the sound is decent, but comparable to less expensive sony earbuds that are half the price.  the cord is cheap plastic that stays in permanent shape as it came from the factory. it looks and feels sad.  the sound isolation and fitment of the silicone ear pieces stinks.  do not attempt to jog or exercise in these things.  all you'll hear is the wind rushing in and the earbuds themselves trying to extract themselves from your ear and onto the floor.  I returned these headphones in 3 days.
Horrible software.. Installation: express install is over 200MB, full install about 650MB!!!It REQUIRES you to upgrade to Internet explorer 6 to continue installation (how it this related to printer installation, and what if I don't use internet explorer - I do not). Install takes forever, is memory hog, then tries to sign you up for some services.I used to like HP printers. I'm completely disappointed with the software to the point that I would rather have other printer than deal with this type of software.
Danelectro Fab Metal pedal. The overall construction of the pedal is pretty sturdy aside from the fact that most of it is made of plastic.  The sound it produces ranges from a hard overdrive to the hariest shreding distortion. The pedal deminishes tone quite a bit and doesn't have a very good range (very high notes are not processed correctly and deliver poor results).  not bad for the money but not an investment in the least bit.  i just got this because i had a gift certificate that i wanted to get rid of, otherwise i would not have purchased the item
Recording quality ok.. but no 640x480 preview!!!. Nice compact box, and recording quality better than I expected.One major flaw though, no preview when recording 640x480 resolution, just a black screen with 'REC' in the top corner.Dropping back to 320x240 resolution doesn't help, this just displays the video preview in a tiny letter-box in the center of the display.A real shame, I love the concept, but the lack of preview is a real problem.Technical support claims that a future firmware upgrade will fix it, I'll keep my fingers crossed, but don't have high expectations
Cute, but on a short leash. I just drove 120 miles round trip to buy this mouse from a brick and mortar store, because I wasn't sure about the size.  For people with small hands, a regular mouse is ergonomically uncomfortable, and it is sometimes hard to find a small size mouse.  The grip is great and the feel is fine.  This is one of a very few mouses labelled as Vista compatible, so the choices are limited.  For a laptop pc, this mouse is probably ok.  But the USB cord is less than 2 1/2 feet long.  Thus, if you're using a big new Microsoft ergonomic keyboard (which has no onboard USB port) and a full pc, this mouse is not suitable.  I suppose one could place the PC on the desktop, but that's an irrational use of space.  But its probably the better plan than moving your desk so the PC is within 2 1/2 feet of your right hand.  I preferred the off-brand Micro Innovations travel mouse with its longer 4-foot cord, but my new Microsoft Office software queers it off (although my old XP software on an earlier computer didn't) and that is why I bought this one.  Microsoft should redo excel, add a generous mouse cord to this model, add a USB port to its 4000 keyboard, and certify other companies' mice so folks know what will work.  As it is, consumers are locked into a somewhat disfunctional set of conundrums
bad product bad company to buy from. I purchased this item for my father for christmas. One day later is stopped working completely.  This product was sold thru amazon by Ritz Camera. It has now been three weeks since we contacted this company to either have the item replaced or refunded.  To date this still has not been rectified. I do not suggest that anyone by any product by this manufacturer or from this company.  In fact I think amazon should drop Ritz Camera completely.  Each time Ritz Camera is contacted they tell you it will be 24 to 48 hrs to process the refund or replacement.  Yeah we've been hearing that for three weeks now. Buy from them at your own risk. Thanks
Looks good and sounds canned... I bought this one because of the good reviews here and I was very...very disaponted. It has more bass compared with most of the other speakers of the similiar size but the problem is that the music is twisted (in order to empasize bass) sounding like from a can. I returned it and bought a Klipsch Promedia 2.0 and there is simly no comparison!It's not fair to reqire this kind of tiny speakers to perform, but the  Bose's problem is to use a price tag to impress the buyers in stead of focusing on quality.I believe some of the reviewers here are just new to home audio. I still remember how I was excited when upgrading my OEM dell speakers to a entry-level 3.1 system for the first time.Well, if you do not believe me, just buy a pair of Klipsch ProMedio 2.0 and see for yourself if Bose worths even $50.
Mine did not work... SONY advertised this as a 18x burner for DVD+R media. I used the recommended brand (Verbatim) and Taiko-Yuden which are very high end media. I was only backing up home movies from my panasonic camcorder. The movies are in .mpeg format, I was only writing data and it should be no problem for any writter.  Unfortunately, I got only 12x write speed with the provided software, in a mac as well as in a PC. (Just slower than advertised, no clusters).It is a noisy drive too.I spoke with SONY costumer service and I could not get any satisfactory  answers. I had to wait a long time to be helped. They said that the drive was probably damaged. I returned it and I do not think the drive quality or the customer support represents the price of this drive.
Caution!. The drive is speedy - no doubt about it. It had good features such as ability to create a secure and unsecure partition.But all its features are useless when the design of the product is flawed. As noted by others, the metal casing connects to a plastic (right around the USB connection). That can break no matter how careful you are. When you pull the drive out of a USB port, you are applying pressure to this plastic part and it's guaranteed to break at some point unless you're 100% careful all the time. It's extremely fragile!Having said that, I would not buy this drive if I had known this before
good tape to use for beginners.. tapes are cheaply priced and the picture quality offered by them is even cheaper.i say if your doing everyday recording and dont care about the quality these tapes are for you.but if you wanna save your favorite movie or show jvc or fuji is the way to go they both offer incredible picture and sound quality
Service Plan. I have yet to receive anything to indicate that i have purchased a 4year service plan. I am still awaiting this information. I should have been sent w/my product or before my product has arrived.I am not Satisfied because i have not received anything at all about my service plan. When you send me something i will be happyMs. Budho
Useless. As far as I can tell this thing doesn't work at all.  I have now tried it on 3 cds and it did not repair any of them.  I should have just replaced the cds
did not work for me. This signal booster did not work for me. I set it up according to the instructions, connected to a Dlink Router DI-624.When I attempted to connect to the router via laptop, it would connect and then drop the connection after about 10 seconds. That would repeat indefinitely.I tracked the signal with a strength meter, and it boosted it to the level expected, but for some reason when the connection was made to the router, it was dropped.I sent the first unit into Hawking thinking it was defective, but they replaced the unit, and it did exactly the same thing.I have no idea why it didn't work. Maybe my fault.I am thinking perhaps I need two of these, one at the router, and one at the laptop. Perhaps the signal going back to the router is not strong enough to keep the connection.
Lousy design. I'm displeased. Egad! Upon receiving this remote control, I found that it requires four AAA batteries. There was no mention of that requirement in the product description! I concur with the other review writer: the control is top heavy, and I would add poorly designed. It's thick at the top and thin at the bottom, making it unwieldy. I will be returning this monstrosity
piece of #@%^. This has to be absulotely the worst product I have ever used.  Whatever you do, no matter how desparate you are, DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT. It sucks.I refuse to go into detail, else I get even madder than I am now.Belkin can kiss my  posterior.You, the buyer, please go find another product.  Even a trained monkey
Batteries are supposed to be standardized. I have two Ni-MH chargers and sony batteries won't charge in them. They probably use some proprietary technology to prevent using other brand chargers. They force you to buy their own non-standard charger that probably won't again charge other brand batteries. And of course this is not mentioned anywhere. No wonder these batteries are the cheapest. Don't waste your money or support Sony's attempt to bring non-standard products into a standardized market. Soon we have to carry bunch of chargers instead of the good old times when just one was enough
Broke for me quickly. I have had two of these now.  The first one broke, and I thought it was because I messed it up when I cleaned it.  It actually worked well when it did work, and was relatively inexpensive, so I bought another one.  This one broke within two weeks.
Buyer Beware. I purchased the Crosley CR-57 in brushed chrome in February 2006.  Less than a year later, it's inoperable and way out of Crosley's 90 day warranty.  Compared to the 1950s Western Electric manufactured phone that Crosley modeled their product from, the Western Electric product lasted for years
Okay, if you don't want it to be a portable. My mom bought this particular portable player for my son because we were going to be on some long flights and she thought he'd handle it better if he could watch a few dvds.  The picture and audio quality aren't that great, but not bad for the price.  The only problem is that we can NOT get the rechargeable battery to charge.  Therefore, it is useless for the purpose it was bought for.  It still places if plugged into an electrical outlet, but there is no way to take it on the plane.  I have not been able to find a replacement battery, but am assuming it might be less expensive to buy a whole new dvd player
Do NOT purchase this hard drive!!. To those people who said they haven't had any problems with this hard drive: just give it a few months.I bought the hard drive advertised here back in December '05 (about 6 months ago).  It was working great until one day I turned my computer on, and lo and behold, Windows gives me the error "The drive is not ready; its door may be open."  (A great error message for a hard drive, by the way, Micro$oft.)  I can't access my data anymore - it's all down the tubes.Buy this hard drive at your own risk
NOT FOR THE NEW IPOD NANOS!!!!!!!!!!. I got this for my wife's new nano, but the new nanos are not rounded on the corners like the older ones, so the new ones WILL NOT FIT in this case.  I'll have to see if I can return it.  I am surprised Amazon is still listing this item
Great idea - but sound quality suffers. I have an XM-ready Onkyo SR-603X, and bought a Connect and Play, since I love XM so much in my car.  Setup was easy, I got a signal quickly, but the sound quality is poor.  When I listen to DVDs, CDs, my iPod, even FM radio on my Onkyo, they all sound great.  XM, however is a big disappointment in sound quality, even though my signal strength is over 80% (70% is recommended).  It sounds nowhere near as "full" or detailed as I was expecting.Listen before you buy and be careful
NO HANDLE. Nice product before they decided to save a few pennies - I have purchased seven, but now it is made with out the handle - so if that was part of the atraction of this case, note that the discription says 'sturdy padded handle' -- NOT!5 STARS if it still had the handle or if you don't need one
Tilts in the HDMI socket and loses signal!. Picked one of these up because it was a lot cheaper than buying a new DVI to HDMI cable. BAD IDEA! The DVI cable screws into the adapter ok, but the completed assembly is too big and hangs down from the HDMI socket. I literally had to prop up the adapter behind the player with some magazines to keep it from tilting down and losing the signal.  Save yourself some trouble and buy a an HDMI cable.
Only for  a 30GB Vision. This case was designed for the first generation 30GB Zen Vision W, NOT the 1st Gen 60GB Zen Vision W...This was not called out on the web-site. As I opened the plastic clamshell packaging, Amazon/ANTonline would not authorize the return of this product
Scans OK  but very poorly constructed. First, let me say that I could not review this product completely as it quit working after about 20 scans (30 minutes after charging it for the first time).  I did have the chance to perform scans at 100, 200, 400 dpi as well as in black and white, 12- and 24-bit color.  I was also able to install the software and import about 10 scans into my computer.It did scan photos well (at both 200 and 400 dpi), but it was tough to get the images to scan in perfectly vertical.  At the higher resolution and higher color (24 bit), the scanning process took to long (about 12 seconds for a full page).  When scanning  at 200 dpi and 12-bit color it took about 8 seconds per page.  Also, the scanner actually turns off after each scan, thus it takes 15-20 seconds and button pushing to reboot the device before scanning another page.  Importing 7 images from the device to my laptop (while it was still working) took about 4 minutes.  The OCR software (Paperport) was good, but the scan quality (Black and white and 100 dpi) was too poor to allow it to be functional.  The 8MB internal memory is not enough and the 128MB or 256MB expansion card is definitely needed.What I was most shocking was the very poor craftsmanship.  There were seams on the device where the plastic was glued.  One of the  two main buttons was recessed into the device.  Also, the indicator lights were misaligned with the overlying symbols.  I cannot emphasize enough how poorly made this was.  I am returning it for a full refund (30 day money back and 90 day exchange - if bought from Planon).DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT!Addendum (April 20th 2006):  I have had a very difficult time dealing with the Planon company.  To return this product within the first 30 days and get a full refund, you must first get an authorization which required no fewer than 7 phone calls and 5 e-mails.  Once I finally had returned it, they said they had credited my charge when they never did.  Upon calling them they said it would "take some time" to see the credit come through... That was 6 weeks ago.  They do not return phone calls or e-mails and in order to return this it has required alot of time and effort.  There business practices (product quality, customer service, and return policy) are poor at best.  I will re-emphasize: DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT
Did not work with Car Stereo. I received this item and thought that the price was great, considering the reviews from others. Unfortunately, the AVB cassette adapter did not work with the cassette player on my car stereo. In case this is of any help, it was a stock pioneer head unit on a lexus sc300.It might just be that I received a defective adapter, or it is not compatible with my car. Either way, the car never recognized it, after trying multiple times, it kept making a noise that sounded like it was spinning and even if it had read the adapter, the noise coming from it was too loud to hear the music over it.I ended up returning it and purchasing a Dynex DX-CA101 and that one worked fine and worked quietly
problems with springs and batteries. I bought this charger 11 months ago.  It came with 4 Kodak 1850 mA NiMH batteries.  After a few months of light use, the batteries were unable to hold charge as much as 1850 mA batteries should.  If I use the batteries immediately after charging them, I can take about 20 pictures (while my 2000 mA NiMH batteries can do &#62;60).  If I charge them and put them into my camera bag as reserves, they won't be useful after only a week.The charger is capable of charging both AA and AAA batteries.  But a few months ago, 1 spring for switching between AA and AAA stopped working properly.  This was after very light use.  I only charge AAA batteries once a month.The market for NiMH batteries and chargers is more competitive than a year ago.  I would not buy this Kodak if I were to buy today
Didn't work for me -- But seller promised refund. I purchased this product and couldn't get it to work on a PC, laptop, or pda (cingular 8125). Not only does it not register in any SD/MiniSD card reader, but the craftsmanship appears to be suspect as well. I am currently pursuing a refund
Clarity of the video is very poor. Clarity of the video is very poor when we connected to the TV
Works! Sometimes =(. I bought one of these from circuit city for $99.  I live in St. Pete/Tampa area.  The auto station find was not very effective.  I found clearer ones by manually searching.  When it's connected to your ipod, it definetly slows down the menus.  The buttons on the iCarPlay 200 are also very unresponsive.  I would press the change station button, nothing happened, then press it again, then it would jump twice.  So my advice is have patience when navigating the iCarPlay's menus.  Sometimes I could get it to work with an acceptable amount of static, but then the unit would randomly stop working, and i get blasted with noise from my radio being cranked up.  You cannot adjust the volume on the iCarPlay, only on your radio.  I returned the unit, and I am in the process of getting a pioneer head unit with a built in auxillery input on the front panel.  I cannot recommend this unit.  It also looks cheap for the price point.  It looks like it should cost about $25 dollars.  One postive note, it does charge the Ipod fairly quickly.  Also in my wifes car, where she a factory stereo the static wasn't quite as annoying.  I have amplified tweeters which pick up everything, including static.  I also thought that putting the unit closer to the stereo would improve the sound, oddly it doesn't seem to make a difference.  You could also look at one of the wired ipod adapters such as the PIONEER CD-IB100 iPod Adapter.
NOT for _all_ XM2go radios. I have a Pioneer Inno and expected these to work based on the claim "works with all XM2go radios", but the packaging when it arrives says it is for MyFi radios and it has different connectors.  The product page here doesn't say Delphi MyFi, it says XM2go (which Inno is sold as).The product itself probably works fine for the sets it is designed for.  The 1 star is actually a complaint about the Amazon product description
So-so. I bought the iHome so that I could choose which songs to wake up to off of my iPod, and it worked well when it actually WORKED.After being very late to work three times because my alarm failed to go off I tossed the item - it wasn't worth all of the problems to keep at all if I couldn't even trust the alarm to get me out of bed in the morning.Other people have mentioned the too bright display and the "gradual volume increase", which I eventually got used to, but I could see how they would be incredibly annoying
one star is even too many!!!. I'm sorry for this review,but each one of my kids gets ONE Christmas gift...... I ordered this item in plenty of time and never got it....So one of my kids had nothing under the tree. Think twice before using this company...It's a shame... I have NEVER had a problem with anyone else! A VERY SAD MOM AND CHILD! Elizabeth M Storm
Cheap cordless solution. Mediocre voice volume. TERRIBLE with VoIP (i.e. Vonage). I bought this phone to replace an older VTech 2426 phone (which incidentally is a far superior model). I saw that the 5823 is 5.8 GHz and on the merits of not interfering with the wireless network traffic buzzing around my house, I bought it.This proved to be a terrible mistake. Caller ID functionality for Vonage mysteriously stopped working even though this phone's REN is rated at 0.1b. I spent weeks on the phone with tech support.Additionally,the voice quality is terrible. Any time we make long distance calls we are constantly told that it sounds like we are conversing into the handset from across the room. We have to yell to make ourselves (barely) heard.Out of desperation, I used my rudimentary electronics skills to put my old 2.4GHz Vtech 2426 back together. I cleaned it up, dusted it out, charged it, and guess what. Voice quality is back. Caller ID is functioning once again as well. Regardless of whether you have Vonage, I would avoid the 5823 phone altogether.For Vonage users, however, it is an absolute no-no. Save yourself months of misery and frustration
Don't recommend if you have other wireless gadgets. I tried to use the SH-FX60 kit with my Panasonic SC-HT740 system, but it only worked within 5 feet of the transmitter!  Past that range, the wireless connection could not be made and no sound at all came through to the rear surround speakers -- possibly due to interference from other wireless gadgets.  If you have other wireless devices that you aren't ready to part with, or if you're in a building where others may have wireless gadgets in close range, do not waste your money on this item.  Otherwise, cross your fingers and maybe it'll just work.
It's not worth it. I bought this after havinf the Belkin Tunecast II and have to say that i cannot see any improvement. The signal is TOO WEAK....TOOOOOOO WEAK
Disappointing. I thought this was something I would use and enjoy. After just a few uses I can't be bothered with it. Most of the words I tried to looked up were not there. It may be of use to a gradeschooler, but anyone with a higher reading level would get nothing but a bookmark and I would rather use a paperclip
Now you see it... now you don't!. The JumpDrive worked fine for me for about a month, and then it started acting weird.  It was recognized by the Device Manager as working properly, but it did not show in My Computer and was therefore inaccessible.  So, was the JumpDrive there or not??Lexar live chat support attempted to help me but later resorted to sending me a Resurrection Tool via email, with instructions.  After executing the Tool (and consequently losing my data), it happened all over again five minutes later!This is a little disappointing, since this is the first USB drive I've purchased and used.  I thought it would help with moving and storing files, but it's turning out to be more trouble than it's worth
The worst and most expensive router i've owned so far. This thing is garbage. I originally had a client buy it, but we couldn't get Quick VPN to work right back then. I got the unit in the end, and it worked for a year or so.Then all of a sudden the diag light started flashing and the unit stopped working. I reset it and updated the firmware. That completely toasted it, and i had to reload the firmware with TFTP.Then there were the notorious MTU problems. Ident is still not filterable in the new firmware, among other shortcomings. You have to forward the port to nowhere manually.Finally, got it to work again for a couple of hours with the new firmware before the diag light started flashing again, and this pathetic router failed again. Now, it's going in the trash.I read that these have a CMOS battery inside them, which can cause problems and is not user-replaceable. If that's true, it's funny how none of the other old, cheap routers i have used ever had any trouble with that. Right now, my old, cheap D-Link router had to take the place of this overpriced trash.Marketing this model as a small-business router is nothing more than a joke..
Lexar 2 gb Jump Drive Sport. I have had a 256 mb, 512 mb, and a 1 gb Jump Drive Sport.  I love these sturdy and reliable drives.  I was very dissapointed when I first used the 2 gb model.  The data transfer rate seems to be extremely slow.  Its slow even when saving a plain text document!  I would buy again only if they improve the speed of this drive.
Nice unint when it work but Bluetooth is very flakey. I am an Air Force trained techie and have been for over 15 years.  I have a lot of experience with computers and electronics.  After a lot of research I went with the Hollux GPSlim236.  Initially I was very pleased with the device until it started having problems.At first it would never lock on with the satellites. (Yellow light stayed on) I found out the unit went into SIRF protocol mode.  I had to find a program called SIRF demo to get it out of SIRF protocol and placed it into the usable protocol of NMEA.Next the device started having problems with with the Blue tooth connection. (the blue light would never turn on).  I would have to turn the device on and off about 50 times before the magic blue light would turn on, and then sometimes it would only turn on constant and not blink.  I could bypass about 40 times turning it on and off by bouncing the device off my steering wheel.  This is a ridiculous thing to have to do to get it to work.  I emailed tech support and tried to call them all to no response.  Now it is the most finicky device I have ever had.  I am often tempted to throw this piece of junk out the window and be done with it.I must strongly recommend you stay away from this device and probably Hollux all together.  Now I will have to buy another GPS
Lacie  d2 Hard Drive Extreme failure 160 GB. It looks as tough as a tank, but it isn't. Once it crashed eveyone told me it's a very delicate piece of equipment. I did not carry mine around, for one, it is too heavy. I also only fired it up when I did my monthly backups, so I didn't have it running all the time, so it shouldn't have over heated as others have mentioned. But after less than 11 months, the computer stopped recognizing it---it hums but never gets anywhere. I changed the ports, bought new cables, all to no avail. As it happens, my computer had failed and I was relying on the LaCie back up drive to retrieve my files--what a shock when I couldn't get to them. Tried other computers, both MACs and PCs, and still no sightings of the LaCie drive on the desktop.Even though still under warranty, I got NO HELP from the LaCie help desk. Their suggestions to use a data recovery application is unhelpful since I couldn't see the drive to select it. They don't even give you a toll free number to call. They also expect you to pay to ship the heavy thing to them even under warranty. They give NO HELP to retrieve data. If you allow anyone to open the case it voids the warranty, but they won't send you the hard drive separately, even if you send them the item intact and it turns out that it's something else.Head aches, head aches....if it worked, it would be great, but it's not the drive that is important, it is the data and if Lacie hasn't figured out a way to help clients when their products fail, they shouldn't be in this business.buyer beware! I wouldn't buy another LaCie ever again. Also learned my lesson, two copies are still not enough, especially if one of them is LaCie
Buyer's Beware. Amazon is NOT an authorized Samsung dealer and the manufacturer's one year warranty on this TV will not be honored by Samsung
No built-in microphone - this is for video only. I was surprised when I got this product. It IS for video ONLY.All Logitech webcams I used before come with an integrated microphone. This one does need a separate microphone to talk through the net.There is a tiny microphone in the package though, but I am really uncomfortable to hang it on my ear when I need to talk. Also, how can a headphone be shared by more than one person?You may need to purchase a bigger microphone to free your ear up and/or to share it.
bad design, bad product. I got one of these w/ my shuffle.Don't waste your money!!!Horrible design.  With the velco in the back, against your skin, if you do work up a good sweat (running) the moisture will seep right through and soak your shuffle.  The velcro at the top and bottom seams is woefully inadequate.My shuffle died after only 2 months, b/c the repeated exposure to moisture (sweat via running) did it in.And the earplug access is um, a challenge, as best.Keep looking
great while it worked - broke after 13 months. Really liked it.   Would have rated it 4-star.But last night it suddenly stopped working and would not turnon anymore. Only the clock works.Just one month out of warranty.From other reviews, this seems to be a common problem
STATIC PRODUCER. The use of this AC power adaptor has increased the amount of static to the point where using the radio with the adaptor is pointless. On battery the radio works very well, just attach the adaptor and all reception is lost.Invest in batteries rather than this product.
Noisy CD changer that just died with no recourse. I purchased the unit less than 2 years ago based on some online reviews. As soon as I set it up, I wondered why everytime the unit was switched on, it went through and read the CDs in order -- even if I was just listening to the radio.  This process was noisy and it sounded like the motorized mechanism within the unit was cheap. I called Philips and while they are very nice on the phone, they said the noise was normal.Yesterday I put some CDs in and the unit now has failed. The drawers do not open and the CDs are locked within. Since the unit is more than 1 year old, Philips will not replace the unit and has no method of servicing the unit.  They have no instructions for how to remove my CDs from the machine and their most helpful suggestion is for me to, "take it to a repair shop."
Software is for Windows only . . . First, let me say that Fasttrack works perfectly for my needs -- i needed to get a mic signal through an XLR cable into my mac powerbook for demos, absent of my usual protools software and clunky hardware. the mac sees the fasttrack immediately. BUT you should also know that none of the bundled software works with the laptop.and considering this is an input box AND software you and i are paying for -- if you're on a mac you should go elsewhere to buy the box alone instead of this package. i saw 2 new units at the amazon "new and used" link at the top of this page (sans sessions software) for a much lower price.Not exactly fair dealing from M-Audio as they flat-out name Garage Band in their product description and then talk about how great the accompanying software is--for that reason alone this package only gets 2 stars from this mac/protools user
Noise canceling...? Or music amplifying?. Stylish, comfortable, good sound quality...and utterly useless at noise cancelation. Great for allowing one to conveniently eavesdrop on seat-side passenger conversations while listening to your favorite tunes, and you'll be sure to not miss any important safety instructions on your next flight. Perhaps there's a reason there was no floor demo set out of the box. I suggest you insist on this. Sure, turning on the noise cancelation sliding button would seem to somewhat reduce ambient noise, but as far as I can tell the only thing it does is slightly amplify the music volume.
Poor Product. Despite not being written on the packaging or website my HP iPaq RX3417 was compatible with this keyboard.Unfortunatly the software supplied was extremely bad, clogging my PDA making it run very slowely. As well as this, it also flickered when in use making the settings for the keyboard very difficult to change.In terms of hardware, I found the size and position of keys to be the biggest problem. While targus does include all 5 rows of a standard keyboard, it shrinks the top row (numbers) and the bottom row (space bar). This makes it very difficult to use the space bar (which is for some reason split into three parts) and the numbers (which could have been made full size as there is nothing else in the way). I found myself constantly not hitting the right key or not hitting the right key hard enough for the key to register. In terms of key position, there is a gap between the keys on the left side and right side of the keyboard making hitting the keys in the middle very difficult. Some keys are also very small (e.g. the right shift key and backspace) making them difficult to use (strange considering they are used a lot on keyboards).One of the biggest problems I had with the keyboard was the lack of proper arrow keys. Targus includes an oval shaped four direction button that controls a mouse cursor that appears on the screen. This mouse cursor is useful, but needs to be supplemented with normal Up, Down, Left and Right keys which are needed when typing to go back to another part of the document. Using the mouse to do this is very frustrating.The final negative thing about this keyboard was the price. I paid AUD$149.95 for this keyboard. Doing some research on the internet found better models (i.e. Think Outside Stowaway IR Keyboard) available for less than half the price (around AUD$70) and bluetooth keyboards available for less than AUD$190. I think it might be about time Targus releases a new model PDA keyboard with a design and software that are suitable for the use the keyboard will get. No more tiny keys and no more than two space bars
Not for big screens. I have to agree with another review I just read here. The quality seems to be good, but it's just too small for any big screen. Ours is a 42" Philips Ambilight 42PF9631/37. The description here says the wall-mount is for 22-49", but the manufacturer does not agree with that. On the box and in the manual it says 23-46". Don't believe that either. It's only just over 16" wide, so there's just no way. It's also not going to work well if your studs are more than 16" (for example 24") apart. I'm also disappointed by the service of Peerless, because I emailed them the story above 2 weeks ago and I never got any reaction. This one is going back to Amazon. We bought a Sanus now, which seems to be perfect and not that much more expensive here at Amazon, while it costs about double elsewhere. Tip: Check your manual thoroughly and see if it mentions anything about VESA
Does Not Deserve the name. I have owned and programmed many SanDisk Cruzer MICRO drives and they work wonderfully. With that experience in mind, I ordered 10 4gb Cruzer Mini's for a customer. First impression is that they are much lighter than the Micro. When I plugged them in, they operated fine, but the real test of a USB flash drive is during installation and use of flash drive based applications.I absolutely ADORES PortableApps Suite ([...]) because it's a menu based system that contains an incredible wealth of free, open source applications inside a menu-based system.On cheap generic drives, installation does not work. Sad to say, the same is true of the Mini.As stated, my Sandisk Micro works like a champ and I've dealt with many of them, but none of the 10 Sandisk Mini's work with this menu/application system.Truly the sign of a cheap drive. Fortunately the seller where I bought these also is having problems and has agreed to take them back.I got lucky, but Sandisk should be ashamed to tarnish their (otherwise) good name with this incredibly bad product
Nice package, horrible product. I got this KVM switch yesterday and hooked it up to my laptop and my old desktop.  The laptop would display properly on the monitor, but the desktop wouldn't.  Plugging the desktop in directly confirms that my DVI port works.  Also the switch would tend to lose the connection with my keyboard.  I spent 3 hours repeatedly rebooting my computers, but I could never get the switch to work properly
Way too pricey for you actually get. I'll start by saying that I have found reception to worse than the $20 clock radio it replaced.  For it's small footprint, the sound is nicer than one would expect to come out of a small radio.  However, in no way is it as nice as a small set of decent bookshelf speakers.  It just can't produce the accurate highs that come from a seperate tweeter, nor can it produce low end frequencies with any real presence (I am NOT referring to boomy bass here).  Overall, the sound is a bit tinny.  It would make a great clock radio if they improved the reception, and it was 1/4 the price.  That'll never happen, though, because too many people have fallen for the gimmicky Bose sound.
Terrible sound... don't understand how people can say good things about it. This is a sincere comment on this product, and my first one ever. I bought it and I was excited to try it out in my bedroom. The unit looks pretty nice and for the price it definitely felt like a good deal.However, the bass sound is absolutely terrible... I did read about this in another review, but I didn't expect that it would be this bad.I actually checked the EQ setting of my iPod to make sure it wasn't in a "bass boosting" mode or anything like that. I was hoping that if I turned it off I'd get an OK sound and I'd not have to go through the trouble of returning it.My advice: * Don't buy this product *It's the only way we can tell these companies (on the market just for the money) that they cannot just have a good external "fashion" design and a good marketing campaign that they will fool us and make money.
waste of time & money. Upon testing this antenna I soon noted the signal strength significantly weaker both for transmittiny and recievin
P.O.S. Believe me, this is not worth it!  Get a Kensington.  I already wasted my money on this, don't buy it.  Horrible signal to noise ratio, poor reception, cannot modulate to more than 4 frequencies.  DOES NOT WORK
October 2006. This dvd player is potentially a great, cheap and versatile machine BUT...The two i bought from Worldwide Distributers were faulty.  I have a friend who owns a CH-DVD 300 which works perfectly with my Region 2 (English) DVDs. I have a CyberHome DVD player in England which works perfectly as well.  The two machine i received didnt work very well and didnt play some discs at all. This is why i would recommend spending a bit more on another machine.  After returning two players i decided to buy a Philips DVP5140 (Multiformat DVD Player with Divx, MP3, Windows Media Support) which with a code to allow it to play all regions works perfectly!  It cost $60 with free shipping through amazon so wasn't actually much more expensive than the other player!  (See the reviews of this player for the code!)I would also like to say that there was nothing wrong with the service from Worldwide Distributors and that they refunded most of the shipping costs. The problem was ONLY with the DVD players they sent me
Good quality, but get the data+power cable... The quality of this cable is fine, but it doesn't give you access to the power pins that are in the Garmin interface.  Get the cable that does power and data instead...  or if you're a hardware geek, then make your own with the stuff from purple open projects (pfranc.com
Incompatible. Make sure you know that these will work with your camcorder before buying. Apparently, they work fine with Sony camcorders (the packet too says so) but not with Canon. Also, it's incompatible with my new Panasonic camcorder too. Interestingly, it was displayed as a combo offer when I bought my Panasonic camcorder, which is the reason why I bought it anyway, but got duped
Not a recommended product. Sensitivity is below par on short wave. I also own a Sony ICF-SW7600GR - a much better radio in all respects. If you want a good radio for short wave listening, buy the Sony
DON'T BUY THIS !!!!. This is basically a 1/8" male to RCA cable for $73; you could get the same exact cable for $5.99 at Radio Shack.  Yeah you get a dock and power brick too but price it out; not worth it.  Buy the cable at RS; it'll work EXACTLY the same.. don't be fooled.  If you want the dock and power brick buy them seperately; you'll save major $$$..
Major driver installation problems with 98SE. Wasted hours trying unsuccessfully to install the driver for the IOGEAR GIC251U 5-port USB card on a Dell Optiplex GX-1 running 98SE. (This computer already has 2 USB 1.1 ports.) The main problem is that the Add Hardware Wizard does not find a *.inf file in the IOGEAR-supplied CD folder and does not recognize the executable program that is in the CD folder. User has to cancel out of the wizard and execute the driver installation file as a stand-alone program. This results in installation of drivers that show up in the Device Manager. However, the installation wizard comes up at every subsequent reboot and the user must cancel out of it just to get the computer going.Installed card seemed to work OK for a D-Link wireless adapter, but did not recognize a digital camera that was satisfactorily recognized by one of the non-IOGEAR 1.1 ports. The following actions did not help. (1) swapping the card to another PCI slot, (2) downloading and installing more recent driver file from IOGEAR website, (3) three calls to customer support, where I found sympathy but so solution
It did not work. I had to return the card because it did not work.  Not sure if this was a fluke or represents a larger problem with this provider
NOT "Apple Easy" to set up. My setup should have been super simple. (It was super simple for my old Airport Extreme) Mac G4 Desktop without an internal Airport card and an Airport Express. My simple goal was to send iTunes to my stereo via an Airport Express.  After five hours of trying to get it working myself, I called AppleCare.After an hour on the phone with AppleCare, we finally got my Extreme to link up with my Express. We had to do three hard resets on my Express. We had to temporarily hardwire the Express to the Extreme with an Ethernet cable. Moreover, we had to manually copy and paste the Airport ID number from one unit to the other. This procedure was NOT in the owner's manual or in Apple's online self help!I have been using Macs at home for 21 years and this is the biggest headache that I have ever experienced in the world of Apple Macintosh.I think that the PC Guy on the Apple commercials got the last laugh on this one.
Misbegotten and hard to use -- really poor design for usability. This mouse is incredibly difficult to use. There's actually only one button: The whole carapace of the mouse. So your hand can't really be relaxed when you're using it, you continually have to concentrate in order to get true right-clicks. In order to get that true right-click, you want to grip the mouse -- but the only place on it that affords gripping without tending to cause false-clicks is the two little pads on the right and left side. Alas, if you grip those (in the default mode), you get Expose, which interrupts your attempt to right-click; if you reflexively follow through with the click, most of the time you'll get switched to another application (because hey, you just clicked on that app window in the Expose screen).The scroll ball is a nice idea, but it's about half the size it needs to be in order to afford a decent amount of control. Without that, you get all kinds of false directionals (scrolling right/left when you're trying to scroll up/down) And using the scroll-ball to center-click is tricky: as often as not, even after you configure the scroll-ball to click as "button 3", you as often as not get a funky "mouse scrolling" action (an icon appears on screen and you can scroll the currently focused document by moving the mouse pointer -- not a crazy idea, but totally counter-productive when what I wanted to do was open the clicked link in a new tab).Basically, this is a fussy, fussy device that will be difficult for most people to use. But since is looks so beautiful, they'll blame the problems on themselves and give it a high rating anyway.
bridging use.. I bought this product to use it as a bridging client in an existing belkin wireless network and it failed to pass any data even though it showed connected to the belkin Access point.  According to the Netgear docs this access point can operate as a access point or as a bridging client but what the fail to tell you is that it bridges only in a netgear environment. After spending 20 mins on the phone with Netgear they told me i needed to buy a different model which is non netgear-proprietary or more netgear access points....How can a company like this be selling proprietary hardware in todays day and age...Leon McCall
Nice features but No range. This phone has about a 20 foot range before it starts cutting out.  It has great features but you can't really move all about your home
Awful. I picked one of these up from the Apple store and used it that day.   Not only does the product not broadcast well (I had to hold it two feet from my radio, it didn't even get a signal in the car on any frequency) but it dosent stay in the dock connector.  The transmitter actually will not lock into the bottom of the iPod.  The transmitter also appears to turn off after 5 seconds of not touching the buttons.  The LCD screen turns off so you cannot see the frequency it is transmitting on.  Because it worked so poorly I couldn't tell if it was broadcasting or if it was simply broken.  An indicator saying whether the transmitter was on or off would be helpful and not a huge battery drain.If you want a knockoff transmitter that works only when placed perfectly next to your radio than get this.  If you want something that works consider the iTrip by Griffin
not a real instrument. This is a toy guitar. I can not say that enough. It does not stay in tune. My son received one as a gift from a relative a couple years ago. The only thing I can say is that, if you just want to see if a child would be interested in guitar, then you could buy it for that reason, it's cheap enough. It would certianly not be good for a child with a real interest in learning the guitar as they would be disapointed in the guitar not staying in tune and might then lose interest. If your serious about a true instrument, stick with the known brands and visit a music store to learn more about what would be appropriate. The real ones (child size) can be found for around 100.00 so it's worth it.
bad quality. I bought this item like 2 months ago, and now it's broken. I'm sooo frustrated.I 'd not recommend buying this item
Not good. The LCD is easier to use than the earlier version that relied on audio clips to switch frequency. You may have to experiment a good deal to find a position where the signal reaches the car radio adequately, like the 1960s rabbit ears tv antennas. Even then, if you are in an are with good FM radio coverage it's going to be hard to find a frequency where this will work. Mostly you can't use this with a cover on and you'll need a car charger if you want to use it for long. The all-in-one modulator and charger that clips to the docking connector is a better solution
Do not buy. Mouse movement is extremely slow. It literally takes 10 (!) seconds to get from one side of the screen to another (800x600). I just got it from OfficeDepot [...].Buttons are too small and hard to control. Joystick is unresponsive
It works... for a while. Although the software interface wasn't the most sophisticated, the WG111 was easy to install and worked well enough for about six months.  Then it started dropping connections to the various networks I'd been using, and now it doesn't connect at all.  I've done quite a bit of troubleshooting; apparently, it's fairly common for the WG111 to crap out after several months.  Don't buy it
Broken on delivery. Can't tell you how well it works as it was broken! The cd lid does not close!
I don't like this item from BlueProton. I don't like BlueProton because they sent me a defective item and I have to pay the return shipping fee.I like Amazon because they refund me whole the payment, otherwise BlueProton would not refund me the shipping fee which is more expensive than the price of item
Power Problems. This drive may be excellent.  I'll never know.  I have now gone through two of them.The first one let out a loud pop and started smoking after being connected to power.  It was plugged into a power strip that has no problems with any other equipment.  Thank goodness it didn't take my iMac down with it.Just received the replacement today.  It powered up for about ten seconds before turning off never to spin up again.  At least there was no explosion this time.At this point, I'm done with this drive.  I'll be looking into another brand
If i could give it ZERO stars I would.... You get what you pay for.  In this case, junk.  It lasted all of 2 days and one use.  The wires fell out of the usb connection.  Unfortunately for me it was while I was driving down the road on a 4 hour trip and within the first 30 min after leaving the house.  I suggest buying something a bit more expensive that will last more than a couple days.  Very poorly constructed connections
re: Absolutely terrible. To celebrate the anniversary of our company, we thought we'd give all employees a gift.  Our Apple phobic IT guys nixed the Ipod as a choice, despite the CEO and CTO both owning and recommending them, so we went with the Zune.  Of the 50 we bought, 16 had to be exchanged for quality issues.  We've had issues with the drivers on the Vista enabled computers and spotty syncing with the XP machines.  Several of the units have had poor performing batteries and several also had a buzz in the headphones.We can't use them as data drives so they're not as useful as we'd like.  Finally, store interoperability is zero and we cannot understand why DRM is applied to files if you share them.  Which reminds me, the wireless is half baked; too slow and we've had plenty of hang ups while trying to share.The end of the story is that the CEO is both pissed and embarrassed as to the gift debacle.  He has already said in no uncertain terms that when Apple ships a video ipod, the company will give those to make up for the Zune experience
Good system - one huge flaw. This is a good product - sounds great, gets good battery life, everything you'd hope for in an iPod dock.  But it has one major flaw.  The iPod docking port is really flimsy, and has no structural support aside from the actual electronics themselves.  After a little bit of use, the connection between the iPod and the dock deteriorated to the point that the volume fluctuated up and down, and sometimes the sound cuts out all together.If they added some kind of simple support so that bumping the iPod wouldn't stress the electronics, I'd give this thing 5 stars.  But without that, it simply breaks quickly, and no longer performs its only job - to sound good.
Low quality, looks very cheap. I bought 2 of them- one for me and another for my fiancee. It looked pretty good deal. When the product arrived, I was so dissapointed that I decided to return them immediately. The looks and feel is very cheap. The sleeves doesn't seem to be of nice quality. It feels like they may get torn or come out of its place any time. I then looked for case logic made of Koshin. They are pretty good. Another good one is slappa. They have hard case like structure. I got them at pretty low price at Buy.com.You may also find good ones at Meritline.com with coupons and stuff. I love amazon. They took it back without any fuss.I wouldn't recommend this item.
wrong item twice. Ordered an antenna the middle of Nov, 05. Received wrong item with in 10 days. I let them aware of problem then I  mailed back wrong item. Within 14 days I received duplicate of wrong item. After I emailed them to let them know of problem, I heard nothing. I had to send an ugly email, stating "what's up?". They cancelled my order, then refunded original amount charged to credit card, plus .11 cents. Still fighting for them to reimburse me for my cost to send back 2 wrong items.
Works fine, but only have memory for 20 names. 20 names is pathetic. Should be at least 50 or 100
Poor quality and DivX problems...returned unit. I was very excited about this unit when I ordered it, but the pixelation was very bad due to the variable bit rate (VBR) encoding, and the DivX recording feature didn't actually work most of the time.  (A blank screen or a green screen was the result.)  Unfortunately, given these problems, I returned the unit.  I think I'm going to look at an older ADS unit without the VBR feature to ensure quality, and then do any DivX transfers by software.  It seems that the fewer variables involved may make for a higher quality image.  Too bad...this one really had a lot of potential
don't like it. IT SQUEEKS LOUD CAN'T LISTEN TO THE CD BECAUSE THE CASSETTE ADAPTER SQUEEKS TO LOU
Nope, not for a 17 inch notebook... We've got Sony's 17 inch VGN-A series notebook, and no, it doesn't fit. Once the notebook is inserted into the carrying case, it is nearly impossible to zip close. My wife uses it mostly and though the case appears durable and padded, getting the notebook inserted and the case zipped closed is difficult and very tight at best, the case needs more room to fit most 17 inch notebooks. We feared that the notebook would get damaged while trying to zip the case closed (we've owned numerous notebooks and cases over the last ten years). The Sony carrying case also does not carry much extra either. We've since bought another brand (Targus 17 inch) that fits much better and carries more items/accessories, this second one was essentially the same price. Much happier now
Buy another clock. This appears to be a very cheaply made clock.  The cover for the battery broke when first opened, and had to be taped on.  The clock takes a "D" size battery, not AA as stated in the description.  The optional full time light was good, as was the ascending alarm.  Setting time was very easy
No TUNER Included. This product does not have its own tuner, which is not mentioned on Sony's webpage, nor in any specifications of the product. It is "revealed" unhappily after purchase. If one has a surround system, this product is incompatible. Trying to get Sony representatives to confirm this disadvantage was enormously frustrating
What a waste of money. I was unfortunate enough to get one of these things for a gift.Since it was a gift I was stuck with it even though it had numerous problems.Buy something else and save your money. This thing is junk
Cheap made in china case. This case is another example of shoddy cheap made in china junk to save a buck.The design of the case is basically like that of a wire frame with inserts pressure fitted -- only there is really no pressure! These cases are made from very thin aluminum coated CARDBOARD inserts with felt glued to the back. Only the bottom insert has rivets, which are there primarily to hold the rubber feet on. All other inserts slide around within the cases, especially the large insert in the top of the lid. As you can imagine, the entire case bows and flexes with the lid closed, and flexing is far worse with the lid open. A full case would probably not withstand being dropped on a corner.Worse still, the inside of the case has reinforcing brackets to keep the inserts in, between each side, making the inside volume non-square. The lid has a full inch of space for jewel cases to bounce around in, and there is only one riveted U-channel piece of aluminum at the top of the base and the bottom of the lid, per division of the case's compartments. This will present a huge problem for those who want to put paper sleeved CDs and DVDs into the case since there is nothing to separate the bottom of the case.There is nothing to prevent liquids from penetrating the seams of the case. If liquid is spilled on the edges of the case, it will get in!If you close the lid and shake the case around, the hanging sleeves tend to come out of the U-channels and bounce around the inside of the case.The inside of the case smells like an old musty house in which air has not circulated for years.The case only comes with 25 hanging sleeves! You have to go to the atlantic-inc website and create an account and enter a "promotional code" to buy the remaining sleeves "at the cost of shipping" which is about another eight dollars.I made the mistake of purchasing two of these cases. Both cases came with scratches on the aluminum and rivets that look like they damaged the aluminum/cardboard panels going in, and will easily pop out.
Not comfortable and too expensive for what you get. This gel mousepad with wristrest is pretty hard on the wrist, you really have to press hard to get it to conform to the shape of your wrist, is isn't very comfortable. The gel is made from plastic polymers and it has an odour of plastic, it is not washable so it gets dirty and stays dirty. You can't replace the gel packs if it gets a leak. There are better mousepads with gel wristrests out there
look elsewhere. Like other reviewers I've had 2 units as a result of warranty returns.  The units work for a while and then the Bluetooth begins to fail to connect on power up.  If you have multiple bluetooth receivers it will fail with all of them.  The built-in diagnostic light for Bluetooth is simply inaccurate.
Junk. I purchased this cd player as a gift for someone, and the cd player didn't work either!  Very disappointing...Do not purchase this product
Don't buy. I am in the process of my 2nd return.  The CD player is junk.  Our radio worked but am very frustrated- I cannot believe that GE would put ther name on such a piece of trash.
POOR DISTANT TRANSM ITION. JUNE 04,2006I PURCHASED THIS RADIO FOR EMERGENCY PURPOSES, HOWEVER IT SEEMS TO BE VERY WEEK. I AM A DOUBLE AMPUTEE AND AM CONFINED TO A WHEEL CHAIR. I DEPEND ON MY RADIO TO RAISE HELP. BUT, I AM AFRAID THIS ONE WILL NOT BE DEPENDABLE. I AM NOT ASKING FOR THEM TO BE RETURNED OR FOR A REFUND JUST LETTING YOU AND YOUR CUSTOMERS KNOW OF A VERY WEAK PRODUCT AND I COULD NOT RECCOMEND THIS PRODUCT TO ANYONE. COBRA WAS THE TOPS IN RADIOS BUT SOMETHING HAS HAPPENED TO THE QUALITY.THANK YOU FOR LISTENING;WILLIAM HEMBREEWmHembree@aol.com
What a let down . . . I purchased this MP3 player thinking it was a good purchase.  Boy was I wrong.  Creative Labs tend to have glitches whether it be computer hardware, software, or other products like this one.  Now having problems with the product is one thing, but customer service is lousy and they could give a rats [...].  Also when I ordered seperate batteries from their online store they mentioned AFTER I purchased their product that it was going to be delayed for an extra month.  My MP3 player stopped working after 3 months, I did get it to work again.  Two months later the screen told me I had hardware problems.  OK, so I download the drivers that is supposed to fix the problem, no go.  Oh, and I forgot to mention that I am working in Eastern Europe at the time so it makes matters even better trying to get ahold of them via phone.Save yourself some frustration and get something better.  iriver maybe?  Just stay away from Creative Lab products.
Encryption is not for Macs yet, not for Windows domains. I bought this because I wanted an encrypted device that I could use to offload personal documents I receive while traveling for work, and then read them using my Mac(s) at home.  Lexar JD II is the only product I found advertised to work with both Macs and PCs at the same time.My primary Mac is an Intel Mac.  Early on I realized the encryption utility only runs on PPC Macs.  Okay, so I figured I'd use it on the PPC Mac Mini, and everything seeemed fine at first.Then I hit a problem where my Mac Mini could not read video DVDs.  A little search on the Mac support forums, and I found that installing Lexar JD software disables video DVD support on my Mac!  Fortunately there were instructions on how to uninstall.Aside from the problems with the Macs, I also hit the problem another reviewer mentioned, which is that you must be logged in as a LOCAL administrator to use the encryption software under Windows.  Since my work PC is a member of a domain, I had to create a local account, log off the work domain and back on as a local user to use encryption anyway. Kingston Data Traveler Elite works fine under Windows domain logins, unfortunately for me they don't have Mac software yet.So in summary the current Lexar encryption software:- Can't be used on a Windows domain machine- Can't be used on an Intel Mac- Breaks the DVD on a PPC MacIt's not for me!However if you are using the Lexar strictly on stand-alone Windows PCs, OR you don't require encryption, it should be okay.
Known software bug may bite you!. While it looks like a great toy, this never installed on my XP home system.  After 3 hours with Logictech support (that is phone time, not the many hours of waiting time!) and many attempts at setting privledges in the Registry, it still never installed.  Logitech blames Microsoft, and it may well be true, but they should have a manual way of starting services instead of relying on automation.  I am very disappointed that I never got a chance to even try the pen.  If you do take the chance on it, be prepared to ship it back because it may never even install on your system.
OK, so it isn't just me... I've had two of these cute lights now -- one was a replacement for the other. As much as I enjoyed the quirky design and fun character, both quickly grew so dim that they were essentially useless. Two is enough! This was a product I wanted to like; a design hit that turned out to be a functional flop
Roll the dice, this one is a gamble. I purchased this item and one month later I still have not received any paperwork. I emailed and have not received a reply
terrible. I purchased a CD player to play CDs.  Out of the box it wouldn't work.  Then I was told it couldn't be returned.  It took three weeks before a shipping label arrived and that might make it too late to get credit as it had to be returned in 30 days.  I sent it back as soon as I was in receipt of the label.  I protested through my credit card company.  I am not pleased and will probably never use Amazon again.  Not a good start to this relationshi
RIP-OFF: Doesn't advertise that you need an AC adaptor. I would like to believe that this hub works well- but I wouldn't know.  I bought it to reduce clutter on my desk from all my devices hooking into my powermac.  I hooked up my printer, ipod and digital camera and nothing happened.  I called Targus and they said I needed an a/c adaptor.  It doesn't come with one and doesn't say anything about one in the manual or instructions, or their website.  They said I could get it at radio shack and gave me the info (5 volt, 2.1 amp, center positive).  I've been to two radio shacks and online- they don't carry it.  I'm upset.  Any advice
Overpriced. The batteries were priced higher than my local supermarket and I foolishly thought the shipping would be a couple of dollars. I paid 20 dollars for batteries that would have cost 4.50 a few blocks away from my home. Check the shipping on your items. Nothing wrong with the batteries. Never shop in a rush
bought two with same problem. I use a headset with this phone for meeting and both phones that I bought ended up static and the person on the line couldnt hear me cause the hole that the headset fits into is defective. 2 phones in two years and same problem in both of them. I recommend spending a little more for a better quality phone.
Worked OK for about 230 days, then stopped. The drive arrived at the end of December, was quick to get up and running, and worked fine until yesterday.  Then it got the machine equivalent of "lockjaw" and I've been unable to get the tray to release.So, it's a good drive while it operates, but I'll probably make sure I pay for at least a 1-year warranty on my next purchase.As far as my recommendation goes, it depends very much on how inconvenient it is when one's drive fails.  Yesterday, I just went to a backup burner and kept working; if I had NEEDED to get the job done, and I had not previously developed a strategy of always keeping a backup device handy, I'd have been in a seething, hair-pulling rage.  Computer hardware is never 100% reliable, but is it worth the risk to purchase a device that is known to fail in less than a year
Holux GPSlim236 is junk. I bought this device and it worked great for about 60 days.  It would connect to the satellites quickly and held a long charge.  After the first 60 days, the Bluetooth light barely ever comes on and if it does, it may never full initialize or turn back off within a few seconds.Buy something better.  This unit is not worth your time or money
Skype better come up with something quick or they will start losing market share!. Do not buy this unit.  I have tested the VoSky, IOGEAR and now US Robotics and they are ALL junk.  While the speaker quality is acceptable the microphone sound quality is woefully inadequate.  I do not understand why no one is capable of developing a hafway decent unit.  And why are the SO SMALL!?  The are so small as to be practically useless.  The IOGEAR unit does not even incorporate mute and volume buttons.Bottom line: Wait until someone comes out with a quality item or shell out big bucks and buy a Polycom and the Computer Calling Kit that is available through Polycom.  (Even the Polycom Computer Calling Kit is analog!  What is the problem!?
Nifty but kind of cheap quality. Likely discontinued because I bought this on sale at Frys for only $4.99. It was worth that price.Like the other reviewer said it dominates the electrical receptacle. Even a four plugger becomes hard to use.Radio sounds very tinny, but works OK. It picks up the local AM stations. I have it on the wall in a workshop where the nicely lit digital clock comes in handy. One problem I noticed was that there is a loud hum when I played the radio while it was plugged in (nothing else active on the line). I got around this by clipping a thin ground wire to the outside antenna. This seemed to also boost AM reception
Great sound, horrible DVD. The sound on this system is really fantastic for the price, but I've had the same experience as the other reviewer.  The DVD skips constantly, and Phillips is absolutely no help in fixing the problem.  Amazon has been great and has offered to give a 50% credit, but Phillips insists that I send (at my own expense) the machine to them and then wait 4+ weeks to have a 'possibly' refurbished unit.  I'm quite disappointed with Phillips and its lack of customer service
Dlync Video phone 1000. Setting this unit up has been impossible, and I have not been able to use it.  I have sought help of Dlync website, dlynk phone support.  The have not been able to work me through it.  I have paid for a machine I cannot use, have spent countless hours on phone and computer in trying to set it up.  Another person who has the same system with which I wanted to communicate has had the same problem and cannot use hers
bad sensitivity at low temperatures. When outsite temperature is around 0 Celsius degrees or below, and the car and the unit it's not yet warm enough the detector acts very strange, it gives sudden false alarm like K 1 2 3 4 5 5 5 5 5 5 55 5  0 0  0 , Ku alarm 1 2 3 4 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 in spots where when it has normal temperature gives no alarm. And sometimes when on the highway , from nothing it gives a sudden alarm of strength 5 5 55 5 and then nothing my old cobra had no strange alarms like this one and it was smaller .the spiral coil it's not good to short , you need a straight onemaybe the scale would be better if it was from 0 to 9
EPSON C84 dies when you change the ink. had an EPSON C84 for a while, it worked great.Changed the ink, now Magenta and Blue won't print.Called Customer Service, they fixed it for free, really happy.Get it back works great, decides its out of ink, even though there is lots, makes me change all the cartridges, now the red has a line in it.Its ok till you have to change the ink
Don't buy this!. This isn't a consistent product. 99% of the time, I can't get it to work. After MONTHS of emails and phone calls, customer service responded. What a joke! They told me the plug in the unit and then unplug, wait 30 seconds, and then plug in. Gimme a break! I shouldn't have to do the Hokie Pokie just to get it to work. By the way, their process didn't work. Poor product, Poor customer service, Poor price
A USB hub would work just as well. I was very disppointed in the video performance of this product. I installed it on my new HP laptop with a 1.6 GHz Centrino Duo processor (which took a phone call to tech support and a download of new drivers) and found that there was a significant delay between what I was doing with the mouse and what I was watching on the screen. The resolution you're able to display on the external monitor is also limited, a fact which would have influenced my purchase. Without video capabilities that actually work, this product is a very expensive USB hub. I'm returning my docking station and using a USB hub. It only adds one more plug (instead of power and docking station I'm plugging in power, USB hub and VGA cable) and works infinitely better
The good and the terrible. I have waited until I finally received a working model to post my experience with Logitech.First, let me begin by saying that now that I have a working Audio Station I really do love it.  The product deserves the excellent iLounge review it received.  The sound is great.  It has an audio in port and an S-Video out port on the back.  I cannot for the life of me understand why there are $300 units made by Apple and Bose that are nothing more than some speakers.  Additionally, the AM/FM tuner works well.  I really only use the FM tuner but have found it to be good - better than I expected but not perfect.  However, once again, most units at this price point do not have any sort of AM/FM tuner and that was a sacrifice I was not willing to make.  For all of these reasons I really do like the Audio Station.However, if there was even another product on the market with these characteristics (AM/FM, S-Video out, audio in) I would have taken my business elsewhere in a second.  My experience with Logitech was TERRIBLE.  First, I brought home a unit from Best Buy in early February and found that it was one of a bad batch that went out to Best Buy stores (see other reviews on this page for more details on which units have the problem with buttons not responding).  After the buttons on the front of the unit didn't respond I got online and read the reviews posted here on Amazon as well as on Logitech's own website where they finally admitted that this was a flawed product.  I then contacted Logitech to see about having a product sent to me as part of the warranty.The representative at Logitech told me I would be better off taking my unit back to Best Buy.  I realized that I knew more about the problem with the Audio Station than the customer service rep did after only about 20 minutes of poking around online.  I told him that apparantly a bad batch went out to Best Buy stores and the last thing I was going to do was to waste my time returning a product to Best Buy only to bring another faulty unit back home.  I also told him that I'd read that Audio Stations coming directly from the factory were reportedly working fine and I wanted one of those.  After some time on the phone we arranged for my unit to be picked up and then I would receive a new unit in 10 days.10 days later I called.  This was the first time I found out that the unit was out of stock and my order was on backorder.  I was furious that I had to call to find out the item was on backorder.  Not only was this the first I heard of the problem but there was nothing they could do for me.  I was told the first week of March they would recieve some in the warehouse.  I waited.  About 8 days into March I called again.  The order hadn't made it to the warehouse.  A small order was due to arrive but it was not guaranteed that I would get one of them.  Again, I was very displeased but there was nothing I could do.This was the first time that a customer representative seemed to know what he was talking about and actually served as an advocate for me.  To their credit, I did recieve a unit out of that first batch.  It arrived relatively quickly and works fine.  However, it was a terrible, terrible experience along the way.If you buy one of these, I guarantee buying directly from the factory.  Logitech does not seem inclined to recall their bad units and appears to be content with letting customers deal with their problem.  If you do buy from Best Buy or from Amazon, be careful - you may receive one of the flawed units and who knows how long it will take a replacement to get to you.  It basically took Logitech 7 weeks to get me a new model.  I've never had so much trouble giving a company $300 of my money.  I plan to never shop with Logitech again
terrible product & service. I AM VERY UNHAPPY WITH THE PRODUCT I RECEIVED FROM TIGER.IT WAS NOT WHAT I WANTED AND TO RETURN IT WOULD COST ME MORE THAN I PAID FOR IT.THE COMPANY CHARGES TOOOOO MANY FEES.I AM VERY UNHAPPY & NOW I HAVE A PRODUCT THAT I CAN'T USE OR RETURN
Prepare to fight every step of the way. N.E.W. will waste your time, money, and your every last nerve before repairing your product.  Eventually they will, but not without an exhausting, protracted fight
Slows my computer down. The light makes my computer very sluggish, even when my laptop is not running off of the battery.  Browsing the internet, especially, is painfully slow, and I am on a high-speed cable connection
Don't waste your time or money. I had been told this was an excellent product, so I was very excited to receive it.  However, when I got the item, I was very disappointed in the quality.  It feels light and cheap.  Buttons stick, often requiring 2-3 presses to work.  The "learning" function says it captures a code, but when you attempt to use it, it doesn't work. Despite the claims of Philips that it can learn any remote, it won't.  I tried to "Revert" the remote back to factory settings, as directed by Philips Service department, but it wouldn't reset.  All in all, spent 2 days trying to program and 1 1/2 hours on the phone with tech support.
Great sound. This unit has great sound and is well worth the price.  I had no issues setting it up or programming it.  Connected to all my devices with no issue.
Surprisingly Thin "Tinny" Sound. First, a little about myself as a listener.  I'm no audiophile, so I don't put any stock in the reviews from "Bose Bashers", or the claimed "audiophiles".  I know what I like when I hear it.  I have the Acoustimass 6 system attached to my home theater and I love it.  The size makes it unobtrusive when the object is to watch a movie, and the sound is really great.  For my den, I have the Polk LSi25 speakers attached to some high dollar gear, and the sound is awesome.  I've skimped on my computer speakers because I didn't see a use for high quality sound coming from the noisy box under my desk, but I'd hoped to change that with a nice set of Bose speakers that were unobtrusive like my home theater.I have a Logitech 5.1 THX system that sounded decent and it sounded better than these speakers at one-third of the price.  Since I moved my computer room to the attic, I can no longer mount the Logitech speakers due to the size/setup of this room.  So, I needed a 2.1 system.As for the Companion 5 system, the quality of the components is very good.  I like the control pod, and the setup was fast and easy; however, immediately apparent with the Companion 5 speakers is the thin tinny sound coming from the satellites.  It sounded like I was listening to my computer through a phone line.  Unlike the Acoutimass 6 system, I was very aware of the fact that all of the base was coming from the subwoofer, and I was equally aware of the location of the base module.  I checked the documentation for correct placement, and was discouraged to find out that I had indeed placed the speakers correctly.  Still, I moved things around, and around, and fiddled with the settings, and moved things around until I found a placement that delivered acceptable, though not really good, sound quality.  I had to place the subwoofer directly behind my monitor, with the satellites right next to the monitor to get a sound that would keep me from returning the system.I'm not thrilled with the Bose speakers, and I'll go back to my Logitech system if I relocate my desk again.  I wish I had a recommendation for a nice 2.1 system, but I wouldn't recommend the Companion 5 system to anyone looking for a good sound from a set of computer speakers.
Beware, Camera Dies After Fireware Upgrade. Camera died after firmware upgrade using the ethernet port to perform upgrade as Dlink recommends. I bought from Ebay new and Dlink refused to replace or repair. So beware if you pay several hundred dollars make sure you buy it from a authorized dealer or Dlink want work on it or even attempt to help you get it repaired. Think twice about buying Dlink because down the road you may have to throw it away regardless of the price you paid. Need to research other brands and see what their repair policy is after warranty, from unauthorized seller, or buying used.
This product did nothing for me. I currently have 2 computers and use a wireless router for broadband connectivity.  The router and the second computer are on the same floor of my home--about 3 rooms apart.  I was receiving a low response connectivity on this second computer so I purchased the powerline adapters (I purchased 2 adapters and installed these according to the vendor's directions) based on other's glowing reviews and recommendations.This product did absolutely nothing for me.  My poor response/connectivity was the same either with or without the Netgear adapter so it was very disappointing
does not work, even with other D-link products... would not work with 624 D-link, even after several phone conversations and hours on the line with dlink technicians.  the techs couldn't offer any solution beyond what was written in the instructions and worse, they clearly did not care whether it worked or not -- they could not wait to just tell me to ship it back to amazon where I bought it from so they could get off the phone...  it was disgusting
Sony. Ever since Sony's Rootkit problem it has prompted me not to buy another sony product ever, and I won't. Even Cd-r blanks.  Who knows what there putting on these things.   As a matter of fact you guys need to read this right here.  http://www.usatoday.com/tech/columnist/andrewkantor/2005-11-17-sony-rootkit_x.htmDon't buy SONY, they need to go out of business.  They are selling products that either people have problems with or damage their system like the BMG copy protected cd's.  I use memorex or Pengo Technologies for my blanks.   preferably memorex because you have to order Pengo from their website but they work great.  So I'd beware of sony products, especially ones that deal with cd's.  I bought some blanks from them and once i heard about the rootkits and how many results i got about it when i went to google i never trusted sony again.  Oh yeah and SONY stands for standard oil campany of new york.  They don't want you to know that because they are an ameircan made company and their name stands so high.  Luckily for me I don't buy sony Copy protected cd's anyway.  And now for sure I won't be.  There infecting people's computer with spyware, trojans and even depending on what BMG copy protected cd you get from them sometimes they can tell when you hit the play button to play a song in a media player.  All that stuff just from one BMG copy protected cd and you were actually suppose to get only the artist not the trojans and viruses on the cd.  They are doing this to try to stop people from copying cd's, bu they ahve took it way too far.  I think that in the future sony sells will swop downward
Caveat Emptor. I cannot speak for all devices, but this was a total failure in my case.  I am a fast typist, and it seemed that about 20% of the keystrokes were not picked up by my Treo 270.  This was simply unacceptable, so I immediately returned it.  I cannot determine whether the problem was due to the keyboard, the software, or my old PDA.  Newer, faster PDAs might have a better success rate, but the potential for problems will still be there.  My suggestion is to buy this somewhere with a generous return policy so that you can return it if it is a mismatch for your PDA
Avoid like the plague. Three reasons why I will not touch any Corsair USB memory drive again:1) As the other reviewer pointed out (4 gig) "The wide, thick rubber gasket surround the USB connector limits how far you can insert the connector into even lightly recessed USB receptacles". I thought it was just mine! There is not enough metal exposed so it means the drive frequently disconnects, loosing valuable data in the process and crashing the PC often.2) Right from day one, the drive would show up as a USB Hub (I think it uses this to control 4 chips inside instead of a single chip). But this would at least 50% of the time cause any other device to be inserted into the same USB port on removing the memory drive not to be recognized - only a reboot would fix this. I tried this on many laptops/desktops and got the same results.3) I contacted Corsair who said to ship it back to them even though the local retailer would take it back. Since I was out the country I told them I was uncomfortable posting it internationally (back to them in Fremont, CA) using ordinary post (courier would have been 50% of what I could buy it new for). But they pushed for this without offering to pay for the post so ordinary post it went. They now claim not to have received it and now unlike the other reviewer I do not even have own a $100 paper weight.I'd like to say a lot of other things, but fear that Amazon will not print it, so lets leave it at the simple facts above. I don't think I have been so disgusted at a company of peripherals as much as Corsair. And for Corsair to validate what I have said is true, my RMA Number: R15300
Does not work with docking station. These speakers do not work with the laptop I have. More specifically a Dell latitude D410 with docking station. it works with the just the laptop, but not through the docking station.....whacked!!!!!! So I dont know what they sound like yet???? beware that they have bugs!!!
No Communication. I purchased this item because of the low price.  However, I got exactly what I paid for.  I have installed many hardward devices on my computer but have had no success with the card.  Every device I have plugged in does not work. This includes iPod, camcorder and camera.  I would agree with many of the previous reviewers - spend a little more money and get a better quality product
Worthless. I ordered the 2-year service plan on May 1st, this day (July 31st), I still have not recievied it. I have contacted them a number of times, and still nothing.  Do not buy from this company
Not worth the price+shipping. I bought these head phones because I read all the reviews that gave it 4's and 5's, so I expected a lot out of them. The truth is you really shouldn't...they don't sound particularly awesome and I was rather disappointed that I actually spent close to $30.00 after shipping and stuff. The mid-highs and highs sound fine, but I had issues with bass and mid-low response, especially when I plugged it into my computer. Plus they are not super comfortable either; the hinges nip at your neck when you don't have them on your head and they fit funny if you have glasses.All in all, I wished i had spent my money on something else. But they do look pretty cool.
poor quality, a definitely do NOT buy. I wish I had read all the reviews before I bought this unit, I stopped working after used only a few times, then the "no disk" warning showed up with a perfect fine DVD in there, and pictures started to freeze up. Here is the funniest thing, I found if I shake it , it will continue to play, if I stop, it will freeze. So if you want a good exercise machine, this might be a good one, because my arms are so sore after shake-and-play for two hours
Why have a five disk changer that cannot shuffle?. I purchased a Sony 5-disk CD changer in 1991 that could shuffle between all five disks. This model can only shuffle tracks on one disk at a time. What were they thinking? The ability to shuffle tracks between disks was my entire reason for choosing a five disk changer vs. a single disk CD/DVD player. THIS BABY IS GOING BACK
Horrible product. I bought this product for my Tivo and it broke within a few weeks. As other reviewers have said, the RJ45 connector is incredibly fragile and it's really not a question of if it will break but when. I recommend the Netgear FA120 instead.  Instead of a flimsy flip-up, you plug the Cat-5 directly into a sturdy box, and it puts less pressure on the Tivo's USB port.  How a big company like Linksys, with all it's money and brainpower, delivers such an obviously inferior product is beyond me
worst souding, best looking headphones ever!. I purchased these cans hoping the ney sayers were extreme audiophiles, and the praisers were average people. Turns out the ney sayers were average people like me. These Headphones have ZERO BASS, none. I love bass, I have had 15 + pairs of headphones, some of them $15-$20 dollars that have better bass. I thought maybe these might just have a nice clean sound un-poluted by heavy bass, I  would rather have a pair of tweeters on my ears. They look so good though, I actually took a decent pair of headphones and put the speakers from those in the Skull Candies. Let me tell you, it's the design of the cup, they made the good speakers sound like dooky. So if you want somthing that looks great around your neck, like jewlery, get these. If you want good headphones, get a pair of sennheisers(SP?). They have affordable stuff that sounds great
Does not work. Sony Disc player does not work. It won't recognize disc in player.Currently trying to get it serviced under warranty
Nice while it lasted. I bought this mouse a couple months ago to use with my MacBook Pro.  I loved it, until a couple days ago when it decided to stop working.  It's not connecting to the USB adapter any more.  I changed the battery and tried the Connect button, and nothing.  Sad, isn't it
Won't play after 3 months. I purchased this boombox for my daughter's room.  Basically, we put in a CD at bedtime, and set the sleep timer for 30 minutes.  NOT heavy or detailed use ... I bought this unit because of the timer.  After 3 months, when you push the play button (either remote or manually) the machine would sporadically play the CD.  Usually after 2 or 3 'no disc' errors, and a power shutoff, it would eventually play.  Now it's completely a 'no disc' error message.  Of course, Sony's warranty person explained that it's a 90 day warranty ... imagine that!  A COMPLETE waste of my money.  If I'd have wanted a cheap machine to last a few months, I would have bought one.  I paid extra for this one so it would last!  I'll be hard pressed to buy Sony again!!!
Want to protect your iPod? Get something else. I just put this on 5 minutes ago, and I don't like it. Like some other reviews, I couldn't get out many of the air bubbles (13 of them) after putting it on (this is bad since two are on my video screen, and many are on the click wheel) and the back only covers a modest portion (the "about 80%" from another reviewer suggestion seems about right). You also have to be VERY careful putting it on. The only reason I even tried it out was because it was a gift from one of my coworkers, and she got them cheap in a 3-pack.To add insult to injury, the overlay is actually harder to clean than the iPod by itself. It has fingerprint marks all over it; usually fixed by a wipe with a clean cloth. I'll probably be taking this protector off relatively soon. Shame on Belkin for selling this product!If you want to protect your iPod, get something else that will protect it from impact as well. I have a slight chip (less than 4 mm) on mine on the front side after dropping it. It slipped out of my hand onto a concrete corner from about 5 feet. I figure that's pretty good protection on Apple's part, but that may have been avoided with a durable case. If you're going to get something, go for all around protection and not this
Great idea - poorly executed. I bought this with the hopes of consolidating/backing up files for home and work PCs.  I already had the drives, so this seemed like a good idea.  It took about 2 hours to configure the device the way I wanted to - a 200 MB mirror and a 50 MB non-mirror.  The mirrored partitions seem to have real problems.The speed reading/writing to the mirror are very slow, and the mirror partition keeps getting corrupted.  To fix the problem requires that you download and use a command line application.  I am technically capable, but I really don't like having to 'fix' the mirror partition whenever I want to use it.I have one PC that can't even run the application to attach the drives - it crashes when I open it.  Also mentioned in previous posts - it is annoying to have to load each PC with software to attach to the device.  The fact that it doesn't use NTFS or CLI format is another really annoyance - I have to copy these drives to another NTFS drive in order to recapture the files I have on this device (Windows, Linux, and Mac can't read the format of these drives).Summation: I would not buy this again.  I am now looking at the Linksys product; it would require me to buy two HD enclosures, but at least then I could actually use it
Telezpper TZ 900. Dosn't work.  Still receving lots of auto-dialer calls.  Waste of money
Very unreliable. Very unreliable .......... I have used DVD RW and CD RW Memorex disks on multiple computers and DVD recorders. I find that they.....1) don't last....get about 50 re-recordings NOT 1500 2) may crap out on any occasion.......multiple CD RW's with critical material would NOT read on multiple computers.AVOID MEMOREX DVD RW & CD RW DISKS!!
Poor to middling quality - breaks under heavy use. I have two of these chargers that I bought directly from Kodak for about $10 each. Each of them came with 4 AAA batteries which do not charge at all straight out of the package. One of the chargers has become defective after somewhat heavy use. Battery charger technology is not all that complicated but Kodak doesn't seem to have mastered it yet. No wonder they were practically giving these away. I'd avoid purchasing these now at any price
A waste of money!. This factory refurbished model 360 GPS worked for about ten hours.  Initially it worked fine.  It then failed to pick up the satellite signal or would loose the signal as a drove along on a trip.  I called tech support for help twice.  The service personnel are very difficult to understand and they also have trouble understanding me.  It is a language issue.  They suggested various tests and reprogramming but it did not correct the problem.  The unit was fifteen days past the 90 day warrantee so they wanted me to ship back the unit and charge me $144.00 to examine it.  I can't afford to pour any more money down that hole for ten hours of service.  Stay away from the refurbished unit and don't buy a new unit without an extended warrantee
Headphones do NOT work with the Pioneer Inno. Even though the Inno is marketed as an xm2go radio and this item claims it works with "all" xm2go radios, the connector doesn't fit.
Causes Windows blue screen of death. Despite the rave reviews for this product, I'm a bit more skeptical.  I recently purchased an HP LaserJet 3015 MFC and wanted to use this device to connect to our office network.  A couple of thoughts:1. Toms Networking does a comparison between this product and Silex's SLX SX1000U.  I would strongly suggest anyone thinking about buying this product to read the article.  The article can be found at:[...]2. Although Silex's product only has one USB port, you *can* connect a USB hub to support up to 15 devices.  The KeySpan device supports 4 devices, but you cannot add more devices.3. I found that the unit would experience problems if I submitted a print job greater than 7 MB through the KeySpan.  I reset the printer and nothing got fixed.  Only when I power cycled the KeySpan did things work.  I am using the latest version, v1.3.1, which also upgrades the KeySpan firmware.4. Toms Hardware also reports that it would crash with several different devices.  I read on other web sites that the Keyspan software causes the blue-screen-of-death (IRQ_LESS_THAN_EQUAL errors), so I tend to believe that the problem is caused more by the Keyspan drivers than the HP ones.5. In some parts of its web site, KeySpan advertises that this unit supports USB v2.0, but if you read the fine print it's supporting at USB v1.1 speeds.6. I discussed with KeySpan about connecting external hard drives.  This unit is really meant for multi-function printers and cannot support external HD's.7. I decided to return this product and try out the Silex instead.  Although there is a lot of potential for this device, I would not suggest it for enterprise environments.  I read the glowing Amazon reviews but would put more skepticism about their comments now that I have tried it for myself.8. I will update this review later when I have a chance to try the Silex unit
Gross Logistics Tail. Not a bad printer; I like the quality of print... but as said elsewhere, very expensive to maintain... Ink cartridges don't last long and are, as far as I can tell, more expensive
SC101 Never again!. Please, please.........Do not buy this thing, there is a wealth of information by users out there with multiple problems and almost non-existent support.  If you do buy one - DO NOT MIRROR IT! - use it only as a storage device without any of the RAID features, otherwise you will almost certainly lose your data!I ultimately stopped using mine and went to a USB/Firewire attached external drive enclosure, much faster a more versatile.Good luck
Bad News. I have a 2006 Lexus GS300, and this item failed miserably.  The skip function did not work, and the unit randomly changed the tracks on the iPod without any user intervention.  And the mechanism itself made so much noise, that when the music was set at a lower volume, you could hear the cassette mechanism turning over the music.  Top that off, the sound quality provided by the unit was fair at best.Disaster
WARNING. I had no problems burning to these discs, its when I went back a few months later to these discs and found out that none of them work anymore. After further research I found out that Memorex uses the cheapest dye available and thus the DVDs have absolutelly no life to them, my discs started dying after a few months.In addition, in you physically hold the disc in your hands you can feel how warped physically it has become. This is true for all the discs (about 150 of them). I CAN NOT NOT RECOMMEND THIS PRODUCT STRONLY ENOUGH!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Poor delivery and horrible customer care strategy. Used this unit for a while but complaints about line static by my phone counterparts were consistent and energetic.  Did not use the unit for six months.  Tried to use the unit today after it was sitting safely in a seldom used drawer.  System failed to activate at all.  Tried resetting.  Called the customer service number on back of the unit to see what could be done if anything.  After the phone self-help proved useless (very user unfriendly), I struggled to get out of the "loop".  Finally, reached a voice who put me on hold, came back, and they transferred me to another technician where my call was dropped.  The customer service number on the website sent me into a new self-help h#ll.  I just needed it to work with my dish network.  I am using the recommendation on this site to use the SBC unit.  Save yourself a lot of annoyance and move on
Oh dear!. After owning a 20" Aquos for over a year I decided on another purchase from this quality product/company. To my dismay, after setting up this 32" I discovered the screen was damaged, figuring this was an error in handling during transit I placed a replacement order. Pleased with the speed of turnaround I was horrified to then set-up this one up and be unable to get a picture ( after troubleshooting until blue in the face! )I will continue to use amazon as they've always been reliable in the past.I just now hope that I get BOTH refunds in a timely fashion.
BW Anti Glare protector. I had high hopes for this protector.  However, I was disappointed.  The back of the protector is adhesive.  When you apply the screen protector, there are literally dozens of visable air bubbles under the protector.  No matter how hard I tried I could not remove them.  Boxwave even includes a bubble remover to glide over the screen to try to squeeze them out but it did nothing.  I removed and reapplied it several times with the same results.  If there weren't any bubbles under the protector, it would be the perfect screen protector
Very Poor Reception. I live three walls from line of site to the TV broadcast towers and get very poor to no reception. Towers are 5 miles from me. Either this is defective or a very poor antenna
Not for use with Canon Powershot. It seems nice enough and it's cheap, but it is apparently incompatible with the Canon Powershot Digital Elphs. For use with those cameras, buy Sandisck instead. Seriously
Lasted 1 month. This product looked light it was one of the best made USB lights/fans out there except the light and the fan burned out after 1 month of use because of overheating
"Not Responding". If you are one of those types who can become frustrated after fiddling with a portable mp3 player for an hour just to get 9 songs transferred to it you'd better pass this baby by. I often wonder if the people that make these things ever do any real testing, with real people, to see how functional their devices really are.The mp3 player itself played music fine. The real problem comes when you try to add or remove music.From the time I plugged it into my XPPro machine to the time I unplugged it with 9 songs on it 60 minutes had elapsed. Everytime you plug it into your machine you have to reinstall the driver. So you'd better have a special folder setup to hold that driver..you'll be needing it. The music manager is prone to lockups. Get ready to see a lot of "Not Responding", shutdowns and launching Task Manager to try and shut down the "frozen" music manager. You will find this will not shut it down though. You will have to unplug the USB cable from your computer to get it to shut down. But do not try and deactivate the USB device like you are supposed to before unplugging any USB device. The OS will not let you. You will get "A program is accessing this device" message. That program is your "Not Responding" music manager.When you add a song it puts the song where it wants to. You'd think a song that begins with "A" would come after the song that begins with "B" on the device but that's not the way it works. And there is no way to order the songs after you add them and they go in the wrong order. You try and drag it up or down and it locks up. And don't try renaming to get them to order that way. Because they will not rename properly. The music manager is a poor design.As far as the device itself. You'd think that in our high tech age they could come up with a fool proof connector. Think again. You'll need a magnifying glass to connect the USB cable to the device because it CAN go in the wrong way. And this is not the type of device you want for jogging or working out. They supply this long necklace for it to dangle from. But you start running down the street with this device hanging off your neck, whipping back and forth, and you'll be knocking out fellow joggers left and right! You'd think they could also design a pair of ear phones that actually fit in your ear! Just slow walking with this device shoved in my pocket I was frequently putting the ear bobs back in my ear. And don't even ask me what it was like to replace the battery on this power hungry gadget.I guess my 8 certifications in IT just don't qualify me to be skillful enough to use such a high tech device. Perhaps you will be more fortunate. But if you want my advice. Pass IRiver products by. The hardware may work but you need software to run it. And unless you like the message "Not Responding" try another product.
agree with J Stern-not a very good copy. I made two data dvds and used the HP lightscribe discs.  I wasn't very pleased with the outcome either.  The pictures were dull and not very clear.  To the person who gave it 5 stars don't think I don't know what I was doing..I checked all the color contrast from best to normal, picked what I wanted and the print still came out bad.  I will be trying something else because the HP dvds aren't worth the money
ABSOLUTE JUNK!. Backed up some movies and not even 1 played well.  They either skipped or didn't play at all.  I backed up my harddrive with one of these and some of the files won't even open... says damaged or corrupted files... ABSOLUTE JUNK!  I will stick with Verbatim from now on
cheap and plastic-y. This item is not worth $150, it looks like a cheap plastic child's toy.  Very disappointed, sent it back
Garbage. We've been through 2 generations of this phone and they suck. Why we gave them a second chance I don't know. The buttons that get used the most stop functioning after about a couple of years. Then it's off to the landfill. I am FED UP with this trend in products to stop working after a limited amount of time. So long Motorola
paint wears off keys after 4 months of use. Just like others have stated. The paint comes off the keys after a few months of use. You would think logitech would have made a better product.
Barely - but barely - satisfactory. Graphics aren't bad, maps are fairly accurate and the same goes for the turn-by-turn instuctions. There are, however, a LOT of flies in the ointment:First and foremost - very week ability to detect satellites. The unit loses contact frequently and takes an inordinate amount of time to relocate them. The slightest hint of clouds make this process take even longer.Second, VERY puny CPU. It's calculations are excutiatingly slow. So if you try to get the unit to set a route that's longer than, say, 75 miles you may be done with a big chunk of the trip before the GPS actually completes the calculation. And, of course, once the original calculation is completed, your current position is no longer the position the calculation is based on, and the process of recalculation starts all over again... Very frustrating, unless you are on a relatively short trip.Third, it does have a built-in mp3 player but it might as well not have it. The sound is pretty bad. And if, heaven forbid, you try to play music while it's in the process of making ANY calculation whatsoever, the sound gets worse and the calculation gets much slower.All in all, it's better than no GPS but the price differential between this and the better units (I have an older Garmin StreetPilot unit with which I'm very happy) is not enough to justify the purchase
Nearly Worthless, save yourself the aggravation and just run a phone line. I purchased this to add an extension phone line into my bedroom. Because of old wiring in the house, the phone jacks in my bedroom stopped working and no dial tone was available. While I use a cordless phone with the main base in the other room, I needed a phone jack so my Tivo could dial out and get programming information. When set up, the two units would be in separate rooms with a hallway between them. I purchased this unit from a store after the clerk assured me the range and quality was good enough that I could use it almost anywhere in my house. After a lot of effort, I find the unit to be nearly worthless.The range is VERY limited. I made sure that the only obstructions between the transmitter and base were the two walls between the two rooms and nothing else (furniture, electronics, etc.) were in the way, yet there was no dial tone. I moved the receiver so that only a single wall was between the two units, and I did get a dial tone, but had such a bad signal that voice calls would be painful to listen to. I couldn't imagine using it with an electronic device (like a modem or Tivo) that sends data. I got the best signal when both devices were in the same room and within 15 to 20 feet of each other. Needless to say, with that kind of configuration, it's easier and cheaper to just run a long phone cord along the baseboard
Who really knows until it's too late... This warranty is purchased through Amazon, but it is actually distributed by another company.  When you search for TV warranties on Amazon, you will see 4 warranties that appear to be the same, but are different prices.  I called the company that sells these warranties and asked what the difference was.  They told me that there is no difference between the $119 warranty and the $499 warranty; they cover the exact same thing.  The girl I spoke with even asked her manager and he said there is no difference.  Warranties are a tricky item to review, because it all looks good until you actually need it.  So, on this one, I suppose only time will tell.  The one difference between the Amazon warranty and the electronic store warranty is that the Amazon one will not replace the first bulb in the TV; but I figure if I need to replace the bulb within those four years I will still be saving $100 because I can get a new bulb for around $200.
N.E.W sucks big time!. Okay,This is not a review of the product itself. But, I stronglyencourage you to consider not getting an N.E.W warranty. They arereally not in the business to fix things but to make money not fixing things.If you had anything to do with the device not working (e.g. you dropped it, forget about it they aint gonna fix/replace it whatever.)They have a very sparce network of repair companies so if there is no one who can fix it in your area you have to ship it to them in Virginia(of course you have to pay for the shipping!)Lastly, they tend to screw over their repair companies so in some cases they will refuse to repair items covered under an N.E.W warranty or they will take forever to repair it since they know N.E.W will take months to pay them for the work they did.If you want a nightmare for a warranty then by all means go for it
DON"T BUY IT. The product shipped is not the same as the picture.  Apparently this is a common thing for this item.
Will not work as Digital Audio CD-R. Avoid a headache.  I had the same problems with these new Memorex music CD-Rs.  They will not work in my Philips CD audio deck, and as you can see in other reviews they don't work on most decks.  I suspect they are plain digital CD-r's, or that the newer 40x discs will not work on Digital Audio decks.  A design flaw at any rate.  I have had great luck with older Memorex Music CD-Rs, but I believe they were 32x.  I have no problem with Sony Music CD-rs which are easily available, and cheaper most places.  However, Memorex is good with warranty service in my complaints about these.Great for dummies who pay extra for music CD-Rs for their computer because they are copying their friends CDs
disappointed. I have bought this cartridge from the store and then ordered them online to save money but it ended up costing me!  I only was able to print about 1/2 the pictures I normally can print.  Will NEVER order them online again
Dead after a few months. As with some of the other reviewers, mine stopped working and blew the fuse in my car for the cigarette lighter.  I bought a Vector brand inverter at Wal-Mart and it is much better
just come in handy!. Solo para aclarar.Sera imbecil el ke pide luces por esta fuente xq' de fabrica no las trae asi ke esperemos ke ese tipo de comentarios no se repitan, para esa gracia mejor se buska otro tipo de fuente mas colorida.Salu2..
item was not. The item was not as it was stated to be which was a disappointment for use in any vehicle.It does not have a suction cup mount.It must be fasten with screws.I made use of in one car.Do to not being sent what I ordered AS listed in desrciption.Most likely not buy another product.Richar
Ginormous Waste of Money. I have purchased three of these dvd players in the past 2 1/2 years, every one of them has had the same problems.  Trouble reading dvds, dvds skipping, discs freezing and the manual buttons stopped working on two of the units.  The price is right on the unit, but not for the time it worked.  I would have been better off spending double or triple the unit price to get one that worked for more than 6 months without a problem.  If I could give it less than 1 star I would because thats really what it is worth, nothing
Poor quality, poor service. I bought a sharp lcd tv from j& r in new york last Jan, after a year and half, when powering on the tv, sometimes works, sometimes not. after unplug in, wait for a while and plug back, worked for a couple months. Send it to service center to checkup, was told that the lcd control board needs to be replaced. when request to get back the replaced lcd control board, was told that sharp does not give back the replaced board, it has to be shipped back, otherwise, you have to pay additional fee to get back the replaced board.. it's rather strange to hear such a lousy policy from any vendor..But, if you do want to get a sharp, better get a long long warranty..
DON'T BUY THIS, IT HAS QUALITY PROBLEMS. You'd think a radio this expensive would have better QC, but it has bad quality problems...mine was erratic on its set-up parameters, losing some, locking up on others. And it doesn't even hold the time a few minutes after a brief power interruption. Sheesh, even the cheapest 10 buck clock radio can do that! Buyer beware
1GB Mp3 player. I brought this peice two months ago. It never worked. This is a peice of junk to through in garbage. If you want to through your money like that, just donate your money to somebody. May be 1 in 10000 will work properly.Lot better products than this you can buy.
very disappointing. Overall my experience with this mouse pad is very disappointing. I had this mouse pad for more than a month and my experience with it is average to very poor. The only positive is it is a very sturdy mouse pad. I have used an optical mouse and a laser mouse on this mouse pad. Both were manufactured by Microsoft. The optical mouse works ok on this mouse pad but the laser mouse (micro) does not work at all. Although I have not tested mice from other manufacturers, I believe this is something new buyers should be aware of before they spend any money on this good looking mouse pad.
Decent mount, bad design. I own the Explorist 500LE and bought this mount and the cigarette lighter adapter for the unit to use in my truck.  As noted in some of the other reviews the USB connector, which also provides power to the unit, has a ridiculous screw on method of attachment.  Understanding that it may be necessary to have a non standard USB type of connection for water tightness, there must be a better way to accomplish the connection.When you have the mount stuck to your winshield and try to connect the USB/external power cable it is nearly impossible to 1) get the power connector through the mounting bracket and properly aligned with the back of the Magellan and 2) be able to screw on connector that is rather tight between the back of the cradle and the mounting bracket arm that attaches to the windshield.  (The same screw type connector that is used on the back of the Magellan battery compartment.)  It apears that the USB connector is supposed to clip/snap into place onto the back of the bracket so you can remove the Magellan and leave the cord in place on the bracket.  I couldn't get it to hold or keep the connector.  Eventually the main tab that is supposed to hold the USB connector in place eventually just broke off.  I found it impossible to insert the Magellan into the cradle and connect it to the external power cord without removing it from the windshield.When I received the bracket, the head was loose on the end of the flexable arm.  I removed a few screws and tightened the head, which wasn't a big problem.  I found the bracket itself keeps the unit as steady as can be expected and does not droop or change position over time.  Whereever you move it to, it stays put.  I do like the side to side pivot design of the mount that allows me to turn it to face me when I need it and can be centered so the kids/wife can see it when I don't need to.If I was just using the mount to hold the unit and didn't plan on using the external power adapter, the mount would receive a 4 out of 5.  I'm a Professional Engineer and in my opinion, this system needs to be sent back to the drawing board for a new design.
SanDisk Cruzer Mini 2 GB USB Flash Drive Review. It would not download; it just stopped about 1/4 the way through.  I will have to send it back
This review was put off for too long. This printer has been a piece of garbage since the day I bought it. I don't know why I kept trying, as the purchase was made about a year ago. It should have been thrown it in the trash long ago and I would have cut my losses (instead I did buy one more package of paper and ink. Mistake.) I have never gotten more than one picture in a row without an error message, turning the printer off, turning it back on, doing that several times, and finally maybe getting it to print two pictures in the same day.Now it says the cartridge should be replaced, when about 20 minutes earlier it told me there were approximately 56 pictures left in the cartridge (and I have not printed anywhere near 44 pictures, which would add up to the claim of 100 per cartridge. I have printed about 6.)The ironic thing is, the handful of pictures that have printed correctly have been beautiful. The one that I printed today was perfect. But several tries to print one more picture were a waste of about two hours. This is the last time I try to use the printer, it is finally going in the trash
Intermittent even with the blue light. I really wanted this to work, since my older home has thick walls that make wireless an iffy proposition. However, even with the little blue light that purports to say the signal is great, it isn't. It works at about the same speed as wireless when it works at all, and then without warning drops the signal. And Netgear tech support seemed to know less about the product than I did. After a half hour on the phone the operator I was dealing with said that I should have picked option 3 on the original voice menu (which a pretty confusing menu to begin with). Now the fun begins; getting RMAs to return to two different shippers (both via Amazon), going to UPS, paying to return the products..... not a happy camper.
Lovely sound, horrible build quality. I bought a pair in January and loved them. Sound is as lovely as everyone describes. However, there are something seriously lacking in the build quality. The soft wires felt flimsy to me when I first opened it, but I thought I'd just take extra care.At 1 month of careful usage, the plastic-covered wires from earbuds downwards became so weather-hardened that I could almost use them as chopsticks, and makes it so the earbuds popped out at the slightest motion. At 2 months of careful usage, the wires had half-ripped from the plug--which I repaired the best I could with unsightly electrical tape. However, at 3rd month, the left bud fell completely off.I am very disappointed--it is one of the best-sounding phones I've ever had (I've owned both Grado s60 and s90, and sennheisers), but man, they need to do something about making this baby last
Garmin Quest II. It is small and light weight, probably perfect for hikers. I think the battery is supposed to last 5-8hrs away from the car. The software is pretty versatile and it lets you do a lot. My biggest complaint is that it is very slow. I'll be typing in a name to help filter my destination choices, and if it is more than 5-10 miles away, it takes forever for it to show up. I end up not knowing if the destination (say McDonalds) doesn't exist nearby, or if I just spelled it wrong. Additionally when I pass up a turn I don't want to make, it goes into "Recalculating...". Then it finishes in time to tell me to turn right just as I'm driving through the intersection...."Recalculating..." again. I think she does it on purpose. This product would probably be fine for anyone who drives at half the speed limit
Magellan could have done better. The cord works just fine, but by the time you get the USB cord and the 12v cord together, there is a lot of cord.  It would make more sense to have a cigarette adapter that pluged into the back of the unit the same way the USB cord does, that way there isn't a bunch of cord attached to the unit.
Kingston 2 GB SD Memory Card. This SD would not work in my  Nikon  Coolpix S6 camera (but the Fuji and Sandisk product did
Horid. a horid thing thats incompatable with anything unless you know how to change its subnet which is impossable
HP 2360: Ripoff. This printer is a piece of junk. The print mechanism is constructed of flimsy plastic so that unless care is taken in inserting the print cartridges, the mechanism is likrly to be damaged. Like other HP printers operating under XP, it is almost impossible to cancel a pring job in case of a problem ( e.g. paper jam, paper out). Cancelling a print job results in a "deleting document message" which remains until printer is disconnected (you can turn it off under these circumstances) and computer is rebooted. Often XP hangs up and the computer must be poered off withexiting windows properly which results in a long diskcheck on repowering. I have long had this problem with an older HP model, but had hoped they had corrected this problem in their software by now, but alas.... The crown of it all is the life of the ink cartridge. The tricolor cartridge, costing about $18 at Wal-Mart, lasts for about 12 8 x 10 photos before the ink low warning comes up.In sumarry: Don't buy this printer whatever the price. It would probably be wise to avoid HP inexpensive printers altogether.
corrupt files. With my D200, I got about 10% corrupt files when the card was new. Now, after a few months, the card is unreadable at all. Repeated emails to Transcend have gone unanswered
battery problem??. I am very unhappy with this panasonic model as well. The battery never gets fully charged even though the indicator says someting different. The phone keeps indicating tobe placed near the base even when it is like a hairline of a distance away. This phone can die on you and I have changed the batteries for both my handsets 2 times in the last 8 months! I would never recommend it
Wysinwyg --- What you see is NOT what you get. Wrong information, wrong picture displayed.Fuji Photo Film USA Inc 43955105Description: Fuji xD/SmartMedia Picture Card PC Card Adapter - PC Card Adapter - SmartMedia Card (SM), xD-Picture Card. Code DPC-ADDisplayed picture is a Fuji film 43955110, xD Compact flash Type 1 Card Adapter. Code DPC-CPFIf you order this item, 43955105, you will get an adapter for SMART MEDIA or PCMCIA, NOT a COMPACT FLASH card.
Does Not Work on ALL DVD Players. First of all, the shipping on this item costs more than the item itself.  I did get it quickly (2 or 3 days), but I had several problems with it:(1) I repeatedly tried it on my DVD player and the player hung.  Each time I had to unplug it and plug it back in to get it to respond.  I tried over 10 times and got the same result each time.(2) I tried it on DVD drive 1 on my computer and it hung as well.  Had to Ctrl-Alt-Del to get my DVD player software to close.  On the 3rd attempt it actually did work.(3) I repeatedly tried it on DVD drive 2 on my computer. Each time I got a message saying "no disk".I consider it item a waste of money
Great Products -- Customer Support Stinks!. I am very happy with my Meridian Color and the other mapsend products I have purchased, however, at first I couldnt get this product to work.I had no problem getting this software to run with XP (even without the patch), however I couldnt view the basemap I had loaded onto my Magellan.  I tried to address this with the company.  It has been three days now and they have not even returned my emails.  Customer service for this product is nonexistant.I joined the Yahoo message board and got a simple answer to my question in about four hours someone posted the answer.  Turns out I just had to go to the Menu -- Card Utilities and maunually select the basemap.  I did not know that basemaps dont change automaticaly like the detailed maps do.I cannt say enough great things about my experience with my magellan meridian color though.  Navigating through Hungary like a pro, I didnt miss a single turn.  I would never recommend any of their products to someone who isnt willing or doesnt have the aptitude to learn about it.  The Magellan Meridian series is in my opinion the finest product on the market for what it does, portability it provides and is 100 percent upgradable with new software and new maps.Get you head out of your a__ Thales.  You have some great products, but you are blowing your customer support base with non existant customer support.  I recommend anyone with a question about softward or the GPS join the yahoo groups and post the question there.  Dont waste your time with customer support.
Weak midrange - worse bass. I puchased the LS 100's to get a decent speaker for a great price. I was disappointed. I knew the bass response would not be astonding but it was almost non existant. The midrange and the highs are scratchy.I would not recommend the speakers for anything other than talk radio
Feature Set is great but the FM is pure JUNK. Long periods of garbled static mixed with random brief moments of actual FM reception. This is in town trying to receive a major station. I am packaging this up and its going back today. This is my second try with Sony that has miserably failed. Guess maybe I should be looking at another mfg
Sure they're cute BUT...... Sure, these colorful jewel cases are pretty to look at but I give their functionality an F. As soon as I opened one of these cases to put a CD in it, the case broke. It happened to 3 cases out of the 12 I have used already. I wasn't using excessive force, in fact most people call me gentle. Buy at your own risk and HANDLE WITH CARE!
Specs  aren't 100% correct. I purchased this and am not impressed.  Note that "works with all click wheel iPods" isn't true.  It does NOT work with photo iPods (at least the 60 GB model). I'm on vacation and had to remove the cover to get it to fit.  I'm ordering a 'photo dock' since I can't see any way to get a cover that is made for the 60GB/photo model.If I'd known this, I'd purchased only the stereo cable and the photo dock separately, since I already have a charger (came with it...).  Grr.  :-
Overpriced, under-featured, misleading. O.K., so I'm paying $300 for a set-top box with a 40Gb hard drive, but I can't use it as a DVR? Why not? Also, the only content I can play on this set-top box is content that comes through iTunes? That's right. if it isn't in your iTunes library, you can play it on the Apple TV. This means you caqn play your DVD's, you cant't play saved DVD, iMovie, or other movie files, you can't play anything unless it has been successfully;y added to your iTunes library. Also, make sure you see the fine print about having to have a widescreen TV. they aren't joking about this. If you don't have one, you can still use this item but it will show up as a frame about half the size of your screen (it won't go to the edges and be borderless) so you have a tiny window to view inside a large black box.Any pros? It has to be the easiest setup I have ever experienced with an electronic item. I mean less than 5 minutes and I was set. also, I thought it was really coll that with zero configuring on my part, it was able to communicate perfectly with iTunes  just because I plugged the Apple TV into my Airport Extreme router that my computer was also plugged into. basically, Apple TV saw this is a direct link. I didn't think it would be that easy without having to configure something, but it was. Also the menus are very helpful and attractive. This will be a good product down the line when this will have a larger hard drive and DVR capability. Right now it's time to sell this one on ebay and wait a few years for something better. if this had only cost me $100 or $150 I would probably keep it, however. $300 is too much for too little
Shiny, but still scratched. I bought this product in order to remove the scratches from my iPod. After using it exactly as directed, which involved large amounts of scrubbing with an unpleasant smelling goo, the scratches were still on my iPod. The iPod was shinier, I admit, but if you want a shiny iPOd you could probably use a wet cloth and get the same results. The miracle sounding 'gets rid of all scratches' is competely untrue. Not even the small scratches disappeared
Totally unusable!. After installing this software successfully, when I try to run the application it displays a popup stating it cannot find the CD (the CD is required to run the application) even though the CD is in the drive!  So far, I have been totally unable to run this software: what a piece of junk
Do not order from Ritz Camera - wrong item. Do not order this item and expect to get what you see.  I ordered the Super High Speed card (RPSDH01GU1A) and what I got was a low quality High Speed card (RPSDK01GU1A).  Seems to be some kind of a scam that Ritz is running with Amazon's blessing.  Buyer beware.  This has happened to me before when you order from one of Amazon's partners, and Amazon will do nothing to help you
Not suitable for heavy books. This bookstand, despite the description, is not suitable for heavy books. If you put heavy books on this, the stand that props up the whole unit is likely to snap off.
Doesn't Really Make A Difference. I use a laptop since I am always on the go. I noticed that my laptop often gets hot since it is on all the time. I thought that getting this would help reduce the heat and possibly help the performance of my laptop. It works and the quailty of the product seems to be great, but it really doesn't do much, if anything at all. I think the idea of the cooling pad is great, but not effective
Not great. I was looking for a small cheap Mp3 player and I didn't care how much memory it had so this seemed perfect for me. I saw that many people had rated this 4 and 5 stars so I decided to buy it. When I got the Creative nano I was really happy with its preformance until I tried to put my subscription music onto it. Thats when I learned that it wouldn't hold any subscription music forcing me to buy my music one by one which is costing a lot of money.After that I started realising all of its imperfections. You can't use the FM radio in the car without hearing mostly static. You can't search through songs without actually changing the song you are listening to. Don't get me wrong, there are some good sides to this Mp3 player but I still would definately not recommend it
Data clears with battery change. Each time you replace the battery you have to reload all of your data.  Don't waste your money on this one
Still cheaper than the Apple Version. Even though there is an OUTRAGEOUS hidden charge of $7.99 for a $4.99 item...the price is still about a third of the equivalent item offered by Apple.Edited Aug 17, 2005Does what it claims to do.  Convenient and easy to use...change my rating to 4 star
Do not buy this product!. Do not buy this product.  I got this product as a cheap solution to play my Ipod in my car.  I didn't want to spend $50-$80 on a Fm Transmitter, so I bought this instead.  Worked fine for a few weeks.  Ended up completely screwing up my cassette player.  It would always click and pop out.  Eventually my radio started not working as a result.  This thing ended up shorting out my radio and nothing is functionable.  Don't get this product for a cheap solution, you are much better off getting a docking FM transmitter that plugs through the cigarette lighter and charges your Ipod.  Make sure you actually spend the money on a good FM Transmitter instead of going cheap and buying one of these things
Junk! It wouldnt go 20 feet... OR 17 LINE OF SIGHT!. I got this and was excited. I can get almost any product to work. I was thinking "all of those other guys are wrong, I'll order this and it will work fine" NOPE! I installed it, and there were lines across the video and the audio would cut in and out. I messed with it for another hour, turning off every other thing in the house (cordless phones included). Still, the same thing, and I was only going through 2 walls, a total of 20 feet. So, just for the heck of it I gave them line of sight. a 17 foot span, line of sight. Nothing blocking them, noting in the house turned on (I even unplugged my microwave like the instructions suggest). Still, the same issue with the video and the audio. Don't waste your time on this. I wanted to crush them, but I sent them back to Amazon instead.
Beware of this product. I used this product once and it made it necessary to completely restore my IPOD . . . after much, much hassle
Never buying an HP Printer again!. I've tried to install this Printer on several machines running Windows XP via Ethernet and every time on each machine there has been a problem with the installation (which btw takes about 25 minutes to complete).This scanner's TWAIN driver does not work well at all with any version of Adobe Acrobat Writer (I've tried versions 5, 6.0, and 7.5).  One cannot scan documents directly from Adobe Acrobat to create a file.  HP Support does not recognize this as their issue.  As I am someone who relies heavily on Acrobat Writer (which costs twice as much as this printer), I cannot tolerate this incompatibility.I am sending this printer back and going with my father-in-laws advice. "HP is no longer a quality product, but another brand like Brother"Overall, I am very disappointed in this product.  It is sad to see that my old HP Bubble Jet Printer (which is 10 years old and still working fine), is built with a much higher standard of quality than this current 6310.
Do not  order this part from RitzCamera. I ordered Panasonic 1GB Secure Digital (SD) Card ( RPSDH01GU1A )Which is a 66x speed (10BM/s)I received RP-SDQ01G which is 33X speed (5MB/s). Ritzcamera will cheat you.   You can find the part they sent me for $20 less on Amazon with free shipping
Short-lived machine--avoid this lemon. Here is the original review of this machine I wrote on June 17, 2006:We bought this machine just over a year ago (a year and two weeks, to be specific).  We had another very similar Panasonic DVD recorder (DMR-E55) in a different room and wanted to be able to record and watch DVD-RAMs on both.  For a long time, the ES10S recorder worked fine.  Recently, though, it has begun making noises when starting up and shutting down, and now it occasionally has problems reading the disks, ejecting them, and even playing them.  At first we thought this might be because we'd recorded over the DVD-RAMs so many times.  But today we tested one of them in the other machine, which has never made any similar noises, and the E55 had no problems with it.  Needless to say, we're not happy that the ES10S seems to be dying, especially since the 1-year warranty just ended.  If you buy or own this machine, follow up on any strange noises as soon as you hear them if you're within the warranty period, because the noises and problems just get worse.  Panasonic is usually a reliable brand, one we've used for many years, but this machine seems to be a lemon.  We're actually going to write to Panasonic about it--I'll try to post again with the results.Here is my update, which I wrote November 3:This is a follow-up review to the one above, which I wrote on June 17. I wrote to Panasonic after my machine had stopped working just after the warranty ended. They sent me a nice letter authorizing a free repair, including labor, of the machine at one of three places they listed. The places were all within a half-hour drive of my home. After doing some research, I chose one and brought in the machine. They fixed it by replacing "the entire internal mechanism" (I don't know what that means). We got the machine back from the repair shop near the end of July; it's now the beginning of November. The fixed machine worked fine for a while, but in the past few weeks, we've been hearing the same old noises that were the beginning of the end for it before. I'm going to try writing to Panasonic again and asking for a refund, because this machine really seems to have something fundamentally wrong with it. It's still working, but I know from the last time with these noises and efforts to read the disks that soon it won't. Avoid this machine. Again, the previous Panasonic model (DMR-E55) we bought hasn't had any of these difficulties and continues to work great. We're still big Panasonic fans, but this particular model is a lemon.
Shipping and handling. The chare for shipping and handling of this small item was RIDICULOUS! I would have been better off buying at a Retail Store.
I am soooooooooo not impressed. At first I was real happy with this, but when I opened the case and started using it I realized how tiny this was. I could hardly fit my USB cable into it's pouch and if you put the ipod in the case that it came with and then into the travel case, it wouldn't really fit. The hole thing started falling apart after a few days and my ipod wouldn't stop falling out of the little lether so it got scatched alot. It's not really worth $30 to me. I suggest you do not buy it.
Don't buy this item. I purchased these earphone to use for swimming with a otterbox and an ipod shuffle.  They are were very uncomfortable from the start, but I could listen to music.  That didn't last long.  The connection would not hold and if I didn't hold it together, the music faded out. Also, music faded in and out from ear to ear. I finally gave up and bought earbud waterproof earphones that have worked quite well and cost less
I`ve never seen such a big mouse. I`ve never seen such a big mouse. I couldn't recognize it before I purchased. Think twice
Good idea, doesn't quite come through. This flash drive seemed like a great idea.  Unfortunatly, the player has trouble playing most of the music files I transfer to it from my iBook.  The company says its compatible with Apple computers, but normally the player will only play a handful of the songs I transfer to it
ADS Tech Video Xpress USBAV-191-EF. Can capture analog video and produce cd-rom's but I expected the ability to produce DVD
BAD CUSTOMER SERVICE. bad customer service its been almost a month and i still have not received this product. ive sent 3 emails and called twice noone really helped me with anything, neither did anyone answer the phones. i dont even know how to rate the item because i dont have it. im pretty sure its really nice its just ive been waiting for almost a month and this is getting frustrating with no help
Confusion reigns!. N.E.W. and it seems AMAZON have no idea of why there are three prices for the 4-year plan. The only solution that I could find from other reviews is possibly based on the price of the TV, ie when you check the price of a TV and scroll down to the bottom of the page, the price of the 2 and 4 year warrantees will be different for each TV. Based on that price, select either 2 or 4 years warrantee and add to your cart.
Not good. Maybe you can make this thing work for your particular application, but it was pitiful for what I was trying to do.  First off, let me point out one thing.  If you're planning on using the little RF wires that hang in front of the InfraRed recievers on the front of your components, bear this in mind - when you stick those units in place, they block the receiver on the component from being able to receive an infrared signal.  When they are in place, you can only tell your components what you want them to do thru the RF signal.  That means you can't use the existing remote for any of your components, which of course means you have to trust that you'll be able to program every single function of those remotes into this unit.  I happen to have DirectTV with Tivo as well as a fairly complicated Denon A/V unit.  I cannot imagine trying to use this universal remote to control everything that the original remotes did and even if I thought the universal could do it, I wouldn't want to try to relearn all those functions on a new remote.  I'm used to the layout of the DirectTV unit and I'm not about to start over again.That being said, you can still use the RF functionality without the hard wired RF transmitters.  The MRF-100 will also receive the signal from the remote and transmit it wirelessly to your components.  The problem is, you have to position the MRF right in front of the components a few feet away - not real convenient unless you want the thing sitting in the middle of your living room.  If all your components are in a cabinet or something and the MRF is in there with them, that may work better, but if not you're out of luck.Now, all that aside, the remote will still not transmit to the MRF with any kind of consistency.  It also will barely transmit thru walls or any other solid objects.All I wanted was something to control volume and maybe channels from various locations around the house and on the back porch.  Without rendering my other remotes useless and/or requiring me to place the MRF in a ridiculous location, there was no chance of getting what I was after.  Nice idea, but no dice
Works. Overall I don't like it. When the screen is black between scenes and what not, their is a lot of mixed in red and other colors from interference. Buy a different one, this one is just not up to the task
This is a waste of money. This product only work for burn around 6 dvd's in two weeks.suddenly when i going to play a movie, give me an error and never works again.i don't undertand because i have at my office and i didn't move it.just simply stops.don't waste your money as i do
OMG THEY SUCK. Omg, I got these headphones and they suck!!! I am not even kidding, they are probably the worst headphones in the world and the worst headphones i've had in my life...first of all, when you listen to music there is a loud hissssss noise in the backround, second, these don't even fit over your freakin ears...haha, also, they are tooo bulky, you can't do anything with them...the sound quality is ok...but if your looking for noise cancelling headphones, i dont recommend these, i recommend the sony fontopia headphones or the 120 dollar sony noise cancelling headphones that are ear buds and not too bulky (availible at brookstones)...now those are what you call great, these panasonic earfones are just horrible compared to these, it only takes out like a little of the noise, but the sony 120 dollar ones at brookstone takes out 70% OF THE NOISE! that's amazing, it is probably why they are so expensive...well i have to leave but this is my advice to you DON'T EVER EVER BUY THESE HEADPHONES IN YOUR LIFE!!! THEY ARE HORRIBLE!!!hope this helped
Too bulky. The remote is very thick. You need a side picture to see how thick this thing is. The buttons are not comfortable either
serious drop in quality. I have always been a fan of Sony because they make quality products that are "user-friendly".  That is why I was in a state of complete shock that this little blue cd walkman is made by Sony, because it is on the other end of the spectrum compared to what they usually manufacture.First the bad...the control buttons (sound, changing tracks, pause, etc) are tiny and nearly impossible to read.  I found myself having to hold the cd player up to my face to find the right button, and I do not have any vision problems.  The little lcd screen is hard to read as well.  Next, the sound quality is poor and has a cheap "watered down" feel to it.  Then there are the stock headphones that the product comes with.  These are cheap and don't fit well.I bought a yellow "psyc" sony walkman a couple years ago, and that one is 3 times the product that this one is.  The sound is near-perfect and the buttons are easy to see and use.  The headphones fit well and the whole package has lasted with no issues at all.I wouldn't write sony off simply b/c of this product, but I would definitely do some research prior to purchasing a walkman from them.
Beware, this does not work with all Tom Tom GPS products. I purchased this adaptor because the listing said it worked with all Tom Tom GPS navigators. To my surprise it did not fit my Tom Tom One GPS navigator and I ended up breaking the end of the adaptor trying to force it in.Look up the USB wall adaptor for the Tom Tom One and save the frustration of ordering the wrong adaptor
why can I not find good DVD storage. This is just a general review, of all DVD cases. I have not found any that even come close to meeting my needs. I was stationed in Germany for over 2 years, and anyone who had been there knows that AFN sucks, so DVD's is your only source of video entertainment. My collection grew to more than 400. I have been trying to find a good case, that hold equal number of title books as it does DVD's. But that seems to be asking to much, or the manufacturers know that by giving odd numbers, you will have to buy more of the product to support your collection properly?????  Then when you look at the furniture options, everything seems to be made for function, and not style at all, they are generally pressboard P.O.S's and nothing I would want to keep in my garage.......... I hope that some of the manufacturers read this and come up with real solutions, cause there is definately a market out there that is waiting to be satisfied!!!!!
poor monitor cable. I purchased this cable as a replacement, and it is far worse than the original I had.  There is noticable &quot;shadow&quot; distortion. My advice is to buy a higher quality cable w/ ferriete beads. This cable was not useable
Not Portable. I bought this "portable" DVD player that bills itself as being the perfect solution for watching DVD's "on-the-go."  Unfortunately, as of the time I purchased it, the description fails to note that it must be plugged into a wall outlet or car power source.  Thus, it won't work on a plane, and if you use it in a car, you apparently have to run the cord up front to the power supply.  I think the name and description of this product is misleading.  The documentation states that you can buy a universal battery pack, but that would increase the cost substantially.To be fair, the return process for the third-party seller is going smoothly, and after a bit of resistance, they have also agreed to reimburse the shipping costs for this item
Subwoofer has no power (literally). I have been very disappointed by these speakers. I have the series III ones. While the treble sounds fine, perfectly clear...this system has NO BASS! My husband recently bought a $35 set of 2 computer speakers and subwoofer and his setup sounds 10x better than mine!Because the subwoofer feeds power off the stereo/reciever it's hooked up to, and does NOT have its own direct power supply or amplifier, it literally lacks power. This subwoofer is the biggest joke ever! I can barely hear the bass on most things, even with the volume cranked up.Bose products are extremely overrated and overpriced. Do not waste your money -- buy something worthwhile (for a fraction of the price!), and make sure the subwoofer has its own amplifier/direct line to outlet
Device not worth the investment.... I did own this router for almost 5 months, Linksys WRT54GX2 v1. In the past, I did owned those routers for at least 6 months, Linksys BEFW11S4 v2 (4 stars), Netgear MR814 v2 (4 stars), D-Link 524 revC (3 stars), Linksys WRT54G v6 (5 stars).I've bought this router for couple reasons. I wanted to have a router with QoS feature and gives a good signal. It turned to be very disappointing (at least for Linksys WRT54GX2 v1), it never delivered a good connection speed. My wireless client 802.11g speed was around 32Mbps sometimes and I was only a wall away and 10 ft. from the router, not mentioning some dead spots. It felt as if you were connected through a dial up. I have changed "Advanced Wireless Settings", flashed to the latest firmware 1.01.18, changed to different channel but it did not solve the problem. The device will lockup after 5 or 6 hours of activity but not every time. The WAP feature used to reject any client after "Group Key Renewal" expired but it was fixed with firmware 1.01.18.I've contacted Linksys customer support and they told me the router was faulty. I am very suspicious because a lot of people had the same issue. I am not sure if it has something related with Linksys WRT54GX2 v1 (there is a v2).I haven't tried with SRX wireless client device but regardless the case, I think it should work with standard 802.11g client. Do not buy this device, not worth the investment. I've bought Linksys WRT54G v6 and it works much better than this one. I think it's a device where Linksys needs to work a lot before it becomes stable and usable
Not loud enough for a shop phone. I got one of these (the Sears Craftsman version) as a gift, so the price was right- otherwise I'd say it's overpriced.The maximum volume is much too low to be used in a noisy environment. The handset is thick, so if you hang it from your belt, (upside down because of how the belt clip is attached)then you're going to scrape it off and have it fall to the floor. The keypad numbers are sealed, but the buttons themselves are very small.If this is really a shop phone, then why isn't there some sort of bright flashing light that lets you know visually when a call is coming in? If you're wearing ear plugs, or running a noisy tool you'll never hear the ring.I haven't found the extra battery to be necessary or usefull. I think it's just a gimmick to appeal to the &quot;cordless tool&quot; crowd. I'm sure that the &quot;spare&quot; battery won't last any longer than the one you leave permanently attached to the phone.One supposed selling point for this phone is that you can put in a garage or shop where you have no phone line installed. You can do this because it comes with a transmitter/receiver unit that you can plug in anywhere in the house there's a phone jack. Don't try to use this phone very far from the trans./receiver unit because its range is pretty low.I'm giving this phone only one star because it has some useless features, is missing several other necessary features, costs too much for what you get, and doesn't perform very well, ESPECIALLY considering it's billed as a specialized shop phone
Buy some string and soup cans. Amazon forces you to put at least one star to review an item, but these phones don't even earn that.  Our 10-year old $18 kmart phones were wearing out, but are way better than these Unidens.  Hissing, crackling static, and the volume of the person on the other end suddenly changes, from ok to inaudible.  We tried various things suggested in the manual.  They didn't interfere with our wireless internet or anything, but we haven't been able to have a single conversation on these-- always end up at the old corded phone.  The ringer is piercing and annoying on the loud setting, and just annoying at the low volume setting (nothing in between).  At least with the string and soup cans, the bad volume is constant.  These are going back to the store
Doesn't work on Windows Vista!. Tried this with two different computers using Windows Vista.  Got this message: "One of the USB devices attached to this computer has malfunctioned, and Windows does not recognize it."  The mini-disk that came with it was no help.  No response from Tiger Direct.  Went to Radio Shack and got one.  It works
Does not fit Nuvi 350 or 360. Although marketed by Amazon to fit the Garmin Nuvi 350, it does not!  Wrong fitting.  I've decided to just charge my Nuvi from the car with the DC cable that came with it, the same way I frequently charge my cell phone
Disappointed. Although the graph link cable is excellent in principle, mine did not deliver as advertised.  My computer/calculator interface was sporadic--sometimes it worked properly, sometimes it did not.  Further, the CD-ROM that came with the cable was, in my opinion, of poor quality and was not user friendly; the help section was particularly disappointing.  Finally, I found the TI internet resources for the cable to be substandard as well, with customer support being particularly inadequate.  After visiting their site, I felt as though they needed some competition to help motivate product quality....  In conclusion, the TI grphics calculators are fantastic, but their accouterments need some improvement
Not worth the money or hassle. To be honest, I have always used and enjoyed reliable service from LinkSys networking products.  Until now, that is.  I purchased the WCG200 V2.0 unit to replace an obsolete Surfboard modem.Because the WCG200 is an all-in-one router/modem solution offering both wired and wireless connectivity, I thought this would be a great thing.  And it would be, except for one major technical issue.  It suffers from a connectivity issue resulting in extremely frequent modem disconnect/resets (often multiple resets within a single hour). And, while a major of the complaints posted in the forums on LinkSys's website are concerning this problem in the wireless operation, it also applies to wired operation as well (Coax and USB connections).IF the WCG200 Router/Modem worked as advertised, I would give it a "5-Star" rating, for it's easy setup and features.  However, given that this serious connectivity problem has been reported to LinkSys as early as March 2006 without any corrective measure or firmware fix being offered to the customer, I would rate this as "-1 Star" if given the option.
waste of money. i was using the tape player for my ipod.  but since i got a new car which did not have a tape deck, i was forced to go to the fm transmitter.  i had expected it to be as clear as my radio, b/c afterall, it feeds off radio frequency.  i was very very disappointed.  it was full of static and depending on the position of your body and transmitter, static can increase or decrease.  i know it wasn't because i had weak radio frequency b/c the other stations were perfectly clear.  so i blame the transmitter.  i ended up returning the item 2 days after i bought it.  i'm glad target took it back.
Same problem as others, sticks to glass...then won't stick. I bought my wife a Nuvi 350 for her birthday last August (overall, we love the Nuvi, but the mount...no). The biggest "advantage" of the Nuvi over other GPS systems is its portability. Unfortunately, the suction cup appears to have been designed to subvert this feature. The cup sticks to the first window it is attached to very well...and then won't let go. When we tried to transfer it (after being attached only a couple of days), it left pieces of itself to the windshield and was very difficult to reattach to another windshield (though with difficulty and repeated tries, we have been able to move it).What this means is that you need a mount for each car you want to use this in. The mount and the charging/power wire (which you will also need since it is cumbersome to remove from the mount) are pretty darn expensive ($60-70) which is ridiculous for a "portable" system
It is not really a mp3 player!!!. After buying this for almost one, I decide to write a review for this machine.FIRST, this is NOT a true mp3 player!!!I was convinced to buy this from amazon.com mainly by the long battery life promised by SONY, and high capacity of the 1GB Hi-MD. This turned out to be true after I tried the machine.However, the use of this machine is a painful process.I have quite some collection of mp3 and wma music albums,  and some mp3 audio books. At first, I thought I can just plug in this machince into my computer and transfer the files I need, and listen to the things I desire. In the end, I found, all of the mp3 or wma files must be first converted into SONY's special format(.omg) with the provided hassel software, then you can transfer and listen them. The conversion takes so much time, although the transfer of the converted files are pretty quick. In the end, I have to quit the using of this and replace it with a Creative MuVo TX FM 1 GB MP3 Player.This is not a true mp3 player!!!SONY's thought are very different from other mainstream mp3 companies!!
Flawed DVD Playback. Picture looked great via HDMI, but unfortunately there was a major problem during DVD movie playback. DVD movies would frequently stutter at chapter changes. This was a show stopper for me and I returned it.  Perhaps my issue was specific to my setup (HDMI), a defective unit, or something else.  However, I went and got the Panasonic single disk HDMI player (S52?) and all is well (except no 6 disc changer). Onkyo tech support was not much help either (They basically told me to return it). Save yourself the return shipping costs and buy the Panasonic player
It works as promised, but not worth the money. Being a huge fan of XM, I was excited when I saw this product.  Sure it looked bulky, but I wasn't going to be moving around much while I used it, and I was going to use it only outside.  The first unit I received worked fine, but the volume/FM frequency selector "toggle" snapped off within the first few hours, leaving me unable to adjust either.  This appeared to be a design flaw, and as such I promptly returned it without incident.  I did get a second one and am mindful of this toggle switch.  I do note that even with careful use, the headphones age very quickly, and I do not think they will last too long.  The bottom line is that the product works as advertised, but does so at great expense, bulk, and does not appear to be durable.  If you can get a much lower price, go for it!
can't connect with computer. It's my first time heard a digital recorder can't connect with computer,it is very strange.I think it's not fit for me
Better off without mic. I married this mic to the Olympus WS-200S Digital Voice Recorder, which by the way plays in stereo. When attaching the mic there was a significant loss of volume, as the system only used one channel rather than stereo. The resulting loss of volume requiered the volume to be turned up during playback increasing backround noise levels. I use this device to record class lectures at the college level. Without the mic I was able to hear student questions from the back clearly. With the mic installed, I could no longer make out all the questions from the high volume related static.
Pull your hair out!!. Bought this to replace my old 2200 Ipaq; Man what a mistake! The battery is always dead, even after the HP tech support for hours on 3 seperate occasions; Patch downloads done nothing, lost information, reloads, Bugs to many to mention. I wished someone would have warned me of this pda model before I purchased it. All the good features it has don't hold a candle to all the troubles it has. I'd be very careful if your looking to buy this model. Da
Great product design/layout, horrible functionality. As mentioned, the layout of the keyboard is great... It's comfortable, has most the shortcut's I'd want, however it's designed for Media Center, and Media Center only.  No IE/Internet shortcuts are present, which in my opinion is a bad design.  Everyone that has a Media Center PC, also has Windows XP "professional", which could use those short-cuts.My largest gripe about this product is the mouse.  Why Microsoft makes you press downward, in addition to the direction of the mouse is beyond me.  We've had it about a month now, and despite other users saying it gets better with time, ours has not.  I was expecting a laptop-like fingermouse, and that's not what this keyboard has
mislabeled!. This site says the product is 15.1", the actual packaging says it's 15.4", but when I placed my 15.4" notebook inside, there was a ton of extra room.It looks as if this sleeve is large enough for a 17" laptop. Totally unacceptable
If you want to get lost buy this product!. This navigational system is useless. I have never gotten so lost before in my life. It tells you to take next left, when indeed it is in about 3 lefts, vise versa with rights.  Gave to my daughter and she constantly called me lost and upset so I tried it myself.  It literally took me about 9 miles out of my way to get to a local establishment.  Tried changing the preferences and it was worse.  Checked the manual, tried everything, if you put it on preferences for no toll roads/highways it takes you in circles down back roads till your dizzy.  If you program it on tolls/highways it will take you miles out of your way to locate a toll road and then back again.  If you program to the middle of the preference line it does not know where the heck you are and keeps searching.  Stay away! This one is a waste of money
Not sure the Long Term Quality & Reliability is built into this TV!. I would not recommend this TV......  I purchase the TV   .... It has a brilliant quality picture.    After a couple hours of running four very large segments on the screen went out making it un-viewable.  Panasonics determined the TV needed to be repaired.  After a two week wait the Technician arrived from a local TV repair center.   The Tech recommended that I take the TV back and exchange it for another.  He mentioned this is a common issue with Panasonic's and he has a couple in the shop waiting on parts. HE said I would have to wait several weeks for parts to arrive from Panasonic.   I loaded it up and back it went.   I exchange it for another brand new TV....    With in a week same issue in a different area of the screen.     Long story short in the past three months ....I'm loading up the 4th one tonight to return and try another brand.    I sense from all of the service techs and Panasonic support line this is a common issue....  Nothing I can say I did.  The TV's had very little use.  On Battery Surge/ Monster Cable UPS system, Coax surge filters and in a well ventilated area.  Based on my experience I would say look elsewhere..
This backpack didn't hold up. Pro'sIt's really roomy.... ample room for my old brick of a computer Dell 15" inspiron 6800 and my tiny HP NC6230.  Good sized for overnight.Con'sNo compression straps when you have a smaller load to carry.I ended up ripping the nylon on the bag accidently as it got hooked on the side of a gym locker.  not as good as ripstop nylon.The zipper "teeths" aren't secure/strong enough... the bag would separate at the zippers numerous times.  Eventually, the zippers all broke loose in one night, even the separate zipper for the laptop.
Constant noise. July 31st 2005:I was looking for a DVD player for my bedroom at Costco and couldn't resist the $179 price for this brand new Philips HTS3400 (HTS3410 is the same except that it comes all in silver rather than silver/black).I played some DVDs and CDs and after 2 days i decided to return it for 2 reasons:1. It makes a hissing sound when it's turned off. Now, it wouldn't bother me too much in a basement (althought it would still be anoying), but it's a definite NO NO in the bedroom.2. Rear speakers are almost silent no matter how much you increase the volume to them.If you don't mind these 2 things, then by all means go for it.Aug 2005 UPDATE:Having nothing better to do, I went and purchased another unit from Costco to see if indeed I have a bad unit or it's a design/manufacturing issue.Surprise surprise...second unit makes the same exact noise only a bit louder!Curious enough (i'm a mechanical engineer with some knowledge of electronics) i open the unit to see where is this noise coming from. It is the AC/DC transformer, more specific two 330uF capacitors making this noise.That is really poor design and/or low quality components!!! I did not expect this from a brand name like Philips. This is no different than any no name units out there at half price.As a result I am changing my initial reivew and recommend that you look for a different product, this one is definately not worth the money. I cannot update the stars but this time I would rate it with 0 stars.Oct 2006 Update: It stopped reading CDs but it reads DVDs no problem. Returned to Costco!
not enough info given. This product is only approved for CASIO keyboards. and only like three of those. Wish I would have known before hand
Poor customer service, product defective. I wouldn't buy anything from this company.  They have the worst customer service I have ever seen.  I got the product working (despite the unbelieveably poor documentation), but the output on my monitor showed ghosting and poor image quality.  I called them and after waiting almost an hour on hold they said "swap the cables and call us back".  At least that's what I think he said --- he barely spoke English. I tried their recommendation and it made no difference.  Called them back and they said the product was defective after asking me 8 or 9 completely rediculous questions.  Said I should ship it back to them (at MY cost) and they would ship me a new one in "a few weeks"!  I told them I didn't think that was a very good policy (I'd only had the product 2 days), and that if that was their policy I wouldn't buy their products.  They said "Your Choice, goodbye".  That was it.  Well I DO have a choice and you do too
Obviously not MAC compatible!!!. Great disappointment. Plugged in this equipment and tried typing in all the applications I own (Excel, Word, FreeHand among others) and displayed typed numbers (when it did) with extra spaces and squared characters. Should specify in the product description that is NOT MAC compatible. I'm not aware if PC users faced this problem as well
Wrong Product. Amazon shipped the wrong size notebook. No problem... returned the product.Amazon is a great merchant...will buy from them again.
Bait and Switch. Don't purchase this if you're expecting to get a 1500 mAh  Power2000 ACD-674 battery.  They sent a 1300 mAh Digicom battery instead
Wasted of money & time. This is a terrible product.  If you can get it to print, the labels look great, but it will only print a few labels before stops for no reason that I can find. I get an error that it didn't print but no reason why. I've installed on two different PCs, one is brand new and same thing happens.  Software is also pretty useless.It also prints many blank labels which gets quite expensive.The online help is a joke and the technical support take 48 hrs to respond.
Mine was DOA too. How do I assign a rating? As several other people have experienced, my unit is also DOA. I received it, plugged it in, pressed 'clean', and the motor started up. I popped open the cover, put in the disc I wanted cleaned, and pressed 'clean' again. Nothing. Terrible quality control.What's worse is the unit case is glued together -- no way to open it up to try to fix the electronics inside without mutilating it and voiding warranty
Gains time..And Display isnt very clear. Bought this despite mixed reviews from previous customers. As mentioned by others it gains approximately 3-4 min in a week. Also the Indiglo display isnt that great. It is very hard to see the time display during the day. Bottomline.. Always look through customer reviews and think hard and long if a product you are considering buying has bad reviews.Update: Display is all messed up after just one battery change. Stay away from this produc
keep hitting the side buttons. I was looking for a 5 button mouse to replace my old one.  Its fine as a mouse but the 2 buttons on either side are way too easy to hit accidentally.  If you cup the mouse sort of like you are holding a baseball you wont hit those buttons but who uses a mouse like that?  Most folks sort of reach for the mouse and put their hand on top of the mouse and that's where you start hitting the side buttons.  My old mouse put the buttons closer to the fron
One of the charging bays doesn't work. One of the charging bays always indicates that the batteries in the bay are not in working condition.  I'm also getting unusual behavior from the other indicators.I tried the 15-minute Energizer charger, and I'm having problems with this unit as well (see my review for that charger).  Frankly, I'm done wasting my time with Energizer chargers now.  I've never had these types of problems with other chargers in the past.
Terrible product. I bought this product to replace a previous HP all-in-one printer I had.  This is by far the worst printer I have ever owned.  It does not like photo paper, it is unreliable and it goes through ink quickly as the cartridges are tiny and overpriced.  Do yourself a favor - DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT!!!
All broken. The Mexican plant must have unhappy workers.  2 paks of 8, and each tape is defective.  Either the case is broken or there are loose parts rattling around inside.  Now we'll see how Sony stands behind their warranty.  Even if they send replacements I'll probably throw them away.  It's not worth breaking a VCR on these cheap, worthless tapes
Wow, these are a waste!. I bought two of the 30 packs of Verbatim Lightscribe CDRs from Best Buy.  I would be very optimistic in saying that 1 out of 3 actually worked.  Oh, the music burns on to them no problem, but when I flip them over to do the lightscribe label, it tells me the media is not recognized as lightscribe.  This happens no matter what program I use!  And what sucks even worse is that with the coating on the cd, it's almost impossible to write on, so you end up with an un-labeled cd anyways.Oh well, back to the HP discs :
Okay, I guess... While the silicon used in the construction of the sleeve is very nice (feels grippy but not sticky if you know what I mean), some of the features are just wrong.  For instance, the opening for the hold switch on top was apparently cut wrong and does not line up with the switch at all - requiring you to have to push the cover around so you can flip the hold on or off.  Also, for whatever reason, the edge of the sleeve is right at the headphone jack which causes it to be somewhat difficult to keep some headphones seated during use (the sleeve can work its way in and pop the jack out).The armband is satisfactory at best - it's just a standard, no frills, velcro armband
Too loud. As the other reviewer said, the lowest volume setting is far, far too loud, making this a poor choice for an office desk or a home nightstand.  (I can't even begin to enjoy the "sleep" function.)  Also, for a travel unit, the carrying bag provided is not big enough to hold the base unit, the iPod and the charger.  All in all, a nice design and look, but these two flaws (especially the volume issue) put this unit directly into the return pile.
Product controls. The Throttle control is to small and not in a good location on the Joystick.  The different buttons are OK, but for use in Flight Simulator, they are not in a good location.  Overall performance is OK, but not exceptional. I feel that the price is not consistant with the expectations of the Joystick. I expected more.
Concerned. The fan works, however, when I first start up the computer the fan is a little noisy.  I'm concerned about how long the fan will function
BUYER BEWARE. I own this product and have used it successfully on one notebook (dell). This  product is a port replicator NOT a docking station. For those that need tech mumbo jumbo its quite simple. Software controls this product and it operates according to very strict hardware rules. The drivers are very unstable plus there is no support for some ATI cards. I would recommend at least 1GB of ram with a 7200 rpm hard drive in order to prevent lag and the screen of death. Please don't buy if you don't know what video card you have or if your computer is slow. Trust me I have 9 laptops and only one worked with this product. Don't be a fool. (Nvidea cards have more support
Old Adage is True "You Get What You Pay For". I was hoping for a great deal on these batteries, but like other reviewers I've found that they run out of juice incredibly fast.  I'm amazed that other reviewers have had such good luck because things like my wireless keyboard which uses two AA's ran out of juice in a couple days of normal use while my automatic sprinkler time that uses two AA's lasted only a week.Be warned that these aren't quite the bargain they may initially seem
Good idea, poor engineering. Even when I realized that it were merely a storage device (not a reader), Disk Stakka still seemed interesting. But then... within 5 minutes I realized it couldn't eject any disc I inserted. After calling 3M, they suggested an "automatic calibration" probably because "the plate must have been misaligned with the ejecting slot". It worked at first but started to fail after another 5 minutes. Surprisingly, "auto-calibrating" the device again - a 10 minutes process - worked for the next 2 ejects. Afterwards it refused to eject unless you "calibrate it" again. I asked for a replacement unit to 3M and they said that since I've bought it online on eBay (it was sealed and brand new - mind this), they couldn't do anything to help me. By the way: they don't offer any kind of repair service on this product. Even if you're willing to pay (like me). If it breaks on you, you're on your own
ink costs more than the printer. I have an epson cx4600, which on the surface looks to be a bargain, at $80. But the ink costs $60 to replace (3 colors and black) and the black, which I use mostly, costs twice the color ink.But here's the real jab, I don't print too much and the ink got clogged some. It says to clean the print heads, and then print a test pattern. Well, the test pattern did not show completely clean, and so I repeated it 5 times. Then to my horror, I saw that each cleaning cleans ALL cartriges, and after the 5 cleanings, I was down to 50% ink. They don't have a way to clean just the black cartrige (or a specific color). I tried faking it out by saying i was replacing the ink in one cartrige (pull the black out and then back in) and it almost got the thing unclogged, but on the second try at this it got worse.Bottom line, they give away the printers then get you by selling you high priced ink. The size of the cartrige is miniscule and I think you could probably only get about 20-30 full page images printed for about $50-60 worth of ink
How could Microsoft screw this one up???. I currently use a Microsoft Intellimouse that I purchased about 4-5 years ago. It is the MOST COMFORTABLE mouse for medium to large sized hands. Bar none. Microsoft kept it sweet and simple and they had a winner! Why they ever took this mouse off the market, I'll never understand.After getting a new PC recently, I decided to "splurge" and get one of these ultra-ergonomic mice. I looked at the usual suspects: Logitech, Kensington, Microsoft, etc. I was disappointed as the feel and fit of the various mice I tried weren't as smooth as the Intellimouse. Then, lo and behold, I noticed that Microsoft rereleased the Intellimouse. Great, my search is over!I received the mouse today. Same design, same fit. Awesome.Only one problem you manufacturing geniuses,... the scroll wheel rattles unbelievably!!! How bad? Think of those old-fashioned New Year's Eve noisemakers that you hold by the small handle and twirl around in a circle. That's the sound it makes, I'm not kidding. The original Intellimouse scroll wheel is very quiet when in use.How could you screw this one up?! It's the same product you offered a few years ago with the color being black now! Did you somehow lose the drawings on the original Intellimouse scroll wheel? Did you need to save that extra 50 cents by having it manufactured somewhere else?What a dealbreaker. I'm sticking with my old Intellimouse until Microsoft gets a clue and fixes this oversight
Creative same as Alienware. I order online from there company. They send me broken box. I want to return but they say if you return they will charge you for the money.I pay for 500 dollars for this? then i go home i use that speaker .the website say it can connect to muvo mp3 player. I try but it not work.They send me problem speaker!!
Not as good as my camcorder's internal mic!. Perhaps this would work well in an area with alot of noise, such as a sports game, but I wouldn't recommend this for any other reason.  In fact, I returned this mic because it wasn't as good as my Panasonic GS180's internal stereo mic. I did identical tests with this mic, and with my camcorder's mic.The Atr55 did pick up better on voice clarity and depth when in close range, but it brought in too much outside/ambient noise, and the cable makes alot of noise!  It's hard not to rub against the cable with your fingers when it's mounted on a small camcorder.The Bottom Line: you may want to do research on a more expensive mic like the Rode Videomic, I hear it's great, yet haven't tried it yet.  I guess you get what you pay for
XP Users Beware. I recently bought this thinking I could use it to upgrade my TI-86 calculator. To my surprise I heard it was incompatible with XP. I supposed the worst that could happen is that it wouldn't work. As soon as I recieved the Cable it said to go to the website...  so I went and updated the software specific to my calculator. After the installation it asked me to restart. After the restart I immediatly recieved a Blue Screen of death and luckily windows XP found out it corrupted a file in the registry and fixed it but were it not for that I would have to do a format. I have not fully installed it yet as now I have started backing up everything as a just in case scenerio however i warn users that when buying this product be cautious as this is not 100% XP compatible and may mess up your system
high expectations from Netgear brand - not a great product. I am not going to write what this phone does and what it doesn't, you will read it from other reviews. I will explain what problems I had and you might  have with it. At least it might help you to troubleshoot the similar issues.First, it was easy to setup the phone, connect it to the router and phone line, register your skype name and make your first land line call. Quality is good. Then I placed a skype call to a friend and ..first problem: no audio, nobody hears anything. I tried to use another skype account on my computer to make calls to/from sph200d and ..no audio.  I looked at all settings on the device, support website and found nothing. I tried to connect to the admin webpage using provided on the CD documentation username and password admin and admin and couldn't connect(second problem). Well, I reset a base unit and still couldn't connect to the admin page. I searched online and God bless internet found that documentation on CD is old and current username/password is admin/password. And what even better reseting a base unit have helped with audio problems! Hooray! Now I can make good quality skype calls without need to go downstairs to my computer.The next and biggest problem I've experienced is no matter that automatic sign in option is turned on the phone(and the web page) is asking the password every time you sign off/sign in the skype. Turning phone off, reseting base/phone, using different skype id, etc did not help. I called support, waited 15 minutes and was told I need to register the product online first. Well it has sense, I did so and called again. 10 minutes later customer representative from Deli was ready to provide me with an excellent service. First, he said yes automatic sign in should work and my phone is not defective, and asked me to do all steps I did already, i.e. reseting, etc. No luck. Then he left to check about this issue and called me back to state that phone MUST ask for a password every time I sign in for a security reason! (what about remember username/password option there?). Nice lie to a customer to make him believe problem is solved.Note: if you turn the phone off - yes there is an option to turn it off, please press and hold red button - without signing off, then when you turn the phone on it wouldn't ask you for a password. Right, but all this time that phone is off, friends see your status as online/away and may try to call you.Well, there is a solution I've found for myself - never sign off, just change your status to offline. I have not decided yet whether to return/replace the unit or keep it. Maybe when you learn tricks on how to use a device it would serve you well. But at current price/quality I would not recommend it, too bad there is not many alternatives.Good luck with it
Broke very easily. The extendable arm breaks very easily.  I had two of them and they both broke within the first month.  The company does have a 3 month warranty but you have to pay for shipping to send it back to them and I have been waiting over a month for my replacement.  Very poor product.  Do not buy
Terrible Navigation Functions. I liked my Honda factory navigation, so I bought the Pioneer AVIC-N2 for my BMW.  Since I could not found a demonstration unit, I bought it based on reviews and thought most of the navigation system will be similar.  Now that it is installed, I quickly realized that it is a terrible navigation system.  The AVIC-N2 does not allow the driver to change the destination or use majority of the navigation functions while the car is moving.  Now I can NOT map to new locations, redirect to new routes while in traffic, find restaurants, locate point of interests in the area, and many other normal navigation functions unless I PARK the car first.  I called the Pioneer customer service and found them to be very non-responsive. The representative insisted that it is a "safety" feature.  In summary, I would not recommend this unit to anyone.  It is not much different from Yahoo Map.
PNY Geforce FX5200 256MB PCI Graphics Card. This Graphics card didnot work as expected, after numerous attempts to resolve installation and operation problems, the card was returned for refund,(which I have not received as of this date.) I WOULD NOT reccomend this graphics card to anyone with built in graphics card in their computer. There seems to be too many software conflicts.
Very Unreliable Product. The setup instructions for this product are totally inadequate as is the online troubleshooting help. With phone support, I was able to get the product working, but after a few days the H1000 lost communication with the extender. After two hours of undocumented procedures with technical support, it was working again. After two more days the problem reoccured. The fix seems to be to reload the firmware and software in both the remote and the wireless extender. If it fails again and it is too late to get a refund, I will throw it in the trash and go back to IR communication on my H1000.
Same problems as all of the above users. My CD player has jammed in a similar fashion to those described above. I called the Harman Kardon customer service line, and they kept me on hold for ten minutes. Then I went to their website, which is poorly designed and slow to load due to an overabundance of flash graphics. The website told me to fax a warranty replacement form to Harman. I had to do that three times to get a response. Finally I got a return authorization after two days and several emails. Poor quality, poor customer support. Guess what H-K, I won't be buying any of your products in the future. This is a replacement for a Sony changer that worked flawlessly for 18 years. And, I may take HK to small claims court if the replacement doesn't work.
Successfully burned 3 cds out of a spindle of 50. This is the second time I've been dumb enough to buy these- both times, I saw an uncluttered surface (no loud logos!) and the sony brand name, and assumed it'd be good quality. Only after my burning software failed again & again, and then my cd drive stopped recognizing any discs at all until rebooting, did I realize that I'd been through this before- with Sony discs, a year ago.I can't imagine what could possibly make these so bad. I've used just about every other kind of discs with no problem. Reading the other reviews here makes me realize it's not just me. It's pretty upsetting that I've wasted $40 or so on these things, for a grand total of maybe 5-10 usable discs
Not worth the hassle; not worth the $. Initially this unit seemed to work pretty well. I wasn't thrilled aboutthe copyright protection issues or the extremely slow time to load, but I decided to try to work with it. In six months, this player often arbitrarily decides not to record sometimes, and it often stops recording regular TV programming (my wife's favorite soap) due to "copyright issues" - completely ridiculous!Now this unit will not output any audio signals at all. Stay away from this piece of garbage. I used to respect Sony quality - I will never buy from them again
Slow, slow and SLOW!. Do NOT buy this product.  It is incredibly slow, by far the slowest USB drive out of the dozen or so that I've used.  It handles small numbers of large files rather well but it immediately chokes whenever faced with a large quantity of small files.  I attempted to copy ~50MB (1500 files, 800 directories) to the disk and it took almost 30 minutes to complete the copy!  That's roughly 27K/second.  Deleting the files was painful as well, taking at least 15 minutes to delete everything.  For kicks, I popped in an old 128 MB Kingston drive and was able to copy the same set of files to it in under 30 seconds and the delete took under 15 seconds.  Bottom line is don't be fooled by the drive's small physical size, large capacity and price point: it simply doesn't perform
Only trouble and big regret of wasting money. After purchasing the item in december 2006 it didnt take even a week before the troubles started, it kept freezing after switching it on and took quite long to rebuild the data. At one point, (after two weeks) I lost all my data. Despite downloading the software from the website the problems didnt disappear and i am basically left with a promising player which doesnt even allow me to listen to music without frezing.Since then i am struggling with Creative Technical SUpport team as thereis advise given to charge my battery or download the software from the website (which both is not been of much help)This player hasnt been much of use to me yet and I deeply regret having paid 360 USD.I gave it 2 stars because I was able to watch 2 movies while waiting at the airport and travelling, this was quite a pleasure
Bad piece of machinery. We had troubles fromt he start, they correct a type would not work.  Took to a Brothers repair shop and they could not fix, need some parts.. plus when you tried to type letters you would get numbers...  It was the present my daughter wanted the most for christmas and she could not use... very sad.  So I will by another brand at a local store in town.
Very Annoying. I've owned this for a year and am looking for a new keyboard.  I have continual connection problems with mouse and keyboard and continually have to reset.  Low battery warnings appear every day.  This keyboard was not cheap and I thought Microsoft could do better, but I can't afford to waste my time trying to type a sentence
Starry Eyed Over This One, But Lets Me Down. Upon the joyful news that we were having a girl, my husband decided to invest in a new digital camera and a photo printer. The digital camera still works great--the printer is another matter. While this one prints beautiful pictures, the cost of ink far outweighs the beauty of them sometimes.As we all know, this is how printer companies make their money, through the ink. Replacing every cartridge at once will run you about $75 at a time, give or take a few. The gray ink is used up the quickest, and has also been one of the hardest for us to find here locally. The main problem I have with this printer is that the quality is excellent after you replace the ink, but for only about the first 50-70 pictures. After that. The pictures take on too much of a magenta cast and start to get out of register--very frustrating when you're printing out any pictures, let alone ones of your child. Yes, we do what the manual sugests for such occasions, and the main one is to clean the printer cartridge heads, but this has only actually worked for us on one occassion. Every other time get us no results and we are still stuck with pictures that resemble something a third grader took a crayon to. In the long run, I will not be buying a photo printer for home use, but will rather take them to a store for processing.Quality-wise, it gets you in the beginning, but doesn't hold out for the long run. We have fiddled with it for two years. Enough's enough
No Speakerphone, False Advertising. For a phone that costs $169, the lack of any features is pretty disturbing.  But the one that Linksys actually points out in their documentation is actually not available on this phone.  That feature would be a speakerphone, a mainstay of about every phone sold today.  The phone works, but the speaker is apparently only to play the startup noise.Also, it feels pretty cheap when using it.  I was afraid I was going to break a button.  This one went right back to Amazon.
TERRIBLE CASE -  BROKE MY IPOD. Don't buy this case before reading this message. This is a terrible waterproof case. I used it once and for 5 minutes only!!!! I took it for my swimming lesson and in less than 5 minutes it drowned my ipod nano!!! I complained at the otterbox web site, but they didn't bother to answer me. DON'T buy this item. You will be waisting your money
A Fair Shake. I've owned two pairs of these for over 4 years and used them in different environments (multi-floor house, single-floor apartment) and have to concur with others that it is nearly impossible to get a clean signal.  Static, popping, cordless phone conversations from other houses / apartments, etc. is the norm.  I've also tried tuning across the variable spectrum with the same failed results.  They work, for my purposes, but I can't honestly recommend these to anyone
Incompatible. My dell Photo 964 and this server weren't compatible.  I think it is my printer's problem not the server's
Defective product.... Apart from the money part, imagine the dis-appointment happening to the kids if the product doesn't work at the first sight....?? Ok, moreover when tried to return it, there is no acknowledgement nor any response back regarding the refund. Why is it being sold again, if the product is defective?? Please stop selling the product and take a closer look at the product review before selling it again, it is really annoying when things like this happens. Please rectify. It is also disapointing when we cannot talk to a customer service personnel over the phone
Worthless. I ordered the 2-year service plan on May 1st, this day (July 31st), I still have not recievied it. I have contacted them a number of times, and still nothing.  Do not buy from this company
HOW SAD. I purchases this karaoke machine for my daughters' 5th birthday.  I gave it to her first thing this morning only to be very disappointed and sad to find out that it too, like the other two people that purchased and reviewed it, didn't work.  The CDs didn't even turn around.  The microphones worked.  My daughter was very sad that we had to return it.  I think that it should be recalled.  I purchased it at Toys R Us and they took it right back without any problem.  I wish I had opened it to make sure it worked after I read those reviews.
The worst. Avoid at all costs!. A terrible product. Extremely difficult to use. Way too easy to accidentally change the combination, and when that happens, it's useless. The only reason it gets one star is that the rating system does not allow a zero or a negaive number. Don't waste your money on this product
Does Not Work Well With My Smartphone. I did not realize I had to purchase a compatible map program to go with this product. When I tried it on my smartphone, it shut down my ability to receive calls also
"Noise Canceling" has no effect. I've tried a few varieties of noise canceling headphones.  These have no actual noise reduction that I can determine in any environment.  They do tend to amplify the volume a bit, and are clear in terms of sound quality.  If it's noise cancellation you're looking for, this model is not for you.  I hope I can return them for at least a credit on another model.
I whish I'd received written conformation!. I paid for it and got an e-mail link but have yet to receive the written conformation. Called the 1800#. It's been a month. If it's this hard to get the plan I wonder how it will be if I need to replace my product
NO SUPPORT. Let's be honest.This product ain't cheap. It's not something you can just throw away if it decides to stop working.I bought mine at cpenusa.com. Delivery was great, only took them a couple of days. However, my c-pen cable was damaged. The connector to the c-pen was, for some reason, cut in half. Without it, you can't recharge or connect the c-pen to the pc.I called their main office all the way in Sweden during the office hours. NO RESPONSE. I sent three e-mails to cpenusa. NO RESPONSE.I don't care if the product itself is great(I'll never know now, will I..). If you're unable to receive support when you need 'em, you're screwed.If you're just interested in electronic equipments, just want to try things out and don't really care if you're on your own, go ahead and try it. Let me know how this thing really is. Otherwise, buy a product that you can trust on with respect to after-sales support
Not a lot of choices. I purchased this about 9 months ago. I had problems with the installation and was on with tech support for the better part of an hour. Because my printer is a bit older and not plug and play ready, a lot of the functions had to be disabled. The product worked for about 6 months but is now not fuctioning. I am being asked to return it for a replacement, but I am finding they do not support this model any longer. With the price of printers/faxes these days, I might as well replace my fax and buy one with a USB and a new wireless server to boot
IT AINT NO KEYTAR BUT IT DUD LAY KICK. hmm. It doesnt sound much like a Grande Piano two me. More of like a strange drumset sometimes or a synthy. Or people claping at me when I didnt even play anything. I push le button hard. WILD HOOOOOGG
Monster Cable is misleading--research before making a purchase. First of all the cable is very difficult to install, it's rigid and not flexible.After I connected my cable box and my LCD HDTV with this Monster Cable HDMI, my service provider (Time Warner Cable) told me that they don't support HDMI, I should use the component cable that comes with the cable box.   Well I already opend the box and it's too late to return.Every now and then I get a message on my TV saying: "YOU CAN NOT USE HDMI CALE, PLEASE USE THE COMPONENT CABLE TO WATCH TV."  I had to turn my TV off and on to get rid of that screen.Some HD channels' volumes are very low, I have to turn to the loudest in order to listen. Has it anything to do with the cable?  Time Warner won't care.The sales guys from Circuit City said it's must to get bla bla bla in order to watch best High Definition channels, this HDMI cable is one of the recommendations.  I'm too naive to trust them.I should have researched more before making a purchase.  I don't like the cable at all, sooner it'll destroy either port--the cable or the TV
Cheap piece of crap. This phone sucks.  The battery doesn't hold the charge, resulting in dropped calls and major aggravation.GE should be embarrased to offer such a piece of junk.Do not fall for this phone because it is inexpensive, as I did. You'll end up spending a ton of money on new battery packs or having to buy a new phone in just a few months, as i am about to do today.This time I'm going Panasonic!FYI: My GE refridgerator is also a piece of cra
Not for the non-techie type. I finally got my Uno to work with my Yamaha keyboard. Yes that's right, I have a Yamaha keyboard (YPT-200). Here's how I did it:I installed the drivers before I plugged in the USB device. Strangely, the Uno was not using M-Audio drivers even though the hardware wizard looked like it figured everything out correctly. I checked Device Manager to see if the drivers were installed correctly (they were not). To get into Device Manager:1. I right-clicked on My Computer, then clicked on Properties2. Clicked on the Hardware tab3. Clicked on the Device Manager button4. Clicked on the plus (+) sign next to Sound, video and game controllers.5. Double-clicked on "USB Audio Device" (if you have M-Audio USB Uno Driver in the list, don't go any further. Your drivers are fine though you may want to update them. As of 3/3/07 it is version 4.2.0)6. Clicked on the Driver tab, then clicked on the Update Driver button.7. Clicked on the "Install from a list or specific location (Advanced)" radio button, then clicked Next8. Clicked on "Don't search. I will choose the driver to install." radio button, then Next9. The M-Audio USB Uno MIDI Driver should be in the compatible hardware list. You will have to select it, otherwise it will use Microsoft's generic drivers. Click Next.10. You will get a scary message about "The software you are installing ... has not passed Windows Logo testing to verify its compatibility with Windows XP... yada, yada... Just click "Continue Anyway."11.  If all goes right your "USB Audio Device" will change to "M-Audio USB Uno Driver" or "Audio USB Uno MIDI Driver" or both.Yes, I got it to work, but for M-Audio to have me go through these steps is unconscionable. The drivers should install without fuss. This is not a true "Plug and Play" device... not even a "Plug and Pray" device. It's just stupid. Giving 2 stars is generous. For those who gave 4 or 5 stars... maybe you have a Mac... or maybe you just live right, but this is not a great product. Even though it now works, there are some latency problems (press a piano key... hear the sound a couple of miliseconds later), and it sounds a bit muddy. I can live with that (muddy sound & latency issues), but a bad install experience does not make me want to purchase an M-Audio product in the future.Cheers
be forewarned, if your thinking of using this with Airport Express. This Amazon listing also suggests buying the Soundsticks along with Airport Express.If you're thinking of connecting them to the USB port of Express, Apple says it won't work.(Apple Airport Express FAQs
Hard to get into. The plastic is really thick and hard to get an iPod mini in and out of. If you move your iPod between docking stations and speakers, this is too cumbersome to deal with
High Hopes, Poor Product. With very limited device support, little or no customer support, and a premium price, Tom-Tom blew an opportunity to change how consumers view hybrid GPS units.Perhaps, the competition will learn from this and provide the tool we are all looking for
Great Tools. We used these radios on a Corvette road tour to the national convention in San Antonio.  Had no problems, great response.  Batteries appear to last more than a few days
New and Useless. Bought a new MD751 home, charged for 16+ hours and never worked!  Vendor commented that they recieved a lot of returns on this phone...errors say - out of range, registration failed, no line even though other cordless phones work fine on the line.  Motorola referred me to a subcontractor for assistance that never called back - so Motorola isn't even interested in what their customer problems are!  Bought a 5.8 GHz Panasonic KX-TG5428C that is getting 5/5 stars.
Bad Cable. THE TEST:I used this longer gold plated cable to replace a shorter, non-gold plated S-video cable.THE RESULT:I saw a much more "grainy" picture delivered only in black and white. I tried several different inputs and outputs, but the problems were fixed only when I removed this Belkin cable and replaced it with the older generic cable.THE VERDICT:This cable delivers substandard picture quality and robs you of viewing video in color. It does not work 'fine' as attested by other reviews. If you don't want to shell out the cash for a higher quality S-video cable (upwards of $20/six ft), stick with less expensive A/V cables.
This product should'nt be in the market. This music bridge is obviously a product that should not be in the market.  I spent at least 10 hours in three different chat and phone sessions with technical support until they asked me to return the unit (got a used unit in exchange).  After upgrading firmware in the router and downloading the utility from their web site to replace the one in the CD, and three more sessions with the tech people, my PC can finally ping the bridge, and every now and then the utility can even find it.  No way to play music through the bridge though.  Tried changing WMP speaker settings, turning firewall off, uninstalling and installing the utility, everything I (or tech support) can think of.  Also, when the bridge is powered my network becomes unstable and the PC's connectivity goes on and off. I have Linksys router and phone adapter, but if I had done a google search before buying, I would surely had gone for a different product, such is the number of negative comments I've found afterwards
Discontinued for good reason. Completely useless. Only shows a digital display when Ipod is "fully charged" -- how long does YOUR Ipod stay fully charged? Even when showing digital display doesn't actually broadcast. Maxell replaced it with the p-4A for a reason. Amazon shouldn't even be selling this, it makes me distrust Amazon. I got it as a Christmas present but it was bought in October so they won't even take it back.Follow up: After I emailed Amazon, they issued a complete refund, which they refused to do over the phone. Now they just need to pull the product, since they (probably wisely) aren't carrying the P-4A and therefore can't recommend it as an option.
Doesnt work. Dont waste your time or money on this.  The sound quality was poor and I had to turn up the volume on the receiver so loud just to be able to hear it on the wireless speaker...which defeated the whole purpose.  After an hour of adjusting and re-adjusting I packed it back up and sent it back
PAIN!!. I have a mouse intensive job with dual screens working on digitizing maps.  Unlike the reviewers before me I have a normal size hand.  Over the years I have developed a slight pain on the top of my wrist.  My favorite mouse so far has been a Microsoft Wireless mouse similar to the 5000 design but with the fake leather on the palm, which is no longer available.  I saw this "ergonomic" Natural mouse advertised on Microsoft's website six months ago and purchased one the second it became available.The mouse caused instant pain in my wrist.  I tried using the mouse for a week in different positions thinking I just had to get used to the mouse.  My wrist pain just got worse.  After a week the pain in my wrist was so bad I wasn't sure it would ever go away.  Not only did I have pain while using it but for days after stopping.  Although I have a mild pain in the top of my wrist from normal mousing this mouse caused pain in a different location at the base of my thumb.I returned the mouse and returned to my old mouse.
Faulty wiring. I detest this printer.  I've bought quite a few printers in my day:  Lexmark, Canon, and have been quite happy with most HP's, but this was the pits.  The first one I brought home worked fine the first time but when I tried to turn it on the next day, it wouldn't cut on.  It just died on me.  I unplugged it, plugged it back it...then it worked for a little while before dying again.  This time for good.  I returned it, got another one...same problem.  Except this time it keeps going.  All I have to do is unplug it before each and every time I turn it on.  Nice, huh?Now I'm browsing online again and I've learned my lesson for sure.  No more el cheapo models.  I'm at least going to shell out for a midline price with some heft to it that will last me a year or two
Flimsy -- Avoid Avoid Avoid   {1 Star}. I wrote an initial review that praised these headpohones, but after a recent breakdown, I had to readjust my rating from 4 to 1 star.  Below is my initial review followed by the update:I can't really say whether these reviews are accurate or not because I've only had my pair for 9 days (they were a Valentine's Day gift). I can say this much: so far, so good.The Cons:Like others have stated already, the sound is good, but not great and they don't get very loud (the bass is virtually nonexistant too). The coord is long, but it's also incredibly flimsy for a set that's supposed to be high quality.The Pros:I gave these a 4 star rating simply because, so far, they're durable, they're affordable, and (despite what I've read) quite comfortable -- in my opinion. I've spent hours and hours spinning records with these on and I haven't had any discomfort (I should mention that I have small ears). Despite the heavy mileage I've already put on them, again, I may not be the best judge because I've only had them for 9 days. The package also contains a few cool skullcandy stickers, an adapter for stereos/mixers and the like, a nice looking travel bag that has room for more than just the headphones, and a pair of black ear cushions if you don't like the camo.My personal opinion as a DJ:While these aren't the worst headphones out there, you should probably go for something better if you have the cash. I swear by the Senheisser brand, but those and other high end brands can get a little expensive depending on the quality level you want. I think Skullcandy spent more time on the cosmetic aspect instead of focusing on performance, but I'd easily recommend these to beginners or those that want a more affordable, above average set of headphones.We'll see if I can say that they're durable 6 months from now though. I'll update this review if they turn out to be crappy, but so far they aren't.Update: March 12, 2007 Like most of these reviews have stated, these things don't last. I went to turn my set on and they just gave out on me -- I haven't had them for more than a month (it'll be a month on the 14th). I haven't dropped them or yanked the cord or anything of that nature, yet my headphones have failed on me. For that very reason, I reduce my rating from 4 to 1 star. These things are terrible
I wish I could pick zero stars for this piece of junk!!. Unfortunately, when I bought this thing it was new on the market, so the horror stories that are seemingly abundant now weren't around to warn me off back then. Needless to say, I have been plagued by problems with my pmc-120 from quite early on. My pmc has since totally died and despite testing with new batteries etc, turns on but does not respond.... Rubbish!! considering I paid $300+ this is unacceptable.To add insult to injury, iriver North America has not responded to my emails. Therefore, the warranty I paid for is effectively useless.Please don't buy this product. There are other portable media centers out there, like the toshiba gigabeat and the DreamEo, but I'm really not sure if they're any good either!! Like others here, I am doing my utmost to warn people away from making the mistake of buying one of these infernal contraptions.A
No Vista Driver. This is a very nice printer and a good upgrade from an inkjet printer. It is fast, quiet, and produces good results. However, it lacks a Vista driver so it no longer works with my upgraded Vista computer. HP is really dragging their feet on providing a driver
D-Link DWL_G800AP Range Extender. The product never worked, even after three calls to tech help. Tech help even changed my computer settings and it took me a while to reconfigure it. I returned the product, and advise anyone not to purchase it
DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT. This jacket is so tight that it holds down all the buttons at once and the Creative Zen will not work with it on.  Do not waste your money on this product, you will be very disappointed.
Allsop Lens Cleaner. I didn't notice any change in the operation of my cd writer after cleaning.  The cleaner was supposed to play music while it cleaned (30 minutes)  It didn't
Great while it lasted... I bought this mouse eight months ago and was quite satisfied - until last week when it stopped functioning altogether.  I really expected a better product and durability from Microsoft.  I've since bought a Logitech VX Revolution Cordless Laser Mouse for Notebooks and love it.
Poor Sound Quality. The outgoing message that I tried to record sounded terrible, so I have to use the default outgoing message. To delete a message you hit the on/off button -- not very intuitive as sometimes it just shuts the machine off if your timing is not right. I've had it for over a year, it works fine, but I'm looking to replace it for something of better quality that's easier to use
To slow. I recommend the type H for usage in cameras instead of type Mas H is the high speed version. A higher speed is more usefullwhen you try to take a couple of pictures in a short time orwhen you review the pictures already taken.
Nice case but. This is a nice case and looks like it would do the job of protecting my iPod BUT, it basically renders my 400$ speaker set useless. The iPod won't dock now in the speaker's dock because of the case. And it is way too tough to get the case on and off to be practical. Something has to give.
Avoid buying it. after few months of using it, it started to lag badly, and the scroll wheel stopped working, I'll never buy logitech mouse again.
Not the quality I was looking for. I purchased this microphone & I am returning it the same day.  I was looking for a microphone that would work with my pc & had a little better quality than the standard ones you get with a new computer.  Sound coming from this was so lo, windows couldn't even detect a voice being transmitted.Can't complain too much, it was less than $10.  I have not tried this product with other devices.  I use my pc for all of my recording
Noisy Noisy Noisy!!!. Pros:  Burner works great, I've gotten only 1 coaster in 6 months.Nice designCons:  It is LOUD!!  Sounds like someone groaning.  There was some previous reviews of noise factor but I vastly underestimated it. It's hard to concentrate on watching movies.  I advise buying another model or even another brand.
re: Absolutely terrible. To celebrate the anniversary of our company, we thought we'd give all employees a gift.  Our Apple phobic IT guys nixed the Ipod as a choice, despite the CEO and CTO both owning and recommending them, so we went with the Zune.  Of the 50 we bought, 16 had to be exchanged for quality issues.  We've had issues with the drivers on the Vista enabled computers and spotty syncing with the XP machines.  Several of the units have had poor performing batteries and several also had a buzz in the headphones.We can't use them as data drives so they're not as useful as we'd like.  Finally, store interoperability is zero and we cannot understand why DRM is applied to files if you share them.  Which reminds me, the wireless is half baked; too slow and we've had plenty of hang ups while trying to share.The end of the story is that the CEO is both pissed and embarrassed as to the gift debacle.  He has already said in no uncertain terms that when Apple ships a video ipod, the company will give those to make up for the Zune experience
Absolute Garbage. Seldom do I find a product that is so bad that I only use it once.  Unfortunately I bought it for an international trip and the return period was over when I got back.  I offered to give it to the store to demo so that no one else would buy them.  Don't waste your money
Crap. I had a Pronto NEO for less than a year before the touchscreen failed after I dropped it 1.5 feet onto a hardwood floor.  The unit has a very cheap feel, especially for the price.  I wasn't at all surprised when it stopped working.  The PC software that you use to customize the touchscreen is crap.  The touchscreen is very tedious to customize (I write software for a living, and I still found it cumbersome to customize the touchscreen).  I can't imagine the average consumer being able to customize this unit, given the effort that it takes to struggle with the software and to transfer the information from your PC to the remote.  The whole point of the Pronto NEO is that you can customize the touch screen.  Unless you are VERY comfortable with computer applications, do not buy this unit.  Aside from the touchscreen's fagility, is not sensitive enough to the touch and the area of the screen is too small, given the size of the remote.  Did I mention the batteries did not last more than 2 months?  In short, this product is crap.  I might consider buying another one if it sold for $30 or less
Totally Failed to perform. One of them arrived damaged on the printer head so did not even print one page.  The other one did not print as many pages as I'd expected.  Besides the color fades away too fast. Contacted the company without any reply.  You'd better go for the genuine HP product.
Joe Barone Big Buyer. cases very cheaply made. Break when opening. Not worth shipping cost waste of money
Terrible don't buy it. Don't waste your money. You cannot see the screen it doesn't line up well with the outside cover so you can use your dial. It shifts and turns the volume up to full blast.
Meh! Shiny but Uncomfortable and Unpractical. I bought this mouse hoping to use it with my new HP dv2000 laptop, with internal bluetooth, I was excited about the Instant View feature and the lazer percision, however when I got the mouse connected it worked, but no instant viewer?  Turns out the instant viewer only works if you have the DONGLE pluged in... but... the reason I bought a "BLUETOOTH" mouse was in order to AVOID a dongle breaking off in the side of my laptop.On top of all this the extra two buttons on the sides are AWKWERD to press, I have to contort my fingers in a arthritus inducing cramp to press them, nothing like my old microsoft mouses' cozy side button.The middel mouse button also is annoyingly resistant to press in order to activate mouse button three... which is set to activate the "Amazing" instant viewer, which is decent, but useless without the dongle.As far as lazer percision, not too noticable, my Kingston RF lazer mouse seemed to preform better.The only reason I gave it a 2/5 is the charger is nice, the battery is good and it has a nice brushed aluminum finish, which feels nice and cool against the palm.This makes a DECENT desktop mouse, if you use the dongle which they include the connectivity is good and the percision is nice.  Not something I'd recomend for a laptop user.  For the price overall subpar
120V  60Hz  only. Classic brick AC/DC transformer is for North America only. I hoped for a &quot;dual voltage&quot; AC/DC convertor which could be used overseas
Terrible Performance, Waste Of Time. This thing actually performed worse than the antenna that came with the wireless card. That means the range stated on the box is incorrect. Back to the store for a refund. You get what you pay for for.
Yes, it does not work. I can concur.  This cable does not work.  It will put sound out, but no video.  Of course I have set the video to TV out.  That's the first thing I did!  I have tried this cable with two ipods on two TVs.  Nothing
short life time. after few months it just stopped working.also, it is not rechargable, and need to replace batery every 1-2 week
Monster Cable is misleading--research before making a purchase. First of all the cable is very difficult to install, it's rigid and not flexible.After I connected my cable box and my LCD HDTV with this Monster Cable HDMI, my service provider (Time Warner Cable) told me that they don't support HDMI, I should use the component cable that comes with the cable box.   Well I already opend the box and it's too late to return.Every now and then I get a message on my TV saying: "YOU CAN NOT USE HDMI CALE, PLEASE USE THE COMPONENT CABLE TO WATCH TV."  I had to turn my TV off and on to get rid of that screen.Some HD channels' volumes are very low, I have to turn to the loudest in order to listen. Has it anything to do with the cable?  Time Warner won't care.The sales guys from Circuit City said it's must to get bla bla bla in order to watch best High Definition channels, this HDMI cable is one of the recommendations.  I'm too naive to trust them.I should have researched more before making a purchase.  I don't like the cable at all, sooner it'll destroy either port--the cable or the TV
Do Not But This Phone. The caller i-d has no light.  The caller i-d requires batteries.  If you are on a call, and your call-waiting beeps, the phone does not tell you who's calling.  Don't waste a dime.  Not a dime.  Period
Garmin Rino 530 disappointment. To build upon the reviews as listed below, I will expand on them to say that even with the lastest firmware the issues till exist and Garmin cannot get it fixed.The hardware radio section is also pitiful and is out of deviation.But probably the worst part of it all is that after five total sets sent to me from customer service as well as 5 sets returned for various firmware and hardware issues.  Garmin cannot seem to get the quality control correct.Worse than that is a set that was supposedly CHECKED by a service tech and listed in the report as OPERATIONAL withing spec.  Out of the box was failing....that is terrible customer service and technical help.I love the idea of the Garmin 530 and would buy two more in a second * IF * they correct all the known bugs and issues with the product.  I do not belive they can and or will and Garmin appears to be in denial about this product.Stay away from this item until you hear that they have taken the bull by the horns and corrected this product
waste of money. Bought 4 ! They don't work. The batteries do not last. We are trying to return them
NETGEAR FAILS. MY WGX102 BEGAN TO FAIL ROUGHLY AROUND THE END OF THE ONE YEAR WARRANTY.  WHEN IT DID FINALLY FAIL DUE TO MANUFACTURING DEFECTS 33 DAYS AFTER THE WARRANTY HAD EXPIRED, NETGEAR WOULD NOT STAND BEHIND THEIR PRODUCT IN ANY WAY.  UNLESS YOU'RE INTO BUYING $100 DISPOSABLE NETWORKING GEAR, AVOID THIS PRODUCT
Not as advertised. I was excited to try this product for my DirecTV DVR connection without having to install another phone jack. Simply put, it didn't work. Then when I tried to use it for a regular phone (both cordless and corded), there was so much static that you couldn't have a conversation. I was very disappointed. It appeared, for me, this product was too good to be true
Unreliable; customer "service" a joke. Unreliable pile of 'you-know-what'.  Worked fine for about 2 months then refused to power up.  Fresh batteries, no go.  Called customer "service".  Outsourced call center to India; rep followed generic script telling me to: 1) use lithium-ion batteries, and 2) press "power + NAV" simultaneously.  As suspected, bogus advice.  Fresh batteries metered out to 1.62 volts each / 4.84 volts total.  Yes, I tried lithium-ion batteries anyway.  Still no-go.  Am still waiting for Magellan/Thales to respond.  Am still owner of unreliable GPS.  Still have about $400 invested in unit plus software and maps.  Still kicking myself for buying a Magellan product.  Don't do it.  Really -- don't do it
Great printer but unreliable. I bought this printer after my HP 2100TN started needing us to press the button on the printer every time we queued a print job. At first the 3052 seemed the answer to our needs. It was very easy to set up for our home office and kids machines. It printed and copied fast and sharp. That lasted for about 100 pages and then it started producing a huge white area down the middle of the page. Removing and shaking the cartridge would fix this for a a few pages and then that stopped working. Faced with a long and frustrating time on the phone with support I decided to just get a new cartridge. This did the trick for about 200 pages and then it started missing the whole center section of the page again. Shaking the cartridge fixes it temporarily. Of course, it always does it when we are in a panic with a customer proposal or homework due that day. I am using genuine HP cartridges which are $55 each. My advice is to look at the competition. Great idea but it doesn't print!
Wrong Picture Amazon!! UPDATE: AMAZON FIXED THE PROBLEM. Talk about misinforming your customers Amazon! The model in the picture is completely different and much better than what you are actually selling
WARNING!  UNABLE TO PAUSE LIVE RECORDING. I bought this item as a replacement for the GX300, which lost the ability to format discs (a common problem for this model). I was told by the Sony Rep. that the GX330 was identical to the GX300 except for some improvements. WRONG. Everything about the newer model is different, as in "worse." Even the menus were different. Several features that I liked on the older model were left out, such as a 3rd line input. But the real shocker - are you ready for this - THERE IS NO WAY TO PAUSE LIVE RECORDING. Unbelievable - but true. I'll be sending this one back
prepare to lose your music!. I have about 200 live concerts that I burned onto TDK discs about 3 years ago. None of them are playable now. Going forward, I will only use Mitsui Gold cds.
What was apple thinking?. At first I was excited about the mighty mouse. The scroll ball worked very well, freely scrolling in any direction. The side squeeze buttons were a bad idea, because they could activate by holding the mouse too tight, but they can be disabled easily. But the mighty mouse has a much more serious and annoying design problem....The scroll ball gets dirty, and there is no way to open the mouse and clean it! The scroll ball collects dirt over time just like the trackball in older mouse. But thanks to the brilliant engineers at apple, their is no way to open and clean the inside of the mouse without potentially braking it. After a while you will loose scroll functionality and have no reasonable way of fixing it. Within three months of use, I could scroll down but not up. The apple support people instructed me to clean it by repeatedly wiping the top of the mouse with a cloth. This only sort of cleaned it, the inside of the mouse was still dirty. The scroll ball only works on and off with this method, so cleaning it this way is clearly BS.I'm still struggling to understand apple's reasoning with making a mouse that you cannot open. Apple has made trackball mice for years, and each one let you open it to clean the inside when the ball got dirty. This is an essential feature. I don't understand why apple thinks a scroll ball on top of the mouse would not need to be periodically cleaned exactly the same way.If you are buying a new computer from apple, I suggest getting a regular two-button optical mouse to go with it
Design both very good and very bad. I wanted this product to work very badly.  It has an elegant, simple design, and finally a transmitter that makes use of the radio's RDS function.  It also is simple looking enough to discourage theft, since it appears to be a simple charger.The bad is very bad.  First, the sound quality was very bad in the northern California area.  This is both in dense and thinly populated areas.  There always seemed to be interference whenever there was a break in the music.  Second, the plug kept popping out of the cigarette lighter.  I've used other car adapters, and they always feel secure.  This plug was poorly designed.  I would be listening to great tunes when pop, I am interupted by loud, unpleasant static.I gave this 2 stars as opposed to zero, because there is a chance that the plug will work in your car and a chance that there will not be static in your area.  If that were the case, this adapter would be great.  Otherwise, this product fails in the simple areas that would make this remotely useful
Not Recommended. Not worth the cheap price.  Very cheap materials and I ended up just getting rid of it
Avoid at all costs. Do not by this product. It has several issues. Go to the forums on the Linksys website and see for yourself. Most people, myself included, have problems with the cable modem crashing and requiring a reset on a regular basis. This device also has firewall issues that cause problems with the Wii and Xbox360. It's SPI firewall component is at fault and can not be disabled without turning off the entire firewall. Even in the face of the number of users having problems Linksys has never released a firmware update and it doesn't appear that they will
Nah. You can get a 4 pack of Emerging Power 2100 mAH batteries for 9.95 on this very site.   I did.  They work great.  Why would anyone pay almost 30 bucks just for the batteries.  Ridiculous
Memory card error. My review mirrors of this product mirrors that of another customer posted recently.  For some months after I first bought the card, it worked great.  Now it has twice caused memroy card errors and corrupted data with my Canon Elph, and photo technicians have been unable to retrieve any of the pictures from the card.  Judging by what other customers have written, I'm suspecting that this may be an issue of poor compatibility between Canon cameras and Viking cards.  In any case, I will be buying a new memory card and it will certainly not be a Viking
Subwoofer has no power (literally). I have been very disappointed by these speakers. I have the series III ones. While the treble sounds fine, perfectly clear...this system has NO BASS! My husband recently bought a $35 set of 2 computer speakers and subwoofer and his setup sounds 10x better than mine!Because the subwoofer feeds power off the stereo/reciever it's hooked up to, and does NOT have its own direct power supply or amplifier, it literally lacks power. This subwoofer is the biggest joke ever! I can barely hear the bass on most things, even with the volume cranked up.Bose products are extremely overrated and overpriced. Do not waste your money -- buy something worthwhile (for a fraction of the price!), and make sure the subwoofer has its own amplifier/direct line to outlet
Not up to belkin's usual quality. I have used several Belkin KVM products (Omniport and Omniport SE) and was very happy with those units over many years. When I wanted a KVM to use with my new DVI video I thought this would be a good choice. Sadly it is close to a disaster on three levels:SETUP / ERGONOMICSSetting up the unit was hard because my Dell DVI video cable housing just barely fit into the input connector on the Belkin base unit. The Belkin cables are quite nice, but have the smallest "footprint" of any cables I've seen and many cables that come with comuters or LCD displays will have a hard time fitting this unit. The compact neature of the KVM means that connections are hard to see if you do not have a VERY well lit area.RELIABILITY:Next, the unit worked for one week and died. My first call to tech support was offensive as the Belkin rep wanted me to replace my USB keyboard to be sure that was not my problem. Since I did not have one, I could not get any return authorization. I did finally borrow a keyboard the next day, but when calling belkin again, the tech did not have me test the keyboard at all. His debugging was simple and in 5 minutes he verified that I had a defective KVM.I got a new unit quickly and returned the old one (but see more on this below). That unit worked for 10 days and then began to malfunction. So far, I have been able to restore it, but this is only possible by powering down all the peripherals, unplugging all the cables into the KVM, powering down the KVM and reversing the process.CUSTOMER SERVICE:To get your RMA # for defective equipment you have to provide Belkin with a charge card that they say they will only use if you fail to return the defective unit. I was careful enough to have my unit shipped with delivery confirmation because Belkin charged my account (for a tidy $234+, way more than the Amazon price). When I called customer service I was told they had no record of receiving my return. But when I gave them the tracking number of my shipment, the rep immediately said, "OK, that is all the documentation that we need, I will credit your account". She was so matter of fact that I believe this is a common occurence.SUMMARY:Some Belkin products are great - this in NOT one of them. Belkin service is inconsistent and this issue on returns is one that makes me plan on avoiding Belkin electronic components. I am going to look at the IOGear KVM sold by Amazon as a possible alternative
Well design, except for the notebook itself. The bag is very nice looking, nice material, everybody loves it.  Lots of compartments inside fit all accessories I need plus some documents.  But the top part (the zipper) is a BIG problem, it just has to get 200% in a way, while the notebook pocket doesn't provide any flexibility.  I just have to scratch my brand new notebook in and out, very frustrating.  (same as another review here).  My opinion, find another one, I'm gonna do it myself
poor compatibility. while the verbatim has burned well in 100% of my recordings they fail to operate in at least 24 different dvd players
DHCP stalls. I upgraded my home net with several pieces of Netgear hardware, including the FR114P router, the WG102 Wifi Access Point, and the FS108P, an 8-port switch with 4 Power Over Ethernet (POE) ports. The AP and the POE switch have been excellent choices. Not so with the router. Although it has features you don't find in a lot of consumer routers, like stateful packet inspection (SPI), logging, and email alerts, it just kept dropping connections to my home PCs for no apparent reason that I could find, and no support from Netgear. The DHCP server would seem to die, and all my home PCs would then lose their IPs and revert to private IPs (169.254.x.x). At that point my only recourse was to restart the router. After three weeks of this nonsense, I said to he** with it. I'm sending it back. The router I'm interested in now is the SMC Barricade Plus SMCBR14VPN.
It made it 1.5 years... So long... Well,we had liked this product for the 1.5 years that it worked.... We are sending it back under the replacement warranty that we purchased.  It now sounds like an old vehicle clunking down the road.  It was used relatively lightly for printing and fax in our small office.
P.O.S. I know that everyone else seems to love this, so perhaps my complaint is more about Apple in general. My Ipod Mini (pink)is a lemon. The battery has never worked properly. It takes longer to charge than to discharge, and my current playing time per charge (no changing settings, not backlighting, nothing but hitting play and waiting till the battery dies) is about 2 hours. Apple will gladly sell me a new ($70) battery, but other than that tough. It is apparently my fault thet they're selling shoddy products. I'm not saying don't buy it. There aren't realistically any better choices out there than the Ipod, but buy it when you have a week to sit around and evaluate it and when they get around to opening a store near you. As for me, I think I'm going to dig out my old discman
Great TV while it lasted. Beautiful tv for 31 days.  Samsung sets new standards for lousy customer service.  Initially they told me 7-14 days before someone would call to make an appointment to look at it.  It has been 17 days and the phone hasn't rung.  I live in a major metro area.  Dell, Apple and others set high standards and expectations for customer care.  Stay away from Samsung
Garbage. I knew better, but I did it anyway, thinking that it would be a good compromise (we have IBM, Dell, and Toshiba laptops and a Sony Really Nice Monitor).  No modem port (not a surprise, but would have been nice), the video display is, well, you can see stuff on the monitor.  One of the USB ports isn't reliable.  I could go on, but you get the picture.  Don't bother
Not so great for tracheostomy use. This Vicks ultrasonic humidifier was thoroughly recommended by everyone when we needed a humidifer with the possible hose attachment that goes to a mask around my dad's new tracheostomy.  Problem is, it puts out TOO much mist even at the lowest setting!  We've tried everything including taping the hole, but it then goes from 'all' to 'nothing' because the small hole desired quickly coalesces water preventing steam from passing through. Of course it wasn't until we started mentioning it to the various RN's that come to take care of my dad that 'everyone' using it for the same purpose complains of the same excessive mist problem.  So... I've resorted to making large hole cuts in the plastic tubing leading up to my dad's mask.  Not a great way to do it (and just asking to be seeded by bacteria), but if anyone has a better suggestion, I'm all for it, even if it means suggesting a different humidifier..
Bad labeling. ad made it look like a charger that works in a car!I am furious if I want to return , there is a feeWHAT A JOKE
GET AN IPOD INSTEAD!. This gadget worked fine for exactly one year and 6 months. It was used nearly everyday until the on button stopped working. Unfortunately the warranty is only for one year. I bought this when the price was inflated. It should not cost more than 75 bucks for a year and a half of service! if you want a positive review read some of the others
Poor product, bad since purchase and no customer service. This product is not recomendable in no way, there is no way to return it without aditional charges. It's bad to begin with. Sent back since DEC and there is no way to track it!!! I could bet on the 30 day return is going to pop up. If a policy such as this exists, this product should no be part of amazon's list, it only creates insatisfied customers for "penny" cash.
Beware. I have an Infiniti G35 coupe and have been using a standard cassette adapter just fine.  Based on this, I felt that the SmartDeck would be a great upgrade.  However, it would not work at all! No sound, no skipping tracks, nothing.  It just switches fron side A to side B and then ejects. The price was great but you may have to return it. Be Prepared
Fatally Flawed - problem with controller causes lockups. An excellent idea, with a fatally flawed implementation.  It appears to be a limitation of the midi controller - drums will fail to sound intermittantly.&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;An except from my (so far unanswered) request for support from Ion-Audio.com:&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;I have found a problem with my new Ion IED05 Electronic Drum Set - the drums appear to conflict, perhaps in the MIDI interface, perhaps within the Alesis controller. &#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;When playing the drums, a pad will fail to sound intermittantly (and occasionally, the whole system will mute momentarily).&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;I hope this isn't the first you've heard of this issue, and that a fix is available.&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;Of course, I've checked the connections, checked to be sure I'm hitting the pads squarely and in the center, tried swapping pads (though the issue affects all of them, not just the snare), etc.  &#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;If fact, I can often reproduce the problem by simply, repeatedly striking any two pads together, one a split-second after the other.  When it happens, the second appears to mute the first, before the first fully produces a tone.&#60;br /&#62;________________________&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;Until/unless this issue's resolved, you'll find the set a cause of repeated frustration, whether for learning, practice or performance
Retracts well, looks cheesy, sounds average. They don't look as nice as the photo, they look rather cheesy. Retraction mechanism works reasonably well if you're careful with it. Sound quality is average. I'm keeping mine as a backup set only
Once you put it on, you better leave it there!. To echo one of the other reviewers, exact placement of the wrist rest is near impossible.  Two days after I thought I had done it perfectly, a bubble appeared.  I tried pressing it out, but within a matter of hours the bubble back.  So, I decided to remove the wrist rest. To my disgust, the adhesive had (in the space of a few days!) begin to cling tighter to my laptop than the pad.  It took me about hour to get the last of the gummy adhesive off.Avoid the wrist rest
disappointed. i brought this at the same time i got my ipod mini. the latter's great!the case smells very bad. a chemical smell. very strong.also, the part that  covers the screen's scratched.im not returning it because i dont have time. if idid, i definitely would.like people already mentioned, it does also bulk to the ipod and wont fit into the belt clip, the screen part does attracts lints, making the screen not as clease as it can be without the case
Piece of crap. Like most of the other people who bought this piece of junk it quit working after a few months. You put a disk in and there is a loud noise and a bunch of colors jumping across the screen and everything is frozen. I will be throwing it in the trash and buying a reputable brand
Great picture but that's about it. I purchased this card because I have on another computer the AIW9700 Pro. The 9700 Pro card has been a great card and I thought the 650 would be also. Well, the TV picture is great once you get the card working. The catalyst software to record programs is worthless. I cannot get it to connect with Titan. Tech support is also worthless. I have been using the Gemstar software from the 9700 Pro to see what TV guide programs are playing. I can record programs while I am at the computer but there is no VCR type functionality to record while I am away. I am extremely disappointed with ATI/AMD that they would sell a product that does not work fully and at the same time not support it properly. I hope they are not naive enough to think they will get repeat business with this kind of customer service
Decent phone - power outage also took out base unit. The material and ergonomics of this phone is average.  The selling point of this phone for me is its ability to connect up to 10 handsets using one phone line.  Below are the factors that I considered before purchasing and my experience:Range:  The range of the phone is very good.  I can be 80-100 feet away from the base unit and the call signal will stay constant and not drop.Call Quality:  Average.  I have a Plantronics CS50 wireless headset that is on the 900 Mhz frequency connected to a corded base unit.  The call quality on the wireless headset is crystal clear.  When I have switched during mid-conversation from the handset to headset, or vice-versa, callers have noted a significant difference in the clarity of the call.  The Uniden is much more muffled and less clear.  It is however comparable to most cordless phone.  Not exceptional, but not bad.Durability:  Average.  I have dropped my handsets on rare occasions, they survived the drops onto the carpet quite well.  One of the handset did drop onto my hardwood floor, which cracked the screen but the force was not significant and it didn't scratch the hardwood floor.Special Note:  I suffered a power outage during a major windstorm.  The base unit will not boot up.  This appears to have happened to other reviewers.  This problem appears to have afflicted only this piece of electronic in my whole house.  On this issue, I have to drop my rating from 3 stars to 2 stars
Compatibility Issues. Cosmetically pleasing is about the only good thing you can say about this unit.  The included software does contain viruses.  The included software is a reminate of the late 80's to early 90's.  The tablet itself does not work under Win2000 nor WinXP.  Under 98 second edition it stops responding quite frequetly and you have to unplug and plug the unit back in to get it to respond again.  This unit would be great, if it came out 7 years ago.  You get what you pay for
Don't buy this remote.... I will make this review very simple.  No matter what features you find attractive about this remote, its shear size makes the thing clunky and unuseable.  Unless you have large hands, you will have trouble accessing all the buttons without 2 handing it. (make sure you go to a retail store and hold it first before you buy it)In terms of features, the remote has only the simplest of "learning" features.  If you want a custom interface for a piece of hardware it doesn't have a code for.... good luck
A WARNING - DO NOT USE. I had no problems burning to these discs, its when I went back a few months later to these discs and found out that none of them work anymore. After further research I found out that Memorex uses the cheapest dye available and thus the DVDs have absolutelly no life to them, my discs started dying after a few months.In addition, in you physically hold the disc in your hands you can feel how warped physically it has become. This is true for all the discs (about 150 of them). I CAN NOT NOT RECOMMEND THIS PRODUCT STRONLY ENOUGH!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I was hoping for more... While I have always followed the age-old adage of "You Get What You Pay For," I have to say that I was hoping for more, even in this price range. While I am no stranger to assembling furniture such as this, my cabinet had several pieces that just didn't quite line up and, consequently, caused me to re-drill a few holes.Additionally, while the black veneer is of the quality that one would expect in this range, it was already separating from one of the corners after only a week of ownership. Nothing a little wood glue didn't fix, but it's still a disappointment.Lastly, the cabinet is very wide but has a very shallow depth, causing it to be fairly unbalanced if you aren't careful about where you place your media. I initially loaded the cabinet at the top and left the bottom empty. It tipped over forward, spilling the contents and creating quite a mess. I shudder to think of the consequences if it had fallen on a child or a pet..
Not Very Durable. Will need battery changes. I have owned five of these UPS units over the past four years. I purchased three for my Mac and PC at home. Then I had to purchase two replacements for units that simply quit. Currently only ONE still works! I have very infrequent power outages, perhaps three in the past four years. These units work well to allow you to save your work and shut down. My G5 mac was so power hungry that I had to use one for the computer and another for the 23 inch LCD.  I can't comment on other UPS brands such as Belkin,  but I have seen many competing brands on the web and at the computer stores. There seen to be quite a few dealers selling refurbished APC products but this may be a reflection of APC's popularity rather than the poor reliability of their brand. My experience over the past four years has been mixed. These are not inexpensive units and you have to decide how precious your data becomes. If you really fear the loss of data during a blackout then the answer is clear. I chose to switch to high quality surge suppressors and never work during potential storms. Many users do not have that flexibility so a UPS is essential insurance. The units I puchased were identical and only one unit is still operational after four years. I can accept the need to replace the battery every one to two years; three of the batteries failed and alarms beeped until I bought new batteries. Prices vary from $15 to $50 depending on the vendor. Battery life depends on many factors so I don't begrudge APC for wear and tear on the battery but to have 4 out of 5 units simply stop working is unacceptable. I bought APC branded batteries and can't explain why the recurrent failures. I'm frustated with my APC products but it may be a problem with this model. Just beware of the hidden costs of battery replacement when purchasing an UPS
Problems Problems Problems. This is a great idea: a small CD player to match the rest of the Tivoli line. Unfortunately, the quality of the units I tried came nowhere near the quality of the rest of the Tivoli line. All in all, Tivoli sent me four of these units and each had problems: one wouldn't play the disc, one wouldn't eject the disc, one had an LED readout that would go blank, and one had variations on all of these problems. The Model One is a great product and the PAL and the others are close behind, but the Model CD needs a lot more work
Wouldn't work on my computer. The hook up and downloading the software was very simple.  There was a error problem with the drivers.  My computer is fairly new with windows xp.  I called there support and was told to try it on another computer. I install it on my neighbors computer and the same happened. I sent it back to Amazon and credit my account, and bought an other brand.  Amazon is so great about handling returns.
Not a fan of these defective fans. These work great initially...I bought six of them. Of the six, four broke. One stopped altogether, one stopped oscillating, and the other 2 would only work on 1 speed. I bought them in May and they broke after 2, 3, and 4 months, respectively. They are expensive fans, and I was extremely disappointed in their lack of durability. They were used at night by adults and were not moved around at all.  I have had a floor fan for 15 years and it still works without a hitch. These are cheaply put together and your money would be better spent on a fan with a better warranty (this is 1 year)and higher quality components.
Weightlifters beware..... I was pretty disappointed with the Tune Belt because of two main reasons.  First, I had to take my Shuffle out of the protective rubber case that I usually keep it in so that it would fit inside the Tune Belt.  That wasn't such a big deal since it is somewhat protected inside the neoprene sleeve.  But then I went to wear it for a run, and the arm-band was too small for my arm!  I have fairly developed biceps from years of weight training, but nothing outrageous.  I would have thought that with a velcro strap there would have been enough range to accommodate most users.  This is unfortunately not the case.  So if you have larger than average biceps (say 17" amd up), save your money...
disappointed. I have this system for about 3 weeks and today remote control stopped working.
Poor Sound Quality. I needed a new headset to use with Ventrillo, online voice chat for gaming, and I needed two requirements: 1. must go through the USB port because my mic port is broken, and 2. must be wireless because I constantly trip over the wire on my Logitech headset when making quick trips from the computer to the kitchen... which is why my Logitech headset broke in the first place.This Microsoft headset fits both requirements, so I bought it. Unfortunately, the sound quality is HORRIBLE. It sounds like you are talking over the phone, like someone calling in to a radio show. It is NOT crystal-clear sound at all. My guild mates on Ventrillo laughed at me so much that I put this headset aside and slapped my Logitech headset together with masking tape
Bad design.....flimsy toggles.......JUNK. Notice, all the happy....five star ratings, are from people that JUST bought this MP3. I have had mine for 9 months.I have had this MP3 since Christmas 2005. I bought the white 512 for my son at the same time. Whith in 3 weeks, my son's was no longer working at all, he had it in his back pack, and some how it got crunched enough to never work again!! I was not happy. Also in a few months, mine started to have issues. The very "tiny" menu button is rediculous. And the main toggle was a complete failure for Sony. I accually removed the cover to the toggle, and just moved the joy stick under it, to change songs, or volume. How stupid. I am so mad about this MP3 player. I am going to buy a Creative V. I have done a lot of research this time, and I will not buy another Sony. The hold button, that is part of this sliding door never works, I find the player dead in my gym bag, all the time!!! Apparently, the door slides over a bit, and the player will turn on, FOR HOURS, and than you have a dead player. Maybe Sony should have given us a on/off button, than this would not happen! Dont do it folks, look into other options, even my mom's iPod Nano is better designed than this joke of an MP3 player.
Didn't last long. What a waste of money. Try buying something else. This lasted me only a couple of months
Good Player with Bad Battery Life!!!. I bough this product after reading several reviews from other people .Pros : Toshiba Gigabeat is really nice from the design perspective , the look and feel is pleasant. The software is well designed and pretty intutive . Though it doesn't have the click wheel like iPod , but I didnt find any problem using it and going through the various menus. They are all well designed and are visually much more better than the i-pod or other similar players. It takes some time to get use to the buttons and other controls , but once you get accustomed then its a zip .Cons : I returned this player after one week , because the biggest killer to it is the battery life, it hardly lasts for 6 hours. You cant expect a mp3 player to last just 6 hour. If I am outta my house , I should be able to play it for at least 12 hours...thats the only problem which i find with this, which undid all its goodness.Overall a good player , if you can live with a short battery life
Don't buy. I got this CD player because I thought sony was a good company, plus I liked the look of it. But after just 5 months after purchase, and not even using it that often, it has already broken. I paid about 40 dollars for this CD player, so I am very disappointed. If I were you, I would buy a different CD player
Disappointed. This may be a good SD, don't know because the company would not allow shipment to Hawaii.  Therefore ordered the Viking SD and it has been a very good SD
Misrepresented product. I was dissappointed to see that when I got the product there were old worn out batteries inside and I then had to go out and purchase an adapter and spend MORE money.  The keyboard works fine now but that was unacceptable for me to have had to do that.  I was very surprised by this from Amazon since I have had such good experiences so far
converter first, adapter only if you need it. I visited Ireland from the U.S. and my hair dryer sparked when I used the adapter and fried both of them. Also I had a convertor for my iPod, but was unable then to use the adapter. The USB charger never worked. Oh well, live and learn.
Problems with 2 units. The reviews for this product are excellent and I was so excited to upgrade to HDMI switching.  The first unit received had a loud hum in the audio and HDMI from my new Sony player through this unit created an extreme blue cast on the video.  I returned the unit and another was sent to me.  This unit had no hum in the audio but the blue cast was still there when using HDMI from the Sony DVD player.  It was not the DVD player because when I hooked the HDMI from the DVD player directly to my TV everything was perfect.  I am very disappointed in this unit.  As for Amazon, they have been great in responding to my problems, getting a replacement unit to me and then refunding my purchase.  I give Amazon 5 stars
Watch your back!. ***WARNING***This product is not for users with nForce Chipsets.  I see users complaining that this product hangs and the keyboard acts up.  You have an nForce chipset on your motherboard.  If you are a fan of AMD and use their processors (hence a likely nForce chipset), stay away from this product, because IT WILL NOT WORK RIGHT!Aside from having to install a separate USB card to get it to work (which I cannot do for my laptop) it has performed quite well.  I read many reviews about the audio quality, and I tend to agree.  The audio will clip if I turn my PC volume up over the halfway mark.  This is easily resolved by keeping the volume low and turning your powered speakers up.I would hesitate to buy another IOGear product in the future (without extensive compatability research before hand)
Below expectations for a Samsung. Application is dual input from cable TV input and analog PC input, used as side monitor on a triple screen home computer workstation.1) Audio output stops intermittently a few times a week, requiring power off/on to regain audio.2) There appears to be no way to disable unused source modes.  To switch from computer input to TV input requires one push of the Source button...... but then to return to computer input requires 4 button pushes - as the TV cycles thru AV, S-Video, Component modes, and finally back to PC mode.  A weak design - the unit should recognize which input is enabled - it is not possible to hook up all 5 modes.This is particularly irritating as this model was marketed as a TV/PC monitor.Picture quality is acceptable for the application, which is primarily watching news channels while working at PC, or displaying dual PC applications
didn't seem to last all that long. brought two 4-packs of these on vacation, had them run out on me faster than it seemed they should. do not seem better than energizer nor duracell. I bought some lithium energizers to use for my next trip. I was using them in a canon digital camera which works with normal alk batteries. bought these as a "get to $25" fill in purchase at amazon
Beware!. I bought my i3 in Europe and enjoyed it very much until time came to upgrade it.  The upgrade that I bought and paid $75 for will not work with my unit, even though the people at Garmin say it will.  I am being bounced back and forth between tech support in Europe and North America.  To add insult to injury, the last rep that I talked to in America was very rude.  This purchase was not worth the hassle and the ripoff that ensued
This is not a Shure approved reseller - no warranty!. Had a small problem with my headset. Sent it to Shure to get it replaced and Shure called me to tell me that this was not a Shure-approved reseller, and that they won't honor the warranty because of that. Be warned
Wire broke - Good customer service. I gave this as a gift to my in-laws. I was so embarrassed, the wire broke the very first time it was used. But ... after I posted the review the company emailed me and promised to replace any faulty parts. They seem very determined to stand behind the quality of their product. I will update this review when the replacement parts arrive
Easy but ports wear out too quickly. I work at a company that has had a many as 10 of these installed at once.  The problems were few at first, but over time you had to turn it off and back on to get it to start printing.  Eventually, the ethernet port seemed to wear out.  You had to "jiggle" the cat-5 cord to get the link light to turn on.  The software is great, but the device itself is poor quality.  We have begun phasing these PS101's out at our company and only have 2 left
The Worst!!!. My purchase of Bose In-Ear Headphones was the biggest waste of $100 since I was in Vegas!! While the quality of the sound may be good, the stupid rubber ear buds are worthless.  They will not, I repeat not, stay connected to the actual headphone. You get three sizes, the largest would perhaps work for Shriek, the smallest for Alfred E. Neuman. After them falling off for the umph-teen time, I superglued them on to the headphone. And, sure enough, after a couple of days of in and out of my pocket, they too fell off!  Whoever designed these probably drives a Ford Pinto. One star is much, much too generous for this product. Save you money
DON'T BUY THIS UNLESS YOU HAVE WARRANTY. I liked the iAUdio but 8 months after buying it, it no longer plays in stereo and the voice record d/n work.COWON'S WEBSITE IS THE WORST CUSTOMER SERVICE I'VE EVER EXPERIENCED IN MY LIFE! You can't submit a question unless you log in but they won't let you log in because every e-mail address you type in they say "already used" which is an error because I used addresses that were brand new. Cowon is too cheap to provide the support needed for their products. I would never buy from them again
Warning-Did not work in my Burner. I tried 3 of these DVD+Rs, none of them worked, errors in every burn. I used another brand to burn the session and it worked perfectly, so it is definately a problem with these DVD+Rs and not with my burner
Make sure you are not buying these for DVDs. I bought these to make labels for my DVDs as when I received them there is a warning on the back that if you use them on DVDs they may make the DVD unreadable.  These are only to be used on CDs.  Memorex makes specific labels that are plasic for DVDs and do not warp when exposed to the heat of a DVD player.  2 stars because the packaging is misleading
There is no Chess game. I bought this card only and only for Chess game and there is none on it.
Nuulooq, not so hot. I bought this item with great expectations but was disappointed enough to return it today.  One big caveat on performance however, I am running an older 800 single processor Mac G4, which, although I use it in a professional graphics capacity every day (Photoshop), is a bit pokey by todays standards. After downloading Tiger 10.4.6 which is required for the tooldail app. I got the thing going. This is what I found  1)  Evan after setting all the Tooldial prefs to the fastest speed I got slow and jerky navigation w/ the nav ring... Overshooting the area I wanted to see because of a delayed response.  Also, to pan upwards on the page requires reaching over the top of this 2 inch tall device to press (with a firm pressure), on the far side of the ring, which requires a repositioning of the entire hand.  Poor ergonomiics in my opinion, seems like they went for a sexy look/concept instead.  2) An Ipod type dialing motion is fine on an Ipod,  but on this device took many rapid circles on top of the tooldial to effect much change in Brush size etc. and seemed much less sensitive and intuitive than a rub strip on a music synthisizer or a waacom pressure pad.  3)  The trigger points funtion, but require surprisingly  heavy pressure to operate,  at least 6 to 7 times the pressure of a mouse click. This kind of treatment 8 Hours a day would send my aging wrists to the glue factory within a week....  There may be a device out there that will someday "revolutionize my workflow", but this isnt it, Back it goes...
VERY SHORT RANGE ON KX-TG5500 SERIES PHONES. I purchased the Panasonic KX-TG5571M to replace a 8 year old Sony 900MHZ phone.  The Sony would allow me to go about 400 feet from the base before the signal became unusable.  The new Panasonic has a usable range on the order of 60 feet.  I have a one story, 20 year old, 3000 Sq. Ft, brick home.  Relocating the phone did not help.I returned the phone for credit and bought a Panasonic KX-TG5583, which is the same phone but with three color handsets, thinking the first unit may have been bad.  NOT THE CASE.  The replacement is just as poor in range.All the other features of the phone are good and work as advertised.If range is a concern for you, you would do well to look at some other system
DID NOT WORK!  (DEFECTIVE)  Return PAINFUL!. Have owned several WD external drives with no problems this one would not work...on the PC on the MAC etc.The package arrived quick enough...The internal packing list is so sanitized you dont know who or where to return the item to. The return is AGONIZING! came from BEACH Audio ...AVIOD THESE GUYS! Getting a return authorization number is a nightmare!@ Multiple e-mails and calls to them...ugggghhhhhh!Much better off getting from the MAC store! BUYER BEWARE!I totally expect NOT to get my refund!
Not for iPod with Video. The new iPods do not have the connections to work with FireWire. So this cable will only charge the new iPods with video. Besides this this is a good product for the iPods
Save your receipt. I own a Brother HL-1240, so of course I have to use this toner cartridge. But if I had a choice, I'd try someone else's. The problem is always the same. After a few months of great printing (and, BTW, I print maybe a couple dozen sheets a week, if that), a vertical line develops down the left side of every page about three-quarters of an inch from the paper's edge. Don't bother with tech support. They'll tell you to clean the corona wire and drum, which I did a million times to no avail. Eventually I gave up, went out and purchased another cartridge, and voil, problem solved -- for another couple of months anyway. And then you have to trash the old cartridge which, as you'll be able to tell from shaking it, still has a heavy load of toner left in it. Great little printer; lousy little cartridges. Suppose that's how they make their money, though
Poor Quality. Product was missing AC adapter...couldn't even plug it in. After hassling with it and trying to rummage around to find an AC adapter to work with it, I gave up and packaged it up and returned it. Instructions and documentation are horrible. Would not recommend this product
Garbage. If I had three arms, maybe four, this would have been easy to put up.  As I have only two, it was a nightmare.  Each section warps as the screws are tightened, so getting each subsequent section level and nested neatly inside the previously mounted section is very difficult.On second thought, even if I had more arms than a Hindu deity, I would still dislike this product.  The inside of the channel has ledges in it to hold the screws in place.   These ledges catch on cables which the user adds or removes after the unit is mounted.  I gave up on trying to remove an RCA cable from the unit and just cut the darned thing, rather than trying to feed it through the channel.I wish I could recommend a better wall-mounted cable management unit.  If I find one, I'll amend this review to include it.Save your money; buy something else
not pleased at all. i bought these phones..... very expensive to start with, but i was willing to pay because quality usually is something you have to pay for. they worked well at first. it took about 8 months to really have a problem with them, but when it rained it poured. i have sent back 2 out of 3 phones that i got and with the replacements they sent me  3 dont work out of the 3. uniden is replacing my entire set because they are under warranty but i shouldnt have to send back 2 out of 3 in under a year. lets see, the one is totally not usable. doesnt turn on , different batteries dont fix the problem...completely useless. the other one, the battery dies after literally 3 minutes of talking , and the third just shuts off in the middle of a conversation with no warning, then flashes on and off. like i said, i contacted uniden through email and i am getting replacements. maybe i just got a bad set. until they broke i liked them a lot. but i dont think id recommend them after having all the problems i did.
Not for the non-geek user!. Without a doubt, the Pepper Pad has potential but it isn't really ready for prime time.  It is nicely made and priced well below many of the other ultra portable laptops and UMPCs.  Unfortunately, the manufacturer still has a significant # of issues to work out before the Pepper Pad 3 rises to the user friendly level it must be at to garner the mass market. [...]There are a # of software glitches that are also causing user irritation that may or may not be addressed in upcoming software updates.  If you are not familiar with Linux and enjoy the user friendliness of Windows, there is a relatively steep learning curve.  Linux devotees, however, love this product.  They enjoy tearing into the software and souping up their pads.  You can not print or use "office-type" applications with this.  In conclusion, if you are fluent in Linux, don't need to print or use office type applications and are fortunate enough to get a pad devoid of the touch screen problems and with the needed software updates, the Pepper Pad 3 may be for you
Poor re-winder. This re-winder does not re-wind the tapes all the way and is very noisy
A sheep in wolfs clothing. Yes, this monitor has all the big tech numbers, whatever they mean. To me, that doesn't mean squat when it's not pleasing to the eye. The colors on the screen are not consistent; it's brighter on the bottom then on the top. If you look at it while moving your head up and down, you'll see it change. That's why you get a difference when you're looking at it straight on. The new, cheaper TN panels they're using have a different viewing angle than previous ones. A lot of the monitors the electronics stores sell are of this type. The display models are deceiving, because they run a video loop  that makes the picture look beautiful. But, when you get it home and start running your apps on it, that's when you start seeing the flaws. Also, this model has an annoying blinking, blue light when it's in sleep mode.
Horrbile quality!. This cheap piece of plastic broke within 2 months of me owning it!! Buyer beware!
Very buggy product. I bought and returned this after using Navigator 2,3,4, & 5.  The problem seems to be TomTom has pressed some defective DVDs.  I was unable to install the North America map or activate the Alaska, Guam, Hawaii, and Puerto Rico maps.TomTom support could not provide a reason as the states and regions installed without problem.  There also seems to be two continental maps, a 0.9gb less detailed US and Canada map, and more detailed 1.3gb North America map with more POIs and richer map features.  I think the US & Canada map was stripped down so it would fit on the pre-installed SD cards they are selling.  It didn't seem to me that TomTom support had a clue as to what was supposed to be on the DVD.Maybe TomTom will straighten this out but I would sure avoid Navigator 6 for now.  TomTom is a great product until you have a problem.  Then you are on your own
Dead after a few months. As with some of the other reviewers, mine stopped working and blew the fuse in my car for the cigarette lighter.  I bought a Vector brand inverter at Wal-Mart and it is much better
JUNK!. This is an extremely cheap product (poor grade of plastic) and sound quality is...for the lack of a better word...gross! The earbuds that came with my ipod are 10 times better! It's on it's way back! STAY AWAY
SanDisk Cruzer Mini 2 GB USB Flash Drive Review. It would not download; it just stopped about 1/4 the way through.  I will have to send it back
Product does not fit DVD outer title inserts. I returned this product as it does not accommodate the outer title insert - only the inner page.  Product recommended for customers who do not wish to keep the outer slipcase cover page
Extremely disappointing after having used the real EB. Being an enthusiast of the EB, and already owning a softwareversion and an old paper edition, I was very thrilled by thepossibility of having access to the EB on my pda as well. Nomore would I be left musing about a strange place nameon a book read in the cafe, or wondering what the currency ofa country might be called... It was a disappointment, then,to find that the "Concise" in the name of the product is aneuphemism for grossly abbreviated; many articles do little morethan state the obvious about their topic. Moreover, one wonderswhy this needs to be the case, as current SD cards have becomecheap and have enough capacity to contain a lot more text. Isit the desperate need for claiming 900 "illustrations"
Garbage - Complete waste of money. I bought two of these and NEITHER of them holds a charge for more than a few hours EVEN WHEN NOT USED. DEFINITELY stick to the OEM batteries.
Not reliable. The only good thing about this product is its price (I saw it being sold at $160 on some other site). There are several shortcomings though:- The greatest drawback is the complexity of the menu. There is no 'home location'. Also there are only two navigation options available - shortest time & shortest distance. So if you are caught in a traffic jam for example, there is no 'detour' function. Also, you cannot see the next few turns when you are navigating. Hence you cannot plan if you immediately need to turn right after a left or vice versa.- The maps are probably very old. I used this device in NJ, VA & MN. In every state, I faced problems multiple times, when the unit did not know that the road bifurcated ahead & it would not tell me to keep on left/right, or it would ask me take turns when there were none.- The unit was very slow in calculating routes (I dont know how the Sirf Star III chip helps). Also it would freeze often & I would need to reset it at critical junctions.- The viaMichellin website is only dedicated to Europe. When I went to register my product, I had to register it in viaMichellin UK, since there was no option for US! I dont think they have any support for the US models.- The POIs are very less compared to other competitors within the same price range.I returned this product after trying to make it work for 2 months. It was great on part of Amazon to accept it even after expiration of return policy (although they deducted 20% restocking fee).
bimbo electronics!. About the only thing Bose has going for it is pretty packaging...the sound, build, and electronic quality is mediocre at best given its outrageous price point.My sister refused my advice and bought this system.  Then I bought her a cheapo JBL powered sub and cheapo JBL satellites which cost about the same...and she was stunned!  I just felt bad for Best Buy, they had to absorb the loss
Stopped working after an year. Bought this from amazon.  Worked well for compact flash cards.  Always complained that i should format the card whenever i used multimedia card (from kodak camera).  so i was never able to use it to transfer pictures from a kodak camera.  And all of a sudden, it died on me.  Had to throw it out
San Disk 6 in 1 PC Card Adapter. Initially I liked and enjoyed the adapter. It allowed me to us a digital card to listen to music in the car. However, it no longer works and I will be exchanging it
So - So. This charger does not seem to charge the batteries fully. I thought that my rechargable batteries were "out of life", but discovered that it was just a case of this charger failing to recharge them fully. My Daughter brought home a cheap Sakar overnight charger when visiting. I popped in a set of batteries I thought were done for, and found them to be just fine using her Sakar charger. What happens on my charger is that the lights (indicating that the batteries have been fully charged) all go off, and the batteries are "cool to the touch" (indicating that they have been fully recharged). Nope! Only about half way recharged
Not practicable in Windows  XP in non Administrator accounts. Like most device drivers the Turtle Beach specific driver needs to be installed with Administrative rights. Nothing unusual.However, when a Non Administrator logs on (as is good security practice) the driver says is needs to be reinstalled, which is not possible without Administrator rights. Catch-22.Not usable for me as I don't use the Administrator account except for special purposes, a security "best practice". Without the Turtle Beach specific driver it works as a generic USB sound card with the default Microsoft driver(no reinstallation required!). No special sound effects then, so not worth the extra price premium over a generic USB sound card.Too bad the poor software implementation ruined a good piece of hardware, as when it works it sounds great
AWFUL!!!. You'd think that because these phones have a higher GHz, that the sound would be of decent quality...NOT!  These phones have bad static and when I am on the phone, I am questioned about where I am!  Ridiculous!  The Uniden 2.4 GHz is a wonderufl phone compared to this one, never had any problems of the 3 years I had them, however after then, they just went dead on me, I had the expandable ones (2.4) and only one just stopped working.  So I would go with the 2.4 before I went with the 5.8.  Awful quality and sound!!! Do not waste your money
Not as Expected. Range is very weak probably less than half a mile. Don't waste your money
Big Waste Of Money!. I was so excited to get Nav/DVD in our new SUV.  However, I hate this unit!  You can't watch DVDs unless the car is in park.  The whole point was for me to watch movies in the passenger seat while my husband drove.Also, you have to put in a Navigation CD everytime you want to look for a new address.  This means you have to remove your DVD or music CD and put in this special disc.  You then have to be in park to put your DVD back in and start it again (we have screens on the headrests).The worst part is you can't use any features of the Nav system while you are driving!  I have to pull over to enter an address or find a point of interest.  While my husband drove, I figured I'd be able to use these functions.It is not user friendly.  We have read the manual and still cannot accomplish tasks such as programming the radio stations!I regret this purchase immensely.  I do not recommend this system to anyone unless you are willing to put the car in park ever time you want to use any of its functions
missing part. when I received my cobra nav system the cord to use it was missing and I have had to call three times and still nhave not received the cord.  I contacted Cobra, but I think it came from Target.co
This is REALLY  worthless!!. Rarely do I write a review but this product is so bad I had to.  Expecting Sony electronics to perform well, what a disappointment, this one is a bummer.  Save your money.  There has got to a better under cabinet radio out there.  While the concept is good and the design sleek; don't be fooled by the packaging.  Nothing works well.  FM reception is poor, sound is terrible, controls are not intuitive.  To top it all off a year after purchase (yep, the warrantee just expired) the CD player decided to only play the first track of any CD inserted.  Forget listening to the rest of it.  This product is really ZERO stars.  I've tossed the whole works in the garbage
Junk. Bought this, CD player worked a couple of times over the last couple of months, now doesn't work. Cheap junk. If you only want a radio, it tunes o.k. The 90 Day warranty is a sham. They know it will last 100 days
It works, but sound quality is not good. Other than the power switch is not easy to see, the most issue with this microphone is the sound quality  not that good.  Use this microphone to record music for sure will disappoint you.  Even using it for church meeting recording, you would not get excited for its sound quality.If you can tolerate the size of Sony ECM-MS907, you may like the sound quality of that microphone. If you like a small lapel microphone with true voice, try the AKG WMS-40 wireless system.  Our people are much happier with the AKG wireless microphone than this one.
Dissapointing. I bought these to replace a pair of sony fontopias I had. I loved the sonys but was trying to save some money and most of the reviews seemed favorable. While they are ok earphones I was dissapointed with the sound range and quality. They really dont block out much ambient noise and the fit is not very comfortable. For 20.00 they work but I wouldnt order them again
Thanks to AMAZON!  No thanks to COBY. This player has garnered decent reviews, so I thought I'd try it.  The first unit sent to me was unusable because of skipping.  I had purchased the extended warranty -- but Amazon's extended warranty defers to COBY's warranty for the first year, so you have to deal with COBY directly.  I found that one could hardly ever get through to Coby, and when I did, they had to consult and call me back, so I ended up having to try to get through three different times, only to be told I'd have to PAY TO SHIP THE BAD UNIT BACK TO THEM -- which would cost almost as much as the unit.  THANK GOODNESS FOR AMAZON.  When I called to express my discontent, the Amazon customer relations staffer quicly and easily sent me another unit.  THANK YOU.  Because the second one works without skipping.  It sounds okay, it does the basics.  There is no "resume play" function, however, which is annoying.
Great idea, but lacks follow-through. The GPS works great!  Having said that, I'm disappointed with the 5919 overall.  I could not get the free map updates from TomTom because HP does not include the Navigator 6 product code with the 5915.  HP's support promised they'd get the maps and post them for 5915 users, but that hasn't happened after several months of promises.  The wireless worked only with non-encrypted networks, and even then, only for 1 day.  I have to perform a soft-reset at least three times a day because the system hangs.  MP3s play fine.  It will play video, albeit they are very choppy.  USB connections to the computer seem to work only after loading the very latest MS ActiveSync, and only after a soft-reset.  Even then, having the computer recognize the device is very "iffy".The unit is a great idea if you travel--maps, email, Internet, music, contacts, appointments, etc., but if it doesn't work, it becomes a paperweight.  I've read dozens of forums with others complaining of the same issues.  HP support so far has been nothing but lip service.  My recommendation--don't fall for the marketing hype, this unit still has to have a lot of bugs worked out
Fuzzy sound poor quality. When speaking or listening, sound becomes distorted and fuzzy.  It is annoying to try to converse
Save Up -- You can do much better. The previous comments about these headphones being "distance-sounding" are right on the mark.  They have very little soundstage, and the mid-range sounded muddy to me.  Bass is decent, and they have treble, but do yourself a big favor.  Save up some more money and go for the Sennheiser HD-555's.  For about $150 you'll be getting a killer set of cans with great soundstage.  If you get a chance to A/B the difference between the HD-485's and HD-555's you will not be able to buy the 485's.  The HD-555 are very close in sound to Sennheiser's primo HD-595's, but cost $100 less than the 595's.  Go for the real value of the HD-555's.  If your really in a pinch for cans, I think the open-ear Koss KTX Titanium phones (for about $20 bucks) make a much nicer sound than the HD-485's. Comfort of the HD-485's is also a big issue.  They aren't nearly as comfortable for long wearing sessions as the Sennheiser 500-series headphones or the Koss.  In summary, the HD-485 is a mediocre headphone even at this price range.
Hoping for the best. I bought this Cobra 2500 watt inverter to upgrade my existing 1500 watt inverter in our travel trailer. It arrived quickly and in about a week I was installing it. This turned out to be quite a hassle, because the Cobra uses two positive and two negative power input lead cables. My old inverter used one of each. I had to buy all new cables to hook it to my batteries. Once that was done, I switched it on. So far, so good. I plugged my 'circuit checker' into it and got an "open neutral" reading. Hmmmm, not good. However, it did seem to operate all my on-board stuff properly (though showing an "open neutral at every plug in the coach).However, in short order, the unit gave out. Boom - no power. I checked to be sure there was no break in the incoming power, and checked for power at the plugs on the unit. Nothing. I called Cobra customer support and the gentleman asked about all the tests I'd done (and I'd already done all he would have asked me to do). He said the only thing he could suggest now was to mail it to them and their 'techs' would put it on the bench and determine what was wrong.So I shipped it off the next day - and that's where we stand now - waiting to hear what's wrong with it, or get a new one to replace it. It's been over two months.
Very nice Portable. I wanted to add that the pet1000 can do PAL to NTSC conversion,and does it very well just make sure that you keep the player in the NTSC mode in the general setup page under TV TYPE when playing a PAL dvd. Yes, it will convert PAL so you can watch it on NTSC tv's using the output from the player.Very versitile portable indeed,and there's a reigon hack as well
Ginormous Waste of Money. I have purchased three of these dvd players in the past 2 1/2 years, every one of them has had the same problems.  Trouble reading dvds, dvds skipping, discs freezing and the manual buttons stopped working on two of the units.  The price is right on the unit, but not for the time it worked.  I would have been better off spending double or triple the unit price to get one that worked for more than 6 months without a problem.  If I could give it less than 1 star I would because thats really what it is worth, nothing
A boom box, not a karaoke machine. I'm not sure what I expected after I purchased this for fifty some-odd dollars and was handed a coupon for a $40 rebate.  But I wish that someone had informed me before I lugged it all the way home that when you sing into the mic, your voice doesn't come through the speaker.  I'm cool with the machine's sound quality when it comes to playing a CD-G.  If I tap the mic, I can hear an extremely faint thud, so I know it's on, but the volume's too low--and, yes, I adjusted the mic controls--if you want to sing along. Which makes this a dinosaur: a boom box in the age of the iPod.Really had to dig through the stacks of machines to find a box that hadn't been opened.  So, when was my first clue?  Doh
Unreliable, and AWFUL support. The printer worked well for a while, then after about a month, simply spat out two sequential pages of blank paper each time we tried to print with it.HP technical support was extremely poor. I had to sit through an hour of a fellow called Raj saying "will you please be pressing" this button or that button, "will you please be turning off the printer and turning it on again", and trying out a whole series of inane tests that I told the tech support person I'd already tried to no avail. Finally we were told to return the printer - which should not have taken an hour! - and the support guy said "please be sending all your printer's accessories and new ink cartridges with the printer please". So we did (including brand-new ink cartridges, the duplexer, and the rear paper feeder, as Raj instructed) and after a few days, received the *same* printer back - minus the duplexing unit, the rear paper feeder, and the ink cartridges! It took a lot of cajoling with HP "support" to have the duplexer replaced, and the rear paper feed unit was never replaced at all - they claim to have lost it. Then after a week the printer started malfunctioning again in the exact same way. No-one in the company can afford to spend the time for Raj or his friends to put us through a long series of tests, give us misleading information, send us an incomplete unit, following which we will waste more time engaging in frustrated diplomacy sorting out the mess HP will make. It's just not worth it.Good technical support pays for itself about five-fold in customer satisfaction and referrals. The standard of HP support was so abysmal that I cannot recommend this printer
Beware of Mail-in Rebate Hoax. The card works as advertised but SanDisk does not send in Mail-in-Rebate. Even though I mailed it in with the UPC Barcode, SanDisk sent me a post card stating that I needed to resubmit it with the barcode. How can I resubmit when they already have the barcode?In my experience with SanDisk, I got rebate back on one of two cards that I submitted - so you get mail-in rebate 50% of the time with SanDisk. I think mail-in-rebate is a big hoax perpetrated by these companies. Don't trust it!
monitor problem. We bought this unit for a 5-day trip, the picture is very clear, better than most but right after that trip the second monitor lost its picture.  We sent it back to the manufacturer, never received the item back and it's been about 2 months. Stay away from this product!
Tried two units, both defective. The first unit I received produced a picture, but no sound over the RF connection.  So I sent it back for a replacement unit.  That one produced no picture or sound.  Worthless!  I'll be trying a different brand.  Note that I double checked all cables and connections to verify that everything else was working properly
Not worth it for every day. I just got the Canon Selphy CP730 and the best thing that I can say is that it is extremely portable.  If you want a picture on the fly, wherever you go then I might consider this.  But if you are buying this to use at home like I have, with an eye for toting it about, the print quality is lacking sharpness and the colors are lacking depth.  My HP printer does a much better job but lacks the portability.  Bottom line, it doesn't produce good pictures
I thought it would be good!. This charger first started out awesome and had no problems. Then after about 3 months it started to act up and now it wont charge my ipod at all. Find a better charger or you will be buying multiple chargers
Why isn't NO Stars an option?. Terrible, terrible, terrible.  OK if all you want is a small spotlight or a nightlight.I wasted money on buying TWO of these bulbs that I will NEVER use!  I do want to see better LED samples in the marketplace, but THIS one has GOT TO GO!Too bad I didn't check the reviews on Amazon before spending over 60 bucks on TWO lightbulbs!  I'm an IDIOT
Another example of Sony's failure to keep in touch with consumers. The bean is small, battery efficient, and has a nice overall look to it. Thats probably the only few good things that can be said about this product. This is NOT an mp3 player, it is a TRAC player. You have to convert all your mp3's into TRAC format before the player is able to play them. You also have to install their software which for most of us is an intrusive program trying to list every music file on your HD....this can ussually result in other people knowing what music you own especially if the software regularly communicates online. Another horror youll deal with is the slow transfer speed this device has. Just to load a single 3 meg file took an avg of 35 seconds, imagine how long 60 5 meg files would take. If your looking for an mp3 player that lets you just drag and drop your fav mp3s into the device so you can hear them hassel free this in not the player for you. This device is the Stalin of mp3 player requiring strict uncomfortable conformity play your fav songs
Does NOT Work on Intel Macs!. The iShock II WILL NOT work on Intel Macs, and per Macally' website, they have no intention of releasing an Intel- compatible driver for the iShock II.  Don't waste your time on his product like I did
Seems that Toshiba quality has gone down lately!. I've owned several Toshiba televisions over the years, and the one striking feature they all had was solid build quality, and excellent reception and picture quality.  Not so with this model.  Even with an amplified VHF/UHF antenna, and living in a major metro area, reception is subpar on many channels.  The picture jumps a lot (doesn't sync), and is subject to image ghosting.  This is a shame because the DVD player, and DVD picture quality is excellent.  So, this unit is indeed a 'mixed blessing'.  Look elsewhere for a quality 13" TV/DVD combo unit.UPDATE: 12/24/06; As of yesterday, I discovered that this DVD player will NOT play several DVD's I fed it!  I had purchased some educational DVD's for my toddler, and out of the 6, it only plays 4.  It turns out that this DVD player is in fact a P.O.S.  Stay away from this subpar TV
Does not work. Sony Disc player does not work. It won't recognize disc in player.Currently trying to get it serviced under warranty
Watch Out!. I don't dispute that Bose is a leader in speaker technology.  But there is a reason this item is discontinued.  It locks up when playing certain DVDs.  Sometimes after selecting "play movie" it won't get past the menu, you have to guide it to the first chapter or else it will sit endlessly on the menu screen.Other DVDs will play fine, but if you happen to shut off the system without removing the DVD, the next time you turn it on it will say "Bad Disc" and locks up - you can't play, you can't eject, nothing.  You have to UNPLUG it and essentially reboot the system.Maybe I got the lemon, I don't know.  But it's worth writing a review given the fairly expensive price tag and the assumed quality the goes along with the name Bose... this system is definitely an exception to that rule
Troublesome. I bought 2 of the Rino 130's for my wife and I to use for hiking, boating, and geocaching.  We were excited about the prospect of peer to peer positioning, etc.  After 10 minutes, one of them locked up, then the second one would not transmit only receive a radio communication.  The only way to get either one of them to function properly again was to remove the power source, wait a few seconds and reinstall and power up again. The first time this happened I was hoping it would be an isolated incident; then it happened again 10 minutes later.  I checked the software; one was running ver 5.40 and the other 5.20.  Webupdater would not work with one of them.  It would lock up during the firmware upgrade.I chose to immediately return the items, thinking that if it is this much trouble now, what will it be like later. I expected better quality than this from Garmin.  Great features and an intuitive user interface are a plus; however, dependability in the long run is apparently non-existent. The GPS portion of the unit is terrific. The problem seems to be aligned with the communication creating instability. I am purchasing a different unit and plan to make it a Garmin product again.Amazon is easy to deal with on returns; 5 stars to Amazon.
Not for Large Houses With More Than One Electrical Circuits. I bought a set of four Westinghouse intercoms.  Usually people buy intercoms because they have a large house and don't want to have to trapes all over it to communicate with other people.  These Westinghouse intercoms (and I believe the same goes for the NOVI intercoms) require that all itercoms be on the same electrical circuit (that is, controlled by the same electrical breaker).  So, if your kitchen, family room, master bedroom, and garage outlets are on different breakers in your main electrical control panel and you want to set up an intercom system, the Westinghouse system will not work for you.Intercoms are usually for large houses...large houses usually have more than one electrical circuit for outlets...hence, this product likely will not work for most people.  I replaced the Westinghouse intercom system with one by another manufacturer called the WireFree Intercom Reporter...this is a four channel system and it works great...works either with batteries or transformer...it is independent of the electrical circuits
Defective Product. Received the product, it was not fully functional.  The buttons worked but the mouse would not track.  I loaded the software, trouble-shot everything, even put up with maddeningly insane questions from Kensington tech support ("Did you try unplugging it and replugging it back in?")  However, Amazon.com was very quick and gracious in the return.Remarking on the design: seemed to fit well in my hand, though it was a bit bulky; usb cord was very long -- a desktop user would not have any issues with its reach; might have been an enjoyable product if it worked properly.I'm a bit disappointed, I was always a fan of Kensington products, starting with the 90s trackball.  I also have a cordless optical notebook mouse.  I've been seeking a replacement b/c it chews through batteries like none other.  So far I am 0-2 on satisfaction with Kensington mice
Cheap product from China. I was very disappointed. The unit looks like a cheap knock-off and the user guide is not adequate. Not user friendly.
Garbage!!!!. Stops Playing and ccompletely shuts off in a 5-15 minute time frame with a fully charged battery.  Volume max. is not loud at all. This player is very noisy which makes the volume seem even lower. Can only Stop or Play Movie without the very delicate remote
CD Player. I bought this CD Player for my daughter for a Christmas Present.  The radio works fine.  The tape player works find.  But the CD player will only run 30 min. and then it turns itself off.  Something wrong there.  Won't buy another one.  I am very upset about this seeing my daughter lives far away from here.  Can't do much about it now.  So we are stuck with something that don't work
A good receiver, but has video problems. I like this amp but it causes my TV (Sharp Aquos 42" LCD) to lose synch whenever the video has a sudden white flashes (NFL sports transitions, War of the Worlds death-beam blasts, Drawn Together transitions, explosions, stuff like that).  The synch loss takes about 5 or so seconds for my particular TV to recover from, which is pretty annoying.  When I had the problem I searched the web and found that numerous others had similar problems with this and other Onkyo receiver models, but Onkyo doesn't seem to acknowledge the issue.  It's a good receiver, but if you buy it save the packing for a few weeks just in case it causes problems for your TV as well.  Given that these problems seem to have been around for a good year or more and Onkyo isn't fixing them, I can only give this 2 stars
Save your money. Dont buy. I got this and the RangeBooster is a lie. It has NOT boosted any kind of range on my network. It also goes in and out of service often. I wasted my money on this one
OVER PRICED&lt;UNDER  POWERED. will not hold bose souround spkrs, will not mount for key hole speakers, also  i paid $11.99 for these on amazon, the saw them in wal-mart for $7.78 good for a cheap system, but if your speakers  weigh more than 5 lbs.  step u
Praying on people who don't know better. Monster should seriously be ashamed of themselves for praying on people who don't know about home theater. If you're already getting a picture using a cheap $5 HDMI cable, without and "sparklies" and without the picture blanking out intermittently, then that's literally as good as it gets and you'd be better off saving up for a better DVD player rather than stuff like this.Next thing you know, Monster will be selling $200 iPod USB cables and claiming that they make the music sound better - it's the same principle
Where's the display again?. I loved the "atomic" aspect of this clock in addition to the travel amenities. But the first time I used it, I swear it was impossible to see the display once it was dark, even with the display "lighted." There was one exception to this--if I tilted the clock until it was almost closed. If it was at that angle, I could finally read the display. I'm surprised this little thing made it out of their testing facilities with this display problem. I have perfect vision and still couldn't see it for the life of me. Now, I'm in search of a different product once again. My advice is to not waste your time here, as nice as it sounds
NO stars for this NON Big Button Phone. When they advertised "big button" I believed that they meant it. But this is NOT, I repeat NOT, a big button phone. If you are buying for a visully impaired person, or even just because you don't see as well as you used to, you're making a mistake
fast card reader, but bulky and picky on cards. I had a Iogear GFR202SD for a year. After losing it recently, I decided to give this Kingston TravelLite a try. Major disappointment and I am going to buy the Iogear one againPro: fast(USB 2.0 rate) and supports SDHCCon: compatibility issue even with kingston's own 1G SD cards.bulky: it is so fat and thick that it completely blocks the remaining USB port on my laptop.exchanging the card is more awkward than the IOGEAR reader. the cap is very flimsy
cute clock; doesn't work great. I love the design and looks of this clock and it's upright CD design.  However, I think that because of the vertical playing position, it tends to skip more than a horizontal player, even with brand new CDs.  Also, the blue backlight is EXTREMELY bright.  I have to cover it at night, which pretty much defeats the purposse of a backlit clock
Do not buy this Charger. I bought this Item on December 7th.. and it stops woking 2 months later. Refrain to buy this.. it is better to put 10 extra dollars and buy the apple one
Battery and charger..... I have had it less than a year and charging the battery as with all the palms is a major disappointment.  They don't last very long.  Palm is great but what is great if it doesn't charge.  Thanks to service plans I have exchanged every palm I  have had due to defective batteries now they know better and don't have the plans like they used too.  My advice:  Buy something with a replaceable battery you can do yourself
Don't buy. I got this CD player because I thought sony was a good company, plus I liked the look of it. But after just 5 months after purchase, and not even using it that often, it has already broken. I paid about 40 dollars for this CD player, so I am very disappointed. If I were you, I would buy a different CD player
I returned this item...not functional. This item was not practical. It looked good but not being able to zip the sides all the way down because of the cute water bottles was not very functional
Skype phone no good!. The phone seemed to work ok with SkypeOut calls.  However leave the phone unattended for a few mins and the phone times out, and will not receive SkypeIn calls. It did not have a reliable connection either.  I am using WPA-PSK, and the phone would often drop the connection. If your looking to receive incoming calls use a landline, or Vonage
Chintzy design...very misleading pictures. Based on the pictures shown on Amazon as well as Logitech's web site, one would believe the dropping your iPod into the dock charges and provides the audio connection to the speakeres.  You'd be incorrect on both counts.  You still have to plug into the computer to charge this thing, and there's a cable (not shown in any of the pictures) that you have to plug into the top of your iPod to make the audio connection.We returned this item and went with something by Altec Lansing in the same price range instead...we're much happier with it
Return policy. We wanted the zoom and missed the fact that this one does not have the zoom.  The reason I give two stars is because of Beach Camera's return policy.  They grudgingly allowed me to return it, as a one-time courtesy with a restocking fee.  I wish Amazon would tag the vendors so we could easily see if we were buying from this type of company
Not very happy with this product. I am not a tech person, but I am also not completely useless.  I have three cards I use for my palm pilot and two digital cameras.  I have been very unhappy with this product. The other two cards are not PNY.  This card seems to work fine in the camera and palm pilot, but will not work when I plug it into the SD slot in either of our laptops.  It just locks up the computers for a while then asks if the card should be formated.  Clicking "yes" or "no" does not help.  I get a message that it cannot be formated.  I am sure it is the card since the same thing happens on different computers.  Like another reviewer, I, unfortunately, threw the packaging away because it appeared to work in the camera.  I even tried to have the camera format it.  It just can't be read by the computers.  None of the other cards have this problem.  I can't return it and it certainly isn't working properly.  I would recommend buying a different brand
sadly- it's been relegated to the junk drawer. I'm not a system analyst, so I need really clear instructions for any new device. I bought this camera 1 year ago to use as a home security camera which I could view from the Internet at my office.Troubles I encountered:1.) Set up was impossible. I finally figured out that I had to disable the wep on my wireless network thus inviting all my neighbors to free Internet connection. I wasn't willing to do this.2.) I could view from the Internet within my home network, but not from my office.3.) Had to convince one of my company's IT system analysts to visit me at home and trouble shoot the camera's system. Took her 3 hours of guess work but she successfully set it up and keep my network secure-- which worked until I had to reset my router. 2 weeks of use in one year.4.) I have never been able to have the camera send "snap shots" to my e-mail or ftp folder. D-Link tech support confirmed that I was setting it up correctly... but the feature doesn't work. I was told by D-Link tech support that I may need to disable my Internet security program. No can do.5.) D-Link tech support may not have access to this product- they are not able to respond to my inquiries. They would send me answers- but not to the questions I asked!6.) The weather protection cover is not designed for wireless antenna and has been out of stock each time I have tried to purchase- so I have not been able to install on the outside of my home. It therefore must be used inside which is not what I need. I could have paid &lt; $80 for an indoor camera.Every so often, when I have a few hours to burn, I drag it out and try to make the thing work. For the couple weeks it was viewable on the Internet it provided a nice view of my home, but it wasn't useful without snapshots or any type of archived image documentation.
Playing by Garmin's Rules. If you purchase a Garmin product, especially this one, you are firmly in the clutches of a Company that gives you what they want you to have, not what you might want. Everything Garmin makes is proprietary so that nothing else will work on a Garmin. You will be unable to transfer data to Garmin media, you will be insulted by a website either written by or for aliens and should you call the customer service or cartography lines assuming you wish to wait and wait, you will get to talk to people so uninformed about Garmin products your wait was wasted. The dingus works ok with Garmin chips, but the chips are inadequate or incomplete.If you should have a Mac, Garmin leaves you totally unsupported so that if you choose a Garmin you need to buy a PC, a downloader, and Garmin chips to go with Garmin's vastly overpriced CDs. In short, if you prefer unsupported products that are designed to force you to buy from a company indifferent to their customers, Garmin should be at the top of your list with their GPSMAP 276c
I should have listened to the bad reviews. I read the bad reviews of the RV042 and ordered it anyway figuring that a company like linksys/cisco would fix such glaring problems quickly, bad assumption.  As a software quality assurance engineer I'm pretty tech-saavy but after two days of wrestling with the QuickVPN, I could still not get it to work.  The problem is one of documentation, their information on troubleshooting the QuickVPN is not helpful at all which is too bad because otherwise the product appeared first rate.  The web configuration interface is very intuitive and easy to use, I was able to get the basic router/firewall working with my custom firewall rules in a few minutes.If you do go ahead and buy the RV042, I would suggest that you plan on hiring someone who has used the RV042 before to configure it for you.The firmware version of my RV042 was 1.3.7.10 and the version of my QuickVPN client was 1.0.39.  By the way, when you review products like this it is very helpful to readers to include the version numbers so they can see if the problem may have been fixed
Great Concept - Poor Execution. This is a wonderful idea, but is apparently before its time or the product designers didn't check with with the paper manufacturers.  It is easy to train the system to interpret bad handwriting, but accomplishing that, it is impossible to find replacement paper pads. The only replacement pads I have been able to find are steno pads and these don't have the same page/space productivity as the original paper which comes with the AceCad.  Either make replacement pads available or make the writing surface a different size to conform to writing pads that are more readily available
Bad quality. Great features and well thought out.  But the quality is horrible.  Mine randomly ejected disks and screen started going bad after only 2 weeks.  Afraid to buy anything Audiovox or EddieBauer after this.  Luckily was returned for refund
Do your homework before you buy PNY. PNY memory is not very specific on its products, check and re-check that the specs. are what you need. PNY is more a reseller of dubious memory brands of asiatic origin (not that others are'nt, but...), pay the extra and go for respected brands like Viking and Kingston, you can't go wrong. In the long term, it's a better investment
If it didn't say Sony on the front... I definitely wouldn't know Sony made this. It's crap. I put it down on a table, it shuts it's self off, it refuses to play some regular (store bought) CDs (no scratches). It eats batteries. It's very, very loud when it does decide to play a CD. I am very disappointed. I was better off keep my 3 year old Pannasonic, it has better rumble control and plays all my CDs
not for the GMR1038-2. Do not buy this for the GMR1038-2 or 2CK radios.  It is not the right unit for that radio.  I have no idea how well it works for the correct radio, but it did seem comfortable and low profile, like it would fit well under hearing protection.  woops, duh, darn.  I need to return it for either an HS910 or S915, which I don't see on Amazon.I do not think Amazon should take advantage of dopes like me by listing this as "people who bought X also bought Y".  I now know that is a bunch of bandini
awful awful. after frimware update, it completely stop working.Followed all the instructions correctly.Hard reset and did everything i can. I could not recover.Do not buy. bottom line
Worst  Phone ever. These phones do not work, they have a lot of static and the battery runs out quickly. Do not buy them!!!
Do not  order this part from RitzCamera. I ordered Panasonic 1GB Secure Digital (SD) Card ( RPSDH01GU1A )Which is a 66x speed (10BM/s)I received RP-SDQ01G which is 33X speed (5MB/s). Ritzcamera will cheat you.   You can find the part they sent me for $20 less on Amazon with free shipping
A boom box, not a karaoke machine. I'm not sure what I expected after I purchased this for fifty some-odd dollars and was handed a coupon for a $40 rebate.  But I wish that someone had informed me before I lugged it all the way home that when you sing into the mic, your voice doesn't come through the speaker.  I'm cool with the machine's sound quality when it comes to playing a CD-G.  If I tap the mic, I can hear an extremely faint thud, so I know it's on, but the volume's too low--and, yes, I adjusted the mic controls--if you want to sing along. Which makes this a dinosaur: a boom box in the age of the iPod.Really had to dig through the stacks of machines to find a box that hadn't been opened.  So, when was my first clue?  Doh
Good for loud OOOMPA-OOOMPA music. ...but not if you are listening classical and have more than below average requirements regarding sound reproduction quality. There is a "hiss" present all the time, cracking noises, nonlinear distortion, echo and other artifacts. I tried installing/uninstalling drivers, getting new drivers, all with no effect. If you want quality, get external sound device from XITE
Sony PSP CTA Digital PS-BGR Rechargeable Battery. worked great for Mom .but was destroyed by my 12 year old in about 30 min. She broke the pins off that hold it in place when she was trying to change the games. The extended battery option was GREAT
too expensive and my headphones broke in 2 weeks. I am a person who actually uses these items, alot. After 2 weeks of using these headphones, the right earpiece quit playing. And I hear MS is not suppporting anything that stops operating. Also, it is too expensive. I am enjoying the Zune, but all the accessories should be a little more accessible
A Piece of Garbage. This was the worst electronics puchase I've ever made.  When I first got the mini it was great, looked nice and sounded great.  Within about 6 months battery life started to go way down, after a year it was down to nothing, didn't work properly, would show a full charge and not last more than 20 minutes.  If you're going to take a chance on an iPod, definitely get a newer different model that may be of better quality than this one
2 or more handsets are a problem. I agree with others that this phone has great sound and range.  However there are two design flaws that I'd like to point out.1. If you have more than two hand sets on one base and two or more people in your house and the phone rings there could be a problem.  If two people pick up handsets to answer at the same time ONLY ONE will actually be connected to the incoming call.  The loser will get an error tone and not hear any of the conversation.  So, if the incoming call is not for the "winner" how does he tell the other person the call is for her?  Which handset do you transfer the call to?  You do not know which handset she picked up.  With old hardwired extension phones you simply determined who the caller wanted and the other party hung up.  Now so easy with this phone!2. The keypad lock feature actually increases the chances of a child dialing random digits to call 911 by accident!  Yes, when locked the keypad only allows dialing 911.  It does this by rejecting all digits EXCEPT 9,1,1.  So if the keypad is locked and a kid dials 4592171 and eventually hits the green "pick up phone" button it will call 911.  Any random string of digits with digits 9,1 and 1 in it will look like 911 to this phone!However, if you live alone and have no small children this phone is great.
Inexpensive Because it's CHEAP - Broken After 3 Weeks. After a few weeks of being constantly plugged in the spring loaded sides that keep it firmly in place gave out. Now it just pops out of the cig lighter hole. I haven't attempted to return or send it back for warranty service yet..
Screws aren't included!. You would think that when you buy a bracket of any sort, the package would include the mounting screws.  Well, this doesn't and you aren't made of aware of that until you open the box.  I'm a strong advocate of Linksys products but this falls under the category of &quot;screw the customer&quot;
OK - if they survive the shipment. The majority of my cases were damaged in shipping. I immediately threw away about eight, but as I tried to use the rest I gradually found ten or so more that had sustained damage as well. Maybe I'm alone, given the other high ratings, but these seem more fragile than other slim cases I've used in the past. I'd give them 3-stars (because they're cheap) if they didn't have to be shipped.
Great Picture Quality...when it works. My wife and I got this TV for Christmas.  The picture quality is awesome.  We initially thought the built in tuner was great too.  We could receive time warner high def channels with no problem.  Now after 3 weeks, the tuner has died.  At first, it was taking a couple minutes to warm up before displaying the picture.  Now, it just displays static.  Called Sony, and they say it needs a new tuner.  Luckily, I bought it from Best Buy so I can just return it to the store
This plan does NOT cover replacing DLP lamps. Fist off, I do not own this product, but I have researched it.I just called the customer service number listed for this product and talked to a CSR. I asked her if this plan will cover replacing the lamp in a DLP TV I will be buying this weekend. She looked up the answer, and read off a statement:"I apologize for the inconvenience of your lamp burning out sir, but the lamp unit is not be covered under our service plan, as that is an accessory which requires scheduled replacement."It also seems like this is not a warranty extension, as it starts the moment you purchase the plan, not the moment the manufacturer's standard warranty ends.My first job after high school was in an electronics store, selling TVs, stereos, and appliances, as well as the extended warranties that are offered at those types of places. Sometimes they are worth it, if they replace a common unit which tends to fail on a normal basis. This plan does not cover the unit which is sure to fail on you within the first 2-3 years, and is concurrent with the manufacturer's warranty, and is therefor not very attractive.So, there you have it
The cover scratches my MacBook. I bought one of these when I bought my Macbook to keep it in pristine condition, just a few months ago.  I just popped it off to clear out a little bit of debris that got caught between the cover and the Macbook and find that all along the cover has been scratching my Macbook.They should at least have had the foresight to make the plastic in contact with the Macbook of a softer material, or created a design where it won't rub against the laptop.Really stupid design.  It may have protected against some very minor scratches,but likely I'm worse off for using this cover (scratches on the outside of the cover are more evenly dispersed than those now on the macbook but both are of similar severity). I don't think in the long run it was worth $40, and I feel very misled by the marketing for this cover.  Given the choice again I would have either gone for another brand or just saved my money
Mediocre remote. Inferior to other philips remotes. This remote controller was quite a dissapointment.  I am using two other Philips/Magnavox remotes that are far more convenient and operate better.  This one does not look like the picture (which looks more like the 425 model).  It does not cover the equipment I have (while the 425 model does), It's learning mode is flaky and unreliable, to say the least. The range is shorter then that of the 425S.  Conclusion:  This would make for a nice ornament (It does look nice, and, if you are lucky you may be able to control  some devices.
Just Say No. This goes down as one of the worst products that I have ever purchased.  To call it retractable is a joke.  The concept of the product is great.  The casing of the cables looks great but the functionality was a big disappointment.  I could pull the cables out but the cheap retraction mechanism would never allow the cables to go back into the case. Don't waste your time with this one as you will end up returning it as I did
In Cold Temperatures - Won't Stick. Great design but unfortunately wouldn't stay stuck in cold temperatures - I have a Saturn and the vent clip was not an option for me
ANTonline will STEAL your $$$$ Money!. I bought this from ANTonline.This product does NOT fit all Explorists as their advertisement says.It is not even close to fitting the Explorist XL.I returned it in perfect shape.I spent nearly 30.00 with shipping both ways and ANTonline refunded to me $2.43.  The extra shipping was their fault and the restocking fees are ridiculous!  I advise you to NOT throw your money at this poisonous enterprise
Great Bag, BATTERY is NOT INCLUDED. I love the bag, but did not receive a battery. I called Amazon and my only choice was to return the bag. When ordering the bag, I thought I seen that it was coming from Antonline, (whatever that is) I have not found a way to contact them. I was told by Amazon that I would have to contact HP. I called but today is Jan. 01 and of course all I got was automation
Not impressed...at all. Will just have to keep buying new copies until something better comes along!. I ordered this on the recommendation of another Amazon customer. I wasnt impressed. I though this would save me money because until then I had been just buying new copies of my favorite CDs that were scrathced up. I cleaned a few discs and ran them through all three "processes" without successful results. It didnt seem to make much difference with any of my discs. I dont think this is a good "repairer" of any disc thats more than mildly scratched. My suggestion would be to just replace your damaged discs by buying another copy of your CD or DVD on AMAZON!! Many of my CDs I have replaced for $7-10 bucks on here. I wish I wouldve kept my $25
Player failed after 3 weeks of use, manufacturer received unit back 10 days ago and has still not given a date for replacement. Product :  	MP3 Players Sansa M200 Series Sansa m240We Received Your Item :  	11/03/2006Customer Comments :11/13/2006 07:51 am   	When will I get my repaired or replaced item. You have had this for 1 week without notifying me of the status. Please respond (by the way, Apple turns around iPod repairs in 1 DAY!).11/13 Still waiting for an update on the M240 you received on 11/3
Marketing Pinheads triumph. I got this as a gift from a friend who should know better, but I could easily have been suckered by the weasel words the marketing department plastered on the package.The package says "Hi Speed" USB but I had 670 MB on a 1 GB Cruzer Mini that I wanted to transfer to the new Lexar JumpDrive FireFly.  The upload to my laptop went smoothly - no more than 10 minutes.  Then I took out the Cruzer and inserted the FireFly in the same USB port and copied the directory I had just uploaded to the FireFly via a simple "paste".  It took over an hour (I don't know exactly how long since I had to leave before it finished).When I got back, I decided to do a test copy of the data back to the Cruzer.  The same data only took 10 minutes to download back to my 1 GB Cruzer.It seems clear that "Hi Speed" for Lexar means USB 1.0 (about 12 Mbps) and not USB 2.0 (about 480 Mbps).I'm sure the marketing department said "Why confuse the poor stupid consumers with technichal specs.?"I searched their website to see if there was more information but the suits seem to have veto power over the web designers as well.If speed is important to you (and with a 4 GB drive it is logical to assume that you are going to have some large files to move) then steer clear of this product.  1 GB of data will take you on the order of an hour or more to move.Of course if speed is not important or if you only have 1.0 USB ports on your machine then the product is fine. It works as well as any other flash drive device on the market.My main complaint is that without testing, it is hard to know that this is only a 1.0 device
would be great if it worked. I have purchased the 100GB drive because of what a lot of you said, the space, the size, and the convience of not having a power supply.  I only wish it would work.  I have tried for the past month with no success to get mine to work, even with both USB plugs attatched.  My computer finally today recognized it for the first time, but it freezes it up and will not allow you to utilize it .  I have tried their customer service with no help or resolve.  I have even tried to get a DC power cord and was told just to send the unit back.I just wish it would work, I have a newer lap top with XP so I don't know what the problem is.I am glad it is working great for others because it seemed like such a great thing
Professional Heavy Backpack. I purchased the backpack and thought the many compartments would be great.  However there is not as much room for documents and folders and I thought.  The padding is great for laptop protection.  The backpack is very heavy and hurts my back when carrying through an airport.The style and look is good function is poor
Don't buy this product!. I bought this product as a way to keep a large amount of backup data saved, however I have fought with the drivers for days now. Whenever the drive is working the usb on my computer does not work, if I try to use multiple computers on the same drives it crashes (even with the newest updates) I will be returning this product ASAP. I'm very disappointed and will not be buy netgear again!I only wish there was a 0 star revie
this is a bad guitar. I think this guitar is horrible. I mean it looks so bad also the make looks like its 100 yearss old
Are they really  Taiyo Yuden ???. I know that Taiyo Yuden manufactures quality professional blank media but these are from from it. There is no proof on the CD hub that identifies them as Taiyo Yuden. Already I have had 2 out of 10 CDs that did'nt record any data during a live church service although the Tascam pro unit we use showed that recording was in process. Buyers beware!
Flawed Hardware. simple to use, sounds good. but the input wire for the sound breaks only after a couple weeks use in the car. I sent the first one back only to have the replacement do the same thing. You need to use the lighter power supply ans the use of the internal batteries does not do it. I eventually re soldered the wires myself
parts missing & customer service not available. i got this to have at our home for our grandson but it came with no remote although the box stated one was included plus it didn't seem to work in our home with our cable service and after calling customer service several times and only getting voice mail.....i felt it might be a sign that this product was a lemon and i'd better cut my loses and return it!  it may just have been the ONE that i received but it didn't seem like an American made high quality item.  Again it may only have been ONE lemon and the rest may all be super....but i'm only commenting on my experience so you can weigh your decision to buy or not on that. =
Not bad... but not as nice as I wanted... Not bad... but not as nice as I wanted... But I got a refund so no worry
Overall very poor speakers, but Subwoofer is very good. Okay, so I just bought the JBL SCS-145.5 Speaker System and they are absolutely horrible! I'm sorry to say, but the Center speaker is ridiculously underpowered/barely audible with the other satellite speakers (which are also weak and tend to get distorted at higher volumes or with a lot of audio going through them). The Subwoofer is *very* good, however, so I guess the price tag is justified by the Subwoofer (that's why I gave it 2 stars), but the other speakers are pretty much useless. Just in case anyone wanted to know how these were, I'd recommend staying away from them and maybe spending slightly more and getting a better system
junk. No matter how you hold this you will accidentilly press a button. In addition the menu is lousy. For instance one screen has 3 options "route" "yes" "no". I still haven't memorized what to press to get back to my original route (it is not "route"). There is no "home". If you look up any thing, for instance the nearest rest area, you lose your original route and have to start again.I went to the web site expecting to download the latest updates (changed roads, new restaurants, etc.) but I don't think you can. There is an edit mode to input changes yourself. Will be a big help when you are lost.The battery sucks, 3 hours at best.I sent Magellan two e-mails asking to clarify, no reply, not even an automated response.Oh one more thing, when my wife used it the first time, she complained that the battery ran out. She had put the charger plug in the head phone jack ! I don't blame her,  the headphones and charger jacks are located close together and about the same size. You have to turn on the light and look closely and also memorize how to handle this thing without accidentially pressing buttons. Also when you pick it up you can't tell if the unit is up or upside down immediately.Junk junk jun
Great output but teeny weeny expensive ink cartridges. Just bought it today. The print quality is excellent. However, I had to go back to the store for more ink later in the day (about $90 for a full set) after printing only a couple hundred pages of medical lecture notes for school. Ouch!!!I'll bet cleaning the heads costs about $5. This will probably be my last Epson because of the high cost of ink. To bad the manufactures don't recognize that screwing their customers on the ink lowers the customers satisfaction with them as a company
Unable to install, despite reaching D-Link technical support. From looking at the D-Link website and talking to five tech support staff, it appears that there are countless versions of this card, each with different driver software. The one I got came with a CD with the wrong drivers. With tech support, I finally found the 8 mb driver file I was supposed to download. However, they did not provide any instructions on how to install the new driver. The normal "automatic" approach did not work. And their instructions did not match the screens I was getting on Windows XP SP 2.So I called back again. And again. And again.Despite being given a case file, each time I was asked the same questions, including what, exactly, is wrong. And each time I was told to do the same thing: Install from the CD. Reboot. Remove the program. Reboot. Install from the new driver. Reboot. Remove the program. Talk to a senior tech support person.Install from CD. Reboot. etc.It would have been easier to send the card with the right files on the CD. A clearly designed website would be second best. And tech support that knows what they're doing and speaks intelligble English would be a nice last resort.I spent three hours calling D-Link technical support and speaking to five people, and they could not tell me how to install the software for this card!I am not alone in this experience; see cnet's web site user reviews of the DWL-G650.Another reviewer reports that this software damaged his operating system. I believe he is right. It appears to have damaged my screen font for Windows message boxes. I have been unable to repair it. The DWL-G650 is bad news.I give them two stars cause they actually have tech support, though in this case it was utterly worthless.Back it goes
Flawed Device. I purchased the Garmin Forerunner 201 from Amazon, believing I was buying a reliable piece of gear. It doesn't work properly in any built up area, i.e. city, where most of us live, or areas with too many trees, i.e. where we city dwellers like to go when we leave the city. Basically it leaves stretches of your running route out, but the stop watch carries on ticking. So if you're like me, and take satisfaction in turning out fast-paced runs (or what passes for fast-paced for us amateurs), the 201 will only be a source of frustration. It'll time your run perfectly, just like any stop-watch (duh!), but then leave out some of the distance you ran, so that you get a mile for mile average that yo-yos in a very suspicious way. Particularly when you've put out a steady effort. And it'll miss out bits of your course in different places on a day-by-day basis. You'll find yourself "adapting" the info the device gives you: how's that for precision? The interval training feature is even worst. You dial in some mile repeats, with a timed interval, and set off at full blast. The minutes tick by and the mile never ends! That's when you find that there are gaps in the "mile" you're running, and you're killing yourself when you've actually done the mile, and should be in your rest period. I kid you not, I wouldn't dare sell a GPS device that works 70% of the time and I'm not speaking of heavily built up areas, I run in spaces where the closest buildings are at least 60-90 feet away...But this is not the worst of it. I though I was getting a well made piece of equipment. I live in Brazil, so I bought it off Amazon, and a friend kindly brought it over for me from the US. In less than 1 year, it started turning on/off by itself, in a crazy dysfunctional way, rendering it totally unusable. Currently it doesn't stay on for more than 1 minute at a time. It now runs it's battery flat by itself. Even though I'd been scrupulously careful w/ it, not taking it out in the rain, and drying off the moisture & sweat after every run religiously. Some of you may say I should have used the warranty, but when you have mailing costs Brazil-US, and if the thing's fixed or replaced, 100% customs duty when it gets sent back here, you'd give up, just as I did. I'm not paying twice for a piece of gear that never worked properly in the first place.My conclusion: try some other model, or even brand. I'd not lay my hard-earned cash on this gizmo again
Starting to go after two years.............. I never had a problem with this radio until today. It has been exactly two years since I bought the delphi boom box. My display unit on the CD part of the boom box has gone kaput. The radio still works, but I cannot see what radio station I have on and I cannot see the song number on the CDs. I called delphi tech support and was told that since I am passed my one-year warranty, I am out of luck. They can do nothing for me. They told me it would be cheaper to buy a new one because to fix it would probably cost me about $80 an hour. I can probably live without the display unit, but I hope this doesn't mean that more things with this radio will start to go wrong. Be prepared to possibly have to upgrade after two years with this one.
two words ----"NO MUTE". Seems like a fine phone, except how can you design a speakerphone with no mute?  Useless for working at home in long meetings!!!!!
Review on GE Cordless 900 MHz 26943GE1 Phone. This phone would not charge for us - we had to send it back for a refund
Garbage-stopped working after 2 months of extremely gentle use. I never even traveled with it. It just stopped working completely making me lose data.NEVER AGAIN I'll buy anything from this company. This drive is a piece of rubbish!
Sound is disappointing. I bought this product to use in my small office knowing that with the size of the speakers the sound would not be suitable for loud playing or large areas. With this in mind I have to say that I found the sound to be poor. Even with the bass turned up and the treble down it still sounded tinny and weak. I did like the fact that it accommodated my older, 1st generation iPod and had several attachments for the various versions of iPods. I bought it because it did accept my older iPod and because of the price, but I sent it back and bought the iM7 which has great sound and accepts my old iPod for a price that is not that much more
DO NOT BUY THIS PHONE. Phones won't stay connected to Base Station.  Read the review from the guy who's wife died while he could not dial 911.   My wife has been yelling at me to get this two handsets fixed for 3 months.   Don't BUY IT!
Cable is so thin I cut it in 5 seconds with some cheap pliers. Anybody with a cheap pair of cutting pliers will be able to cut through the cable in seconds. I know because I just did it. The cable is very thin and is made of pliable steel wire. You could even use household scissors to gnaw through.Having this lock on is better than nothing because the thief needs to have some cutting tool and then has to deal with the remaining lock that is attached to your computer. However, if you are going to go through the trouble of locking up your computer, you might as well get something with a stronger cable
Tip broke off in one year. The headphones sound great--no arguement there.  However, I was removing the plastic tips (which need to be changed every several months) and the headphones broke.  The company has only a one-year warranty so I was out-of-luck.  Again, I thought the sound was great, but for this price I would expect them to be more durable...I was hardly touching them when they broke off.Also, the earpiece can be a bit uncomfortable at times
Bugs in firmware. The minor problem is that the user manual claims the user ID is "admin". Well, it is not. Frustration and wasted time will occur until you somehow find out that the user ID should be left blank to log in.The major problem is that the unit only works for twelve to 36 hours before it has be rebooted. After twelve to 36 hours it looses the connection to the wireless network. Once you unplug and plug back the power cord, it will work fine for another twelve to 36 hours. I am used to rebooting Windows every time it hangs, but I don't accept having a Wireless Access Point that hangs (I am not sure how Microsoft was able to convince me it is OK for an OS to hang). This box is going back. I already bought a Buffalo that works fine
Money to burn.... Please do not waste your time or money on this item, unless you have money to burn.  Don't get me wrong, the car charger part of the kit is great, but the modulator for radio frequency is horrible.  It provides substandard sound, no matter what format you have your audio in.  I tried multiple frequencies, multiple formats, and every setting on the zune itself, it's just horrible.  I am returning mine ASAP.  I cannot justify spending 70 bucks on such a terrible item.  Hope this helps someone else
This product sucks. I own a Infiniti G35. This product makes a lot of noise and the skip feature did not work in the G35
Memorex software good (or bad?) for your neck muscles. This product is a sad joke.  It's expensive of course.  The paper is just heavyweight paper that's perforated so you can bend it and break out the inserts themselves... which takes some effort (not sure if it'd be quicker just getting heavyweight paper and using a paper cutting board).  But, whatever.However, the software is crap.  That's the appropriate term.  Reading this I can save you an hour of your precious time.  No you can't make the template show right-side up.  That's right... to use the software you have to TILT YOUR HEAD SIDEWAYS.  I'm not kidding!  I guess you could also turn your monitor on it's side.  You can rotate the text so it shows the way it should.  But when you edit it, it'll be sideways again.  So you'll have to turn your head (or monitor) back and forth sideways.  What kind of company would sell such a product?And oh yeah... if you're looking for templates for the DVD Inserts?  ... nada.  They're not there!
Not as advertised on Amazon. With serious Sirius reception problems in my office and no option to mount outside, I looked to this antenna to help solve the problem. Adverstised dimensions as 11.1 x 2.4 x 6.0 inches ; 10.7 ounces, I thought I was ordering a huge, Monster antenna. The dimensions must be the size of the package. It's actually about the same size as the Sirius stock antenna with no appreciable improvement in signal reception. Not worth the price and falsely advertised by Amazon.
A Gamble. It's a gamble. It may work for you in your stereo and city? It just doesn't work for me in my stereo and my city. It almost works if I hold onto it. But, upon letting go comes the sound of static/interference. It's an ugly sound.I'm going for the hardwired fm transmitter. A more involved install, but no noise.
Terrible!. First of all, despite the claim that it works with MacIntosh, it definately does not.  There is a template that you can use in Mac with Word, Claris, and other photoshop software, but there are no instructions as to how.  Once you think you have it figured out (on the page) it doesn't print the same as pictured.  The technial support people have no idea how to make it work with Mac, and will probably tell you it is a problem with your printer drivers.  In any case, they have no idea how to direct you through the process of using the Word template for MacIntosh.  Don't waste your money. (I gave it one star only because no stars is not an option.
Better Not to Buy. I'm the consumer of SanDisk USB flash drives. I have used couple of sandisk flash drives (i.e. 512MB Mini, 256MB Mini) before I bought this product.Performance wise this particular product is not doing good. It's taking long time to copy files from my computers. Even it's taking long time to delete files from this disk. So I returned to Amazon and looking for Mini products from SanDisk.I doubt all the Micro products which is having capacity more than 512MB. Now I'm planning to buy 512MB or 1GB SanDisk Mini USB flash drive.Better buy some good one than wasting your time on this product
sucks. this thing sucks, as does their telephone support.  was told that it didn't support using 2 computers.  it seems it should.  am still on hold while i write this
Please don't Buy a Zune. I bought the Zune around Christmas time of 2006. I used it on a daily basis and was happy with it. Early in April, it stopped working. After spending three (3) hours on the phone with four (4) technicians, Microsoft accepted my return for repair and sent me a box to ship it to their repair facility. Two (2) weeks later, I received the Zune back with a note that the Zune was not repaired because the problem it had was not within the warranty limitations. They did not tell me what the problem was - only that they did not fix it. I was more then dismayed. I had spent almost $300.00 with tax and shipping to buy this product. I did not abuse it in any way. Please think twice before buying this product. If and when it breaks - Microsoft will not fix it and you will be stuck with a $300.00 paperweight.
sorry - didn't do the job for me. i've given it 2 stars instead of 0 because after i used this CD, the sound from my system did seem to be a little better (the CD's were not skipping as much).  but the bottom line is it didn't fix the problem as the CDs are still skipping noticeably, although not as bad as before.  ... not sure if this has anything to do with the fact that my set has a 6-disk CD changer
Green Picture. I got this at Best Buy 4 months ago, its been serviced twice, has a replacement board and there is a 2 month + wait for 2 more replacement boards (digital and scaler).  The picture is lime green, especially on the left side.  The Tech keeps saying all of them (this model) have a green picture so repairs won't work ... so here I sit waiting for repair #3 - by the way, don't get it at Best Buy or use their warranty - its a big battle getting them to replace it or even fix it. FYI This Model wasn't made by Sharp, it was made by a far inferior manufacturer, and the picture shows it.  Anyway, it would be a great set if it wasn't like looking thru Lime Green Jello.    Perhaps the other Aquos models live up to their rep
Never recieved any repalcement paln information. I never recieved any replacement paln informtion regarding my warenty. I had customer service email stating they would send me the paperwork for the plan but never did. II sure hope when I need to use it I will be able to.
Works well but way uncomfortable. I will agree with that other review that states this headset is uncomfortable.  The ear cushions are fine, but the frame presses into my head quite hard.  I added some padding which helped, but it is still a poor design.  I can't complain about the function though.  Mic is clear and sound quality is good for my purposes.
Poor quality. It didn't work. When I try to transfer video from my Camcorder to my laptop, there is no image neither sound in my lap. According to the manufacturer's laptop technical support staff, the problem is with the cheapest cards. I stongly recommend to buy a well known brand name card
It worked great until it didn't. I bought this remote with hopes of consolidating down to just one remote. Initially I was able to get my TV, DVR, DVD, and VCR to all work flawlessly with it.I wish the story ended there, but this thing just stopped working one day. It lost all of its settings, and though I was able to reprogram them, the learning function seems to be permanently gone.I strongly recommend you avoid this product
GREAT WHILE IT LASTS... I LOVED this printer!!  The print quality is truly phenomenal!  I had a few issues with paper sizes, too many pieces being fed through, the rear feed slot, same as other reviewers, but looked beyond those because the prints were so wonderful.  And yes, I am speaking in past tense of my wonderful printer, because it is DEAD at the ripe old age of 13 months!  Exactly ONE MONTH after the 1-yr warranty, my printer is "unfixable".  And HP won't do anything for me... after speaking to 8 people on the phone (only one of which I understood fully) and 3 supervisors, they just said that I'm SOL... So, yes, very nice printer, if it lasts
Cheaply made---look for something more solid. When I got this product out of the box (I hadn't seen one in a store before), I was surprised by how lightweight and cheaply made it appeared, particularly at the price they charged (about $80 at the time).  The box I received was also missing the insert for the iPod nano, and the nano won't sit securely in the iPod socket without it.  I returned this product, and for about the same price, I got a much more solid--and better sounding--boom box with an auxiliary input jack that allows me to play songs from my nano (though admittedly without the remote that allows you to scroll through your iPod songs).  This wouldn't be a bad iPod speaker set if you could get it for $20, but at $80 it's dramatically overpriced
Piece of Junk - not durable in the least - even for an adult. I purchased this for my 9 year old son for Christmas. Luckily, I took it out and inspected it while he wasn't home. I took it to my piano and was going to tune it when I noticed that tuning it made the neck start coming away from the main part. After twisting the middle string 2x it broke. First Act includes extra strings for the two thinnest strings but not for the middle. I am very disappointed and will be sending it back. I'm just glad I looked at it before Christmas morning.
It was surprise for me. Before I bought this reader I considered 2 models 12-in-1: Lexar and SanDisk. I decided to buy Lexar.I bought this reader to use mostly with Memory stick. I have 2 cards: 128 MB and 1 GB. I had no problem with 128 MB card.But I could not insert My GIG card into this reader. It just did not go. I tried hard trying not to break the card - no success. It was a surprise for me. May be because my card was made not by Lexar - by SanDIsk...? I contacted Lexar but did not get any explanation of this problem.Any way I had to send it back and buy 12-in-1 SanDisk Reader.
tearing paper. I went through at least half the pack on wasted jammed paper. I truly have never had a problem with paper going through my printer, but this - frankly - sucked. The stomper software is pretty lousy for bringing in artwork created outside the program, but I got that down after two mis-registered prints. SO I THOUGHT I was finally in the clear- until this cheap backing and paper started ripping in the print feed. How hard does Avery have to work to make a decent product. Jut to be clear- the original stomper paper that came in the pack worked fine through the same printer. So I can only assume the problem is this product. Maybe they "reformulated" the product if they manufactured the original. Probably saves them a buck a pack. Truly a disappointment  - and waste of time and ink
palm pad keeps peeling. The left palm pad keep peeling, possibly from the uneven heat.This make the protection pad a lot less useful than one wouldthink, which is most people buy this pack fo
This one's a dud. I love the Saitek 880 wired gamepad.  So I figured the wireless would be that much better.  Unfortunately, my next purchase will be another wired pad to ensure no problems.  There's nothing worse than the few times I really need two gamepads that the wireless one poops out.  I bought this and the batteries died.  I sent Saitek an e-mail and they sent me two new ones.  Great, they worked!  Then they died soon after.  Hopefully their new wireless, which runs on one AA battery will not have any issues.  However, this one's a dud
Good IDEA Bad Product. Okay so I was excited to get these... Thought they would work great protcect my entire ipod from scratches and be an all around good product... Well... Duct tape will protect your ipod also... but i wouldn't use it nor would i use these again...So you clean your ipod great... You go to put on the covers and they are pain to line up and next to impossible to keep all the dust out (a vaccum envrioment like found in labs might work).  Then lets get to the click wheel cover... So you put it on... well if you move the click wheel it pulls off... So i am not sure how long it would stay on...As i said before duct tape will protect your ipod too... I would not buy these again
Good when it works. I bought this item not to cool my laptop, but to provide some insulation from the heat when it's on my lap sitting in a chair. I'm very satisfied with it's being able to accomplish that. HOWEVER, the cord ended up breaking after a few months. Targus replaced it at no charge which is good, but still a hassle. Now one of the two fans has started making a racket when I first turn it on. After a bit it settles down but very noisy at first.
stay away... recent quality is TERRIBLE. I've previously purchased Memorex media DVD+R and have not had any problems until recently. My latest purchase has given me infinitely more grief and frustration than the initial purchase price... Where do I start, how about the fact that the media is labeled as 4X and only burns at 2.4X (gray spindle)? How about the fact that files and videos have errors causing file corruption and/or video dropouts (stutter or DVD lock-up)?. I thought it was my recorder until I read all the reviews... There has been a HUGE drop in quality recently. If you want to gamble with the recent sub-par quality of the Memorex branded media and "hope" every thing turns out ok by all means make your purchase here. For me, I'm dumping more than 50% remaining on the spindle because the media is completely unreliable and worthless for anything other than coasters
button presses not registering!!. i bought this for an exam with restrictions about what kind of calculator I could have ... in my prep work I noticed a few times that button presses weren't registering on the screen (might also have explained some of my answers ;-() ... but as luck would have it in the exam it was happening OFTEN ... I was on the alert for it though so it might have always been the case. My fingers were feeling the "click" though ;-( Anyway ... a calculator that can't be relied upon to register button presses is USELESS
Archos 604 stand-up case. I bought this as a gift.  The recipient told me that the back of the closure snap scratched his Archos 604 Wifi to the point he returned it for a new one.  I am very disappointed in this product
Not in stock as of 2/28/07. Although listed as in stock when I ordered it was canceled due to unspecified reasons -- I assume it is NOT in stock.The item is still listed as available although apparently not for everyone
Piece of junk. Don't bother with this charger, keep looking. I do not have enough negative adjectives for this charger. Echo the other reviewers regarding the sliding contacts, they barely work correctly right out of the package, consistently getting disconnected at the slightest bump. My bet is that after a year of use they don't work at all. And after a disconnect, you start the 8 hour cycle all over again. Which brings me to my second complaint.The charger works on a timer, something that is not specified on the outside of the package. This is the worst way to charge your batteries, cooking them with a full charge even if they don't need it. Get a charger that senses voltage and your expensive batteries will last a lot longer.Another thing, this charger will charge only an even number of AA/AAA batteries, something else that is not specified on the outside of the package. It has four separate charging circuits, each circuit will work only if it has two identical batteries in it (C, D, and 9 volt can be charged individually). Again, this is a very bad way to charge your batteries, especially if the two batteries have different discharge levels.And finally, the quality is very very poor. One charging circuit on my unit didn't work right out of the package. It kept showing that it had bad batteries in it, even though there were none.
lousy. Uses an absurd amount of ink. printed 3 sheets of 8X10 photos one CD and about 15-20 documents and ran out of ink not just one or two Cartridges but ALL six. customer service ay Epson is awful e-mail went unanswered so i called, tried to explain how much ink i was going thru and how the printer would clean the ink heads before every print job but was told that was normal. i don't know if the printer was defective or not, but i do know that epson customer support is. retuned and bought a cannon mp600 and i love it!!!
many people are having charging cradle problems. Once you get this remote working -- which I found challenging, and I work with computers all day long -- you'll definitely like how it works and it's better than programming in codes. The biggest problem is the charging dock doesn't make a connection to the remote so you have to wiggle the remote or put a book on top of it to make sure it touches down on the charging contacts, which means it's usually dead when I go to pick it up. I've been on hold for over an hour to try to get them to help me with this issue once again which BOTH of my 880s have, and they're not even answering. Last time I called, they said many people were having the same problem and all I had to do was squeeze a rolled-up piece of paper behind the battery to force that connection. That solution hasn't worked. They're on to something, but I'd wait for a version where they've addresed this issue
Perfdormance of Audio Technica AT-PL50 Belt Drive Turntable. There was no problem with the turntable, except the sound was very poor, distorted and muddy. I thought it had to be the cartridge, and so stated in my reply to you.I thought perhaps you would provide me with a new cartridge, instead I was offered a 15% discount. I could not tolerate the sound, so that was not acceptable. I have quite a collection of records 33 and 45's. Some of them are in fair condition but the reproductio was very poor.I have ordered several items on the net and that was the first return. so I don't think it was my problem.Thank you,Robert Sander
Beware! No HDMI Cable!. Specs look good. HDMI 1.3a, 1080p, firmware upgrade over Ethernet, etc. The unit seems to be solid (heavy) and well built.However, Toshiba chose to ship this HD-DVD player with only a composite A/V cable (yellow, red, white RCA jacks) in the box. The best resolution you can get with this cable is 480i, and not even as good as an S-Video connection for that!It is pretty amazing that a high-end consumer electronics device which is advertised for its high-definition capabilities and HDMI 1.3a interface is being shipped without a cable set (component video or HDMI) that actually makes it possible for the customer to connect it to an HDTV. I don't know how much cost savings Toshiba gets out of not including a cable that costs less than $5.Now let's get to the real review:Pros:- One of the best features of this unit is its capability to upscale regular DVDs to 1080p. The upscaling is very high quality. The unit also has various noise reduction options that help with some of the poorly mastered DVDs.- If the weight of the unit is any indication, build quality is high.- It has an Ethernet port for firmware updates (and possible future functionality)Cons:- Very slow boot time. Takes longer to boot than my Windows XP PC.- Especially durimg 1080P HD-DVD playback, the unit gets very hot. Make sure your enclosure/rack is open in the back. There is a somewhat loud fan unit in the back of the player.- This player has no zoom/scaling functions for dealing with non-anomorphic DVDs, so you have to use your TVs scaling function. Kind of  a pain since the image quality suffers when the video has to go through two parallel scalers
Don't buy this. This product was absolutely awful.  First of all it is VERY picky about the USB port you are using.  My first attempt was to use it through a USB hub, because my mac mini doesn't have enough free ports.  It did not like the USB hub at all.The second issue I had was range.  I was not able to use it from more than 20 feet away, and even within 10 feet it was not able to go through items at all.  This is an RF remote, but it still required line of site to work reliably.  I was able to stop it from working by putting it behind a large pillow.  Pathetic
Case Logic Neoprene DVD Player Shuttle. Requested a return authorization the day received.  It was not what we thought we ordered.  It has been 5 weeks and still no authorization code
DEAD after only 1 year. I bought this DVD player after my Sony player died prematurely.  Is it just me, or are DVD players supposed to have a longer life??  This DVD player looks nice and works fine when it is working.  The player is a bit noisy when reading the discs, though.  But the bottom line is that it just stopped working after only 1 year of use.  I expected an improvement over my Sony player and I am sorely disappointed
Nice feature set if it worked. I purchased this item for my daughter through the military exchange based on the connectivity options it offered.  The item came in well packaged in a double box with QA stickers across the opening seemingly indicating that the QC department check it out before shipping.  First of all it appeared that the item had been previously used.  The batteries for the remote where nowhere to be found, there was a quick start guide that seemed to have been crumpled into cellophane.  The unit is made of thin plastic and comes with adpaters to accomodate varying iPods.  Once the unit was connected to the speakers and power my daughter inserted her iPod and immediately started playing music.  The sound is below average and there is no equalizaiton or tone controls to adjust it. Next up was the radio.  FM Reception was fair, apparently it comes with a loop atenna for AM but that was also missing so I didn't test AM.  Next up the CD, first it was an MP3 CD, no luck, a copied CD and regular CD failed as well. There are more sources that can be used, i.e. various memory cards but I had seen enough. It's now packaged and ready to be returned.  Stay away from this one.
It doesn't work. Nothing that uses FW400 responds to being plugged into this device, whether is it bus powered or not.Bloody useles
not worth it. Just got this item recently to split my vga output on my comp.  This particular item is not worth the price.  The cables are not shielded, and you will get ghosting.  Even tried buying some ferrite cores to no effect.  Do youself a favor and don't be cheap.  For a couple extra dollars you can get a splitter that's shielded
Bulky to use..... The cords provided for the hook-ups are way too long....especially when you are riding a motorcycle....I could wrap them around me twice and still have cord left. It would be very easy to get caught up in these when turning a corner.  We returned the item..
this sucks, please don't buy it. I had a linkysy router for years before I bought this piece of crap.  It was great, so I didn't expect all the problems I am now experiencing.  From day one, my connection has mysteriously disappeared, several times a day, every single day.  I never had this problem with my old router so I was baffled.  There is nothing to be adjusted, nothing to fix, it just cuts in and out all day long.  It's a horrible router.  The saddest part is that my connection didn't really speed up measurably.  I wish I hadn't wasted my money, or that these things are returnable when they prove themselves worthless! (hello amazon, anyone listening?
Was Great then broke. First I rated it great and it was, for two movies. Then it broke and the picture was scrambled and rolling. The end.
Awful. I bought these speakers for my emac, as an upgrade to the two built in speakers.  They are in fact much worse than the built in speakers.  They are about as loud, which mind you, is pretty low.  In terms of bass, I could not imagine worse speakers.  I'm not really sure how creative could even sell these for the price I paid (35).  Anyway, just really dont buy them, there guaranteed to be worse than whatever speakers you are currently using
The Linksys converter was pure junk!. The product not only did not work but blew out fuses in my car.  The mechanic who checked my car out said the device had a dead short in it.  I have written to your customer service department and asked for money back but to no avail.  I will not purchase another thing from Amazon until my money is refunded
Old technology from Emerson Research. I used to have this same unit under the brand name "Emerson Research"  It's a pretty good unit, but it's a very old model.  For the price, you can get a much more modern one from Emerson Research at a local store
Windows Media Player incompatibility. Incredibly frustrating.  I was quite happy with my T30 until I recently upgraded my windows media player to version 11.  It became IMPOSSIBLE to add any new music.  There is a firmware upgrade on the iriver website, which I downloaded and installed three times.  It just doesn't work!  I managed to solve this problem only by rolling back to WMP 10.BTW, I emailed iriver customer support about this problem and waited 17 days for a response
Buyer Beware Syntax / Olevia / Target. Purchased this TV December 10 after much research. Unfortunately for me the TV was defective on arrival!When it is working it is a very nice TV, but the customer support from both Olevia and Target leave a lot to be desired.Target will not replace the item... the corporate policy I am told is the item must be returned via shipping... you are responsible for packing the item and putting it outside for the shipping company to pick up... and once target receives the TV back and it is processed thru receiving a credit will be issued... they say within 30 days... my credit card company AE says it will take 6 - 12 weeks... All this time with no TV, paying interest on the credit card or paying the balance and not be able to purchase another one until everything clears... I don't know about you but that is pretty steep!Now Olevia... though it is under warranty I again must pack up the TV in the original box, ship it back to Olevia and when they receive it back they will ship another one to me... the TV weighs 100lbs packing it up is not easy and again I am without TV for a month or more while the transaction takes place. If I want a TV at the time the defective one is shipped I must give Olevia a $1600 credit card hold while they process the transaction.EITHER WAY THE CONSUMER GETS SCREWED!!The television has a one year warranty, I purchased the extended warranty... What else could I have done!?!I am told by both TARGET and OLEVIA this policy falls under the "other terms and conditions" ... I wonder why they don't actually say that?BUYER BEWARE OF TARGET AND OLEVIA!!!
DON"T BUY. Or You WIll Regret. I do not leave feedback of any kind on amazon.com, but this time as I was listening to my car audio today, I was compelled to leave one for others. This product is probably the worst of any electrical equipments I bought for mp3 player/audio system. Its sound reproducing/transmission from mp3 player to car audio is of inferior quality. It does not balance well the low/high frequency sounds, resulting in dampened sound with absolutely no clarity. Mine worked ok for the first several hours I assume. I think it damaged the speaker, and it now sounds like it's going to rip apart. Someone else left review explaing this trouble, which I ignored, which was a mistake. Again, don't buy.
Creative ZEN Nano 'minus'. The Creative Nano sucks. 4 hrs and 2 calls to tech suppoert and the unit still will not be recognized by my computer. One of the Tech support help points was to use one of the USB ports on the BACK of the computer rather than the front (not in the instructions). They say that the ports on the back of computers are more capable that those on the front (?). I asked them why they would design a device - with a 6 inch cable - that required you to crawl under your desk to plug it in each time, when there is a perfectly good port (that works for every other plug-in device I have) on the front? All I got was a sheepish, 'yeah, I know' from the techie. Still did not work on the rear port. Then they wanted me to go in and do some monkey work with the computer's register. Forget it. It goes back. It's like buying a radio for your car and then being told you need to work on the transmission to get the radio to turn on. What a piece of crap.  Amazon should have an option to rate '0 stars'
Eh... It gets the job done, but the sound is not even close to the quality of the actual iTrips.  I bought this cheaper transmitter after dropping my iTrip, and it's definitely worth the price.  There's also a faint high pitched sound for most of the play, when it's set to any station.  It works, but not as well as other similar products
Synchronization tool not a hard drive. I purchased this item thinking that I could manipulate files and make room on my laptop hard drive by transferring them to the portable, but this product will not accomplish that.  It allows you to share the same files between two computers, but will not allow you to view the files, move them, or have files stored on the portable without having them on your PC/Mac/Laptop.  There was no indication of this "synchronization" process on the package or inserts. I needed to search the WD website to learn what this item is intended for.  The website emphatically tells you to NOT use this to back-up your files.   I have not doubt that you use it to synchronize files it will work well.
Macally Cigarette Power Adapter for iPod. I wanted an cigarette lighter power adapter for my iPod but this must be for the old fire wire version. My ipod cord is USB... This was usless to me! I am sure it works fine if you have a Fire Wire cable! Double check this before you make the purchace.
Worked Great...When It Worked. Worked after I opened the box.  Took on a plane...didn't work after the plane ride... Tried again after removing and repositioning batteries (repeatedly), then it worked!  Then, I tried to use it again later...didn't work!  Not sure if it's a loose connection or what ...when the speakers work they're great, but they hardly ever work :
Completely Worthless When Used As Recommended. Both Amazon and Sony present this power supply as suitable for the ICF-M410V Sony Radio.  (Check Sony's web page)Only when you receive the wretched thing and go through the slashing, cutting and hacking that modern packaging requires, do you find that this item is completely useless with the radio, emitting a loud hum that drowns out any reception.Now I have to package it up, write and explanatory letter to Amazon, and try to get my money back. Then I'll have to find a power supply that is suitable for the radio.  I have a feeling that I am not going to be successful, as one of the other reviewers has found.So now I'm stuck with a radio that will only function with batteries, after it was presented as being compatable with a charger - why else would it have a female input for a DC jack?To say that I am annoyed is putting it mildly.  What a bloody scam!
Worked while it worked. I liked this machine while it worked, but I started having problems finalizing discs a bit ago.  I got busy and suddenly the warranty was up, and then the other day, it just wouldn't turn on at all.  I had it for 15 months
Pocket Radio. Bought this radio to use in a high rise office building.  Radio' AM tuner unable to receive signal through the building walls / structure.  Works great, if outdoors
Ipod speakers. These speakers worked good while they worked. They didn't even last a year though. The sounds keeps cutting out on them or doesn't work at all. Probably would not recommend
did not work. This drive has a great aesthetic design, but did not work out of the box when I received it. Amazon delivered promptly as usual, but quality of this product is definitely lacking. Look at the Western Digital... that's what I now have and have had no issues.
So close and yet so far!!!. Sure, this calculator does lots of really neat stuff. It would be impossible to give a rating based on the features. Either it does what YOU need it to do, or it doesn't, like any other tool.However, I can rate subjectively, and this thing is subjecting my head to a ROYAL headache!! The LCD viewing angle has been designed so that you only get good contrast when viewing it at a very weird angle - exactly the WRONG angle if you are in a room with overhead lighting or brightly colored walls. In order to get good contrast you must be looking at the LCD screen at such an angle as to make the LCD screen and the curvy faceplate reflect overhead lights, the ceiling, the walls, etc.  If you attempt to view the LCD screen head-on in an attempt to reduce these inevitable reflected light sources, and so that the characters on the screen are not stretched due to exaggerated perspective, or so that the buttons actually face your torso so they can be easily pushed (god forbid) the characters appear extremely (!!) dim. That is, the "contrast" is set all wrong, and I haven't found any way to fix it (a technology that was mature for hand-helds in the 1980s).Now, if there is a way to fix the LCD contrast and I'm just ignorant about it, I'll gladly take the egg on the face to fix it and get rid of my headache. But I doubt it.Then there's the hard cover. Like so many other calculators these days, it comes with a nasty hard plastic cover that increases the thickness by 30%, and also increases the width a bit. And of course to go without the hard cover leaves you with nothing at all for protection. The soft cover some other calculators come with is thinner, lighter, and takes less PLASTIC to construct. But as we see all too often in thousands of OTHER made-in-China products, the more plastic you can get the consumer to buy and carry around, the "better"...or something.So, just like most calculators, the hard plastic cover 'works' but sucks and should be a separately purchasable option. And this perverted LCD viewing angle is almost prohibitively uncomfortable and the inability to adjust is beyond asinine.These are SUCH EASY THINGS TO FIX - it's ridiculous that Sharp would put so much excellent functionality into such a miss-the-mark package. Where's QA on this?!?Made in China
This phone has no battery life. Even with a brand new set of batteries, this handset still fully discharges in a few hours even when no calls are made.  I have the older Motorola MD61 and it has usually a 3 day life even when making several calls a day.  Don't buy the 76
DO NOT BUY. I wish I had read the problems and netgear.com forums before purchasing this product.Huge flaw in this product requires that it be restarted daily. This requires you unplug and plug back in the AP in order for it to stay visable to your computers.Second problem I am noticing is that the 54mbps speeds are very rare, and even at 3-5feet from the AP the unit is around 11-36mpbs.Do not buy this product, find another company who stands behind there products. All of my contacts with them have landed me somewhere in India. People on the phone dont know how to help you and email support is a joke. Latest firmware fixes none of the problems
Never received it!. This item was promised to me as a free bonus for my purchase of Casio Exilim camera, but was never delivered. Now Amazon wants me to review it, so here your are..
Good...But. This is a good case except for the fact that when you want to charge it or put music on it you have to undo the metal thing and unsnap the case which is bad because with the other ones you can just plug the stuff in with no problem.Thats why I dont like this cas
Broke after 3 months. I bought this memory card for my Canon SD 200...after using it for approximately 3 months with no problems whatsoever, I took a video and the card just flat out broke.  First the screen said "Image not available" and then "memory card error".  I tried everything to fix it - but nothing worked.  I lost all the pictured I had stored on it, and found it was cheaper and easier to just buy a new memory card instead of paying to get it fixed...now I have a Panosonic one and I'm really happy with it.  My advice: splurge on the more expensive card from a reliable brand, and it'll be worth it
One of the worst network cams on the market. The camera Locks up many times. It is certainly not for those who want this camera to be monitoring all the time.The software is messy. It goes to full screen mode and never comes back. Ideally when you are away you would be contrlling the PC through remote. It is very difficult to control this from a remote location.The software lacks the ability to auto detect the camera at startup.The software is poorly written by by someone who has never been in this business.DLINK has no support at all.Please Don't waste money in this camera
For Wilderness Use. I'm using this in an area where, as usual, there is no map data for the trails and roads. Navigating through old and obscured trail systems or just passable terrain, to known trails I've been on is very cumbersome requiring switching between screens and allot of thumb work when I should have my chin up navigating. Even then, the functionality is very limited. Seems a big step forward on the software would make this product a really great tool, but so far it's only a novelty item. In order to view the other trails in the area previously recorded I will need to purchase the $100 Mapsend software which contains no useful data for me, only provides the functionality of editing/creating my own base map. A function I can only do on my laptop, something I usually don't carry out into the wilderness.Basically I bought this to use it to document my assaults on various ridges, passes, peaks and unknown road systems, while understanding my proximity to previously traveled routes to help me make progress. So far it's a 0/5 points in this department.If you want to find your way back to points this is useful, however for other types of navigation involving linear objects, such as trails and roads, waterways the software isn't there yet
It will protect your mini.... but the touch wheel is harder to use.I bought this case about a month ago and immediately put my baby into it. Since that point time I had a harder time turning it off/pausing, adjusting the volume, using the back and forth touch points, and setting a stop point in a audiobook. This is the result of the mini being recessed into the case.I took my mini out of the case today and had immediate ease of use with the touch wheel again. The case will protect your mini without a doubt - but you lose the functionality that the wheel is so popular for.Also, make sure you tighten down the pivot head with a screwdriver since I nearly almost lost my mini because it came apart from the belt clip.I'll only use when absolutely necessary now.
Buyers beware. [...]."Sound Blaster X-Fi Xtreme are not based on any kind of X-Fi chip. These cards are in fact based on Audigy LS (low budget version of old and outdated Audigy "1" ). Check the markings on chips - CA0106 means it's old Audigy LS. Even the driver file is the same: P17.sys - you can download an Audigy LS driver from CL's website, unpack and compare it with "Xtreme Audio" one. The only difference is with Sensaura3d driver file - software implementation of Sensaura's 3D API."I am quoting here, but can confirm Blue Screen of Death issues as I own this product.[...]
Not Worth It. The photo is decrptive. The photo makes it look wider than it is.  As no dimensions are listed, I was fooled by the photo. It's only about 11" wide.  The screws putting it together are difficult to screw in straight, due to poorly constructed parts.  You'd do as well putting an old book, or two, under your monitor; which is what I do with worthless old computer books, like books on Windows 98
Be an educated consumer!  You don't have to spend a lot for *digital* cables. You don't have to spend a fortune on expensive cables when you are dealing with digital signals. Keep in mind that all digital interfaces have error correction built into them. Did you know the internal components of consumer electronics are connected with tin and nickel? There's no gold inside! So there's no need for oxygen-free, gold tipped, multi sheilded, super mega supreme cables. If you don't believe me, buy this cable and a no-name cheapie. Compare them for yourself -- you will see no difference.With analog signals, a good quality cable may make a difference (although the difference is usually only visible on an oscilloscope).
Connection problems. I'm having the same connectivity issues as the other two reviewers (Noah and Casey). We have two servers where I installed the cards, running Windows 2003 Standard Server with SP1 and all updates; the servers are connected to 3COM gigabit switch. The connection starts just fine, but it cuts off in about 2 to 4 min of medium file traffic, and the servers become inaccessible - not even responding to pings. The card needs to be reset to restore the connection - only to drop it again in the next 3 minutes. We tested the switch to ensure it's working, and we tested the cabling, as well, - everything seemed working fine. Finally, we gave up and installed more expensive Intel 82541PI Gigabit cards. No problems since then.
Waste of money. I bought this cahrger and I was never able to use it!!!I even bought the correct tip for my laptop but I can't get it to work.I have no one to talk to at targus!!!Save Your money - STAY AWAY
DOA Twice. Don't buy these, they are total garbage. They won't turn on at all, I followed all of the instructions and still nothing. Avoid this
Arrived DOA. This phone arrived DOA and there is no way I could use it.  As usual, you get what you pay for
Cool device, but connectivity problems. I bought the Archos 600 mostly for the picture- and video viewing and sharing ability - the large screen and good portability seemed ideal to share photos and videos with friends and family. The device didn't disappoint - also has coolness factor going for it with the sleek design and easy navigation.My opinion quickly changed when I ran into connectivity problems a few days into using it. While I was able to download and synchronize (via Windows Media Player) easily the first couple of times the device all of a sudden wasn't recognized as a USB device anymore and also froze the "external hardware" management function on my PC.  Right now I cannot even connect using it simply as an external hard drive, and so far customer service at Archos has not been able to help me, blaming the problem on driver issues on my PC (seems to defy logic - works fine first and then without warning stops), a  really frustrating experience. Seems like this is along the lines of problems that another reviewer experienced, so this may not be as isolated as I thought.
Nice hardware - really bad drivers. Ever since I loaded the Targus drivers on my Tungsten C, the battery discharges quickly and won't take a full charge.I've removed the driver, with no change.  The next step was to do a hard reset of the Tungsten C and I'm hoping it will take charge.I'm taking this keyboard back for a full refund
Beware..Not compatible with many HP printers. Before buying this product you absolutely have to go on the web site and try to find out if they support your printer. Their web site is absolutely atrocious. It is so slow and constantly refreshes so it is almost useless. They have a link on the back of the box to a list of compatible printers so go directly to it. I have an HP G85 OfficeJet multi-function printer and the setup did not work at all. The tech support was useless. They kept trying to ask me what brand of computers I had on the network and what my ISP was. None of this mattered except to the marketing department. It drove me nuts. After 5 phone calls I finally got hold of a technical support person that confirmed my printer was not compatible.Separately, even if you have a compatible printer you should be aware of a serious bug in the software if you use 128 bit WEP security for your wireless network like we do. Unless your network uses key 1 (of 4) you cannot hook the print server into your wireless network. There are radio buttons to support the other keys but they do not work. Tech support acknowledged the issue.All in all a horrible experience. It's a shame because their wireless routers are almost decent
Not suitable for heavy books. This bookstand, despite the description, is not suitable for heavy books. If you put heavy books on this, the stand that props up the whole unit is likely to snap off.
Too hard to open. It is difficult not to break them when first trying to open them.  On the flip side once they have been opened once, they don't reclose very well
Too Pricey. Not a Good Mouse. GAMERS BEWARE!. Ok, first of all, IT DRIFTS! Leave it undisturbed on a plain wooden surface and the cursor begins to...drift! I bought it to replace an older MS Mouse (that could not clean its rubbery surfaces any longer) yet I wish I had opted for a cheaper, optical model.I don't know if it is their trying to save on batteries while using laser technology (by reducing the sampling rate), I am not an engineer. As a consumer though I find it UNACCEPTABLE that a Brand-name, PRICEY mouse would loose its target repeatedly while being used on a CLEAN, FLAT Surface!Now try...targeting with a mouse like this! Had to replace it with my laptop mouse to replay FarCry. GAMERS BEWARE & AVOID!!!To be fair, IF USED CORRECTLY it feels good under your hand. Not for lefties thoug
Buy Something Else. I bought two,one for me,one for my son.  He is so disappointed, and I'm very upset.  I'm happy I only opened one.  I guess you really have to be computer saavy to use this thing.  The instructions are useless, the software didn't upload, and I have Windows XP so I know that wasn't the issue.  Unless you are a computer whiz, save your money.  I wanted one for the both of us.  Guess, my son will only have one because now I have to go find a more expensive and user friendly one.
wont work with itunes for windows. also import a cd , money down the drai
Not ready for prime time. This thing has TONS of potential... I ordered one and got it up and running quickly.  the Wi-Fi range was not good, so I got online and saw they had released an update, so I ran the appropriate function to get the update and install it.  Midway thru this process, the thing locked up and I spent about 15 frustrating hours tinkering with the thing to get back to the main screen, only to find out the touchscreen was still not working.  Pepper tech support helped a little, but in the end they wanted me to send it back to them so they could fix it.IMHO, the thing should've created a restore point so in case the update failed, I could've restored the old OS. This thing has potential for sure, but for 700 bucks, I expected something a little more ready for primetime.  I'm returning it to Amazon for a full refund and will look at it again (if the company is still around) in a couple of years.Like one reviewer said, this thing is NOT for someone who isn't into tinkering with linux, so keep that in mind before purchasing it and also keep in mind that there isn't alot of support for this yet...
Lovely sound, horrible build quality. I bought a pair in January and loved them. Sound is as lovely as everyone describes. However, there are something seriously lacking in the build quality. The soft wires felt flimsy to me when I first opened it, but I thought I'd just take extra care.At 1 month of careful usage, the plastic-covered wires from earbuds downwards became so weather-hardened that I could almost use them as chopsticks, and makes it so the earbuds popped out at the slightest motion. At 2 months of careful usage, the wires had half-ripped from the plug--which I repaired the best I could with unsightly electrical tape. However, at 3rd month, the left bud fell completely off.I am very disappointed--it is one of the best-sounding phones I've ever had (I've owned both Grado s60 and s90, and sennheisers), but man, they need to do something about making this baby last
For casual use, most advanced functions do NOT work. Basic connectivity and wireless work. Any attempt to use advanced firewall rules fail including VPN passthrough.  This device could not have gone through even a rudamentory test cycle.  Please read the reviews, this is common and these problem were confirmed by my IT dept and also by D-Link's tech's as well.  On second one, all of the exact same problems.Sad to have made a choice, hope they make it right
Creative Labs Gigaworks S750 7 Piece THX 7.1 Speaker System. Total waste of money, unless the only thing you want to do with this system is connect it to another Creative Labs product, like one of their PC cards. This system cannot be connected with anything else, be warned.
sucks. The player was alright for a while but after like a month the display stopped showing any text and then it stopped linking up to my computer properly and when you call customer service at sandisk they are of little to no help. Overall I would not advise this ite
Yes, beware!. Do not order this item, if you want a DVD player with a 5 inch screen.  This item is not as pictured.  You will receive a small orange colored player with a 3.5 inch screen
Very unhappy with this purchase. I bought this same brand of discs sometime last year on this very site. I was very pleased with the purchase then. I didn't have one problem with the discs.I bought another pack recently and I've been using the pack I just bought. All of the discs are messing up for me. I can understand having a few problematic discs but this is insane to have a whole pack of discs and every single one of them messes up for you. I wish I could send these discs back and get a refund. This purchase has scared me away from anything else related to Memorex. I thought Memorex was a very reliable brand and they would make sure they were sending out top notch items to consumers. I guess I was wrong. And apparently you get what you pay for. Don't be fooled by the good price. You'll just be out of your money and stuck with discs that wouldn't even be worth using as a frisbee. Find another brand to use and avoid this brand
Installation nightmare. I haven't listened to these yet, and I'm sure the sound quality is great. However, trying to get the grilles to fit on the speakers after installing them in the ceiling has just been the most frustrating job of my entire kitchen rehab.
Coby DVD Player. The picture is really nice, but playback time did not last long.  First time charge lasted less than 1 hour and playback time indicated low battery before the end of a movie less than 1-1/2 hours long.  Still need to recharge and try again and see if playback lasts longer this time around. Really like the slim design and really good picture quality.  But not happy with battery life.
Don't be fooled by Amazon. They advertise the Toshiba 32DF46 32" Pure Flat, but they will deliver the Toshiba 32D46 32" which is a round tube. I had to send it back twice which took more than a month. They cancelled my order by saying they are correcting the problem, but as you can see they are still trying to bait and switch. No wonder the price is lower than other places
They Just Don't Make Them To Last Anymore!. The Onkyo TX-8522 receiver lasted less than one month. I purchased it to replace a Fisher receiver I have had for 36+ years. Thought it was time to replace it. While listening to one of my favorite jazz tunes this new Onkyo receiver sparked - followed by the smell of a burning resistor. Needless to say I put my 36+ year old Fisher receiver back in service and continued listening to my favorite jazz tunes. They just don't make them like they use to. More to follow pending the results of the repair
If I could give it zero stars, I would. DO NOT BUY THIS LAMINATOR. The first one I bought broke and the replacement broke the first time I used it. Waste of time and money
sent to old address never received it. I contacted amazon when I found out it was sent to my old address but they said they could not help me.I had to stop payment on it
Broke after 3 months. I bought this memory card for my Canon SD 200...after using it for approximately 3 months with no problems whatsoever, I took a video and the card just flat out broke.  First the screen said "Image not available" and then "memory card error".  I tried everything to fix it - but nothing worked.  I lost all the pictured I had stored on it, and found it was cheaper and easier to just buy a new memory card instead of paying to get it fixed...now I have a Panosonic one and I'm really happy with it.  My advice: splurge on the more expensive card from a reliable brand, and it'll be worth it
Remote System. All I have to say is it sucks! I have bought two of the 479V remotes and they have both crapped out on me. Not to mention, I tried calling Viper Alarm systems and their customer service sucks because they won't even return your calls. They don't insure their remotes either. The new remotes are around $100.00 and it's a waiste of money... DON'T BUY THEIR CAR ALARM SYSTEMS!... it will just keep breaking on you
No VISTA Support for HP laptops. This printer will NOT be supported on 64 bit operating systems!  I learned this the hard way
serious drop in quality. I have always been a fan of Sony because they make quality products that are "user-friendly".  That is why I was in a state of complete shock that this little blue cd walkman is made by Sony, because it is on the other end of the spectrum compared to what they usually manufacture.First the bad...the control buttons (sound, changing tracks, pause, etc) are tiny and nearly impossible to read.  I found myself having to hold the cd player up to my face to find the right button, and I do not have any vision problems.  The little lcd screen is hard to read as well.  Next, the sound quality is poor and has a cheap "watered down" feel to it.  Then there are the stock headphones that the product comes with.  These are cheap and don't fit well.I bought a yellow "psyc" sony walkman a couple years ago, and that one is 3 times the product that this one is.  The sound is near-perfect and the buttons are easy to see and use.  The headphones fit well and the whole package has lasted with no issues at all.I wouldn't write sony off simply b/c of this product, but I would definitely do some research prior to purchasing a walkman from them.
Terrible. I bought one from a store, which didn't work, so I thought I'd try Amazon.com. Well the one I order from here didn't work, either. Rather than go through all the rigamarole, I just bought a new printer.  I've had no luck with HP products.  The printer I had bought this ink for did nothing buteat expensive cartridges--when it decided to actually work, that is. Save your money and get a better printer
Product stopped working. The first unit worked OK for about a month but then just stopped transmitting, if you unplugged it and plugged it back in again it would work for about 5 minutes and then stop again. Returned it for a replacement and the exact same thing happened in 2 weeks. Returned second unit for credit and will buy something else. Both units had a lot of static, even at low to moderate volume level
No optical input !. This system is very expensive, but Bose didn't even bother to put an optical input so that you can get the optimal sound from your dvd player.I strongly think that Bose likes to rip off consumers.I say so because if they had placed an optical input, then there would be very little difference between this system, and their 3-2-1 system. A system that Bose retails for twice as much money
I Want My Money Back and A New CD. This junk absolutley ruined an otherwise mildy scratched CD. Avoid at all costs unless you want to completely destroy a CD. What was in that bottle, toilet cleaner
Admirable concept, but shoddy manufacturing not worth the price. The first product I ever bought from Razer was one of their Copperhead mice.  It was expensive, but I was impressed with the overall design and quality of the product.  I've had that mouse for more than a year now and haven't had any problems, even with heavy use.When I heard Razer was branching out into PC audio, I was naturally curious.  So I decided to pick up a pair of these headphones, along with their AC-1 sound card.  Again, they were expensive but I felt I would makeup for that in design and quality.When I first opened the box I found that the cord was melted together in a few places, like the wire insulator hadn't cooled properly before it was rapped together with the plastic twisty.  I also found that if I pulled these bonds apart, they revealed the bare wire.  Not good.  So I sent it back, and got a replacement.  When I opened the second pair I found the same thing, in addition to one of the fancy LED lights not working.  Luckily, I was able to pull the various bonds apart without revealing any bare wire.  The light still doesn't work though.I am, to say the least, disappointed with Razer here.  I have since read other reviews about people complaining about similar issues relating to the quality of the headphones.  (screws coming loose, volume control loosing responsiveness, etc.)  Gamers in particular tend to use headphones hard and don't appreciate when they "break" before their time.  If I am going to shell out that much money for headphones, I would like the quality of the product to reflect the price
I must have different stuff. After multiple applications and rereading of directions, I can't see any discernable difference.  Maybe with polishing cloth.
OK if you don't need it more then 10 feet from base. After the last Panasonic 4-line debacle....1 key failes in 6 months on ALL handsets YIKES! and with not having a lot of other choices on the market we were forced to buy the new edition of the Panasonic Phone. How bad could it be, we figured.  They have to have figured out how to build a decent handset buy now.  Well, the handset is probably ok, but when we took it 20 feet from the base we lost signa1. WHAT!!?  Called Panasonic and of course customer service probably had never seen the phone suggested to unplug the battery...For Heaven's Sake. Hang up, call back, next person educates me that 5.8 Ghz just means clearer signal, but range is shorter.  WTF??!  We immediately boxed this PIECE OF JUNK up and sent it back!!  Do yourself a favor, buy from a different manufacturer
Not Quite There Yet. I purchased this yoke thinking that I would get a better flight experience with MSFS but the responsivness of the yoke is terrible.  I had an older version from several years ago and it had the same problems.  I was hoping that they had improved their product, but it is basically the same yoke that they had 10 years ago with a couple of extra buttons aded.  They need to develop a better slide mechanism so that there is a smooth transition when climbing or decending.  There is way too much friction between the stick and the collar of the housing.  You often need to overcompensate with a sudden push to overcome the friction which makes the plane hard to control.  It is very hard to get the yoke to center so you are always having to make adjustments beyond what you can do with elevator trim.  But this is pretty much the only reasonably priced yoke on the market, so I wouldnt hold my breath on them revising the design to make this into a quality product. I would not recommend this yoke for anyone wishing to get a true flying experience.  I wish Saitek would make a yoke with the same quality that they put into their rudder pedals, but for some reason they have stayed out of the yoke market
Poor audio output and no mic mute make Big Al mad!. I want a wireless headset for Skype and maybe some gaming. I thought the ZX-6000 was it, but it's not. Not even close!First, the sound can get really bottom out. Sometimes my Skype friends sound like gurgly lagoon monsters, hungry and ready to feed. I can't hear the mid or high ranges of their voices. And the connection seems unstable, causing pops and drop-outs. So I take it back, lagoon monsters may be more coherent. Initially I thought this was a Skype problem but I plugged in my wired headset and I could hear them clearly.I like the headset design, but it doesn't feel comfortable on my ear. I imagine if my grandma took out her dentures and sucked on my ear I could get the same sensation. It's OK for a few minutes, but after that, I can't take it anymore....wearing the headset, that is.Volume levels are fine and the volume buttons work, as does the power button. The call button, on the other hand, is an anomoly. It does nothing unless you use voice on Windows Live Messenger. And even then, you have to install software. The button doesn't work for Skype or Yahoo. But what annoys me the most is that button would serve much better as a microphone mute button. This headset does not have a mic mute! Volume and mic mute controls are essetial on any headset! How could you not have mic mute!So those are my big gripes. A few other things that annoy me:1) The USB receiver is large considering the dongles that come with mice and other peripherals are pretty small nowadays. It also has a cord, which is good if you want to set the receiver on your desk, but I prefer just a small USB dongle that plugs directly into my PC. I bought a wireless headset to...forego wires, not take one off the headset and add it to the receiver.2) It would be nice if the headset was Bluetooth so I could use it with my cellphone. As it stands, it just works with PCs. I know, I'm probably asking too much seeing how Microsoft overlooked some of the more basic elements like a MIC MUTE!I want to use a wireless headset, but there's not much to like about this one. I regret purchasing this headset. I just hope my $[...] rebate comes through to soften the blow
Didnt Travel Well. While traveling in China I hooked up this charger to a Sharper Image voltage converter and had to through it away after it started smoking.  A much better buy would be the Sony charger with worldwide voltage and for 5 dollars less
It's a No Show for 30 days. Well, I can't give an honest review of this product because I haven't yet received it.  I ordered it on June 15, and it was promised, by Amazon direct, not another seller via Amazon, between June 21 and June 23.  So I'm sitting here on July 15 with no TV.......It really isn't Amazon's fault, it's the shipper, Eagle.  But whatever, I'm less than satisfied with this Amazon.com transaction.  I have seen the TV in stores and it looks good though..................
My Book Pro II External Hard Drive. Disappointing, the drive is very noisy, when you reboot the drive runs with the fan on high then shuts down. I would not recommend this drive to anyone
lost sound. The unit has many positive features, however the signal is easily lost indoors and often outdoors as well. If it were not such a hassele I would return the unit and continue my hunt for one that is better functioning.
Use on High Res LCD monitor. Terrible results. Scan line interference. Looked like steady stream of waves
Keyboard works on Mac. SOFTWARE DOESN'T!. The keyboard does a nice job as a usb unit. The packaging does a less than stellar job of clearly stating up front that none of the educational software is written for the Mac
range is poor even with direct line of sight. it's range is poor even with direct line of sight
nice while it lasted. When i first bought these things they were awesome and really cute.  i loved the volume control they isolated noise pretty well just not wind but for the price i guess one can't expect much. all of a sudden the right ear just stopped working.  i only had them for about a month and i wish i kept the receipt or the box maybe i could've had some sort of reimbursement but I'll never know hopefully everyone else has better luck with thos
FireWire was defective on mine. I bought it, and USB was fine, but the FireWire ports didn't work.  Lost time and money sending it in for warranty service
This is JUNK. I bought one of these about 3 days ago and it's already broken. I try to charge my ipaq1940 with the suggested tip and the adapter begins to continually reset my PDA. Not only that, but it drains rather than charges the battery. This is an extremely overpriced piece of junk, you'd be better off taking the large amount of money you would invest buying this product and consolidating whatever various devices you're trying to charge into one smart phone/pda/whatever that does everything you want
Very disappointed. I purchased this radio because our favorite smooth-jazz station became a hip-hop station, and we learned that the smooth jazz programming was available on the secondary digital channel.  However, we could not get the second channel to work with any consistency.  It worked in the kitchen, but not in the bedroom, where we had intended to use it.  Another reviewer has commented on the user-unfriendly setup process, and I second those comments totally.  But the deal-killer for me is that it just can't pull in the stations.  I tried everything.  It just doesn't work very well at all.We live in suburban Dallas.I'm sending it back.  I NEVER send stuff back, but this was really unsatisfactory
Warning-does not work with Sangean radio. This adaptor is suggested as an accessory on the web page selling the Sangean DT-220V AM/FM Stereo Pocket Size Radio.  It will not work as the polarity is opposite of what is needed
ethernet for wii console. Need a wired connection for wii console, so bought this however couldnt get it to work. Is unusable to me.
Absolutely awful. Followed the instructions to the letter.  PCs would not work once connected and even worse stopped XP starting up - had to go back to restore point.  Belkin email support is next to useless.  I would strongely recommend buying a KVM product from another supplier
not what I expected. As previous reviews state, there is NO clip, which is the reason I purchased it in the first place.
Iogear Laser Terrible. The Iogear Laser mice (mouses) are terrible. I bought this mouse (GME521) and the travel desktop mouse and the sensitivty & reaction of both mice are the worst I've ever seen.  Good luck trying to point the cursor where you want it to go.  The cursor dances across the screen even when I'm not touching the mouse.  I've tried them on 2 different desktops and a laptop computer.  It's a disgrace
Not very good. I use a plastic water bottle and the only part that is kept cold is the bottom.
No tape monitor feature. It has been 15 years since I last shopped for a stereo receiver, and back then there were certain features that all receivers came with, regardless of how basic or inexpensive the model was.  Well, I took for granted that they all still came with these basic features, and I was wrong.  I just purchased the Sherwood RX-4105, and it does not have the tape monitoring feature.  It has tape input and output jacks, but it doesn't have the monitoring feature that lets you listen to the tape deck's output while you are recording.  If you press the tape button, the receiver switches away from the input source you are trying to record from!  The tape monitor function is also necessary for the use of an equalizer.  It baffles me that they are still giving you tape in and out jacks, but don't give you the proper switching for monitoring.  I guess they figured they could save a few pennies by leaving out this function, since the demand for tape decks has declined in recent years.  Unfortunately, there are those of us who still like to use an EQ to customize the sound to our environment, even if we are no longer recording on tape.  I have found it difficult to verify whether or not a receiver has this function, since the specs and features list usually never mentions it.  If they have a good picture of the unit, you can look to see if there is a button that says "tape monitor."  Just looking for tape in and out jacks will not help, because as I mentioned above, the RX-4105 has these jacks, but no monitor function.  Then there are some models that have monitoring even though the switch only says "tape."  The best way to know for sure is to try out the unit first, but this is not practical when shopping online.  I have even gone so far as to go to the manufacturer's website and download the instruction manual.  If the section on tape connections and recording doesn't mention "monitoring," it probably doesn't have it.  Also, many models no longer have phono input, but this is easy to check just by looking at a good picture of the unit.  The RX-4105 also lacks an auxillary AC jack on the back of the unit; not a big deal, but a consideration if you have an outlet strip already filled up by other components. Another thing I noted that is worth mentioning is that many newer models such as this one have volume control knobs that do not have any position indicators or scale markings on them; so be sure to turn down the volume before you turn off the unit, or you could be in for a surprise when you turn it back on again!If you don't intend to use an EQ, and don't need phono input, the RX-4105 is probably a good inexpensive starter model.  The sound seemed fine, and it had plenty of power for my application.  The tuner did seem to have a weak sensitivity; some local FM stations came in with a lot of static.In my research I have found the TEAC models RV-S2100 and AG-790, as well as Onkyo models TX-8011 and TX-8211 all have tape monitoring capabilities as well as phono input.
Compare to Radio Shack Model 12-898. Although the RS receiver doesn't have TV reception (who cares),it is 1/2 the price, PLL digital, 3" speaker, DX/LOC switch, andprobably much better quality..
I will never buy one agian. I have had nothing but problems out of mine. first off, the screen went out due to a factory defect only 3 months after buying, got it fixed, and went out agian. I just took the piece of junk nad threw it away. I wouldnt waist my time with it.
READ IF YOU CAN'T TURN ON YOUR NEW PLAYER. When you receive your new Zen Vision M, there is a very good chance that the player can neither be turned on nor be charged. If it CANNOT BE EVEN TURNED on, all other pros and cons of the unit are irrelevant. So I will spare all such details in my review.In my case, it took me TWO replacements and a lot of headache to finally figure this out. Here's the issue: if your new player's battery is completely drained - which is often the case due to inventory sitting in some warehouse for a long time, then you're in for a world of pain! The player is not shipped with a wall charger. So out of box, the only way to charge the player is to connect to your PC and charge it via the USB. Here comes the rub, in order for the charging logic in the embedded code to activate, the player needs to be turned on and recognized by your computer's USB controller! But if your battery is completely drained, you cannot get it turned on. I think you can appreciate the chicken and egg problem here. The ONLY way to get around this nightmarish problem is to find a wall charger. Luckily, I found an old PDA charger with similar power output/polarity/connector to get the thing going. My advice for you is to look around your house, chances are you can find an old cellphone/CD player/PDS AC adapter that plugs into the DC input of the sync adapter. But for most people, the only option is to bite the bullet and pay extra for a wall charger.I think it's as low as a company can go to exclude the accessory that's ESSENTIAL for the basic operations of the product. Even worse, no where on Amazon, on Creative's website, and in any of the included documentations, is this documented. Very lame. I'm not a lawyer, but I think a scheme this lame warrants a class action law suit (Mr. Ambulance Chaser, please contact regarding this proposition:).Once you do get the thing to turn on. Then you're all good. You can charge it using the USB for the future (unless your battery is completely drained again, in which case you will have to go back to a wall charger of some sort).I knew I said I wasn't gonna go into all the pros and cons. But I must say something about the sync adapter. The thing is ridiculous! The larger-than-iPod form factor allows all such connections to be built in. There is really no logical reason for this kind of ugliness. Why? Very ugly engineering. Perhaps Creative will decide to exclude the sync adapter  AND the wall charger in the future.
False Advertising. I ordered this "Complete Kit" naively thinking that the box would include what it said it included with the label applicator: "24 white matte labels" and "6 white matte inserts".  For the price I paid, and what the product image showed on this site, I expected to get what I ordered.  Instead I received a box with a sticker covering over the original contents list, giving a modified count of only 4 CD labels, and no inserts at all!People, before you purchase this item--or any item here or elsewhere--make sure you get what you pay for.Because I certainly didn't
no Range. I purchased these radios for a back up so to speak for my elderly mother. We live approximately 1/2 mile from each other and I wanted her to be able to reach me if she had an accident and could not get to a phone. These walkie talkies worked great within 200 feet of her house but after that the range lost any chance of hearing her. I would not reccomend them to anyone who needs something to rely on!!!!
Very sad about this... The card worked fine for my son's graduation and a family holiday but became corrupted during my brother's wedding and I lost all the photos from that event.  I still can't believe it happened.  If you have an iPod, or other, remember to back-up your photos as soon as you can to try and avoid this
Nice but wouldn't buy it again... The Linksys WIP320 offers good sound quality but:- Battery weak; lasts an hour in speaking, you have to charge it always during standby to make sure you have enough power when a call comes in.- Had several situations where the phone made a reset by itself or didn't reacted anymore (so the battery had to be removed, then it would restart).- Can't join wireless networks which require authentication- offers just a few ringtones to choose from and they all sound horrible. There's also no way to load additional ringtones via the USB port- Somewhere "speakerphone" was mentioned... well, not that I ever managed to get that working.- Headset port doesn't work with every 2.5 plug headset
shipping issues. order this from their website.  shipping there costs $2.50 instead of $45 like Boxwave charges here.  Apparently this very small piece of plastic comes in a 3 lb box
Less then What I had hoped for... First let me say I am a big supporter of the Zune, and it's software. I love it and wouldn't mind investing my money into a second generation early 2008.But these headphones suck, sorry to say the sound was terrible. I'm a visual effects major and I'm around various sound equipment on a weekly basis. The quality is less then ideal. The head phones that came with my Zune far surpass these. My Major problems are below.Cons:1: Lack of sound Quality.2: Can't get them to stay in my ear, feel like I'm probing my ear.3: Noise Canceling feature, definitively didn't work.4: PricePros:1: Awesome carrying case2: Magnet earphones work better then the original Zune, snap well.
QUITE POSSIBLY THE WORST MOUSE IN THE HISTORY OF ALL MICE!!!!!. DO NOT BUY THIS MOUSE!This mouse has given me nothing but frustration.1. The front of the mouse where the buttons are located is extremely low, causing a muscle strain in your hand if you use it for long periods of time.2. Battery life is horrible. Like 2 weeks...3. When your mouse is idle for 8 minutes, it goes into an automatic sleep mode. The manual says to touch the metal lines on the side to "revive" it but when I do it simply freeze the cursor on the screen. So I have to reboot my computer.Absolutely the worst!!
Product Advertisement Deceptive. I purchased this product for my business. The manufacturers' Ad indicated that you can take notes and transfer to PC. Also, the Script is handy to convert handwriting to text. It does well in converting your handwriting. However, if you put an 'X' in all 4 corners of the notebook, it does not stay in the same position on the PC. All of the characters shifts to the top-left corner. The notebook cannot distinqush spaces or null gaps on the page and the characters shifts to the left of page. If you fill the whole page with characters, it also to shifts to the left, as well.My advice..just like the other reviews, do not waste your money on this product. Amazon allowed me to return without any issues. Amazon is a great merchant and I will continue to buy from them. Thank you Amazon!
GARBAGE X 2. Ok.... I bought one of these as a refurb thinking that it was a great bargain... hey 5GB for less than $100 what a deal.  Once you get the hang of loading and working with the Windows Media Player its not a big deal to load.  Unfortunately after it begins locking up and not recognizing songs (which requires a drive reformat and reinstallation of the songs) you get really good at it.  Had it for about 4 months before it stopped even recognizing the HD and no longer worked at all.  I thought maybe the reason was that I had bought a refurb so a new one had to be better... right?So I stupidly bought a brand new one.. again less than $100.  This one has now begun the lock up and reload problem within 2 months of reciept and I just recently got the "not recognizing the HD" message.  I am in hopes of getting it to work but for right now its just an expensive paperweight.  I am 0/2 with these players so I don't believe that they are worth the shipping it takes to send them back.  Beware of this product
Terrible Disappointment and Waste of Time. This was terrible. I returned after hours with tech support and days of email exchanges with Apple Support Desk.The product will probably be better with future software updates, but in my experience, it was fairly unreliable in its current state. Examples of problems: wouldn't download drm managed content online, had problems when downloading itunes purchased music (the first time I've had that problem in 4 years of ipods and itunes), couldn't connect to my corporate VPN, and finally, just as evidence of the lack of QA on this device, the included instruction manuals were for the previous version of the Apple Extreme. The images were of the previous white, button-shaped device.This was a genuine disappointment, and it seemed to stem from bad software and bad QA.  Others seem to have had more success, but I'm back on my 802.11g airport extreme and all problems have magically disappeared
Looks fancy but doesnt serve the purpose. This is really a very small mouse and after a while just too difficult to use. Planning to send it in for a refund. Its easier to use a regular sized mouse
Does not do the job!. The product is a four USB hub however, for USB flash drives, which is what I got it for, it does not work: you can put ONE drive in the top row and ONE in the bottom, if you try to put them side-by-side they do not fit - the ports are too close together. So in fact - functionally - it is not really a four USB hub but only a tow USB hub for the price of four...:-
PCI Gigabit cards aren't going to be Gigabit speed on the PCI bus. The PCI bus does not have the bandwidth to get you Gigabit speed.  You will be very lucky if you can get 300 megabit speeds on a PCI gigabit card, even with jumbo frames.Your motherboard has two PCI busses, and sometimes has three.  Depending on the chipset and the manufacturer, the internal devices like the keyboard/mouse/floppy, internal network, USB, Firewire, and more, will be on one bus or the other bus and often both busses.  You will have to run SiSoft Sandra or pcitweak to figure out which of the devices are on which bus and experiment with which slot to plug this card into so the card can get all the PCI bandwidth it can get, but that will not be close to gigabit speed, either.  Best case on 33 MHz PCI is 300 megabit.Even if you can find which PCI bus has the fewest bandwidth-consuming devices on it, the 33 MHz PCI busses in all consumer PCs cannot handle the bandwidth of this (or any) gigabit card, anyway.  If you want true gigabit speed get a motherboard that has built-in gigabit or get a motherboard with 66 MHz PCI, PCI-X (not PCI Express), 64-bit PCI, or similar, but you're going to pay lots of money for that.Worse yet that built-in Gigabit interface might still be on a 33 MHz PCI bus and always sharing bandwith, giving you less than 300 megabit speed.  It probably shares with other devices so you have to do your homework
unreliable discs. I burn about 50 CDs a week in live music trades.  I can tell you from experience that these discs do not last.  After a year or so, they start to skip more and more and have all sorts of problems.  Any scratches that they have only make it worse.  I recommend using Sony, Fuji, or TDK.  All the others are cheaply made in comparison and just don't stand the test of time.  So if you care about preserving your CDs, don't use these ones
Brother M231 Labeling Tape-1/2 inch width. This stuff is great.  My wife and I use it to label things we don't use often so we can tell at a glance what is in a box or what a bottle contains.  It goes into the labeler without a fuss and works the first time every time.  The glue on the back (once the backing is peeled) requires the the surface be dirt and oil free or it will eventually come off.  The printing will "wear off" if you are using it in a high friction environment such as on a book in a backpack.  However, it lasts long enough that whatever it is on becomes habit and the label is no longer necessary.BTW, if I did not have fingernails, I could not peel the backing off without using a large paperclip.  There ought to be suggestions from Brother about the best way to get the backing started off the label
sucks, very poor quality. The product is just piece of crap. don't waste money on i
Background noise!. The Item doesn't work properly.  The video quality is okay.  There is a loud background static type of noise both on the TV and on the computer video card when I attempted to record a show. The background noise makes the product useless
Not good. The LCD is easier to use than the earlier version that relied on audio clips to switch frequency. You may have to experiment a good deal to find a position where the signal reaches the car radio adequately, like the 1960s rabbit ears tv antennas. Even then, if you are in an are with good FM radio coverage it's going to be hard to find a frequency where this will work. Mostly you can't use this with a cover on and you'll need a car charger if you want to use it for long. The all-in-one modulator and charger that clips to the docking connector is a better solution
Wrong Discription of Item. I could be wrong but when i looked a this item i thought it was going to be a router that would interface to my DSL line. all it is a cheap firewall with a switch not at all what i wanted. the discription should say 4 port 10/100 Router.
Two paper cups and a string would work better. These have to be the flimsiest radios with the worst reception around. If you only want to hear the monster megawatt station with top twenty, it will do. Everyone else, beware
Texts and pictures on the labels SMEAR ! ! !. I just bought these matte labels. When I printed a photo, I noticed that photos come out at the ultra lowest quality, and the worst part is that everything printed on these labels SMUDGE when fingers are lightly run over the labels.Has anyone experienced this? Please share your story
Poor Construction. The teeth on the metal contact broke off after first use in top flight DSLR equipment
Confusing. Basically, the O2 comes with very few instructions, and you have to go on the internet to find any manuals and so on.  Even with the online help, it is very confusing and I have not been able to get it to work at all.  The instructions you do get assume that you have used other MIDI devices in the past and so that just getting a hint written in computer jargon is enough
Which iPod do you have? How to pick the iSkin?. I have now been shipped two iSkins for my 60Gig, and both of them had the holes in the top in the wrong place. There are at least three flavors of 60 Gig iPods in the marketplace at present, and more coming, it appears, so be careful which one you order. The manufacturer's website is very confusing and unhelpful about identifying the correct model of skin, even if you know the model number of your iPod. I also agree with the other reviewer that the belt clip is a mistake. Throw it away.
100% useless for exercising. The Sennheiser PMX70 had excellent sound quality and volume compared with others I'd used recently. I had high hopes on first listen. However, these semi-in ear headphones were moderately uncomfortable after only about 20 minutes. I later took them on a 40 minute run. The design is such that in any position I adjusted them, the speakers tilted slightly upward in my ear. Once I started perspiring, my sweat poured right into the little speakers. I had to stop every few minutes to shake the collected sweat out of the earpieces. The right speaker was filled with sweat and non-functional pretty much the entire run. Who designed these? Consider these headphones only if you 1) never plan to exercise while using them and 2) will be keeping them on for 20 minutes or less
Not to be used with iPaq. This keyboard folds out well and I liked the feel of the keys.However, the IR connector needs to be in direct connection with the IR port in the PDA.  For the iPaq, this port is at the bottom of the handheld.  The 210 degree arm does not rotate to this area.  In order to have the proper connectivity, you have to turn the handheld on its side.  This then requires another software program download (not freeware that I can find) to rotate your screen to the landscape view, unless you can read sideways without getting a headache.Before buying this product, check your handheld to see if your IR port is between 4-8 o'clock - if so, this may be a difficult keyboard to use
KODAK CARD READER. I got this from JnR . This unit powers up but the computer fails to detect it. I tried this on multiple computers. MAy be this was just a lemon. I will exchange it to a better brand
Old technology from Emerson Research. I used to have this same unit under the brand name "Emerson Research"  It's a pretty good unit, but it's a very old model.  For the price, you can get a much more modern one from Emerson Research at a local store
UNa basura. This mic is a piece of trash ...I bougth it and you have to shout to be listened..es una completa basura y una perdida de recursos
A sure 1.5 to 2.0 star rating, I had hoped for more. Trusting to insightful reviewers here, I purchased a Grundig G4000A with a few clicks. I supposed that my Dad's Grundig of the 50's wouldn't be dupiclated in a G4000A; but, all I wanted was quality reception and a nice sound.  My radio provides neither.  Yes, it's a nicely finished set and all it's options work. That's about the best of it. My night stand holds a $10 Sony clock radio that puts the Grundig's reception and sound quality to shame. A standby battery operated radio is a must in South Florida and this set will do that job nicely. I had hoped for more.
The mystery of the Sony CD-Rs continues. I purchased this item recently at a local Radio Shack because it was on sale for $7.99.  In my case, I did not get the abysmal product that others here have encountered, but I did get a disappointing one.  I use an older CD writer (NEC NR-7800A) which is capable of burning at a maximum speed of 16X, and I have achieved that speed with other media (notably Imation).  In my system, however, these Sony discs are limited to a maximum of 8X no matter what data is being burned or what program is being used.  Either the disks are substandard or they are not fully compatible with my drive.  On the positive side, all the discs used so far have burned successfully and can be read by my DVD-ROM drive, DVD player, and CD player.There's no point in buying this Sony product when there are so many others out there.  Find a brand that works well with your burner and stick with it.UPDATE:  The current model number on Sony's web site for the 50-pack CD-R spindle is 50CDQ80LS3 (not 50CDQ80LS2).  If you still want to buy Sony, try to find the current model number
Beware this tricky little backwards baby. I must say that I had to return my Atdec wall mount, cuz it's made in a cut corner  way that should be rejected. VESA measurements are 75mm or 100mm, and usually 100mm we would be using. This Atdec wall mount has one piece @ 100mm, but the second part is only 75mm, so it has the smaller 75mm screw-ins. On my 2 LCD PC monitors, the monitors had 100mm screw fittings, so I was forced to put the 75mm piece of the mount afixed to the wall. This made the piece on the wall set in w/ small distance between screws. Ifelt unsure, and after turning my wall mounted monitor on & off a few times. the wall mount 75mm piece started to loosen. Don't buy this mount. Peerless is a far better unit to get for yourself
Iriver products lack Plug and Play with Macs. I have an Iriver T10 and there is virtually no software to support the USB plug and play interface that Mac owners have always expected.Pay a little more and buy an IPOD.  It interfaces with PCs and Macs equally well.
Not a lot of a value for the money. Too many disadvantages:1. No battery backup2. Even on the brightest setting the clock are barely visible from the distance.3. You'd be expecting better sound from this unit. It's acceptable with the radio, but CD sound quality is extremely poor.4. etc.
Be Aware : you may receive a white box without A/V Adapter cable. Be aware that there are two white boxes in the market. One is older and  there is no A/V Adapter cable for your Svideo input.So please make sure that you have a A/V adapter cable in the box or purchase other brands which work fine two.This is their reply :" I'm sorry that you feel that way but it states specificallythat it does not include one. It is not a defect or missingpart it was how the model was sold. Also we still do sell a oem which is what you purchased only the kit comes with the cableset. So it is not people after a certain point lose outit is based on the model you purchased.
Garmin Zumo 550. Excellent GPS goes from car to bike to handheld easily. Easy to use I wish I had this on my last crosscountry trip.
overpriced and unsupported. I bought the Explorist which I am generally happy with, but this software is lousy and there is no product support for it on the website.  The version I have 2.0 has not been updated to work well with the Explorist, and the 64MB limitation is a pain when you have a 512MB SD card.  In general, the routing works but the interface is nowhere near as good as Streets and Trips
Compatible?. I am sure this product works wonderfully with most devices, however, with my Panasonic SV-SD80 MP3 player, this product was not compatible.  I could still transfer files to it but it could not be formatted to SD Audio support
Not As Great As It Sounds. If you're planning on using this much as a radio, think again.  The reception on trains (over land) is terrible.  The reception at work (in an interior office) is worse.  XM Customer Service will tell you that you have to sit next to a south-facing window for optimal reception.  As an MP3 player, it's okay -- as long as you don't have a vast iTunes library.  It doesn't work with iTunes at all, and the software that Samsung provides is for PC only.  Just my opinion.
DO NOT BUY FROM AMAZON.COM. Better cards are available from other retailers - just check epinions.com - you will find a whole bunch for $19 or less. Also they deliver, while Amazon does not.  The item has label "usually ships in 24 hours", but I have waited 5 (five !) days, and still it was not shipped. Do not buy this card, and check other place than Amazon. The Amazon stinks..
Not Good. I purchased this product December of 2006. I got it and was very very pleased with it. Video, Music, Pictures, FM radio, FM radio recording was all good, never used the microphone.After about 4-5 months after purchasing this product, I went to charge and add music to the player and the USB cord could not be recognized by my computer. I have read reviews of this happening and still decided to purchase it anyway......WRONG MOVE.  Everything I tried that the tech support told me to do via email because your phone support help expires after 30 days I believe did not help.  Luckily I purchased from Amazon and was able to return it but with a 15% restocking fee deducted from my refund.I don't know if its just the Creative Zen Vision: M that has this problem but I suggest that you do not buy this product to find out.DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT
Can't Make work in Dell Dim2400. Tried upgrade of PS to 400watts.  Bios I've set to AUTO not onBoard.Can't rate what isn't working..
Horrible. This product is far by the worst CD player I've ever owned. It's takes a while for the songs to read on the CD and the songs will randomly stop while the eye tries to read the disc. At first I thought it was just my CD, but I changed it through 8 CD's and the same thing happened. The anti-skip is also terrible like stated above. I wouldn't recommend this cancerous CD player to anyone. The headphones are also VERY uncomfortable. Please don't waste your money
sansa transmitter. wrong transmitter advertized with sansa e250 as accessory had to may $11.00 in shipping fees not refunded on docking statio
Do Not Buy, It's a Ripoff. This product does not work. PERIOD. I wrote to them for a refund and so far haven't heard back but in fairness that may be because I wrote on Saturday. They also shipped the item in the wrong box. It was a cell phone charger box. This tells me that doing business with these folks for any item is not a smart move especially since given the other reviews they are knowingly shipping a product that does not work at all.
A WARNING - DO NOT USE. I had no problems burning to these discs, its when I went back a few months later to these discs and found out that none of them work anymore. After further research I found out that Memorex uses the cheapest dye available and thus the DVDs have absolutelly no life to them, my discs started dying after a few months.In addition, in you physically hold the disc in your hands you can feel how warped physically it has become. This is true for all the discs (about 150 of them). I CAN NOT NOT RECOMMEND THIS PRODUCT STRONLY ENOUGH!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
MISSING TRAVEL KIT. I cannot review this item since I have not received it so far at the shipping address I gave Amazon when I did the purchase.I bought four items, and I only got two of them by mail.What happened to the other two items?-Apple iPod USB Travel Kit with Car Charger, Travel Adapter & Cable (Purchased on 09/15/2006)-KOSS Stereo In Ear Ear Plugs - The Spark Plug (Purchased on 09/15/2006)WHO KNOWS..
It didn't work. The radio for the boom box worked.  The CD player did not work.  I had to return it to be repaired or replaced. I do not have it back yet
not exceptional. I don't even use it anymore, didn't think it was that great.  I got a gel rest from fellows, a lot better...
Great for four months. This item was great for the few months that it worked.  I liked how I could just plug it straight into a USB port to transfer music.  I had just started using its voice recording function when it stopped working.  I was able to record a lecture and do an interview with it.  It seemed to me to have a good range and playback.  I typically didn't use the earphones, but rather plugged it into my tape player in my vehicle.  A drawback perhaps is that songs are listed sequentially, so it is not possible to select a menu, choose your favorite artist, and then choose a specific song from that artist.  But, I didn't mind that so much.  The major flaw was that it stopped working.  The COBY screen flashes on and off, never getting to the point where I can play any music.  I can still use it as a thumb drive to store media if I want, but it's a bit bulkier than my other ones.  When I contacted COBY about doing a reboot, I was told how to reboot it, but that it was out of the short warranty period.  I know that no device is going to last forever, but I think that I'd like an MP3 player to last longer than 4 months
Not much better than plain paper. Most Canon photo paper is very high quality.  I print to the photo paper (glossy) and photo paper plus all the time and am very happy with the results.  So I was surprised that this paper is so dull.  It is hard to tell which side is the printable side and the printouts are 2-dimensional and not very bright
Tight fit for the iPod. This would be probably be best for a mini. It was just too tight for the color screen iPod. After working hard to squeeze it in, I had to pull it back out to make any selections on the iPod. It looks good and fits well but it's just not 'user-friendly'
Do not waste your money on this piece of junk. I want to give this product a zero rating! Within one month of purchase, the battery lid got broken and I could not put it back. I made a phone call to creative and was told that the battery was NOT covered in warranty. The replacement would cost me $4.9 plus shipping and package with totals around 30. I argured with the CSR and they just rudely hang off the phone. I will never ever buy a creative product again. Guys, if you want to waste your money and be treated rudely, do not hesitate. Otherwise, choose a more honorabl brand
very dissapoinyed by Brother Products. My last Brother fax ( a higher end model) just stopped working. Can't find anyonme to work on these so you throw it away and buy a new one. I thought I would stay simple and bought a 575 but it jams continually and my biggest problem is only 1 out of 10 faxes sent goes through, it keeps disconnecting. My phone company says they have compatability problems with Brother (Verizon) so I am returning this for a higher end model again. I guess you get what you pay for. Don't buy this or any Brother product!!!!
Works fine but not "Sport". I bought this drive primarily to keep on my keychain and because the cap wrapped around the body and I would not have to worry abut loosing caps.  This worked well for about 2 months when, after the normal wear and tear of taking my keys out of my pocket, the cap popped at the point that conects to the key ring. I say popped not broke because the cap is made out of rubber-like material that I now realise is a glorified rubber band. Sport indeed.   I had to resort to keeping the drive loose in my pockets, have long since lost the fragile thing, and am now wishing I had the frustration of loosing caps for a drive that is sucurely attached to my key ring
Terrible Support. I contacted Linksys to determine the best product to purchase to improve signal coverage in home network.  First tried extender and should have listened to others who rated it poorly on Amazon.  It was worthless.  Then purchased the WAP55AG at Linksys advice.  I set up fine but could not get access to the internet once I connected to the WAP.  Support basically just said it won't work with the WRT54G Router.  This company is the worst.  I would not purchase LINKSYS in the future.
Hard to use, user instructions are not easy to read. I bought this to replace an older sharp organizer.  I liked the old one a lot, but the lines of resoluations were starting to disappear so I order another sharp.  The style is different from my old one, this one has a stylus.The new one is hard to use, the display is hard to read and the user instructions tend to leave out some major details which case some frustrations with trying to set up the organizer.  I had to call Sharp and they even told me some of the insturction manuals for this model wereincomplete.  I will keep it only because I need something to put all my phone numbers into.  But I don't see this becoming something I will use everyday
CONSTANT PROBLEMS - ESPECIALLY WITH MAC. Since we bought this to work with our Mac, we have had nothing but problems.  If asked to print one page of a document only, it freaks out, all the lights flash and has to be turned off an on again to reset it and calm it down!  Have had long sessions with HP customer service on the phone and they haven't a clue.  If we could have been bothered, we would have taken it back, but just live with the fact that we have to print excess pages (at least we do recycle).  There are various other things that also cause it to freak and flash, can never work out specifically what, we just sigh and reset it.   Will be looking for something else to upgrade to soon
Very flaky, contrary to Viking's reputation for quality. I've owned various Viking branded memory cards in the past and have always been pleased with their performance, until I purchased this 2 GB CompactFlash card.It's possible that this card works well in other uses, but I found its performance unacceptable as storage for RAW images shot with my Canon Digital Rebel SLR.  Anywhere from 1/5 to 1/10 of the images were corrupted, particularly bad in continuous shooting mode.  Contrast with my Lexar Media 512 MB and 1 GB cards, which were able to shoot reliably with no corrupt images under the same conditions, and without as much of a lag time as the Viking card (often left waiting 15+ seconds after shooting as few as 3 continuous images while the card to "recovers")
Appears to work but does not when you need to use it. Please be very careful when reading reviews of this product. I have been using the home edition for months with all the latest patches installed and everything appears to work great. It does it backups without any glitches. Most reviewers are talking about this part of the software.A few days ago my windows installed got corrupted after a bios upgrade. No worries I thought, just restore my backup. First the boot-up rescue CD did not work. I just hangs on a black screen. So I reinstalled windows and the acronis software. I asked it to restore my latest backup and it said it was good to go. It asked if it was ok to format my hard disk and reboot the machine. I clicked OK and about 10 minutes later I get a message saying that the archive is corrupted. I now lost all data on my hard disk and my backup is completely useless.For months it has been doing backups without hinting at any problems but as soon as it formats your hard disk it does realize there is an issue. Many people have the same issue.When I got some of my system installed again I did a test full backup. Then I did a check archive and it then did tell me that it was corrupted. So it can not even backup a few gig and restore it just a few minutes later.Please do not buy this software. It does not work.I have spoken to their support department and they told me that the problem was with my machine and that I should take it to the nearest service centre. I have 2 windows XP machines with completely different hardware and it is failing on both. This is the only software that is having a problem on either machine.
Not cost-effective. In the case of HD Radio, the HD does not stand for high-definition, but hybrid-digital. HD Radio implements something called digital IBOC, which has only 60% the coverage of regular analog radio, poor signal penetration into structures, and causes adjacent-channel interference. When an HD receiver goes out of range of the digital IBOC signal, there may be a delay, as it switches back and forth to analog. HD Radio has extra HD channels, which evidentually, are just extra low-bitrate streams of repetitive terrestrial radio. Save your money and get Satellite Radio, Wi-Fi Radio, or iRadio (iRadio will be appearing in Rokr E2 cellular phones), which have hundreds of stations HD Radio just carries local stations. Wi-Max, or wide-area wireless access, will bring Internet Radio to portable devices, including automobile radios, by 2008. Sirius has just come out with the Stiletto, which receives Internet Radio via Wi-Fi hotspots, as Wi-Max will eventually allow for reception everywhere. Cingular and Sprint Wireless have 50 radio channels, available through their cellular phones, for a small fee. As a matter of fact, over 200 XM Satellite Radio and HD Radio stations are free on AOL Radio, so there is no need to buy expensive HD Radio receivers.
Very cheap cable. I wouldn't say this is cheap in price considering the quality. It should  have been $1.99. Severe ghosting on a Gateway VX1120 through a LinkSys  PS2KVM4 switch running two DELLS, and two GATEWAYS with two machines  running SUSE LINUX. Horrible reception for every single machine. What a  waste of money
No workie. Unit apparently does not work with older magnavox VHS.  Wasted my money
Poor sound quality. I recently bought this radio, primarily for my car, but also got the home dock. It was easy to set up and install both types of kit. Unfortunately, the sound quality was very poor in both configurations. The FM modulator for the car was pretty close to hopeless. It only has maybe 10 channels. I found one that was free, luckily. But even with a clear channel, the sound had a terrible hiss, that went up and down in volume at apparent random even when everything was stationary. The occupied channels actually worked about as well (still lots of hiss)- except when the underlying channel broke through. Even disregarding the hiss, the sound quality on the music was not very good.I thought the problem was probably with the FM modulator, so I tried it in the home dock, connected to a *very good* home hi-fi system. The hiss was gone, but the sound quality was completely unacceptable. For whatever reason, this particular receiver doesn't like the compression artifacts very much. Satellite radio quality is, AT BEST, about like an average MP3, with highly compressed signals (some channels better than others). This receiver seemed to exacerbate the effect, and it sounded a lot like a tin can and string "telephone" most of the time. It was vert irritating very quickly.The form factor (about the size of a modern walkie-talkie) was fine, and pretty easy to fit in the car. It also seemed to be pretty solidly built. But all of that is completely moot if it doesn't work properly.I returned the receiver and both kits the next day.
Poor framerate, tricky setup. I really wanted to like this gadget, but I've ultimately been disappointed.  The idea is COOL, being able to see your family and carry on a FREE Internet phone conversation with them, and the price is much less than other videophone solutions out there.  Alas, there are a few problems still to be worked out with this device.Here's the saga of trying to just get the device to work with my network setup.  I tried calling Dlink (the i2eye manufacturer), Linksys (for my router setup), Comcast (broadband connection) and SunRocket (VOIP) for support on this issue.  I eventually got the device to work connecting to my parents' wireless version of the i2eye (which I setup through a USR wireless broadband router by opening the required ports) by connecting my i2eye (the wired ethernet version) directly to my cable modem (without my Linksys broadband router or SunRocket VOIP box in the equation).  I then tested various configurations until I was able to determine that the Linksys router (model WRTGS) was not forwarding ports correctly (I HAD properly configured port forwarding).  Linksys tech support tried but failed to help me out.  I swapped routers with my girlfriend who had a Dlink router and the problem went away (after also configuring port forwarding).  Would have been nice if Dlink could have told me when I called them for support that my router wasn't compatible with their device (though it's possible that my Linksys router has a "broken" port forwarding feature).  I also had to forward ports through my VOIP box which the SunRocket tech support people quickly told me how to do.  So I eventually got the damn thing working after a month and a half of trying.  Of course that is two weeks after the standard return policy of ANTonline expires (who I bought the device from through Amazon).Now to performance.  Even when the i2eye is connected directly to my broadband cable modem my framerate never rises above 5 frames per second.  That's both for the transmitted and received data stream.  (On my parents' end I have to connect wirelessly through their wireless router as their TV is too far from their cable modem.)  I've tried tweaking the "speed" settings on the i2eye to adjust the amount of data the device is configured to send and receive, but I never got an improvement.  Dlink advertises that you can get up to 30 frames per second using a high quality broadband connection (like mine and my parents').  I haven't tested my broadband connection's total upload and download speed because I simply don't know how (probably need some third party utility program).  Regardless I SHOULD be getting at least 500kbps upload speed and at least 1Mbps download speed (at both mine and my parent's end) as that is typical of cable broadband connections.  Also the image quality from the i2eye's "lens" and CCD is horrendous.  The brightness, contrast and general overall "sharpness" of the image is lousy.  That's simply not acceptable.  You can get better framerates (along with much better image quality) from a good webcam using one of the "messenger" applications out there.  Which is what I'm going to explore doing next.I'm going to attempt to return the devices now (both mine and my parents' i2eye) through ANTonline and Amazon with the argument that the i2eye devices don't perform as advertised and that I'm "late" returning them because of the difficulty in testing the devices (you have to coordinate with the people at the other end of the connection to determine if your own configuration is working).  I'll try to post an update to this review with the results of that attempt.Unless they can improve framerate throughput through some kind of data compression technology upgrade, I can't recommend this device to anyone.  Less critical improvements would be a better quality camera (and microphone) onboard and better support for setting up the devices (a dedicated i2eye server you can connect to test your i2eye configuration settings) including a list of supported and non-supported routers.Hope this helps someone else avoid the headaches and hassles I've been subjected to by this device.Andre
Save Your Money!  This System is Complete Junk!. How much can I emphasize that I wish we HAD NEVER PURCHASED THIS SYSTEM?  Purchasing a radio from a dollar store would be a better investment.  This unit is the result of poor manufacturing and will provide you with poor performance.  I'd give it no stars if that were an option.We have had our new Bose system hooked up for about two months.  One major complaint is the lack of a headphone jack.  I have never heard of a stereo system without a headphone jack.  We were updating all of our components and purchased a new Sony DVD Recorder/VHS and a new DirecTV DVR with Tivo.  We were trying to pair down our equipment.  Turns out, none of these components have a headphone jack.  All of these newer components are being produced without headphone jacks, which left us in quite a pickle.  Fortunately, we found a company called "Ramsey Electronics" which provides a headphone amplifier with audio cables to allow us to hook our headphones through the Ramsey unit and then into the Bose unit.  It set us back $80.Next, we had the dilemma with the remote.  The Tivo remote won't work with Bose, though it did work with my 12 year old Pioneer sound system.  Then, I spent another $100 on a decent learning remote that could control all of my components, but I'd rather use the Tivo remote.As irritating as that was, the most irritating thing about the Bose unit is that the audio/video plugs do not stay plugged in.  They are all kind of "loose."  We bought new, expensive A/V cables, thinking that would solve the problem.  We've tried everything to remedy this problem, including pushing the unit up against the back wall of our entertainment center in order to keep the plugs from falling out.  I can't tell you how disheartening it is to be in the middle of a movie with a $1300 Bose sound system and just have the sound go OUT because one of the plugs fell out of its socket.  It's not a tension issue, either.  It's poor manufacturing.Even more flawed is the DVD disc tray.  First, there is NO eject button on the remote, then when you press the eject button on the unit, it will just say "Opening..." Nothing happens!  Then, when you press it again, it just says "Closing..."  Nothing happens.  My husband had to "teach" me that if you push the eject button in rapid succession, you can sometimes get it to open.  That's just swell for a $1300 investment.  I have a DVD player in the guest room that I paid $29.99 for and it opens and closes its disc tray, no problem.  Go figure.  Fortunately, for us, we have the Sony DVD Recorder/Player and use it when the Bose is being "temperamental."  We've only been able to successfully watch 3 DVDs using the Bose because the tray won't open.Also, it sounds NOTHING like it does in the store.  I don't know if they have some special demo disc or what, but our 12 year old Pioneer system had far superior sound.  We've never owned a Bose unit before and thought we were stepping up to purchase this one.  I think we stepped way down.  Also, how can a company that manufactures headphones-not make any units with a headphone jack?  That makes no sense, at all.  To inform me in the literature that I will "lose sound quality" by plugging my Bose headphones into a "non-Bose" component must be some sort of joke.  The Bose units don't have a headphone jack, what else am I supposed to plug them into?I am confused about this.  I've always been told that Bose is the leader in sound components, but this headphone issue is just a lack of good common sense and the shotty manufacturing of the plugs and disc tray have caused me an enormous amount of stress and regret.Save yourself money, time, regret, and stress by finding a different system.  This one will only test your sanity in regards to the $1300 you spent on this piece of junk
short bulb life. Rated as 3000 hour bulb life when purchased, today they claim 4000 hours.Bulb lasted only 900 hours.  Service at "unfocused" does not care about creating a satisfied customer base.  Would not replace bulb even on a prorated basis
4-Year Service Plan for Televisions. I purchased the 4-year service contract thru Amazon (actually 3 years since the 1st year is covered under warranty).  I never received a conformation mail from the third party vendor (Service Contracts from NEWCORP).  I have called their customer service and am currently waiting for them to send me written confirmation.  It is also unclear on whether I need to provide them with additional information before my service contract becomes "valid" since they had no further information about my purchase from Amazon (e.g., model number of the TV, etc.).   If this is any sign of the type of service I will be receiving, I have serious reservations about this service plan.
Mine broke after 7 months and 1 day. good while it lasted, POS broke yesterday for no reason, won't read anything i put in it, phillips customer service was no help, I have to buy and new dvd player... and it won't be a phillips
Died suddenly... repair impractical, lost my stuff. One day it just stopped working. I got the dreaded "orange and green flashing lights of death"... the contents of the File space were un-recoverable... and I ended up just pitching it after extensive attempts to revive it.Apparently this is yet another one of the bad products that Apple likes to keep hush-hush
Not for Comcast / Motorola DVR users. Start off with the bad news.  I have a Motorola DVR / Converter box with my Comcast cable service, and the Comcast remote sends the ADS box into gonzo fits.  Attempting to use the menu button on the cable remote causes the ADS box to switch inputs.  Using the cable DVR fast-forward button cycles the ADS through screen formats with each button push, etc.  I contacted ADS tech service and they responded that the only fix was to physically separate the two boxes so the remotes could be aimed at one at a time.Obviously, this is not acceptable.Too bad because this box does a much better job than my Philips Cineos at upscaling.  Tivo, analog cable, DVD, Laserdisc all look better.  The improvement is more than worth the hassle of having another remote to handle, but definitely not worth it if you have a Motorola cable box that will conflict.5 stars for video quality, 3 stars for user interface (which is not so great), subtract all but 1 star for failure to publicise conflict and for failure to solve conflict.
not fully satisfied. I do not do much printing, but the ink ran low after a very short time. It did not last as long as it normally does when I purchase it at an office supply store. I wondered if it had dried out
DANGER, WILL ROBINSON!! NOT COMPATIBLE with Linksys Wireless PCI Adapter!. Okay ... it's late, and I'm crabby after wrestling with a wireless network for most of the day.I bought this bad boy to strengthen the signal for my network. A few really insanity-making points...FIRST, as several other reviewers have pointed out, apparently you can hook this thing up to your router. Not that the directions tell you that, though. The directions only show connecting to a free-standing PC. (How silly of me to think I could follow the directions.)I popped over to my local MicroCenter and bought a Linksys PCI card and this HSB2. (I'll usually try and stay with the same brand but MicroCenter had neither a Linksys signal booster or a Hawking PCI Adapter ... if indeed either company makes such a beastie.)I got home from the store, slapped the Linksys PCI Adapter in, fired up the computer and went to connect the HSB2. Things were going too smoothly. As soon as I unscrewed the antenna from the PCI Adapter the signal disappeared (which is to be expected). I then connected the HSB2 ... and still nothing. Rebooted. Still nothing.Checked Hawking's website. No user forums ... no nothing.Checked amazon, thinking that I might get some good tech advice. The reviews say you can put it on the router (what a concept!). I unscrew the antenna on the router (a Linksys WRT54GS) only to discover ... that the HSB2 connector doesn't fit. Argh.I call the tech support # from the back of the manual. Wrong #. Search the web, find the right #. I call and after a fairly short wait (a pleasant surprise!) I get a guy from India (no surprise there). I can usually understand these guys, but the connection was horrific ... had to start phonetically spelling everything like a WWII fighter pilot ("Kilo ... Bravo ... Whiskey ... Foxtrot...").Anyway, the tech support guy right away starts talking me through the ROUTER end of things. I told him that I was following the directions (I'm goofy that way) and trying to connect to a PCI card. After a short stint on hold, Mr. Tekkie informs me that the HSB2 is incompatible with the Linksys PCI Adapter (this despite the HSB2 package that says, "Also works with other certified wireless network adapters and devices with removable antennas.") Except that it doesn't.So.....Mr. Tekkie THEN suggests I try to hook up the HSB2 to the ROUTER end of things, at which point I inform him that the connectors are incompatible. Another short moment on hold, and he comes back and tells me that I need a HACST coupler to connect the HSB2 to the Linksys Router. "Will the HSB2 be compatible with the router even though it's not compatible with the PCI adapter?" I ask. Tekkie assures me that it will be.Amazon lists a HACST coupler at about $9.00 USD....can't wait to see what my local MicroCenter hammers me for it. (For installing my network I at least had the wisdom to buy locally so I could return things easier. When I go and pick up the HACST, it'll be trip #4 for the network....)I might return the HSB2 or I might pick up the HACST ... I'm too tired to decide right now.Whichever I decide (and I'll update the saga as it unfolds), this HSB2 is getting one star ... for compatibility issues and inexcusable documentation and a user unfriendly website.Stay tuned!UPDATE: See my comment that follows this review for an update
Disappointed. This may be a good SD, don't know because the company would not allow shipment to Hawaii.  Therefore ordered the Viking SD and it has been a very good SD
RIP-OFF: Doesn't advertise that you need an AC adaptor. I would like to believe that this hub works well- but I wouldn't know.  I bought it to reduce clutter on my desk from all my devices hooking into my powermac.  I hooked up my printer, ipod and digital camera and nothing happened.  I called Targus and they said I needed an a/c adaptor.  It doesn't come with one and doesn't say anything about one in the manual or instructions, or their website.  They said I could get it at radio shack and gave me the info (5 volt, 2.1 amp, center positive).  I've been to two radio shacks and online- they don't carry it.  I'm upset.  Any advice
Ram didn't work. After nearly two weeks, I'm still waiting for Kingston to ship out replacement ram. The ram was installed and after just one day, the ram caused several of the programs on my system to quit functioning.After calling Kingston several times, they still have not shipped the replacement modules yet. It's been two weeks.I would strongly consider a different brand next time. This company is not responsive.
WARNING. I don't have a clue how this item works - I just took it out of the box.  What I can tell you is that it does NOT accept a cigarette lighter adapter, as one might conclude it would, given that Amazon and other dealers include a cigarette adapter as an accessory.
SONY STEALING PEOPLE'S MONEY!. DO NOT BUY THIS TV, I BOUGHT IT IN FEBRUARY AND IT HAS A LOT OF BACKLIGHT BLEEDING ALL OVER THE SCREEN THIS IS TERRIBLE, I CALLED SONY THEY HAD TECHNICIANS COME OVER TO MY HOUSE THEY SAY THIS IS NORMAL, THEY REFUSE TO FIX OR REPLACE THE TV AFTER I SPENT $2,500 ON THIS SET IM SO DISSAPOINTED AND FEEL ROBBED!
slooooooooow. This card is such a disappointment.  It is soooo sloooooow.  I use it for my digital camera, mp3 player, and ipaq.  It takes forever to copy anything to and from it
Did not function as expected. The Maxtor OneTouch iii - Mini Edition did not function as expected. It doesn't backup system files (neither the Windows folder), nor make an image of the notebook's hard-drive. Maxtor wasn't very specific about all it can really do in their webpage.The software which comes with it, is really poor, and offers almost the same that i can already do in Windows with 4 or 5 batch commands and schedule.I do not recommend
Not a good deal. Amazon has decided to exclude these print cartridges from the free shipping, even when you are buying several. When you factor in the shipping charges, you are better off buying these at your local office supply store (Office Depot, Staples, Office Max, etc.)The cartridges themselves are excellent, just not at this price
I've had problems too. I set up a wireless network with the Belkin wireless N router and three computers containing the desktop card. The first two worked fine, although they've been lightly used. They're both within 10 feet of the router. The third computer (unfortunately my main desktop) is located about 30 feet away on the same floor down an open hallway. It's hard to know exactly what's going on because the computer freezes periodically with the desktop card installed. When it doesn't lock up, it has video problems and switches into some God-awful default mode. All three computers are running Windows XP, but my computer is the only one to have these problems. During the brief intervals when I'm actually able to bring up the Belkin wireless networking utility, it either shows the wireless network with minimal signal or the wireless network doesn't show up at all. I've uninstalled, reinstalled, updated drivers, and everything I can think of to no avail. I also have a laptop running the PC card N1 adapter. It works OK but the signal varies between good and poor, again in the same room 30 feet away from the router. Needless to say, this has been a discouraging experience and has soured my impression of Belkin as well as 802.11n. Unfortunately, as I've read reviews of competing products, they all seem just as bad. I think I'm going to break down and run a wire to my bedroom and drop the wireless desktop effort for now
"Acquiring Signal" for eternity. I purchased this receiver in December 2005. It worked like a champ until February 2006 when it began to have issues with decoding the satellite signal.The unit works for five minutes from cold start up, then the audio cuts out. Display still shows program info. Being an experienced PC user, I turned the unit off and back on, repeatedly. The message "Acquiring Signal" displays permanently, even though the Antenna Aiming screen shows full SAT and TER signal bars.My best guess is that a ROM or RAM chip cooked. This unit runs hot! JVC has been less than helpful. It sucks to have to landfill  a $100 piece of hardware, but no one will touch it. It's my last purchase from JVC.Glad I didn't purchase the Sirius "lifetime" license
Nice features but poor display and reception. A terrific idea: Show the current time AND the alarm times all at once. Very intuitive, very helpful. Unfortunately, the backlit LCD display just doesn't make the grade. The numbers do not stand out against the bright background enough to be easily readable. The manufacturer's photo makes the numbers look sharp and clear, but the customer image from wickedpete is much more realistic. The numbers just wash out.It's interesting that the customer image shows the orange and green backlights reversed from the manufacturer's image and from the unit I got. I think that would be a slight improvement, because on the one I got, the orange (backlighting the alarm times) is about twice as bright as the green (backlighting the current time), and it just looks weird.Also, FM radio reception is quite poor. The line cord is supposed to serve as the antenna, but that just doesn't work well no matter how I orient the cord. I can't tune in a strong station just 10 miles away. So back it goes
Did not perform as advertised. This unit failed to provide reliable power to my new Toshiba Satellite A60 laptop. It cycled on and off every 3 seconds. It powered a 100 watt lamp okay, but wouldn't start a 250 watt heat lamp at all. Product spec sheet says it can supply 400 watt surge and 200 watts for 2 min., and is rated at 140 watts continuous. My laptop power supply is rated at 2A input at 100-240 VAC, and if it drew 2A constantly I agree that it would need 200 to 230 watts, which exceeds the continuous rating of this inverter. However, even at that power demand the inverter should run it for 1-2 min., but only manages 3 sec.  In addition, I doubt that the laptop power supply actually draws a full 2.0 amps continuously. I talked to Linksys support, and they suggested returning the unit for replacement or refund, so I did. It did not work for me. Maybe it would work for a laptop that only needs 100 watts, but I wouldn't recommend it for more than that
No Vista Compatibility. Do not buy this if you are planning on using Windows Vista.  There are no (not even beta) drivers and the Windows XP/64 drivers do not work.  M-Audio seems totally arrogant about the whole thing and there are no target dates for any driver support (which hasn't even been confirmed)
Review. The adapter, which allows you to connect your CD player to your car's stereo system, worked fine and I am completely satisfied with it.  The CD player is a different story.  It repeatedly would not recognize disks (that worked fine on a different player), or would read a disk for a while but then stop, just generally very poor reliability.  I didn't return it, as the adapter was what I needed the most and I had another CD player that worked fine.  My advice is to buy the adapter by itself and then get a different CD player
NEEDS HIGH CONTRAST DISPLAY!!!. I'm sure the capabilities are wonderful. That's why I bought it. But, it was so difficult to use - because I couldn't see what was on the low contrast (even with adjustment) display - that it wouldn't have mattered if it had outclassed a Cray. I couldn't program it without getting a headache from eye strain.If it had a decent display, it would be great. Without reasonable input and output display, it is just a piece of junk
Targus does not issue drivers for my Viewsonic v37. It worked OK for 2 months, but the KB kept on falling off. When I complained, I was told that the KB was not compatible with my Viewsonic v37. Yet, it was advertised as compatible with the VS PPC 2002. The worse came when I upgraded to PPC2003 and the KB stopped working. I contacted Targus and was told that they do not have plans for upgrading their KB drivers for this VS PPC.I do not believe that this should be permitted. If you sell something, stand behind it.Very disappointing
Amazon never delivered. I ordered an "amazon stocked" Aquos. After one month of waiting, Amazon sent a notice that the order was delayed another 3 weeks. Nuf said - AMAZON is NOT reliable when ordering TV's, nor is Amazon the best deal available... actually they are pretty expensive
DWL-G820 is a piece of crap. Do not buy this for your xbox.  It sucks.  The unit was functional (well, not defective) and by 'dialing in' to the unit it was able to communicate (with and w/o wires) with my computer.  The first red flag was when the xbox did not recognize the DWL-G820 as a wireless adapter.  This is normal.  It has to be configured with an IP address, which is ridiculous because the wired router connection is normally plug and play.  However, no amount of configuration in the xbox dashboard would allow the xbox to connect wirelessly.  This was even with the assistance of tech support, which is spotty at best.  The folks are nice enough, but getting through can take a very long time.  I'm okay with networks - all of my other stuff works great - but definitely not an expert, and I could go on and on about the changes I made.  I won't, though.  If you prefer painless set-up it's probably best to match brands when designing a wireless network.  I'll give D-link the benefit of the doubt and admit I was using a router of a different brand, but with all of the configuration options on both ends, this should not matter.  Oh, and I read some of the earlier reviews and I agree that this thing runs real hot.  Who knows what that'll do for the product's longevity because I don't plan to keep it.  If I ever got it to function properly and I had small children, then I'd probably mount it out of their reach
Drive itself is great, U3 software troublesome. As a sysadmin, I am administering Windows, Linux and Mac PCs all day, and need this device to go between them all seamlessly.Pros: lots of room for data, after much headache, I uninstalled U3 and the drive now works on all platformsCons: The U3 caused trouble from the start.  Confuses linux machines (I wasn't expecting U3 to work, of course, but it is supposed to appear just like a data drive on non-Windows PCs - instead, it just failed), failed to work on a Mac, failed to work on VMware Windows images, failed to work on Windows PCs where the PC has some policies that prevent full access to the PC (i.e. most work/corporate environments).  Other cons are that it doesn't fit well onto my keychain.  It comes with an extremely flimsy cord to attach it to things - so flimsy it was immediately obvious that it would break on a keychain with the way keys get used throughout the day.  So, I ditched the cord and fished the keychain loop through the actual plastic hole on the end of the key.  But it's too small to allow for free movement, so it is always tangling up my keychain.  The lid appears to be getting looser the more I use it, too.u3.com has the uninstaller product.  It works fine, and now the drive acts just like a 1GB plain data drive.  I recently bought 20 of these for distribution at work.  We unpack them and immediately remove U3 before handing them out - it would be a support nightmare otherwise.  My advice is to buy a drive without U3 or similar technology while you still can.
Horrible quality. I was deeply disappointed for buying stuff from Memorex. Not a single DVD was usable in the pack. Never gonna buy anything from Memorex!
Unresolved Difficulties. This remote was easy to program but has not worked well for me. It will suddenly turn on all the emitters, which then blocks all commands for up to 3-4 hours. "Favorite" buttons sometimes work, other times do not work. Have tried to get help from Universal but they ignore all my emails. Can't recommend this remote.
15db? I doubt it. Despite careful aiming, this has exactly, and I mean exactly, the same signal strength as my cheapie $6 Airlink 7db omni, and is weaker than my homemade Pirouline cantenna. Probably not a bad antenna if you can pick it up cheap, but save your money if you're expecting 15db performance
Swiss Gear rolling computer case. The bag is self was very nice. Compartmentalized beautifully. The problem was the telescoping arm would not stay in the open position, kept closing up by itself. Plus the length of the arm/handle was not long enough for a 5'11" person. I returned this bag and found another swiss gear style with 41" handle/arm that works perfeclty.
KILLS COMPUTER / UN-STOPPABLE SHRIEK ALARM. I mistakenly believed the hype that this thing would PROTECT my computer from BEING KILLED, but instead, this thing has KILLED my computer FOR THE SECOND TIME IN 4 DAYS, EMITTING AN UN-STOPPABLE(i.e., CAN'T TURN THE FEATURE OFF) SHRIEK ALARM. How do smart, talented people idiotically convince themselves that a home product should have an ear-piercing shriek-alarm that can't be defeated / silenced?In addition to doing far, far more damage than it can ever prevent, ask yourself -- do you want this un-stoppable ear-piercing shriek alarm going off in your house at 2a.m.? I BOUGHT ONE APC PRODUCT, AND SO FAR, THEY'RE 100% DEFECTIVE AND 100% DELITERIOUS TO THE USE OF MY COMPUTER & IT'S A MATTER OF TIME BEFORE IT'S DELITERIOUS TO MY SLEEP.
half of this never worked. I decided to risk the purchase based on previous reviews.  I got it and it seemed like it would be fine.  The VCR portion worked beautifully, audio and video.  The DVD portion's audio was fine, but the video never worked - all I saw was jagged lines across the screen.  Would not recommend this product
Part doesn't work. This part doesn't work because I put it on a hi def monitor and it wouldn't come on
Worthless. Zero stars is more like it. No matter what I did in the way of configuration, it would not work. I have wasted nearly a week of my time trying to get this piece of junk to hold a configuration, to no avail. Finally, my frustration with it grew so intense that I took it to my garage and "fixed" it with a mallet. I can assure you, it will not be giving anyone else problems. Avoid at all costs
You're Kidding. I'm usually a big linksys supporter. This is an exception. This device is a joke. Not a very funny one. The first thing I was told when I called for support was it most likely wouldn't work with my printer (Canon MP950). I spent several hours trying to get a linksys router to see this thing with online support. Don't waste your time
Horrible support but a good unit. I bought this unit for my wife and we received it this week. It works great. When I registered the unit on line I found that Magellan's website showed there were software updates for this unit (Roadmate 2000). I downloaded the update and after some difficulty I was able to perform the upgrade. I then found that the voice prompts no longer worked. I logged back onto their webpage and found that the firmware upgrade had been removed due to a technical issue they are working on to correct. I verified all of my settings and finally called Magellan support. The support group was hard to understand (they are located in India) and were unable to help me. I asked if this was a problem related to the upgrade since the voice prompts worked fine before the upgrade and they would not say. They asked that I upgrade the unit again (although the screen showing the firmware and OS versions showed the new version numbers) but by this time I was low on battery charge and could not perform the upgrade. This unit did not ship with an A/C adapter. I asked if there was a way to backout the upgrade and he (Tom) informed me there was not. I asked the tech again if this was a known issue and what other issues I might experience with this "upgrade" and after some time on hold he once again was evasive and would not answer my questions. I asked for a supervisor and after some more time on hold he told me one would call me back within 24 - 48 hours. I was not happy with this and said that was unacceptable to which he put me on hold some more after I told him I thought 1 to 2 hours is more along my expectations. He came back and said a supervisor would call me back in an hour. It is well over an hour and no call so far. I tried their Corp office and was routed by an ARU back to India. I called their Corp office again and after attempting the dial by name directory got to a receptionist named Marti who would not connect me to management. She said she would send me to Quality Assurance and they could escalate to management if necessary. I spent about 15 minutes on hold and was finally disconnected. I love the Magellan GPS units and I have three (Blazer 12, Explorist 210 and the Roadmate 2000) and each time I have had to call tech support I am very disappointed. I have to say I will not recommend their products to anyone else since I am really getting the impression they are disconnected with their client base and provide at least some answers.To be fair Tom (tech support) did say the updated firmware will be out within a weeks time. However, until then I have a nice map on a video device with no audible prompts whatsoever. If my wife was not already used to the unit I would pay 100 bucks more and get something by another manufacturer.In summary be careful with firmware upgrades and don't expect good customer service if you need Magellan's help.
Cheap. Product is cheap and of poor manufacture; routinely causes my iPod to disconnect and reconnect to my computer at the slightest bump of my iPod, potentially leading to data loss. Avoid
Xtreme TB264DKO 264-Disc CD/DVD Case - rebate problem. I also bought this item.  Sent in all of the required documents, including original UPC.  Rebate denied because UPC was not included.  I emailed them 3 times stating that I did in fact enclose it .  Also quoted the number from the copy of it that I retained.  To date, have heard nothing from them.  I have now filed a complaint with the Texas Attorney General, and will follow up and file with the better business bureau and the FTC.Ji
Just doesn't work. Should have believed all the other negative reviews.  Didn't work in my Honda Civic and didn't work in my Nissan Altima, both with original manufacturer tape decks.  In both cases, the tape deck whirred for a bit, then ejected the SmartDeck
Memory card error. My review mirrors of this product mirrors that of another customer posted recently.  For some months after I first bought the card, it worked great.  Now it has twice caused memroy card errors and corrupted data with my Canon Elph, and photo technicians have been unable to retrieve any of the pictures from the card.  Judging by what other customers have written, I'm suspecting that this may be an issue of poor compatibility between Canon cameras and Viking cards.  In any case, I will be buying a new memory card and it will certainly not be a Viking
Customer service disappears. Adapter advertised to work with Magellan 2200t but is the wrong adapter.  Not sure who is at fault but Amazon has not responded
Eh... It works if there's a direct line of sight to the reciever.  In other words, if the ipod is lying down horizontally, it won't respond.  You'll want to use a dock or something else to prop it up vertically for it to work
This is NOT a photo printer. The black-and-white printing is OK but the photo printing is terrible. This printer simply cannot print black in photo mode. I used the Canon Photo Paper Plus Glossy, one of Canon's premium photo papers. The blacks look gray, the colors are dull. It reminds me of a newspaper photo. The review on CNET is misleading - it says that the colors were a bit washed out but they were impressed nevertheless. The only thing that can impress me is how much the colors are washed out.I own quite a bit of Canon photo equipment and I cannot believe that Canon can make such a terrible product. The printer came free with a laptop that I bought and I did not have high expectations for it, of course. But I did not expect it to be that bad for photos. I have seen photos from $80 printers that are brilliant compared to this one. Canon should have advertised this as an office printer with color capabilities. The "photo lab quality" sign on the box is a big lie.After a few tests, I put the printer back in the box and I will give it away.
I am never going to buy it again. It not transparent cover so its hard to figure out which CD it is. I had to put all stickers to recognize Cds faster
Have some problems with the CDs. The first CD in this pack was damaged even before writing :(.  Well, I was able to write the second one without issues.  Hope the rest of them would be fine too
CHEAP. Poor sound quality, few features, not too easy to program.  Don't waste your money
It's just OK. I was excited when I saw the price because I'd been looking for a cheap cordless that had an answering machine. I love the answering machine and the features that come with it. My problem is with the headset; it is very hard to hear the person on the other end. I have to have the volume all the way up, but then I have to talk softly because I'll hear myself YELLING and can BARELY hear the person on the other end. I have to be in a quiet room with no kids, TV or dogs to hear and use this phone, and most of the time, that just isn't possible.
"Can you hear me now?":   I wish. I read the reviews and chose to believe the good ones.  Bad choice.While watching on NetStumbler the product would DECREASE my signal strength each time I increased the power output...even with different antennas, antenna positions and computers.Got it yesterday, sending it back tomorrow.I guess I will move on to creating a wired access point in my attic to get the extra 15 feet of signal reach I needed...but did not even come close to getting from this product
I've returned this item. I've returned this item because the color is not pearl white as the website showed, plus, my friend also did not like this color since it does not match with her iPod
service????. after purchase they want the buyer to call for the service agreement.  of course you want a hard copy, that is why you bought it. just do it.
Good tool for Archos but at very much cost. Its a good accessory for Archos product, I have 604 wifi. Its compatible with generation 4 Archos devices.Pros:1) Good build2) Enough connections to expandcons:1) It very much costly as compare to it utility.2) It comes with charger which should be a part of standard item.3) There could be more cables included in this package like SPDIF, USB Mini cable.4) In this cost it could have a backup battery (extra) that could be part of (built in) the Docking station, so that Archos device can have longer play time.I think Archos has a built in mentality of making as much as money they can, if it is then it would not go a long
AWFUL sound - stay away. I have always bought and liked Uniden phones.  Tried this one based on Consumer Reports recommendation and because I wanted caller ID.  AWFUL reception - too much background noise and you cannot hear the person on the other line.  Turn the volume to high and you get feedback from your own voice.  Good range (which is useful in finding the perfectly quite place in your house to finish your call!).  Stay clear!!!!!!
Not one of Sony's most user friendly products. I bought this just to use as a CD player at the gym. Sound is fine but display is only adequate, and controls are very small. I always need to wear my glasses to change any settings. Would not buy again
BEWARE of Kingston REBATES!. Beware of KINGSTON rebates!Of course, I hope your experience would differ, if you were to buy Kingston product(s), but mine was terrible.I bought a Kingston CompactFlash card that offered a $50 mail-in rebate.  I promptly (as in, the day AFTER I received the item delivery) went to photocopy my rebate certificate and UPC code and sales receipt; then sent it all on its merry way.  Yes, I was well within the rebate period, both for the purchase AND for the postmark date.  My purchase was a valid retailer (think HUGE online e-tailer).The rebate REQUIRED sending THE ENTIRE ORIGINAL UPC label, which was like the entire outside package for my CF card, about the size of 1  business cards when flattened.  No problem.About TWO MONTHS later, I get a letter saying "your rebate request was denied because you failed to furnish the appropriate ORIGINAL UPC code as required by the rebate offer."Well, now  WHAT?  I can't RE-SEND the original (it was already in their possession).  I called, and they insisted on repeating what the letter said.  I re-sent my PHOTOCOPIES and they said a photocopy is invalid proof of purchase.After another 6 weeks of pursuing this, I figured this is their scam.  They simply wouldn't honor the rebate.  And without the ORIGINAL UPC in my possession, I couldn't really submit to their requirements.If you're looking for a RAM upgrade, I'd suggest you look at a quality company like OCZ (the BEST!), or Patriot, Geil, or Corsair.  If you're looking for a value Flash Memory Card, I might suggest SanDisk.For one, Kingston does NOT make the best products, they are VALUE-driven products.Two, there are competitors to Kingston with just as good or better value-to-performance ratios at the same prices.Three, Kingston will not stand behind their customer as I have experienced.I urge you to, please, be cautious of Kingston and their rebate scams
BEWARE! Beltronics will not honor it's warranty. I own a different model of Beltronics radar detector (the Express 925) which I have had for less than a month. It developed a porblem with the display, so I called Beltronics so that I could get it repaired. Surprise! Surprise! The lady there told me they will not honor the warranty of any Beltronics radar detector not sold by an "authorized reseller" and she told me that Amazon is NOT an authorized reseller. So if you buy your radar detector from Amazon or other non authorized dealers, they will not honor the warranty if you have a problem. Check Beltronics web site to verify this!
Lovely sound, horrible build quality. I bought a pair in January and loved them. Sound is as lovely as everyone describes. However, there are something seriously lacking in the build quality. The soft wires felt flimsy to me when I first opened it, but I thought I'd just take extra care.At 1 month of careful usage, the plastic-covered wires from earbuds downwards became so weather-hardened that I could almost use them as chopsticks, and makes it so the earbuds popped out at the slightest motion. At 2 months of careful usage, the wires had half-ripped from the plug--which I repaired the best I could with unsightly electrical tape. However, at 3rd month, the left bud fell completely off.I am very disappointed--it is one of the best-sounding phones I've ever had (I've owned both Grado s60 and s90, and sennheisers), but man, they need to do something about making this baby last
Cover advertised to go with MP4 I purhcased. This items was advertised to go with the MP4 I had puchased and it was entirely too big for the item.
Cool idea, BUT... This device has lots of problems.  The customer support was not very good either.  We had difficulty setting up the wifi access when we got it.  Customer support provided no help at all.  We finally figured it out on our own.  The software constantly freezes, often requiring rebooting.  The last straw was today when all of the applications disappeared from the desktop.  We'll take our refund and purchase a laptop
memorex blank dvd's. In each pack there have been several dvd's that aren't any good.  Too many bad discs in my opinio
Good when it works. I bought this item not to cool my laptop, but to provide some insulation from the heat when it's on my lap sitting in a chair. I'm very satisfied with it's being able to accomplish that. HOWEVER, the cord ended up breaking after a few months. Targus replaced it at no charge which is good, but still a hassle. Now one of the two fans has started making a racket when I first turn it on. After a bit it settles down but very noisy at first.
5 star,if comes w/ own's manual booklet. Unfortunately,comes with electronic format only.What happen to people doesn't had any computer with printer ?What I'm going to do when i need information regarding the navigator on my road trip ?I only got this Garmin 660 few days, so far I'm very happy with it.Except this lack of PRINT owner's manual !This is a great gps, direct me without any confuss.Got almost everything incluing a 3 months free trail of FM triffic message.Garmin should incluing a owner's manual BOOKLET in this high end price gps
I returned it -. Voice echoed back to me - cheap casing that I would expect in a $20 phone.I returned it after 1 day - very disappointed and way to expensive for what it is.The good news was that Amazon refunded my purchase price
bad ink cartridges. I ordered the combo ink cartridge package. The black cartridge quit working after one page. I emailed the contact person and it took almost a week before he got back to me. They sent a replacement cartridge and it worked the same as the first. I will not buy from them again
Good system - one huge flaw. This is a good product - sounds great, gets good battery life, everything you'd hope for in an iPod dock.  But it has one major flaw.  The iPod docking port is really flimsy, and has no structural support aside from the actual electronics themselves.  After a little bit of use, the connection between the iPod and the dock deteriorated to the point that the volume fluctuated up and down, and sometimes the sound cuts out all together.If they added some kind of simple support so that bumping the iPod wouldn't stress the electronics, I'd give this thing 5 stars.  But without that, it simply breaks quickly, and no longer performs its only job - to sound good.
Only bought because Imation Sonix stopped making their label. No where near as easy to use as my old system ,But with trial and error can have a decent amount of control over your Projects.But one interesting thing someone mentioned earlieris that regardless of with system you use these labels can alterthe way DVDs play making them stick and freeze and wondering if its the disks,burner or what..after some experimenting I didconfirm that it was actually the labels I was having so much fun making...It might be the weight but i think its possibly the way the beam shines through the disc and reflects off the white label backing..Dunno but if you all of a sudden start having problems try a labeling tape or a sharpie
Be an educated consumer!  You don't have to spend a lot for *digital* cables. You don't have to spend a fortune on expensive cables when you are dealing with digital signals. Keep in mind that all digital interfaces have error correction built into them. Did you know the internal components of consumer electronics are connected with tin and nickel? There's no gold inside! So there's no need for oxygen-free, gold tipped, multi sheilded, super mega supreme cables. If you don't believe me, buy this cable and a no-name cheapie. Compare them for yourself -- you will see no difference.With analog signals, a good quality cable may make a difference (although the difference is usually only visible on an oscilloscope).
Battery Issues. As all of the other posters state this controller has a serious issue with its batteries. I, too, contacted the company and without any question they sent two replacement... no qualms with that kind of service, but the new batteries died just as quickly. I even tried removing the back cover (which was successful) revealing 2 NiMH 1.2V 280mAh batteries. However, the were both seated in the casing properly. I may try and replace them, however the bottom line is that I shouldn't have to go through all of this hassle. My recommendation is to buy a wireless PC gamepad that works the first time... am I not wise? :-
Doesn't work with the C340. This mount won't work with the Streetpilot C340 - it's really designed for the 2700 series types. wish I had known that before purchasing it.
Waste of money. This is a complete waste of money for a number of reasons.1. This hub will not work with any USB powered devices. So forget being able to charge your phone or running an unpowered external disk through this hub.2. Extremely slow USB 1.1. This device is NOT USB 2.0 compliant3. It is clunky4. Does not comke with a power adapte
Broke without warning. I bought this Adapter because I could use the cable that came with iPOD, (one fewer thing to carry).  Well, about six months after opening this item, I noticed that my iPOD was running on battery.  One of the contacts had broken, and the device was not working anymore.  I am disappointed, but should have expected that for the $10 I spent.
Just awful. After reading the reviews on here I was hesitant to use the product I had just purchased. But I figured what could I lose - it was already skipping and if this didn't work, I'd just buy a new copy.Well I'm here to tell you that if you plan to use this on anything important, forget it. The CD was left with more scratches than before (the "protective" pad actually MAKES scratches WORSE than a paper towel...) and it's just a horrible product. I followed the directions to a T. Thanks Maxell for wasting my money and my time
No backing up, just breaking!. Tried Acronis for about 6 weeks and finally, went back to using XP Pro's back-up prog. The more than several problems I had with Acronis making back-ups. I spent a good part of 4 weeks following their tech. support guidlines. Reinstalled the product at least 3 times. It never was able to provide a backup with out an error message coming up. Finally, the computer crashed and Acronis would not let me access any files on the backup drive or my computer. I had to reformat/reinstall XP Pro.been using XP Pro's backup program now for 3 weeks (full backup and incremental backups)and it has offered no errors.
It went dark after 6 months. I bought this monitor in April, 2006.  For six months it was great.  Then it stopped working.  It's under warranty, so I am hoping to get it fixed at Apple's expense.But I ask you, what kind of quality control does Apple use?  And what can I expect after the warranty runs out next April?I am deeply disappointed.  I have been using Apple computers for 22 years.  This was the first time I bought an Apple monitor.  It is also the last time
Worked like a charm for 24 hours. Install went smooth on my W2K/dell inspiron notebook. Everything worked fine for 24 hours then it just stopped. Worked with customer support for about an hour getting nowhere. This thing is junk. I'm sending it back
Crappy Tuner. I`m very Dissapointed with this boombox. The FM tuner has too much interference The FM is fine if you listen to a strong station but If you tune to a weaker station and your close to a downtown area you will hear 4 or 5 strong stations bleeding through the weaker ones. I`ve tried ajusting the coils but this model has no ajustments for FM only AM the AM has bleed too so if you try to pick up distant stations at night you may hear the strong station next to it. For example I live in Atlanta GA so the strongest AM signal is 750 WSB so if I try to tune into 780 WBBM at night I get 750 bleeding through I have had other Panasonic boomboxes that don`t have this trouble with AM. So If you listen to the radio like I do please check it out you`ll see what I mean. I hope Panasonic will correct this on future model
Device Permanantly Reverts to Japanese Language. If you are considering this device, be aware that it will revert from English language to Japanese if it sits around without being used for a few months.  Olympus is aware of this peculiar behavior but charges you to fix it.  Having owned the device for several years, I finally got around to sending it in to take care of this.  Unfortunately, there is a charge of $95 to give it a 'hard boot' - according to the technician.  Since it works fine otherwise, I elected to have it sent back and I'll just have to find another brand I can rely on when this one falls apart.I'm giving this 2 stars because it is light and easy to carry and discreetly set on a lecturn.  Those are its good features.  However, the logic of the buttons is not intuitive at all and the 'self-directed, non-reversible language adjustment' is simply unacceptable. I'm just glad I learned how to use it before it made that adjustment!  Since I drag the wav files to my iPod anyway, I'm going to explore that avenue for recording presentations in the future
Sub par experience. Well, I did considerable research for comparable low-budget microphones.  I have a 3-chip Panasonic consumer video camera and I'm interested in producing documentaries, shorts and travel videos.  My goal was to enhance the audio that came standard with my PV GS300 when filming and capturing both near and far-range audio.I performed a few mic. tests to create a standard for evaluation.  I filmed six scenes.  3 scenes at close-range with these 3 mics, and 3 scenes at long-range using these 3 different mics.  I used iMovie to import my recordings to evaluate the audio.   For this review I tested my on-board stock mic., a Radioshack lavaliere mic. and the Audio Technica mic.  My results are as follows:I. Out-of-the-box standard mic.: Performs with mediocre results, less than desired by Current.tv standards.  The recorded audio has a slight echo/ reverberation, it performs like a stock mic. is expected to perform and produces a somewhat muffled sound.II. Audio Technica Mic.: Disappointing sound quality.  For $53 I expected this mic. to improve upon my equipment's stock microphone; it did not.  The regular setting was just as loud and clear as the stock mic.  The upside is that it had slightly less of an echo than the stock mic. but it also delivered a softer audio recording.  The Tele setting essentially acted as a volume increase; the subject was louder, but so were ambient noises.  Overall it was difficult to distinguish between this mic. and the on-board mic.; and certainly not worth the extra duckets.III. Radioshack lavaliere mic: The audio was significantly enhanced.  When interviewing a subject sitting 3 feet away the recording of both my questions and the subject's answers were louder and clearer.  Down-side : this mic. is less convenient because it requires attaching a corded microphone to the subject's lapel.  There are ways around this like a wireless receiver but what is gained in audio might be lost by creating technical intricacies with your subject.  Don't forget to switch the mic. on; this one also requires a stereo adapter.I was hoping this Audio Technica mic. would provide an increase in performance worth the additional cost.  The lesson I learned is that it is all or nothing.  Shell out $200 for a pro/pro-sumer grade mic. or get by with what you have.   You can improve your situation with a lav. mic. but so far I have not discovered a budget shotgun mic
Back up your data now!. I bought this drive in late 2003, and it's gone through a moderate amount of use in a home environment since then. The positives first - though it has an 8MB buffer it is very fast, and can even stand its ground against some newer disks with larger buffers.It does make quite a bit of noise and heats up a bit more compared to my older 40gig and 20gig WD's, and the newer seagates.2.5 years after purchase, the drive started corrupting files like crazy. WD has tools on their site to check your disk status, and sure enough it was due for an RMA. When I checked the warranty status online, 6 months had mysteriously 'vanished' from my warranty period. The drive warranty had started 6 months before I'd purchased it! Anyway, it was still valid and they sent me a replacement very quick.Still, this is my second WD drive to die, and I'm going with other brands from now.
About This Thing. This product is not for the heavy handedafter 2 weeks of use one of the slots was non functional because spring leaf to hold the card against the contacts some how managed to get bent into the path of the card, and seeing that the slot is for a flash card it is almost impossible to get any tool to fit to do any 'repairs'.on the bright side it did work with the stated flash types
No Audio Punch Through!?. The remote would be fine, except it will not allow you to "punch through" the volume to your receiver, only your TV. This makes the whole thing pretty useless.Our home theater, like almost everyone's, uses our surround theater for sound. Why you can't punch through the volume controls to it is completely baffling. I did a web search and it's apparently baffling to everyone else as well.Back to the store it goes! Utterly worthless
Stopped working after one movie. I was so happy with the first DVD I played - then the second and every next DVD would not load.  The player has never left my kitchen table - no chance for abuse.  I sure hope I can return it - it was expensice
Sony SRF-M85V S2  -  poor design and recepction. I have been using the Sony Walkman receivers for years, and am familiar with the product.  Two major problems with this model:First, setting radio stations with this model (I need the instructions) is much more difficult than in the previous model (intuitive).Second, the reception is horrible.
Confirmed - No go for Dell's. Bought one of these fellers for my laptop to use one of the old IBM  'clicky' type keyboards; no trouble using the keyboard with any computer with a ps/2 connector, but the USB converter is not recoginzed with the Dell
dwt108 double wide 108 disc dvd tower. Was a little hard putting it together.  You have to be very careful taking the cds out or it would fall apart.  I am not happy with this product
You get what you pay for. Basically this is a cheap item that should not be purchased. You can spend a little more and get a nicer and better equipped item. I bought this for my young daughter to download only minimal amounts of music so I thought for the price, this would be fine. However, it simply would not download songs. It continually 'locked up'. When it would finally download, the ear piece had static throughout. Finally, upon downloading  one CD, you were forced to erase that CD to download another. I have sent this back to the manufacturer for a refund. Upon telling the salesperson about my reasoning for returning the product, there was no questions. This is probably commonplace for this product.
Horrible use of battery power - PURCHASE NOT RECOMMENDED. This would be a great wireless mouse if it weren't for it's battery usage. It runs on dual AAA batteries. They need replacing about every 2-3 weeks. I DO NOT recommend this mouse. Instead of adding to my large collection of AAA batteries, I'm purchasing another mouse that handles battery usage efficiently.
Worst Warranty Service I have ever experienced. This TV has a great picture and would be a 5 star rating if it had acceptablewarranty service. I bought this TV in December and it worked great for about a month. The cooling fan for the bulb started malfunctioning and would only allow the TV to work for a few minutes before shutting it down. I reported the problem to Samsung and have waited for three weeks with no resolution. They say the reason for the delay is the lack of a local authorized repair center to perform the in-home repair. I have no idea of how much longer I will have to wait before I get my TV replaced or repaired.I cannot recommend Samsung because of their poor warranty service....buy a Sony!!
DVD operation is very poor. While the price for this HTS is very nice, the performance is substandard.  There's a hissing sound when the unit is off.  The DVD player has trouble playing DVDs.  I have a large DVD collection & most of them don't play.  The surround quality is also very poor. It's a stretch to call it surround sound when half of the speakers don't put out much sound.  In order to get this serviced, I have to send it out for up to 3 months.  I bought a progressive DVD player, put the audio through the Phillips HTS 3400 and the video to the TV and suddenly the picture was better and the sound was better.
Easy to Use But Unreliable. We bought this phone two years ago.  While the phone is pretty easy to use and has nice features (I've especially enjoyed the handsfree function on the handsets), we've found it to be extremely unreliable.  The problems we've had are listed below:*very short battery life for the handsets*the screen on one of our handsets blanked out after only several months of use*the handsets go "out of range" when one takes them only a modest distance from the base (even though we have the base in the middle of our house, the handsets don't work at the ends-- and our house is not that big)*the handsets randomly become "unregistered" from the base and have to be reset (this has only become a problem in the past month)The issues we've had with this phone have frustrated us so much that we are now shopping for a new phone-- usually we'd expect such a purchase to last longer than two years
Kingston 2 GB SD Memory Card. This SD would not work in my  Nikon  Coolpix S6 camera (but the Fuji and Sandisk product did
Belkin Kaiser Napa, feminine and not well represented. Unfortunately this item was not at all what I was expecting or wanted. Amazon did not have a pic, but I chekced other wesites and found the same pic on each one, none acturately represented the case.The exterior of the front is very feminine. It has stiching that makes in appear padded into diamond shapes
Awkward data entry. Well, technically, it does everything it says it does. but data entry is awkward, having to toggle between the "calculator" screen for numbers and the alpha screen for letters, and then going to a whole other screen for symbols. For the reminder section, I can not turn off the alarm for my entry's. Takes me an average of 4 times to input any one entry.Pedometer is great, but the clip of the case isn't great, and keeps unhooking from my belt. plus it counts normal movement such as lifting the unit as a step, so not entirely accurate.Overall, this takes so long to use, it was a waste of my money and I find myself reverting to the post-it method of remembering things
not ready for prime time. Primitive menu systemChoppy output at HDWireless not quite fast enoughNO PAUSE BUTTON. If you stop the video, you get to start at the beginning again.Media Center software is at revision 0.01aIt's a good idea. Come back in 18 months
I am not too happy. The item is good, the sound is decent but i tought than a refurbished item was an item that you can hardly say it's used. The speakers i got did not look good at all. Scrached and dirty, you can see it was used for a very long time. No too happy about this item
Unmet Expectations. Seemed to be just what I was looking for. But that was not reality.While the unit looks nice and had a good price, for use a low volumes in a room setting, it just did not but it. It had a constant hum when music was not play. The remote was difficult to change the settings. The sound waulity at low volumes was poor and had little base. The knob on the front were difficult to spin as they are flush to the face. In an outdoor setting this may work as intended but it was not what I needed. The blue light LCD is very bright in a dark room. Also be careful of the return policy and don't expect any reply to e-mails. Maybe my unit was defective, but I will never know
Poor quality - avoid. I have a collection of over 1500 disks so I have bought many cd/dvd cases over the years and this brand is the worst quality on any that I have purchased.  I would avoid this brand.[...
Belkin 12' S Cable. The ends are comming off this cable doesn't meet the normal Belkin standards
Overpriced --underprotected. Just received the flex skin and my first thought is that this is way over priced.  This is a $5.00 piece of soft plastic that will do very little to protect the unit.  It will protect against scratching, but only the areas of the unit you're not really concerned about.  The screen is totally exposed, so it can be scratched when in the unit.  I'm sure that's so you can see the screen better, but a clear protective cover (that can open and close) over the screen would have been nice.  Anyway, at $25.00 this is too much to spend.  I'm ordering a leather cover with a kick stand (which by the way you need if you want to stand it up on your desk or on a table) for less than the price of this product.  I feel I just flushed $25.00 bucks down the drain, hopefully you will not.
IOGear DVI CS1764. I got this device to connect two laptops and two desktops, to one screen and one keyboard and mouse. The Mouse is a Microsoft Intellimouse, and the keyboard is a MS internet keyboard Pro, none of these devices work with the IOgear CS1764. I have to plug my mouse and keyboard on the back of the CS1764, to be able to use them, but lose all the keyboard short cuts functionality. Also after some hours the USB devices plug on the back are not available to the my windows or linux OS, requiring me to unplug and plug the devices again
DON'T BUY THIS PRODUCT!. This player is junk.  It would not play music for more than two hours before going dead.  When I called Toshiba, the person that I talked to claimed he wasn't aware battery life was even a problem.  I directed him to read some of the reviews on C-NET, which I discovered after I bought it. (My fault) It was finally returned and the battery was replaced.  Now (after two weeks) it won't even hold a charge.  I'm returning it and will not recommend this to anyone
Frustration PLUS!  Flimsy construction!. Instructions which come with this item are woefully inadequate to get a person started. Everything I tried to make it work with my iPaq pocket PC resulted in building frustration when it STILL wouldn't work.  I finally decided to set the keyboard aside and went to fold it back up, only it started to break up instead!The end of all this was that the keyboard wound up in two pieces (roughly) on the floor.  [...] and I will no longer consider ANY bluetooth keyboard for my iPaq
Broke in less than a year. The player stopped working after only a few months - it would accept DVDs but not play them and refuse to eject them.  That behavior started out as intermittent, but it finally gave up the ghost and swallowed a DVD and never let go.  We had to take the player apart just to get the DVD out before throwing the player away in the trash.  Our previous DVD player lasted over 5 years before it started skipping.  This one lasted less than a year before it stopped working altogether - what a waste.  Save your time and money and buy another machine
Limited use if you don't live in a highly populated city.The price is not  warranted to its usefulness. Garmin needs to have a chip to up-grade changes in the NUVI 660 in the restaurant section each year.This week I went to three places coded in for Italain,two had changed and one was out of business
Sound good, wires weak. I loved these earbuds for 5 weeks, right up until they stopped working.  The wires to the iPod (the stationary wires, not the ones that wind up) disconnected or broke inside the retractable casing.  For a while it worked if I taped the cord so it pushed the wires into the case.  But quickly stopped working altogether.Too bad, they're comfortable, the sound is fine (great on the bus), and the retraction works good.
Far too overpriced for this length!! You shouldn't spend more than $10. Much like the previous reviewer I urge you not to spend lots of money on HDMI cables. HDMI specs state that only one pixel out of every billion can be lost, therefore there is no reason, no matter what the cable is made of, to spend money on HDMI cables.Search the internet, you can find plenty of good 10ft HDMI cables for $10 or less.Digital is zeroes and ones. In HDMI's case, either the cable is connected or it isn't
Horrible sound. Hardly any bass, tinny treble, not natural-sounding for acoustic instruments, concert/jazz bands, and string orchestras. Don't get these, go with Philips HS500 or Sennheiser PMX60 instead. Both sound much better than this
Great Quality Recordings - but completely incompatible with macs. What's annoying about this solid recorder is that Sony hasn't elected to make it compatible with mac.  It records in a proprietary format which you can't convert out of (or even play) in mac, and it's not exactly easy to convert out of the msw format in windows either (requiring multiple different downloads, or an initial conversion to aiff with the provided software).  For a while I had to run virtual pc to get my recordings - and that is just way too much hassle.I used to love Sony's products, but now, I just wish they would work with other technologies in my workstream (Sony should look to how apple learned its lesson with interoperability)
Good Sound Poor Craftsmanship. It's sounds great for a FM transmitter.  Beware I bought 3 of them, each time one of the channels would go out.  Usually in less than a week.  I liked the sound so much I even made up a splint type thing for the cord.  Nothing works. Irock if you read these reviews then answer this.  Why would you make the cord so flexible if it was going to cause it to malfunction?I would pay ten dollars more if the thing would last!Got the Belkin digital one (not the 4 station preset one) and it doesn't sound as good. BUT IT WORKS FOR MORE THAN A WEEK!!!
Worked for a while. When it worked, it did as described, but twice it stopped functioning and all data was lost.  Now when it is connected the computer fails to recognize it.  There are many better, more reliable brands, such as the Sony Micro Vault which I have now.  Nevertheless I wouldn't put anything on these that I didn't have backed up.  These drives heat up if you leave them connected to the computer.  Heat will cause them to fail faster
For OS X, a uselessly slow hard drive. I use this thing with a MacBook Pro. Actually, I don't use it. My plan was to keep all of my iTunes music and movies on it, but whether I use wireless or a 25 ft ethernet cable, it's unusably slow. iTunes takes forever to start (and keeps losing its library), and movies and tv shows play choppily unless I use the ethernet cable.I also tried making backups with SuperDuper. After 24 hours a tiny fraction had been backed up.So I've given up.I use a Firewire hard drive for my bootable SuperDuper backups, and a small USB 150G Fantom drive for iTunes.The HP MediaVault? A paperweight. Maybe it works well on a PC -- it doesn't with Parallels --, I don't know
Usable, but critically flawed. The plastic case is sturdy and clear -- viewing the video screen through the plastic is not a problem.There are, however, two major design flaws:1. The cutout hole for the hold button is only slightly larger than the hold button itself.  Though this offers the best protection, it makes the hold button very difficult to reach, since the plastic is 3/32" thick.2. The bottom of the case leaves a hole for the sync/charge cable.  However, because of the proximity of the hinges, it's almost impossible to use the Apple-provided USB sync cable, since this cable is the locking variety with the unlock buttons on the sides of the cable plug.  Once the sync cable is inserted and the lock engaged, a narrow object like a knife blade or ruler is required to disengage the cable.Because of these two faults, I cannot recommend this product.  It should have been tested more before going to market.
Radio reception stinks.  Period. As others have written in their reviews, the radio reception on this is simply horrible.  The manual and their website suggest extending the power cord to improve reception.  However, nothing we did made it tolerable to listen any station on the dial; the static and noise were simply not acceptable.  We have three or four other radios in the house that all pull in the stations just fine, so it must be this unit.We picked it up for 50% at Target, and even at that price, it's not worth it.  We're returning the item
Love it, or Hate it. Loved it, the first day.  Hated it ever since.  Right out of the box, it worked like a champ, sounded good, used my wife's skyfi2 in it, no problems.  Used the skyfi2 receiver it came with in the car the next day, again, no problems with the XM receiver, but the boombox is dead.  If you turn the volume UP ALL THE WAY, you get a little pop and crackle, thats it.  sounds like the internal amps are blown.  It does this with CD/FM/XM.  Returned it to place of purchase, I've been waitting two weeks for a replacement to come in.  During that time, I'm reading reviews and understanding why its taking so long.  It does appear to be a MAJOR problem that Delphi should own up to.  I'm not the only one with sound problems.
Did not Work!. Unfortunately, I never got to use it as the iPod would not charge. Looked very cute, but never got to use it...Returning for a refund..
Garmin Forerunner 201 not for rural use. My kids and I recently purchased the Forerunner 201 as a Father's Day gift for my running husband. He was thrilled after reading the product information! He immediately followed the simple set up directions, and away he ran a few hours later! Unfortunately, the unit just could not maintain a gps signal, and the little bit of information gained was useless and inaccurate. We called Garmin after a few more unsuccessful runs, and the technician on the phone suggested it might be a faulty unit. Amazon quickly sent a replacement. (Yippee for Amazon!)Again, my husband can not keep a gps signal for the duration of a run. The unit registers "weak signal" 20-25 times on a 5 mile run! The final mileage the forerunner has listed for the same five mile distance has ranged from 2.3 to 79.8 miles!!Garmin tells us that tree canopy can interfere and cause the weak signals. We live right on the shore of Lake Ontario (wide, open space), although we do run on scenic, shady roads.The bottom line is that the Forerunner is useless to my husband.  Garmin admits that it really doesn't function well on "shady" roads with trees around. If you like to run anywhere outside of a barren city street, think twice. A very disappointing Father's Day gift, returned for the final time
Quality control issues?. I saw this set at the store and it was a magnificent picture.  Has an integrated HDTV tuner and all the connections you will need.  Looks sweet, too.  However, I got one off Amazon which was a dud.  Poor picture quality and white light bleed from the top and bottom of the screen (a problem another customer complained about).  Samsung telephone service help was great and agreed it was defective.  Amazon was terrific and paid for the return and refund.  Be careful with this set and wait a little for other feedback.Oh, one annoying feature.  While the HDTV tuner works well, you cannot dial in a specific digital channel (like 10.1) unless the search program has previously found it.  And there is no way to "save" the found digital channels so that you can reposition the antennae, search for signals again, and then have a compiled list channels locked into the memory.  In other words, if your search found 10.1 in one antenna position but not 6.1, there is no way the TV will let you dial in 6.1 even if you reposition the antenna optimally.  You must then reprogram the search to find 6.1, but then after that is completed you wont be able to dial in 10.1 after turning antenna back because the TV did not permanently store that channel prior to the new search.  My 32" Sony 960XBR can do this no problem
Not supported. these will not work in a dvd recorder to record tv.  it didn't say on the webpage, but on the back of the discs it states that the discs support recording only at 4x and 8x.  my dvd-recorder supports dvd+rw media but to record television 1x recording must be supported.
...was hoping for something a little more durable... Loved the idea of being able to clip the iPod mount to the dash vents - unfortunately the execution of this concept was lacking in this product - the clips held to the vents - but they fell off the back of the mount.We have gone with plan "B" and used the self adhesive mount directly on the dash. Sticks well - but can't see the iPod once it is in the mount. Well - at least we can keep out eyes on the road with one less distraction
Believe the negative reviews. If after reading all the negative reviews you say-- "This product can't possibly be this bad" (like I did) well, you'd be wrong. Even the strongest FM stations that come in perfectly clearly with the cheapest throwaway radios are garbled, noisy, and static-y on this radio. This product is a blot on Sony's reputation
15dB Broadband Cable Amplifier. I was disappointed in this product.  When I attached it at the cable source it created probles for my broadband connection and living TV set.  I did install it at my TV on the second floor where I was originally having signal deterioration and it worked for awhile.  I would first suggest having your cable company in and "tweak" your cable throughput - it shouldn't cost you anything other than sitting around waiting for a service call.  I no longer have it installed and will resell it on ebay
Unusable. I bought these for use with my HP DVD740e Lightscribe DVD burner. The device would not write to them. Not one of them! I have never had this problem when using similar blanks with HP and Verbatim labels. The Memorex blanks I had were made by CMC Magnetics. What a waste.FYI - Windows users can get a small -- but distinct -- increase in label darkness with the use of a free utility found on LightScribe's site. It increases the contrast. "Best" quality labels do take longer to create.I guess Amazon does not allow web addresses. If you want the utility, search for "Lightscribe Exstended Label Contrast Utility" without the quotes. Or you can take a big guess at the name of a commercial site devoted to LightScribe
Very Difficult to use. This product is not for novices. The labeling on the buttons is extremely confusing. The instructions are not written for the layman either
Short Life. I bought this thing because I lost a memory mod to a power surge.  It worked fine at first but now it has no battery life.  Recently the power went out and my computer shut off immediately - like it was not on a backup at all.  Of course the alarm was still screaming but so what - my computer was already shut off without any warning.  I had this thing for two years but I will be going with a different brand next time
Mapsend...SHAME ON YOU AMAZON. Just bought Mapsend from Amazon. They sent me version 2 when this is clearly out of date. Don't be fooled - it's a piece of crap. This is devious and dishonest of Amazon - no wonder it was marked down. Avoid Magellan at all costs.....avoid Mapsend at all costs.....maybe even avoid Amazon if this is typical of the stunts they pull.
Couldn't get it to work. I experienced what seemed to be a common problem for many people that have purchased av cables for the ipod. I was able to get the audio but no picture was available despite following the advice of other reviewers to set my TV out signal to on. It didn't help that no manual was included in the box to assist with troubleshooting.
not to be relied upon. Sometimes it works, sometimes not.  Takes a very long to find position. I wish I had read the other reviews before purchasing it.  I would have chosen another.
Charger stopped charging. I was impressed with the charger for about 1 month---than it stopped charging the NiMh batteries it came with.  I took it back to Best Buy only to find that ALL of the Rapid Chargers on thier shelf did not work either.  A sales person and I tested them all, hoping I would be able to exchange my broken one with one that worked.It was more disappointing  after calling Kodak ---they were unable to replace it or get my money back.  I thought purchasing a Kodak was a smart decision, however, they did not stand behind their product which was very disappointing.
Disappointed little girl!. My daughter got this for Christmas from her Grandma (who worked long and hard to get this for her)and she was so happy and excited when she opened this Christmas Eve. She was only able to enjoy it for 1 month when it decided to only play certain CD's. It will soon be on it's way back to Amazon for an exchange. Hopefully, the new one will work and all will be well. It is very, very cute and my 7 year old just loves it. We are keeping our fingers crossed that there won't be any problems with the next one. We will keep you posted.
Sangean DT-180 A/m-F/M/TV Band Receiver. Attrative, compact, easy to use.Poor reception on some FM stations.  My digital MP3 player, which fits into the change pocket of my slacks provides much better reception over entire AM/FM range
Eh... waste of money. The CoolIT USB Beverage Chiller is a great idea with not-so-great execution.  It only keeps the bottom part of the beverage cold, and not so much that you would notice a difference.  The fan is loud.  All-in-all an unimpressive product.  I'm sending mine back
Wont work on a Tungsten either. For some reason, the game controls dont work on my Tungsten.  Would have been cool - but since there is no support for the game, I guess it will have to get returned
Poor Quality. Bought this drive in September 2006.  Now, instead of reading CD's or DVD's, it only makes a clicking noise.  Sony technical support is horrible.  Buy another brand.
SONY LCD REA PROJECTION TELEVISIONS. I purchased my tv in Dec 2004. I did not purchase the extended warranty. These sets are have all kinds of video problems. Myself and other LCD owners have called for in home service. The service company is QUALXSERV in home service. They want $350.00 to come to your home if you do not have the extended warranty, and can not guarantee a fix. Take it from me buy some other Bran
Bad design.....flimsy toggles.......JUNK. Notice, all the happy....five star ratings, are from people that JUST bought this MP3. I have had mine for 9 months.I have had this MP3 since Christmas 2005. I bought the white 512 for my son at the same time. Whith in 3 weeks, my son's was no longer working at all, he had it in his back pack, and some how it got crunched enough to never work again!! I was not happy. Also in a few months, mine started to have issues. The very "tiny" menu button is rediculous. And the main toggle was a complete failure for Sony. I accually removed the cover to the toggle, and just moved the joy stick under it, to change songs, or volume. How stupid. I am so mad about this MP3 player. I am going to buy a Creative V. I have done a lot of research this time, and I will not buy another Sony. The hold button, that is part of this sliding door never works, I find the player dead in my gym bag, all the time!!! Apparently, the door slides over a bit, and the player will turn on, FOR HOURS, and than you have a dead player. Maybe Sony should have given us a on/off button, than this would not happen! Dont do it folks, look into other options, even my mom's iPod Nano is better designed than this joke of an MP3 player.
You get what you pay for. Well for $20 I shouldn't have expected much.  But most of the reviews here were so positive I just couldn't resist.  What have I got to lose?  With taxes shipping and handling...about $25.The construction of the headset is very flimsy, almost toy like.  But thats ok, if handled with care they could still be servicable for some time.  The real problem was with the sound quality.  My intended use was for late night TV watching.  But the bass frequencies are so muddy and rumbling it was annoying to listen to and made voices almost unintelligeble(sp).
Nice appearance, but break easily. I received a box of these cases and about 20 out of 100 were broken upon arrival because they are so fragile.  If they are handled carefully, they work well, but the hinges are easily broken. Unfortunately, not a lot of selection on Amazon for this type of clear CD case
DEAD after only 1 year. I bought this DVD player after my Sony player died prematurely.  Is it just me, or are DVD players supposed to have a longer life??  This DVD player looks nice and works fine when it is working.  The player is a bit noisy when reading the discs, though.  But the bottom line is that it just stopped working after only 1 year of use.  I expected an improvement over my Sony player and I am sorely disappointed
false advertising claims. The DocuPen holds, at a maximum, 10 pages.  When I called customer service about this, I was told that the unit's capacity was being exceeded because I was scanning "high resolution images."  Photos?  No.  Pictures?  No.  I was scanning printed pages from books.  Apparently the DocuPen can only hold around 10 pages of normal text.  The 50 page limit described in their advertising apparently refers to pages with a sentence or 2 on them, rather than actual pages in books or journals--very odd considering it's touted as a tool for students.  A complete waste of time and money.  I returned it and now I'm back to using the photocopier.  Don't bother with this one, it's not at all what they claim
Disappointed. I have been less impressed with the new case for a number of reasons:1)	The additional insulation does cause heat related performance issues.2)	I had to trim the bottom case with a sharp knife so that it didn't catch when opening and closing.3)	Even after trimming the case, as recommended on the Speck website, the bottom part of the case still doesn't secure completely to the laptop (although this could be specific to my machine).4)	The additional weight on back of the screen causes the laptop to shut with considerable more force.5)	The case adds overall weight and size.6)	The case further limits the angle at which the laptop can be opened.Still, I use the top part of the case without the bottom part.  The case provides some protection against the flexible nature of the screen part of the laptop.  If you allow the top to flex you run the risk that external pressure will push the rivets (the ones that attach the apple icon) into the back of your display.  This will cause little dark spots on your screen that don't go away
Have some problems with the CDs. The first CD in this pack was damaged even before writing :(.  Well, I was able to write the second one without issues.  Hope the rest of them would be fine too
Inefficient and Ineffective. I've owned this unit for about one year.This unit suffers from 5 problems.1.  The unit gives poor directions.  On a route from Long Island, close to an entrance ramp onto the LIE, to a destination close to a different exit ramp off of the LIE, it told me to take local roads.  That's 100 traffic lights I would hit over local roads.  I did not have any avoidances set in the settings.  This is not an isolated circumstance, but it happens all the time in NYC.In addition, it's constantly trying to take me over toll roads, even though I set an avoidance to toll roads.  I get the feeling that the unit does not really know what toll roads are.  It also likes to take me over roads with lots traffic lights (see previous paragraph).  Although they might be the most direct, this device does not take into account time wasted at traffic lights.  Oy vey!!!!2.  The maps are not updated.  I tried to go to Home Depot through the business search function.  Unfortunately, when I arrived at the "destination" - Home Depot was no where to be found.3.  Speech directions are often given too late to actually make the turn.  The unit also gives me turn directions after I've already made the turn.  Moreover, the screen updates slowly.  After you've made the turn, you look at the unit and it still displays your position prior to making the turn.4.  The unit processes so slow.  Searching for businesses by name/category is completely useless.  It literally takes 10 minutes to find an business by name.  Its faster if I text google for the addresses with my Treo and manually enter them into the i3.5.  The input device is really cumbersome.  You really need a keyboard or touchscreen.  Scrolling back and forth through numbers is a giant pain.  In addition, this unit does not speak street names; only left, right, turn, bear, u-turn.  I want to spend time looking at the road, not trying to decipher directions on a tiny screen, to figure out where to make the turn.This unit is really useless.  At least in NYC, where there are many roads.I've wanted to hurl this thing out my window on several occasions.Don't waste your money on this.  Buy something nicer (that actually works) or buy it from a store with a liberal return policy
Horrible Customer Support. I had a terrible time with HP's costumer support when I needed help with my scanner. All the email support was for Windows only and the phone support was all outsourced and the technicians spoke terrible English. It was awful. I've gotten stuck with a product and can't get any help with it
How did this thing earn the top spot at iLounge?. I tried and tried to convince myself that this sounded good, or even acceptable.  Alas, the sound was so muddy, no matter what I did.  I set the EQ on treble boost, and I pressed the "3D" button on the unit.  Still as muddy and muffled as could be.  Besides that, there was a terrible sound between tracks that reminded me of a CD player searching for the next track.  Amazingly, I never hear this sound when using the nano with headphones.   I am returning this and moving up another price point when searching for my next small speaker set
Another HP printer DOA. I was excited about being able to afford a color laser jet printer...until the HP 2650 printed a grand total of 6 pages and then died (a "fuser" problem).This is the second HP printer that has died a premature death on me in 14 months - the other a B&W laserjet. Working with HP is a real nightmare. When I called I was put on hold for 15 minutes each with a series of customer service reps who could not help me. Finally they said they would ship out a replacement unit within 2 days. 10 days later no printer and I called to see what had happened (they did not ship because they had written down a wrong PHONE number for me!) They said the unit would be shipped out ASAP. It did not arrive until nearly another 10 days had passed. By then I had  to buy another printer and just refused delivery on the HP. I would never buy another.My Apple laser printer lasted 8 YEARS with no problems..
Very wrong cable modem. It workED fine first month then it get slower and slower , sometimes I could only get  20 Kbp/s, turn it off and back on again, performance get much better for couple hours and then it slow down again. Faulty product! Downloading from the same website, my sister got 900Kbp/s , I got max 200 Kbp/s(after turn off and back on). Disapointed !!!
DON'T BUY. Don't buy this at all!  I bought this to use on my media center.  All that happens when I plug it in is black and white lines across the screen.  I've tried restarting and everything.  I'll try for a refund
day2trip. You cannot put double cds in this product.  I think its great for single cds, looks sleek, but I would have purchased another type of media storage had I known the doubles wouldn't fit...I have several
Poor range for me. Does not compare with Motorola.  The range was poor.  Interestingly, when I pressed the call button, that was transmitted but the recipient couldn't pick up my voice and vice versa.  If they work for you, then you have a good deal.  But not for me.
Fooled again. Once again I'm amazed at how the reviews were so highly in favor of this product.  These are terribly uncomfortable (for my ears) and don't really provide that great of listening experience. The frequency response seems muted until you use the largest possible "surrounds", and then they become distractingly uncomfortable.  But of course, this is just my experience, your mileage may vary, as they say.  Personally, I found my Apple iPod 'phones to be better
Great when it works, but..... I received the printer (as a great gift) on January 16th, I set it up and it wouldn't print - the ink cartridge holder seemed stuck in place.  I called Epson who shipped me out a replacement with no charge or delay.  I used that printer for two weeks and it quit.  Same problem with the ink cartridge holder.  Once again Epson customer service shipped me a new replacement printer.  It worked for another two weeks and quit on me yesterday (same problem).  So, I'll call Epson when they open tomorrow and try to upgrade to a new/different printer or try once again. The printing results are spectacular, especially when using Epson 4* glossy paper.  Anyone else with problems?
You get what you pay for, JUNK. If you do purchase this device make sure you write down the serial number.  Supposedly there's a sticker on the back that has the serial number on it.  My switch failed after a week.  Since there was no serial number on my device the manufacturer has decided not to provide product replacement even though it's their unit and has their name on it
Not so good... I bought this item from Best Buy.  It works great until it was time to change the batteries.  The battery cover is hard to open, which caused a back piece to break off.  Since then, the mouse did not work anymore.  I would not recommend this mouse
Terrible Piece of Equipment. After constant dropouts for the past 6 months and no help from the "Belkin Bozo's"(support). I received a long delayed canned e-mail answer to my problem which didn't help a bit. I finally got rid of this piece of junk and installed a Linksys Network Card. Both Linksys hardware and software are a vast improvement. No more dropouts.I would suggest that prospective purchasers of Belkin products hesitate before buying.. It's one thing to have a product that works intermittantly, but it's really frustrating when Product Support is worthless
Great sound - awful design - design flaw fixed. Very simply put, the sound is wonderful - the design stinks.  I too crazy glued the rubber earcups to the plastic earphones - that lasted 2 days and they fell off.I don't know what Bose is thinking - clearly they are not doing any end-user testing.Update - Bose has issued replacement earcups which apparently don't fall off.  Pretty cool - I gotta upgrade my rating from 2 to
Wrong Adaptor. I, like the other customers. ordered this adaptor based on the recommendation from the site, and was disappointed when, on Christmas Eve, I realized this was not right for the keyboard we had ordered.  This situation was particularly misleading since the adaptor was practically "bundled" for sale with a product for which it is not compatible
Cheap. Print quality is pretty bad. There are often streaks and discoloration on print outs. If you want a quality color laser printer, look somewhere else
Installation Nightmare!!!. I dont know about the installation on this thing. Tryed to install this with the Bluetooth card supplied and my new HP Pavilion with Bluetooth built in you would think it would be easy. No way!!. After two hours on my own, then two hours to a guy in India who did not know anything, I gave up. Boxed it up and sent it back. Its also bigger then you would expect, its not something you can put in a brief case with a laptop. Its way too big. Your better off bring a cheap LexMark printer with a USB cable.
you get what you pay for. expecting big sound and good FM station reception, buy something els
Don't buy this!. This mouse works fine on my laptop...however, it goes through a pack of batteries within weeks.  I hate it.  If I still had the packaging for this mouse, I would have returned it.  No wonder it is so cheap.
There are better remotes. I have several Sony products (TV, Stereo, VCR) and yes they all work wonderfully with this remote - didn't even have to program those devices.  The problem I had was when I tried to program my DVD player.  There were only codes for 10 other brands! I have 4 DVD players and this didn't work on any.  I decided to upgrade an older memorex model with a new sony.  Yes, it did work, but some of the functionality was quirky.  If you press the DVD function button while the DVD is on... the remote will turn it off. So if you want to switch from the stereo or tv functions back to controlling the DVD, you'd better put your hand over the transmitter or it will shut off the DVD player while your watching it.  Didn't even work with my genaric analog cable box
Shame on Epson - Many thanks Amazon. I bought my Epson Printer CX 4600 last yr. thrilled w/ it, (and the price) because I was using mostly color.  However the "thrill is gone" now.  My experience has been exactly the same as the other reviews, only I thought I had done something wrong when the brand new black ran out and after cleaning the nozzels the color was gone, and it didn't tell me which color I had to replace. If I hadn't seen these other reviews I may have taken it into my repair place and spent a bundle tyring to find out why....Too bad we can't send these "all in one" reviews to Epson.  Thanks very much for the forum.
lose the belt clip!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I recently bought this product for my Palm TX and was equally disappointed as well as annoyed with the cheap belt clip.  It isn't apparent in the photos, but there is a screw attached to the back of the case, which makes it impossible to lay flat.  This I found extremely annoying. The clip (which you can take on and off) is extremely cheap and doesn't secure well.  It flops and swirls around.  Otherwise, the case would be fine.  I do not recommend
Can't even use it. I ordered this A/V cable for a client showing since I didn't want to carry extra baggage.  The cable arrived in time, but on plugging it in I found the cable damaged by a short in the video side.  Since, it only cost $20 bucks, I threw it in the trash and bought a more expensive cable at my local Radio Shack.  I'm sure if it worked I would continue to use it with my iPod, but alas it's history
NOT WHAT I THOUGHT!. I was extremely disappointed in this purchase.  It turned out to be a refurbished model that did not work!  [There was no indication beforehand that it was not a brand new item.]  I had to pay UPS to send it back.  THEN, I only received a partial refund for the returned item.It cost me a bundle to learn not to buy anything from Amazon again
Nextar MP3 player, don't buy it!. The unit wouldn't support DRM, so any songs downloaded from the internet were not usable on the player.  Once we got some CD's burned and songs copied on it crashed and was never recoverable.  The voice recording feature also never worked like it said it would
Dead in one week. My title is my review. The thing worked for a week. After that it wouldn't power up anymore. Chinese junk
Faulty wiring. I detest this printer.  I've bought quite a few printers in my day:  Lexmark, Canon, and have been quite happy with most HP's, but this was the pits.  The first one I brought home worked fine the first time but when I tried to turn it on the next day, it wouldn't cut on.  It just died on me.  I unplugged it, plugged it back it...then it worked for a little while before dying again.  This time for good.  I returned it, got another one...same problem.  Except this time it keeps going.  All I have to do is unplug it before each and every time I turn it on.  Nice, huh?Now I'm browsing online again and I've learned my lesson for sure.  No more el cheapo models.  I'm at least going to shell out for a midline price with some heft to it that will last me a year or two
broken item. Item arrived broken.  Amazon reimbursed the cost.  They have not reimbursed for another electronic item that was ordered at the same time.  Both arrived in an unusable manner.   They have not replied to my request about the other items status.   Will not buy electronics from Amazon again.
no click. did not work - never clickedno tech supportwaste of good mone
Not appropriate for all applications. This adapter worked fine for charging and for sound output, but be aware of some key limitations:1) This adapter is too large to fit into many docking stations. I found I could only connect it to other items using iPod cables.2) Although it will charge and allow one to play music from the iPod, it doesn't provide full functionality. When I connected it to a computer, my Mac did not recognize the shuffle. This was the case whether or not I'd pre-launched iTunes.So, if all you want to do is connect your shuffle to a car transmitter/charger or other cable-based device, this adapter is fine. If you want to use docks or make your computer-connected iPod cable do double-duty for your shuffle and for your other iPods, this isn't the solution for you
stayaway from it. i have so for used inav iguidance,mapopolis,navigon navigator 5 and The Blue Logger & Street Atlas USA .out of all these The Blue Logger & Street Atlas USA is the worst and inav iguidance 2.1.1 is the best  .blue logger gps hardware is good but v impractical to use bcuz of its strange onoff button....i will not recommend it to anyone....simply waste of time and mone
Cheaper at walmart. Recently discovered you can get the same cartrige at Walmart for 18.82.  Not worth the price here especially after you have to pay $5 for shipping.Go to Walmart
Beware of shipped an incorrect cable -- and a cheaper one!. I ordered this cable and ended up sending it back to Amazon.  And I advised them why.  The THX 800 cable is not blue.  The THX 600 cable is blue.  I called Monster Cable and got hold of their technical support.  They said they have NEVER made a THX 800 cable in blue.  Amazon obviously has not followed up on this issue
Interlink RemotePoint is Poorly Designed. I've owned three of Interlink's units, but that was before  competitors came to market with well-designed units. The Interlink pointer plastic casing is flimsy and cracks easily;  there is no OFF switch to prevent the laser from accidentally coming on when the unit is packed or placed in one's pocket; the advance and go-back buttons function most of the time, but on average miss and have to be pushed a second or third time at least 2-3 times per 30 minute presentation.  Although I agree with many of the points made by other reviewers who score this Interlink product better than I do, it seems these other reviewers have not compared the Interlink pointer with competing pointers that have identical features. For example, the Kensington pointer is half the price; the case is sturdy, has a no-slip outer coating, has a comfortable feel in the hand, and even includes a trench that serves as a holder for the receiver when not in use.  Placing the receiver in this trench automatically disconnects the laser so that batteries do not have to be removed when packing the unit for a trip.  And the advance and go-back buttons function all of the time, not just most of the time!
If you bought the old Dymo Labelwriter 330 Turbo you will be disopointed. I have used the old Labelwriter 330 turbo, for our veterinain praktices for 3 years, when finally the first one broke down last month the choice for the new Labelwriter 400 turbo was a no brainer atleast we tought. How disapointed did we get.First of all is was nolonger possible to put the labelwriter off, when we went home (not good for environment). Then it became clear that it was no faster then the old Labelwriter 330 turbo and even worse it pulls the label forth and back before printing, which makes changes of labels gettting stuck in the machine very high (which happend to us a lot). Also when printing to it from another computer it stops just before the end, then after a second pushes the last peace of the label true. Which means for us that we pull the label of the machine to soon and then it gets stuck in error mode. The software has lots of problems, for example if you repress bad labels in the software it won't print at all. My advise look for a diverend labelwriter
Tray locked after 2 use. SONY service sucks. The child proof tray lock feature is an absolute nightmare.  There is software issue with this player.  This feature was activated by itself and wouldn't unlock following the procedure in the manual.  Sony support is totally useless.  They recommended steps that I have already tried. The support person was obviously reading from a template as it took him (probably doing support from India) 10 minutes to respond to every simple question.  After struggling for 1 hour, he finally concluded that the unit needs to be sent back.The player is only accepted at SONY's Texas service location.  SONY doesn't provide service locally even though there are tons of SONY stores in my area.  Not only I have to pay shipping out of my own pocket, the turn around time will be about a month.  Worst yet,  the fine print in the support agreement says SONY will ship me back another refurbished unit.I will think twice before buying SONY again
Blah. It looks like I bought this unit based on the very positive reviews only to come back and see the few less than positive reviews that are brand new. I've had this happen on several products now from Amazon - product has a lot of good reviews, I buy it and by the time I go back to review it there are several non-positve reviews. Makes you wonder if some are being written and scored by people involved with the products. Some of the review sound like sales pitches and brochures and I personally question if these are real consumers -  not that I necesssarily think that happened here.I bought this unit to and just received in. So, far I am disappointed in it as well, but I'm not ready to throw in the towel with it yet.The interface takes some getting used to, but I don't find it that horrible compared to others. Some GPS have excellent user interfaces, but most just seem average to below average and the X930 fits in there too. So, I would say its interface is just as bad as most are - there are only a few units with very good interfaces IMO.The POI in this unit seem ridiculous. Michelin tries/wants/is/offers travel type services in general and I thought this unit would be packed with tons of accurate POIs (Points of Interest) - not really. Maybe I expected too much here but I think their POIs are dismal and very dismal if they are a travel services company. This unit should overflow with POI and again, its just about average. Though I will say again, there are onl a couple of very good GPS unit and then there is all the others, so this unit fits in with all the others IMO.Its directions are not fabulous so far either.Any route from my house actually has me drive a circle around my block.I have not found any route from any point in my city where the "quickest" or "shortest" route is any different and I know of shortcuts.It also wants to route you to the most major interstate and streets even if a less major put acceptable roadways are closer and shorter. For example, from my house to work it routes me 4 miles west to catch the north-south interstate to get me to the west-east interstate. There is a major road that gets me to the west-east interstate less than a mile to my east though. Shorter distance and quicker drive time.Same on my work to home route - it routes me 5 miles past two major roadways in order to stay on the interstate - and it does this regardless of choosing "quickest" or "shortest". The interstate may be quickest with no traffic, but it is definately not shortest.It does attempt to tell you what lane to be in on the interstate but its been the wrong lane for me about 50% of the time - 25% is due to outdated maps, 25% seems just wrong.I've tried it for some in city driving where I already knew the routes and its routes did get me there, but were not the best or shortest route. I expect a GPS to actually return a shortest route when I ask for it. So far, all the directions I've selected - the shortest route and the quickest route are identical.I am headed on a several hour drive in a couple of weeks and will see how it goes there.Like the other reviewers, the speaker is ridiculous - at the out of the box volume level the speaker is distorted and crackly. Its not loud enough with windows open, vents on medium or with a carfull of conversation. Its adequate if you are concentrated on following its directions.The screen itself is decent. I don't have a big glare issue and the unit responds to my commands ok. The mount is adjustable so glare can be avoided. The unit seems to respond quickly to commands.I don't think this unit calculates routes or picks up your GPS position extremely quickly. It seems about average there too. I've used some other GPS and I would not say they are much better so maybe my expectation is too high. Again, there's the very high end and then everything else and this fits in with everything else.Overall, I am disappointed but I may keep the unit because I need a GPS and I don't see one that seems much much better. Maybe my expectations are too high, but I don't think they are.The MIOs, Garmins, Magellans, etc all have pros/cons and none seem to hit the target completely on price, function, accuracy, interface, etc. They all have their quirks and from playing with several the key items of speed and accuracy don't seem much different. I tried a friends MIO 310x and if I were to review it, my review would sound worse than the Michelin.I've also used a Garmin 350 and other than perhaps the user interface, my review of it would not sound much different.So this seems to be par for the course for the $200-$500 GPS - I did not look at higher priced units, because I'm just plain not interested then.I was really only willing to spend up to $250 on one so my choices were cut down to just 3 units really anyway though I did review some of the $299, $399 and $499 sales units.Up to $250 your choices are the MIO c310x, Michelin X-930 and a Nextar model. I don't think any one is appreciably better than the other so its a dart-shoot.If your expectations are high and you need/want a GPS now with the low end price target then all 3 of these are about the same with their own set of quirks. If you don't need/want a GPS now then I would personally wait for the low end units to be improved. They are not worth it (nor do I think the higher priced models are) until they improve.[...].
Interference w/ 2.4GHz Telephone & Bad Customer Service. I tried to install at my house with only 20 feet range but I was getting static noise.  Only way I could make it work was by disconnecting our 2.4GHz cordless telephone (Panasonic) unit.  I tried to contact the customer service but nobody are answering the phone.  I was on hold for 30 minutes twice and it was answered by a voice mailbox
Speaker Feature flakier than Courtney Love. I bought this premium priced product because it has both built-in voice-mail and speakerphone. The latter was the key feature I sought. Well, it works intermittently, just enough so you can tell (occasionally) that it's "on" but infrequently enough that you can't actually use it to carry on a meaningful conversation. It reminds me of the "Can you hear me now" commercials.I'd rather live with Courtney than own this piece of junk one more day!All the other complaints from others are absolutely true as well.Ugh. DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT!!
Service Plan Never Received!!!. I have never received any correspondence from this company.  They were supposed to send the service plan within 2-3 weeks after I received the television.  However, as I stated - I never received the plan!
CD changer died - can't get a replacement part for warrantee. Like many others here, my CD-changer died after a couple of weeks and it wouldn't read any CD. It's in for repair, but they say the changer part is on National back order and they don't know when they will be available. No surprise, I guess given the number that are breaking. The JVC parts web site says the changer is not available for "more than 3 weeks." I hope they will replace my unit with something that works
How Rude Can Adorama be?. Very ! ! ! Got my new card and it didn't work so had to send it back. So upon calling Adorama every person I talked to was rude, short, and not helpful.  They did send me out a new one hopefully it will work.  I do know one thing I will never ever buy from Adorama again. BEWARE rude people and lousy customer service at Adorama. I will return to tell you more on how my new card is working for me.
Doesn't seem to work to well. Well, first off, I'm not sure if it's the card, or the N1 router itself, but ever since I installed the new N1 serious wireless in my home, I have had nothing but problems and poor connectivity. They clam that the N1 has extended range, I went back to my Pre N wireless and got twice the range and way better reliebility then with the N1. The concept seems good and the descriptions are great, but i can't say I feel the product is what they say it is
2 major design flaws - Buy Kensington version instead. I purchased this product, but after 3 months of frustrating use wound up throwing it away.The first problem is that the structural support of the power tips between the laptop plug and the cord plug is the electrical solder!  The effect of this is that if you use the adapter on the road where it's subject to a lot of plug and unplug and varying mechanical stress, the solder breaks.  You then at best have a tip with an intermittent connection.  I replaced the tip twice before giving up and getting another better designed adapter.The second problem is that when I unplugged the power adapter from the wall, it would cause my laptop (IBM T20) to emergency power off.  Unplugged at the laptop plug was fine.  I understand this to be an issue between the T20 power system and a surge issue in the adapter.I replaced this with a Kensington 33197 120W adapter.  It looks almost like the same product (same OEM?) except they have stronger power tips.  It also didn't have the power-off issue.I loved the form factor, but the product just didn't work
Good product, forget about service. Good product, forget about service. I e-mailed InFocus about my faulty projector 8th January 2005it is now 7th January 2006 and I still do not have my projector. That's right, it's been ONE YEAR sincemy projector stopped working, I have given up on it being repaired (it was under warranty) and am nowstruggling to get it back so that I can repair it out of my own pocket. Check this company's record atthe Better Business Bureau, it is deemed to be unsatisfactory due to unanswered complaints
Likes and Dislikes. I have now owned the 360 for 3 weeks.I enjoy being able to put in an address and follow it.  It has benefitted me and I have yet to use it to the maximum level possible.  I must admit I have yet to read the book.The bad is that it does not accept all addresses.  I use Yahoo to map out sometimes to compare.  The address that Yahoo will map out will not necessarily input to the Magellan.  The second bad point is the loss of signal at key times.  Cloudy days and winter as we have now do not go well with the Magellan.  Several times it has taken forever to pick up or reconnect to the signal.  Third, don't always believe the 360 on what side of the street an address is located or a turn must be executed.Overall I would still buy at the price I paid.  It is worth the price as a playtoy in the auto to assist in driving.The other bad point is the
I threw half away. It's a shame that Garmin won't allow you to buy the individual components in case something gets lost.I had to buy the whole mount just because I needed the rod connecting the base to the Nuvi 'holder' for the portable friction mount.
Customer Service SUCKS!. While I have my projector for 5 months, it stopped working and upon servicing it, Optoma returned it stating I needed to purchase a new lamp.  The customer service representative said that it was my bad luck of the draw and there was nothing I could do but buy a new lamp on my own dime....go figure, great support.  I will never buy from them again
Garbage - Buttons wore out in 14 mos. I loved this player until the day I really, really needed to use it for recording, when I discovered that the MODE button no longer worked. This is the button you need to use to switch from mp3 player mode to voice record, line-in record, or FM radio.The device is now permanently stuck on mp3 player mode with no ability to shuffle or repeat, which is not the worst thing in the world, except that I specifically bought it for its recording capabilities which are now, for all intents and purposes, non-existent. And 14 months after I bought it, too; conveniently post-warranty.The screws holding the case together are impossible to remove, so there's no way to attempt a DIY solution to this maddeningly simple but nonetheless irreperable device-crippling problem. This thing is of no use to me now; a $200 paperweight. I'm never buying another iRiver product again
Missed the boat with this one!. While the TiVo service is amazing they really missed the boat with this product.The idea behind this unit is to be able to record two shows at one time; a really great idea that has been available in cable and dish systems for some years.  However, this unit really can't do that for many people.You can ONLY record two shows if you meet ALL of the following conditions:-You subscribe to cable TV-At least one show you want to record is on analouge (not digital) cable-The other show you want to record is on either digital or analouge cableIf you have an antenna, no dice.  Dish newtwork or DirectTV, no dice.  Want to record a show on HBO and Showtime at the same time, no dice.  Basically, you can never really know if the shows you want to record can be recorded or not without having to cross reference them to what part of your cable service they are on.TiVo has the right idea but clearly did not execute it with this product
Great for a while, and then not so good. This was a great mouse for about the first year I owned. After one year is when all of the problems started.  The mouse now loses connection sproadically and sometimes it doesn't want to connect at all.  I have changed the battery quite a few times and that doesn't seem to help.  It is very tempremental, and I have now given up and am shopping for a replacement.So, a word to the wise - in my experience the mouse will work great for a while, just be prepared to replace it in a year or so
what happened to the hard case?. ...I'm so dissappointed in CaseLogic for discontinuing the hard cases. They were great, a HARD cover with rubberized coating and actual cd case style holders inside (that you pop out with your finger by pressing the center). Somebody could have sat on it and it would've been fine..
You get what you pay for. This television hasn't worked right since I got it, and support is not so great.  I simply cannot get it to display in full screen.  Comcast doesn't carry the id# which makes setup complete guesswork.  I really might as well have bought a good 32 inch set.  Well, I do get the advantage of the taller screen in 4:3 aspect, which is nice.The picture quality is fine.  I have seen reviews about the clunky remote, but I don't have any problems with how it looks or feels.  You do have to aim it pretty close to the bottom of the set.Right now I wish I had spent another $600
Why did I buy this... I've been thoroughly disappointed with this system since the day I purchased it.  First off, I can hardly hear anything from the speakers (no individual volume control for the wireless speakers).  I have to put my ears up against the speakers to actually hear them (I think this may not be due to the wireless speakers so much as the Panasonic system driving them).That's not the most annoying feature though.  Ever since I installed the wireless kit, I've had problems with my wireless home network.  Apparently, this Kit interferes with my wireless g network.  At one point I could not get my network to work at all.  Sometimes, I cannot even use my network while I've got my TV/surround on.  So I have to turn it off just to work on my computer.  Ridiculous
Could have been fantastic. This unit could have been fantastic if not for one issue.  Almost all the navigation fuctions cannot be used while the vehicle is moving over 10 miles an hour.  What good is having all this power and information at your fingertips and not be able to use it when you need it.  If you are going down the highway and you want the unit to find a restaurant or an address you have to pull over and stop to enter it into the unit.  This is just plan wrong and there are many other units on the market that will let you imput information without stoping the car.  I can understand not allowing DVD's to be viewed while driving but restricting the ability to imput address into the unit while in motion is just plain stupid. I highly recommend you do not buy this unit as you will be very disappointed
Caveat emptor... Despite being sold as an X-Fi card, this particular model does not use the X-Fi chipset. In fact it uses a variation of the Audigy 2 SE chipset. This is further confirmed by the fact that this card uses different drivers than the rest of the X-Fi line, and is not recognized as an X-Fi card in games. The main problem with this is you cannot uses any of the X-Fi features in games like you would expect. Try using this card in Battlefield 2142 and you will see what I mean.Creative Labs should be ashamed of themselves for this blatant act of marketing fraud. When someone buys a Ferrari, they are expecting to get a Ferrari, not a Honda with a Ferrari emblem on the front. But that is exactly what Creative Labs has done here. They are marketing this sound card as a high-end brand (X-Fi) when it is really a crippled version of the previous product line (SE model Audigy). They must have a glut of unsold chips and they thought they could pull a fast one on consumers with this cheap card.I for one will be very cautious before I consider purchasing Creative Labs products in the future. Buyer beware
SanDisk SDMSV-2048-A10 2.0 GB Memory Stick Pro-Review. After buying this product, I opened the case after few days, as I was out of country, to use this memory stick in my camera or other devices. However every time I put it in the camera or other devices, it gives error and doesn't work. I couldn't use this memory stick since I bought it and as I opened the box almost 15 days after the receipt,I  am not sure how I can even return it back either. Basically not at all happy with the product at this time
This is only OK. For the money, this is not a bad product. But, there is alot of hissing sound which doesnt really allow for clear vocal quality. I dont really use them. I use the wired microphones because of the sound problem
Overpriced, confusing software, misleading advertising, poor technical support. I am a photographer.  I wanted a device that would help me match my computer monitor display to my prints.  This device does a good job of calibating your monitor, but does nothing to help you calibarate your printer.  The software that ships with the device has many options of which most are "greyed out".  For instance, options for calibrating your printer are "greyed out". Why the heck show the options on the screen, if they are not included in the product!  When you call tech support you get a response in about 36 hours. An overbearing jerk explains that printer calibration is not included in the product, but you can buy another product for several hundred dollars more, which will address that. The same company offers the Huey for about half the price of this device. You would expect for twice your money you would get twice the value - right? Wrong!  As best I can tell the Huey does everything this device does, and more.  This device cannot monitor ambient light, which is a feature of the Huey.The device has two modes for calibrating - simple and complex. Simple works pretty well. Complex is useless.  I have tried to use the complex option numerous time and have never obtained any better luck than with the simple approach
Didn't Work With My System. I can't give this an objective rating. Despite repeated consultations with my computer manufacturer and the software provider I couldn't get this unit to play through my computer, so couldn't do any recording. I sold it to a friend and it is apparently working with his system. Conclusion: be careful if you buy it, it may or may not be adaptable to your equipment
If it let me give zero stars, I would have... This phone is a total piece of junk and a waste of money. As others have described, the battery holds MAYBE 5 minutes of a charge. Forget about it if you don't set it back on the charger when you hang up. The next time you dial, it'll be dead. I'm talking within minutes. The beeps are indeed annoying, as is the ring and the overall volume. I can't get a new cordless fast enough..
Junk. I got what I paid for. Allows for four frequency options at the top of the dial - all of which were picking up real broadcast signals in my area
BEWARE! Syntax Warranty!. Syntax clearly states that their warranty is only good for the origninal purchaser. I got my daughter one as a gift, gave it to her bran new, in the factory sealed box and Syntax refuses to honor the warranty, (and yes I calld everywere and tried everything).
Cannot Recommend. Pros-its been 2 weeks since Ive had it and it hasnt erased my dataCons-Must turn off computer to turn off harddrive-Sometimes isnt recognized by the computer-Inner ring is supposed to show how much space is left on the drive....it   doesnt do that.-SUPPORT IS A JOKE.  HAD TO CALL 6 TIMES IN 4 DAYS JUST TO BE PUT ON HOLD.  I WAS ON HOLD FOR 20 MINUTES AND THE GUY WAS ANYTHING BUT HELPFUL.Bottom Line-I guess its not that bad, but I would recommend purchasing from another company, my luck with them has been anything but good.  But the price is pretty reasonable, but just be careful if you decide to buy from WD
Does not work with large SD cards. Buyer beware.  This reader does not work with large SD cards.  I could not get it to work with a new 4 GB SD card.  My 1 GB cards work fine, but anything over that will probably not work.  I confirmed with with Lexar technical support as they have not tested this yet
"Nike dropped the ball" DO NOT BUY!! Better options out there... Like many of you are thinking about, I bought this through a website (Apple). I bought it based on the name brand, partnerships, and design (I must admit, it is a very nice design - in theory) figuring, "Hey, Nike invented this additional sensor and must have figured out a way to fit into a nice little package...I'll spend $30."  IT DOESN'T FIT CORRECTLY & YOU CANNOT SEE THE SCREEN. This armband is NOT FUNCTIONAL!I even tried to make it work by fitting some tissue at the bottom to raise it to its "intended" position, but inevitably the tissue shifted during the run.  I used the Nike+ armband a total of three times over a 10-mile period and IT CAUSED PROBLEMS DURING EACH RUN.  First, I had trouble adjusting the volume. Second, I accidentally kept pausing my workout trying to play my "Power Song" (center button on Nano).  Third, on my longest run, just today, I accidentally erased the workout trying to end the workout without taking the Nano out of its case (I still don't know how I did this).  I was so frustrated after that third negative occurrence that I immediately went out and bought a different case.I'm not going to name drop, but just type in NIKE+ armband and there are several other options (okay, I will name drop).  My favorite, (especially because I did not want to purchase the Nike+ shoes) was the Marware Sportsuit Relay; this set comes with a neoprene Nike+ sensor pouch (to attach to your current running shoes) and a wrist/arm band that covers the entire Nano with room for the additional Nike+ transmitter.Bottom Line - Nike+ system and partnership with Apple Nano = AWESOME! Honestly works perfect and I couldn't be happier so far, but don't give Nike any more $ for this specific armband. Hopefully we will see enough bad reports, and Nike will come out with a new, more functional design.
Extends, but doesn't pick up IP numbers!. When it works it does extend the range. However, every time you turn off a wirelessly connected PC and turn it on again, the PC is not assigned an IP number. Unplug this extender, and the PC is assigned an IP number by the router without any problem. A brief power blackout will cut IP numbers to your wirelessly-connected PCs. I purchased this particular D-link range extender because I wanted to ensure that it works well with my DI-624 router. I wasted my money buying this device. It's useless, and it's too light to even serve as a door stop..
Unreliable Rip-off. This product is cheaply made and noisy. The USB power cable developed a problem after 30 days. Don't get ripped off. Avoid this unreliable product
great product if I could use it. I did the research on this product and it was one of the best. I don't know that to be true due to the fact that the software that they sent me was a demo version that was outdated for use. I have to buy another software package to opperate the product that had stated in the description that the software was included. One if not the only reason I had purchased it. I e-mailed tiger.com and received no reply. If your going to sell something false advertisement is not the way
Thinking different is cool, Apple iPod is not. I sincerely hope iPods have improved... I bought a 30G iPod Photo a little over a year ago and was on my second replacement when just recently, outside the warranty (which of course goes from original purchase date, not replacement date), it's kaput again. Now if I have to pay $275 for Apple to fix or replace a three month old player! No way. THREE players on the blink, each after a few months - that isn't just bad luck.That isn't even mentioning the difficulties with the iTunes software or if you change computers. I get a new PC and have to re-transfer 100s of CDs! How lame. That negates all the convenience of the large capacity (I wish other MP3 players had the storage space the iPods have).I just can't justify spending more money to replace this limited, inferior POS again. So essentially over the last year I have spent about $1 a day to have a player and now I'm left with nothing. I will be buying a different player. I will spend far less than $275 and get something that will last more than three months, is compatible with the rest of the players in the world and is easy and convenient to load and use - obviously not an iPod! Unfortunately I can't transfer the music I spend hours and hours loading up (over and over). What a waste of money and time
Would have gotten a higher rating if it worked at all. I would imagine it was the cheap, crummy power supply, but mine wouldn't even light up...dead...One wonders why a $200 component can't run on 110 volts?  I'd try it again if they re-worked the power supply, but not if I have to use a DC adapter like a $3 item.
Severely outdated... This card was very good, about 4 years ago. If you don't know much about computers, and you're looking to get a friend a gift, or trying to buy a cheap video card, listen to this. There is no such thing as a good cheap video card. The hardware demands for modern games are so high, they require constant upgrading of hardware. So, if you're looking to keep up with PC games, you're waisting your money unless you invest in the best video card you can (can get pricey though, $500+). It is well worth the investment. Don't let this card fool you, sure it has 256 MB memory, but that's just bait. This card is slower than my old ATI All-In-Wonder 9000 (which only has 64 MB of memory)
New CD Stomper is TERRIBLE. I used the original CD Stomper for many, many years and never had one problem. I bought the new version and it's such a huge downgrade. Why do I have to calibrate my printer when I didn't before? Even after you calibrate your printer, the text still is never perfectly on the label, I've wasted so much ink and labels trying to get this stupid thing centered and it never prints perfectly. Oh & the side tabs never rip off cleanly, my cds have to look atleast half-way professional when I send them out to clients, and it doesn't look too good with tear marks on the each side of the label...this product is JUNK.Thanks for ruining a great product guys
Still trying to get this *&^%$ player to work. I want to believe all of the positive reviews; I really do!  But at the moment I'm still having problems with the downloading and uploading of the firmware.  I know, I know:  do it in recovery mode!  Whatever that is!  (Don't worry, I've been to the site and followed the directions 20+ times!)And as for customer support...I got a message giving hours and "Good bye" ( I did called during the hours CS was supposedly open).  I had a MPIO and wanted something more reliable but once again find the software package and manual (so big and so little information!) are not intuitive or easy to use.  Maybe the Mac Nation is right.And as for that first review posted here on Amazon.com, I hope that guy got a bonus; he must be working for Cowan!Don
Not as good as the D-R4 in most ways. I have the D-R4.  If you look at the reviews of that model, I have most of the problems with that model. There is a firmware upgrade available, butsometimes it still refuses to use DVD disks.  And sometimes, for no reason at all, it decides for some reason not to record something. However, I like many of the features, such as Pause Live TV, simultaneous play and record, the ability to use double side Ram cartridges (I have never had a problem with the ones made from Maxell), DVD-Rs, and DVD-RWs. Also, at the highest quality setting, I have made DVD-Rs, finalized them, and it has worked in all the DVD players I have tried.  I also have an older Pioneer DVD model (which is probably the best of all of them except for this), and if you do this, the DVD-Rs sometimes do not work in other players.Onto the D-R5.  I have just bought these for both my sister and my mother as Xmas presents, but I had no idea they would have dropped simultaneous play and record.  I think a lot of the cheaper DVD recorders do not have this, but the better models all do.  It also does not have either the TV-Guide ONscreen guide (which may be a blessing), nor VCR-plus, as it says on the website, as far as I can tell.The picture quality is actually very good, perhaps because it has a digital tuner.  I really am not sure why, as I only have it hooked up to theTV with the RCA cables.  It seems better than the D-R4.By the way, for some strange reason, you cannot use component cables froma D-R4 to a newer Toshiba CRT HD-ready TV, as the tv wants something calledColorStream componnent cables, and the D-R4 does not use these.  I am not sure about the D-R5, but some of the newest upconverting DVD players made by Toshia, do have Colorstream component cables.At any rate, I will take two of these back, and get the Panasonic 25 model.I would have bought a Pioneer model instead, but according to their website, the only DVD recorder they make right now is one with a hard drive. Although I may purchase one for myself at a future time, (despite the missing HDMI output or DV input), I cannot afford two of these as gifts.I hope this was helpful.Alex Maasa.maas@cox.e
Piece of Junk. This sucker couldn't pick up a single channel; not even one less than 10 miles away.  I live in a fairly open area
Didn't Work! Don't waste your time!. I got this tape recorder and plugged it in, but the tape heads wouldn't even turn. It made some sort of noise and that was the end of that. I had to return it for a refund.  It felt very light and cheaply made--too bad-- I liked the looks of it. I am going to try another shoe box recorder from a different company.
Coming Apart at the Seams. In theory an excellent product -- room for lots of disks, relatively compact and attractive HOWEVER I purchased three of these (2 for me 1 for a friend) I can't say how his is doing but both of mine have faulty zippers, making  it impossible to close the binders and therefore losing much of their attractiveness and compactness. (...). All in all, a disappointment
Waste Of Money. I bought these discs at CompUSA because I needed a few before I got the ones I ordered online. Well, I just wated a good 25 bucks because out of 5 discs, I got one that burned good. Not much bang for the buck. I have burned many discs but never Memorex, usually Verbatim or Ridata or MAM. Very disgruntled with these discs making coasters. Maybe my burners don't like them but whatever the case, I won't buy them ever again. I thought Memorex made good products
Bought with an iHome from amazon, stopped working after about a month. I bought an ihome along with a remote on amazon a month or two ago. I f I hadn't wanted the remote, I could have payed about 15 or 20 dollars less and gotten one without it. But after about a month of use, my remote decided to stop working.At first I thought the battery was dead. So I tried a new battery. Didn't work. I even used a voltage meter on both batteries and learned that both were completely full and functional. I didn't drop the remote in any way that should have broken on it. I didn't step on it, spill anything on it, or throw it across the room. So I was rather upset when it stopped working. And there no way I can really return it. So now I want a remote but I'm unsure if I should order another.
Waste of Money. I bought this as a backup drive several months ago for my home business after the iomega backup drive I was using crashed and took my backup with it.The Maxtor software installs automatically when you plug in the drive so that part was really easy and it took just a few minutes.  The initial backup was really easy and went pretty fast too.  So far, so good.  The problem is that once the initial backup takes place the backup function doesn't backup new or updated files!The scheduled backup doesn't work at all.  The light flashes so you think it's working but it doesn't backup ANY new or updated files.The synch is useless too.  It's like the backup function.  It will synch your files one time but then after that it doesn't synch any of your new or updated files like it's supposed to.  It's like it takes a snapshot of your computer at a specific time and that's it.To get around the fact that it won't automatically back up my files I have to manually transfer my files every few days or so which is a real pain as I have to remember what files have been updated and/or are new.I would NOT buy this product again.  It's not an automatic backup drive, it's just an external drive that will back up one time but then isn't reliable AT ALL.If you need a backup drive look elsewhere. Sorry to say, this one is a complete waste of money.
Dead On Arrival... While I read the reviews on this machine, it is clear to me that Lexar has some serious quality-control problems. For some people it worked, for others it was a miserable failure. I am in the latter group. Sigh.Mine was dead on arrival. I tried the device with *BOTH* of my Windows-XP machines and in both cases, it was unrecognized. Lexar tech support subsequently proved to be a contradiction in terms as they would not return my email requests for help
Wireless feature is Useless for this camera. I installed this camera and worked fine. I took it downstairs for wireless. It is so slow, you can take a nap. If you trying to use to see video from work, overseas or from another wireless computer, forget about it. It does not work. (Even I enabled port on camera and opened the ports on wireless router.). It worked as long as it was sitting next to wireless router. If you take if far from wireless router, it does not work. I returned it and using my Logitech QuickCam (wired).
Not exactly what I was looking for... I primarily purchased the product for recording lectures and it did not work well. The Mp3 recorder records the lecture, afterwards, recording is really bad. Sometimes it doesn't record at all or it erases the file or there is an error. In addition, the volume/sound quality is bad. Not loud enough. In the end, you need the software to transfer files, takes forever to figure out what to do. My brothers bought Mp3 player called Matchspeed (red color), good price and it worked great. Best player we ever had, 3 times louder then scan disk and the best thing, no software needed to transfer files. Just drag he items into the folder, thats all to it. And it records great. I hope this advice will help saving everybody's time.
Sad! Because I have to keep it for my birthday!. This Philips HTS3400 DVD has all the features I need, but its mp3 player is really bad: Audio just pops before moving to a next song . It looks like what Philips' people just do in all of their electronics.  I really don't want to talk about this any more because William R. French and  A. Isaicu all talke about these problems
Antenna not as ordered. I read the reviews and everyone had received the 1000 instead of theordered 1500 and I thought surely that problem had been fixed by now.Bad guess----I received my 1000 instead of the ordered 1500 today 17 Jan.So it seems that Amazon is making no effort to correct the problem.  Itdidn't even matter that the shipping order indicated a 1500 and the ordera 1000 was shipped.  Don't know yet what to do with it as others havereceived the wrong item more than once.  This is unlike Amazon
It was working for couple months. I bought this Trendware TU-S9 couple months back. It was working great  except that I had to unplug the cable before hibernating my machine; otherwise the machine will hang during bootup. Today, Windows sees it as an "unkown device".  It was working an hour ago. I give it two stars for it is not very reliable - broken after rarely used for couple of months and that the cable needs to be unplugged before the machine is shutting down/hibernating. I would have given it four stars if it were not broken. By the way, my laptop is Dell Inspiron 6000. I haven't tried it on any other machine
Honestly Really Bad. I used this maybe 4 times when the "in" stopped functioning, but it mysteriously *would* work in reverse.  I wish I read other people's reviews on this before I bought it. Horrible waste of money
Not compatible with my printer. This product was not compatible with my HP LaserJet 1000.  There is no compatability list anywhere, even though it's referenced in the manual.  This further reinforces my belief that Belkin products are not worth the time, money, nor effort
2 GB MP3 Player. This was ok for the money, decent sound quality, however it died on me after just 2 months of use.  The USB drive still works (sometimes) but the built in player no longer works. I found the controls less than user friendly and difficult to use
Randomly drops connection. I also have the problem of random disconnects.  We had a techie come in and try to set it up for us, he got it working, but the thing still randomly boots us off.  It does the job, I guess, of giving us a connection, but it's got almost no reliability.  I hear it's got a lifetime warranty; good, we can return it
Waste of Money!!. I truely wish I had found the prior reviews for this product before I bought it. Unfortunately, I am now stuck with a product that will not start and will not run on my pc, running WinXP2!! DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT!! Support sucks all around and there appears to be no fix now or in the near future to get software working...I lost $100 bucks on this one!!
Never worked. About a year ago I got one of these to allow me to play DVDs for my kids on my laptop while travelling.  It has an alarm that sounds when your battery is getting too low -- well it sounded immediately .  I figured that my car battery was not fully charged or on its last legs.  I hadn't tried to use it since.  Now that I'm taking another trip, I thought I'd try it out in other cars.  No luck.  The thing is dead -- doesn't do a thing when I plug it in
Defective. It stopped working 2 weeks after I got it. The display goes back and forth between OK to disconnect and Playlist. Buttons for search and the toggles don't function either. It is a great idea. Poor product
BEWARE!. There has been a mix-up here.  The item pictured here is NOT the Coby TF DVD5050.  The spec.s given here do NOT match the spec.s and capabilities of this item.  The spec.s given here do not even match the TF DVD5050!  Here's what you are looking at:  The Coby TF DVD550.  For spec.s go to coby.com.  This device has a 3.5 inch screen.  It does not have two headphone jacks or two sets of headphones.  It will not display JPEG images from a disc.  It does not have a zoom function in the playback mode.  Amazon has been notified but is not taking responsibility for the mix-up.  TechDepot (the Amazon partnet actually delivering this product) has been notified, but is not taking responsibility for the mix-up.  TechDepot will take the item back, no problem, but if you wanted the item described, they won't have it.  As far as I can tell, nobody has it.  The closest thing out there is the Coby TF DVD450, which has a 4.5 inch screen, looks like the one pictured here, and matches the description here except that it doesn't have two headphone jacks.  I don't know WHERE that came from!  Hope this saves you some aggravation
FALSE REVIEWS?!. Does anybody else think it's an AMAZING coincidence that everyone who gave this product a positive review has only reviewed it and other ICLEAN products? Something's a LITTTTTLE fishy about that...I've tried it and it really doesn't work that well with scratches--if I wanted a shiny, polished iPod, I'd buy cheap Windex
Sounds great, CD player dies. Great appearance and sound, JVC has produced a nice sounding unit.  Speakers look as great as they sound, no problem handling bass at loud levels.  Tuner is very easy to use, USB input works flawlessly.  Now the bad news, the CD mechanism breaks down and is unable to read any CD, whether store bought or MP3 burned.  First unit died after three weeks, the replacement lasted five.  CD player mechanical design is unable to handle light use.  Will think twice about buying a JVC again..
WHITE DUST. WE THOUGHT IT WAS GREAT UNTIL WE STARTED NOTICING WHITE DUST ON EVERYTHING.  WE CHANGED THE FILTER, BUT THAT DIDN'T HELP, AND WE'VE BEEN USING SOFT DISTILLED WATER.  WE'VE GOT TO GET A DIFFERENT ONE!  I DON'T RECOMMEND THIS HUMIDIFIER UNLESS YOU WANT TO DUST OFF WHITE DUST OFF EVERYTHING EVERYDAY - NO FUN
When it worked. The Micro has some excellent features at the right price. But it fails to work all the time. First it was the firmware, then it wouldn't connect to my PC, now the hardware has failed. I am going to buy an I Pod, despite Apple's refusal to allow other forms of mp3 downloads.
Returned without opening the box. Returned to Amazon without opening the box because I ended up purchasing a SONY home theatre system that included an upconverting DVD player as part of the package. I will say I was concerned about the number of negative reports I read concerning the Samsung HD860 DVD player after I had ordered it in comparison to the SONY equivalent DVD player.
Sony VRDVC30 is an excellent product. It came within one week of being ordered. It is an excellent product and is as advertised. I received a manual for Sony's Compact Disc Recorder instead of the manual for the VRDVC30
Annoying and difficult to use. The user interface was horrible. The product documentation was even worse. I still can't figure out how to perform a regular scan, no OCR. This was poorly designed, poorly supported. Get some other scanner, this one is impossible
Not waterproof - "weather resistant". Just make sure you know the difference.   These speakers are NOT meant to get wet.  They can handle being outside (ambient moisture, temp, wind, etc...) but aren't meant to be directly in the path of rain or snow.They are only really usable outside if you have large eaves/overhangs under which to place them.The only reason I didn't give this item 1 star is because I probably could have found all this out if I had read the Amazon advertisement enough... and at least they seemed well packaged before I shipped them back.
Don't purchase this printer!!!. The installation of this printer went very well.  However, after installing the printer my computer began running EXTREMELY slow.  I checked and it was using 100% of the CPU.  I stopped all the processes associated with this printer and my speed returned to normal.  I contacted HP and they said it is a known problem and they are working on it (that was six months ago).  They still are working on it.  HP's solution is to install the print driver only (so you cannot use the scan or fax feature) until they write new software for this printer.They should have recalled the printer since it doesn't work properly.  DO NOT PURCHASE THIS PRINTER!!!
dwt108 double wide 108 disc dvd tower. Was a little hard putting it together.  You have to be very careful taking the cds out or it would fall apart.  I am not happy with this product
Vicks Ultrasonic Humidifiers aren't what they're cut out to be!!. I recently purchased 2 Vicks Ultrasonic Humidifiers in Jan 2006 and received them by the 3rd week of Jan 06. On 2 Feb 06 (having used them only 2 weeks) one of them stopped putting out the humidifying vapor. I followed the manual's instructions to the letter by cleaning the tank with bleach and the base I used vinegar to clean what white dust (if any since I'm using the cartridge)it might have. Having followed the manual instructions  to the letter, the humidifier turns on but there is no mist coming out of the mist nozzle. I plan in contacting the manufacturer for a replacement or refund. Good luck to those of you who are considering in purchasing a Vicks Ultrasonic Humidifier!
Doesn't support windows mobile 5.0. I am very disappointed in this product. I purchased the Blue Logger to use with a new Dell Axim X51v (which I purchased to use with the Blue Logger). I found that I could not make a Blue Tooth Connection between the Blue Logger and the handheld computer. I contacted Delorme & was told "At this time we do not offer any support or updates for Windows Mobile 5.0.  Hopefully in the future we will be able to offer updates for compatibility but currently there is no timeframe." What a ripoff. Delorme has a product that is not even compatible with the present PC Handheld operating system.I have also found that I cannot upload routes created on Street Atlas 2006 to the hand held. Basically I have a little electronic map with no functionality.
Unable to use. I do not know if it is defective, but we were disappointed to find that this item does not work with any of our equipment.
Not impressed. I used to be a big proponent of Netgear.  Not anymore. First off, after reading the package on the VPN box, I believed the software client was included, but no.  Once I figured that out, I bought the software, which costs more than the router.  After a week of hacking, I finally got the software to work, on one out of 4 machines.  One machine hard re-boots if you try any kind of network activity once the VPN is connected.  I've disabled everything I can think of, it just won't work.  It won't work with Vista either, no word from Netgear on a date.  All other VPN software has to be un-installed, so forget using one machine to connect to a Netgear, Watchguard, Cisco, etc. vpn.Very frustrating software
Lack of Support, Drives fail. Lack of Support for Failed Drivesby neever, Dec 07 '05Western Digital will not support your hard drive WHEN it fails. On November 16, 2004, I bought a 250GB hard drive. Three months later in February, 2005, I had to return it for a replacement due to a hard failure. Now, this replacement drive too has failed as well after only eight months.I went through two Western Digital drives in a year due to no fault of my own and the hard drive failed just six days after the warranty expiration. I requested a replacement from Western Digital and they completely ignored me.Buy at your own risk.Pros:NoneCons:Lack of Support Drives fai
big problem - anamorphic picture. I bought this product  4/13/2006It was excellent before I found the picture is anamorphicIf we see "anamorphic wide screen movie" at a 4:3 screen, the shape is perfectly anamorphic.( if you don't select 4:3 letterbox)but even in the wide mode at 16:9 it still little too much anamorphic-If you watch carefully the screen; human face looks longer than the standard and circle looks ellipseAfter I saw this It border me; I could not watch the movie- I tried several different movies but same result.I went to best buy, circuit city and comp usa, and tried all 10.2" portable dvd players- maybe you don't believe it -all 10.2" screen dvd players had  same anamorphic problems- philips, polaroid, initial, insignia, . etc-  I think all companys are from same lcd panel company.I have returned 5 players -1. polaroid,($289)-low contrast, 2. panasonic($399)-do not have AV input, 3. insignia($339)-10'2-anamorphic problem, 4. toshiba($289)-not clear dark picture and av input image is terrible,  and  5. philips($399 anamorphic problems.finally I bought a Durrabrand 8.5" player(179) at wall mart- picture is not progressive but very high contrast and very clear and realistic and not anamorphic and AV input image is also good- it is just like Panasonic quality + AV input- even little samller screen the 10.2" but Now I am very satisfied of the product. I am also disappointed of the famous brand. -Panasonic, specially toshiba, and company of 10.2 inch.if you don't mind the anamorphic - you can buy Philips, or any chipper 10.2"  but - I don't recommend itif you don't mind AV input buy panasonic
Ni regalado. Despues de una semana de uso el tv presento una falla y hasta la fecha ha sido imposible obtener el manual tecnico de sharp para proporcionarselo al tecnico, por cuanto solo se lo venden a los tecnicos autorizados.Aca en venezuela no existe un tecnico autorizado
Expensive for a toy, very poor as an instrument. I purchased this guitar for my young boys. The strings don't stay in tune long enough to tune them all together. I put lighter strings and new tuners on it, but that did not help. I didn't expect much, but it should at least be able to be tuned.
Told by company that it would take up to four weeks!. I am the type of person that ALWAYS buys the extra warranty on whatever I purchase.  However, I started reading the reviews on this company and many people reported that it was four weeks and counting and they still hadn't received their refund check.  I was astonished.  I contacted N.E.W. myself and asked them about this.  With no shame or embarrassment on the part of the customer service reps, I was informed that if I did everything by email, it would take AT LEAST 15 business days (that's three weeks!) to receive my refund check AFTER I sent them the warrantied item.  If I had them send me a pre-paid label for the defective item instead of using my own printer, it would take a week for me to receive and at least a week for them to receive the covered item.  In other words, it would take no less than four weeks to receive the replacement check and possibly up to eight weeks!  I cancelled the contract immediately.  It is just not worth it when you really do the math to purchase this contract.  I would recommend buying a product from a company that first makes a quality product and then back it up with a good warranty and gives good customer service such as Grado, Sennheiser or Koss.  But stay away from these people; that's my feeling and my advice.
Scratches!!!. Horrible - the first time I slid my nano into the case it put several scratches on the front; defeats the purpose for even buying it. I would recommend getting an Agent 18 case.
Does not work with Kingston miniSD 1GB. IF THERE WAS A 0 RATING I WOULD CHOOSE IT.  I bought this with the Kingston miniSD 1GB so I could download pics taken with cell phone into computer.  Of course the miniSD came with an SD adapter.  Usually, computer does not see the drive buty says "insert disc into drive E".  Sometimes this thing works if I push the memory chip in all the way into the reader, but other times my pics are totally deleted and I have to reformat the memory chip to get it working again.  It's a shame that this doesn't work with Kingston's own miniSD chip.  Definitely don't buy this thing--it isn't worth one cent.  I plan to return it.  Any suggestions on a reader from a different manufacturer
Poor quality. My second one just stopped working.  Each one lasted for less than a year.  I was a Sony fan but now I'll try other brands
WARNING: Why o' why do aliens n' non-humans try to cheat us?. SELLER'S: For an honest review go to the CORRECT page for the Bose 321 Graphite w/ Accoustimass 3rd module and two satellite speakers.  That will have the correct retail rate and draw the true end-buyers/purchasers.  This price of $700 is for the 2 speaker satellite system so you would be losing a bit selling here.  I hope this helped you in your endeavors and I look forward to honestly/fairly competing with you in the future!BUYER'S: Buy as many of these as you can and report any loss or "mistakes" on the sellers' part in contractual agreements to Amazon customer service.  Because if this ad by that company/seller is being honest and selling a 3 speaker system (2 satellite and 1 lrg Acoustimass) you are in for a steal! literally, so get a goin! LolDisclaimer: this review is an anti-review posted to make aware the disparity between price and item description (which is it?? 2 speakers or 3???) in this advertisement for above mentioned product.  Why isn't BOSE listed as a seller?! DOH  No slander or libel has ever been implied or attempted unless it was true
Didn't work for me. I tried to install the driver on my computer.The computer went into a loop, just booting, shutting down, and rebooting. I was able to get the computer into safe mode and use system restore to revert to an earlier point.I'm scared to try it again.Any body want it? I'll sell it cheap. For that matter, just pay the postage and it's yours
Not to be used with iPaq. This keyboard folds out well and I liked the feel of the keys.However, the IR connector needs to be in direct connection with the IR port in the PDA.  For the iPaq, this port is at the bottom of the handheld.  The 210 degree arm does not rotate to this area.  In order to have the proper connectivity, you have to turn the handheld on its side.  This then requires another software program download (not freeware that I can find) to rotate your screen to the landscape view, unless you can read sideways without getting a headache.Before buying this product, check your handheld to see if your IR port is between 4-8 o'clock - if so, this may be a difficult keyboard to use
Not universally compatable !!. I have used this _RW with my Sanyo DVD recorder. The result is that I cound not play the recording. It wil freeze up. and some times they can not be formatted. They will not function well if they are used for the VR mode. I have used other brands such as TDK or Fuji. they are OK.
Probably not worth it. It was very bright at first.  Then button began malfunctioning.  I emailed customer service and never heard back.  Don't know if it was a problem with my unit or a poor quality button
Deceptive marketing at its finest. The one and only reason I purchased this label printer was for the highly touted Dymo Stamps feature, supposedly giving you the ability to print your own postage stamps onto thermal postage labels for no monthly fee, only the cost of the printer and the thermal label refills.  According to the Dymo Stamps website, Dymo Stamps gives you the ability to "Print Exactly the Amount of Postage you Need" and "Eliminate the Need for Costly Postal Meters."  What the consumer is not told upfront is that these "precise" amounts of postage can only be in denominations of the Dymo Stamps software's choosing, not any amount you want.  In fact, the only postage denominations that can be printed are those already available in stamp form at the post office, basically just your run-of-the-mill $0.39 stamps, $4.05 Priority Mail stamps, and postcard stamps.  This software also does not give you the capability to print postage for Parcel Post, Media Mail, or Express Mail, and doesn't allow you to add additional postage for services like insurance or certified mail at all.  How this saves you any trouble over buying stamps from the post office is beyond me.  Conveniently, you can only overcome all of these limitations by subscribing to Endicia (Dymo Stamps' backbone provider) for a monthly fee.  Heck, you can't even go to an office supply store to buy the thermal postage label refills that you need to print postage on; they can only be ordered online through a link in the Dymo Stamps software.  Especially given the fact that even the least expensive Dymo Stamps capable LabelWriter model is over $100, this will NOT save you any money in postage, will NOT save you any time, and ordering stamps online from USPS (or getting them from the local post office) is just as convenient, if not more convenient, than ordering the stupid thermal refills online from Dymo and waiting for them to arrive.  Thankfully, Amazon is great at accepting returns
stay away. you may be tempted to buy these because of the 'sony' name...but be warned, DO NOT buy sony cd-r's off of amazon....I bought this same 50 pack, and had to throw half, yes half as in 25 of the discs, out because they had read errors and God knows what else.  I find this strange though, because I've  bought (and still do) these same sony cd-r's from best buy, and at target, and at staples...and they've always worked fine.  I thought I would give it a go buying the online and I'm sorry I did.  If you want the sony cd's, just go to your local target and pick em up there...at least I can tell, based off my experience, they'll work.  Can't say the same for the ones coming from amazon
Broke after 6 months of use.....             :(. I spent $60 on this and it broke after 6 months.. I guess the old saying, "you get what you paid for" is true.:(
Disapointed. He didn't send me the product that he was selling. The keypad is not USB and also it wasn't new and also it wasn't targus.I want my money back or the real product that i payed for
LR44  Button cell battery. Great price, but that doesn't make a difference if you're sent the wrong merchandise, I received LR41 button cells (instead of the LR44)which are useless to me.  I tried to get this corrected and decided it is cheaper and less time consuming to just let it go and order elsewhere
Item came in defective. - The LCD screen didn't work- The first DVD I played (hooked up to the TV screen) stopped reading at track 7...- I returned the item to the address writen on the box, it came back because the return address is a different one, so I had to return it a second time (at my expenses of course)- Despite having nothing to do with the fact that the item was defective I only got refunded 2 thirds of the purhase price..
Just Nothing. This "amazing" booster did nothing to my signal, I have tried everything and nothing...
Cases break instantly!. I knew these were inexpensive CD cases, but I can't even open one without it breaking into two pieces..
Don't buy it, really JUST DON'T DO IT. I have used it for 5 months and it's been tearing apart since the first one, besides that, it is cumbersome to fit it correctly with one hand, the way I use it, (I run a lot), the Ipod end up soaked in sweat at the end of the wourkout, lately I've been having problems with my sensor/receiver, I don't know if that's due to be so wet so often, but the armband won't prevent it a bit.You can get use to control the music and volume with it, but if you wanna see how fast or how long you've been running, you have to wait until you finish your workout, that's an obvious flaw (screen covered), but the bad craftmanship and how difficult is to fit it, worth mention it
Hunk of junk, go for the manual version. Luckily, I didn't pay a penny for the motorized SkipDr. as it was given to us as a "prize." I have the original (manual) SkipDr. which worked every time, and I always end up using it instead. It has more than paid for itself in repaired CD's--$20 for an entire kit at a wholesale club that came with spare sanding discs and the whole shebang.The motorized version didn't come with any deep scratch sanding pads, which I need about 25% of the time for a badly scratched disc. Most of the time the automatic sensor fails to detect that a disc is even in the machine, and won't start turning, so I have to squeeze it together to make it work
Yet Another Wireless Piece of JUNK!!!. This thing is JUNK!!!  Don't waste your money.  I am a computer professional and I had it working for about 5 minutes, then after powering it down and back up it never did work again!  If you buy one, go through the setup and if it doesn't work immediately SEND IT RIGHT BACK TO AMAZON!  Don't waste your precious time trying to get a $70 brick to do wireless because the odds are that you will just be wasting your time.Finally, Amazon likes to keep the good reviews toward the top of the list to keep the potential customer from being discouraged. However, YOU SHOULD PAY MORE ATTENTION TO THE BAD REVIEWS THAN THE GOOD ONES. If the product is in fact good it won't have many bad reviews, or even possibly none at all if it is exceptional. However, look up all the bad reviews for this product. They should tell you that something is seriously wrong with this product
Not so pleased with the Cobra Road Trip Hand Held CB Radio. I tested the Cobra hand held CB on California Rt. 99 today.  Not so good.  Tuned into truckers' channel 17 (for North-South traffic) and heard mostly noise.  There was very little discernible language so I squelched out the noise and waited...and waited.  I called out for a radio check and got a comeback--loud but not clear.  The speaker in that hand held CB is awful.  It's abrasive to listen to.It is my opinion that the short 10 inch magnetic roof antenna is ineffective in receiving clear signals and if you do get a clear nearby signal it is unlistenable because of the poor quality of the speaker.This CB radio needs some work to make it worth using on the road.  Perhaps a longer whip antenna in the roof mount along with a better quality extension speaker will make the system less annoying.  I was looking for a portable system for temporary use, but the Cobra HH Road Trip CB is pretty poor.  Personally, I wouldn't buy it again
Lasted one week. Having had problems with a previous USB drive I bought the Lacie as a replacement having been brought under the impression that it was a superior quality (and therefore more expensive) than the previous drive.It has lasted one week and after hours on the phone to the manufacturer's support line no one has a clue what the fault is.This drive and it's support team are a complete waste of time and money.
Avoid this product. I've always had issues with this product since I bought it on Amazon.  I've updated the firmwares for both the router and the card but the problems persist.The problems are inconsistent internet connection.  Its easy to isolate since I can connect my workstation directly to the router/modem.  And when I do, my connection is normalI've since travelled a lot and didn't have time to give this back ...Be warned
Too bright!  Not for light sleepers!. We have had ours for almost a year - it still works great, but there is one big problem - the display is a white/violet bright light.  Great for visibility of the clock when you need it, but unfortunately, even when it's on the lowest setting, it lights up our whole room!  My husband sleeps through it fine, but I need a dark room to fall asleep and I always have to throw a sweater or towel over it.  We finally gave it up and switched back to our old clock radio
Stay away from this equipment. At the beginning, I really thought this is a very nice product. It does solve the CD organize and automatic storage problem for many people. However, this equipment is poorly engineered. I bought four units and all of them failed within a year for various reasons. There is no easy way to even take the discs out of the faulty units. If you ever think about move this equipment to another room, it is almost bound to fail. Customer service usually take 2 days to respond. The phone service guys do not answer questions about disc stakka because they know this is a bad product and rather not to deal with it with the disappointed customer. Imagining someone charges your $400 to organize 300+ CDs for a year and then quit. I am completely pissed off.
CrashCrash. Can I give it negative stars?I actually have no idea how it works on my Palm Treo 680, I was never able to get that far.  I installed the software to my Windows XP desktop and it:  would not allow me to install the Palm software (no device found), ran my CPU at 100% and refused to let go or be terminated.  And then crashed my computer.  On reboot, I discovered that it's autostarting, sucking 100% of my CPU, won't let go, won't terminate, and as soon as I opened the UI it crashed my computer
Wish it would work! Defective item received 2 times!. This item was a gift to be used at our family holiday festivities. We put it together it sounded and looked great, but the CD player was defective. Contacted Amazon on Christmas Day, a new one was shipped. CD player was defective yet again. Now we are waiting for a new one. Both times I communicated that the shipping packaging may be the problem. I recommend this machine, but buy it from a store, not Amazon. I just wish there was someone in my area that sold it!
Brother(brand)labeling tape 1/2". This is the OLD tape....meaning that there isn't a crease in the back so that you can "crack" it open and take off the protective covering so that you can stick it onto something and actually lable it!!  It is very frustrating.  Very.  The newer version of the tape, of course, has this feature.  Be carefu
NOT FOR TEXTBOOKS. I wish I never bought this because it was not sturdy enough for textbooks.  If you put a textbook on it and turn the page, it collapses and or tears the page.  I wouldn't even use this for a notebook.
Died suddenly... repair impractical, lost my stuff. One day it just stopped working. I got the dreaded "orange and green flashing lights of death"... the contents of the File space were un-recoverable... and I ended up just pitching it after extensive attempts to revive it.Apparently this is yet another one of the bad products that Apple likes to keep hush-hush
sounds worse than the laptop speakers. The builtin speakers in my laptop sounded better and louder than these speakers.  The Sony's highs are muddy and the volume does not go very loud (yes my laptop volume was all the way up).  If you want extra laptop speakers for your presentations with clients look elsewhere.  All we wanted was a decent quality sound that was a little louder than our laptop speakers and these speakers definitely did not deliver and will be returned.  If you need ultra portable sound and your laptop speakers are broken or sound much worse than average laptops (we have nothing special), then maybe this would work for you.
Philips PH-62050 CD-to-Cassette Converter. I ordered this item because it was the lowest priced of three remarkably similar devices (all had the same description and specs).  It worked for about 2 weeks, and then quit.  A friend with the same device suggested checking the wire connection inside the cassette, which had come loose. Since then it has come loose twice more, so I just don't use it anymore.  When it worked, it worked fine, but it is at best an inexpensive and temporary solution
dont buy it!!!!!. this is a piece of junk, it never worked fine, or the software crashes, or the scan results are terrible and very very slow
Terrible! Don't waste your money. I bought the Zire 72s as an upgrade to my previous black and white Palm that I had no problems with. It has been nothing but a lemon since I got it. Often when I turn it on it has lines going across the screen and has to be turned off and then on again to get rid of them. The graffiti is terrible and rarely works. I have to reset it all the time. Customer support is terrible and did nothing to rectify the problems. I even sent it to them at one point and they sent it back in exactly the same condition I sent it to them. I don't think they even looked at it. After my experience with this Palm, I will never buy Palm again
Doesn't match well with my YPT-300 keyboard. I got this stand as a kind of "freebie" when I purchased the excellent YPT-300 keyboard. At first I was baffled by the lack of instructions and the apparent lack of attachment screws. By reading another of the reviews here in Amazon I learned that the screws arrive inserted into the bottoms of the "X" pieces. Thanks to the person who pointed this out, as it isn't intuitively obvious even to those of us long accustomed to putting together small mechanical devices for our children.I managed to figure out the proper hex key wrench to remove the screws and then quickly put together the keyboard stand. Once you have all of the pieces and the proper tool it's not rocket science. However, it soon became apparent that the stand isn't really made for my model keyboard. If you line the keyboard up directly on the stand it rocks back and forth. The only way to get it to stay put is to angle it a bit, which looks kind of odd  And there's a constant danger that someone will knock the keyboard right off of the stand onto the floor. Someone suggested a double-velcro strategy--not bad!  But this is a makeshift solution that can only partly mask the fact that the stand was never really designed for the keyboard I own.  I'd love to know what reasonably inexpensive stand would work better than this one
Awful. Do not buy.  This may be the worst product I've ever bought.  It has never worked properly.  I've kept fresh batteries in it, but it's still no good.  Within 10 feet of the laptop, I'll click three or four times and nothing happens.  Then, I'll click and the slides go in fast forward until the end.  It's quite embarrassing to be giving a professional presentation and have this happen.Awful product.  Believe the bad reviews.  It's worse than they describe.The only positive thing I can say about the product is that it doubles nicely as a cat toy.  My cat loves the laser pointer
Horrible. I have used HP, TDK, Fujifilm, and JVC blank DVD's and have had no problems. But when I tried these Sony DVD's all I got were problems. They suck. A lot of other people seem to say that these are good. But for me, I'm using an HP Lightscribe DVD Burner and these DVD's suck. They do not work. Don't waste your money on these. If I could give this product 0 stars I would
Immediate malfunction. I tried my Picturemate for the first time last night and it malfunctioned almost immediately. It claims that it has a paper jam, but it doesn't. I've tried pushing "OK" to clear it as suggested, but this does nothing. It still insists it's jammmed and refuses to operate. I've tried the suggested "troubleshooting" to no avail, so I'm now on hold for an estimated sixteen minutes with the Epson support center. All of this hassle for a brand new fussy appliance makes me wish I'd gone with another brand. The few pictures I got out of it looked very good, but the macine took a few minutes to print each one, so even when it's working, the machine is still flawed. I would strongly suggest another brand
Batteries... or are they?. Heres the thing about batteries. They eat people. Yeah. You can never trust a battery, cause those things are HEARTLESS. Especially Rayovac... those give me the creeps. *Shudder* So the next time you think about buying batteries, think about B.E.P.-Batteries eat people. Dont even think about it, punk
Bad Quality. Purchased thinking it was gold-plated as advertised but actually is not.  Quite noisy - settled for a Monster Stereo (Male-to-Male) cable instead
Epson ink clog problem. I have used a cx4800 card reader,scanner, printer combo for 3 weeks.  After 4 consecutive days of no use, prints were streaked, like horiz. striped shirt. Blue and black are clogged, and running utility many times improves, but does totally cure, the problem. Shows ink at 70-80% all colors, 60% black.  I have bought NO NEW carts, so these are absolutely factory EPSON cartriges.If you have to run utility every time you want a quality print, even if it DID work, that's no bargain.Recomend: avoid all Dura ink printers until they get "dry head" bugs out of ink formula/heads
RMA in One Month. Good Price for portable hard drive - you don't have to use this as a sync it can be for storage (don't know what other reviewers were smoking)..Loved it as a backup and PC Toolkit (I put all software I need to fix others machines - and for business software and 40 gig Itunes backup)..Seriously used it 2-3 times and now it is dead.  Light goes on but must have been a bad hard drive to begin with - started RMA process and am waiting on replacement -- WD have had some serious reliability issues for years so it did not surprise me --Nice package if it still worked -- hoping my 2nd one will be a good one -- also I suggest using this for on the road backups not as your main backup as it may not be reliable enough for that purpose.
Great MP3, When it Works. I've had this MP3 since Xmas 05. It gave me trouble initially then the problem went away. Since July it hasn't worked for more than a few hours, despite Cowon's several attempts to fix it. This is the third, or maybe now it's the 4th?, time that the sound on my 20 GB iAudio X5 has cut out. Cowon just returned it to me again a couple of weeks or so ago. The screen shows that the song is playing - it's just that no sound comes out. Besides this problem it also has an annoying problem of repeating songs when the setting is set not to repeat.  This is a quibble, however, that one can live with.  Given the problems I'm having with it I considered rating it a 1 star except that when the sound does work it is really good.
Not Worth the Effort!. With so many other mounts to choose from, why buy one that doesn't fit US homes (16" apart studs)? True, you can jury rig the unit and move the mounting plates in, but why? This product is unacceptable for anyone wanting to mount on studs behind drywall. It's probably fine for brick, stone, or somewhere else where you're using anchor bolts.I'm returning mine
Worst... Label Maker... Ever. The labels are sticky on one side, and printable on the other, but that's about all this product has going for it.  The software is a nightmare.  The print previews only vaguely represent the finished product, and the program frequently and randomly alters your image.  I wound up using the labels, but creating the documents in MS publisher.  what a shame
BAD PRODUCT. THIS IS THE SECOND ( IN SIX MONTHS ) OF THESE UNITS I HAVE BOUGHT. ONLY FOR THE SPECS AND ESPECCIALLY THE SIZE. THE BATTERY FOLDS OVER , FLAT ON THE BACK OF THE SCREEN SO IT IS LESS BULKY. HOWEVER I FOUND OUT THEY DON'T LAST VERY LONG . THE FIRST UNIT THE HINGES JUST SNAPPED OFF, THE SECOND, THE SCREEN WENT DEAD AFTER ONLY DAYS OF USE
OK not great. I've had the phone for about a week now, including the optional Bluetooth Mobile Phone Link.Pros:  Stylish than most. Build & sound quality.Cons:  When using the base speakerphone and you pick up the handset from  the base, it DOES NOT switch to the handset.  Major annoyance.Buttons are little stiff, maybe I was just used to my previous setup.My previous setup was a Panasonic KX-TC1881B 2 line 900MHz DSS speakerphone. The Motorola was supposed replace my Panasonic, but I think not. Too bad, I do like the stylish design & the optional bluetooth link.
Don't buy this. Bought two of these phones, the answering machine base unit and one expandable unit.    They actually sound great when they work.   About a month following use of the extra phone, it wouldn't hold a battery charge any longer.   Amazon pointed me back to Panasonic--or the Panasonic black hole.   I dropped another 10 or 15 bucks on a new battery.  Same thing...no charge.   I would suggest it was defective hardware and not battery related.  I swapped the other phone's battery with it, same thing.    So phone number one lasted about 4 weeks.    Phone number 2 lasted about 12 months.   Same thing occured to phone 2--won't hold a charge.   Tried all three batteries with the remaining unit---doesn't work.   Draw your own conclusions.  I don't have time for a phone that doesn't work.   I bought it because 2.4GHz was interfering with the wireless network.   5.8GHz is definitely the way to go and I suspect most the good reviews of this product can be attributed to adopting the 5.8 frequency.    Get that feature in another phone.  I'm off to the store to try another brand--and keep my fingers crossed.
It Comes with the Forerunner 201. This VERY expensive cable is already in the package if you purchased the Forerunner 201.  You won't need this unless you somehow lost it.  Damn, it is expensive!  This is a cable for goodness sake
great product if I could use it. I did the research on this product and it was one of the best. I don't know that to be true due to the fact that the software that they sent me was a demo version that was outdated for use. I have to buy another software package to opperate the product that had stated in the description that the software was included. One if not the only reason I had purchased it. I e-mailed tiger.com and received no reply. If your going to sell something false advertisement is not the way
Almost completely useless. I was fooled.  I thought, "Oh, a vertically polarized, amplified antenna ought to work pretty well, at least a little better than the antenna built into the power cord of my tabletop radio."  Well, folks, it doesn't.  In a few minutes, you can make a very simple passive dipole antenna (i.e., a hunk of wire, basically) with a piece of 300-ohm flat twin-lead wire (you know, the stuff that's flat with two wires about a 1/4" apart in molded plastic...goes for about a dime a foot) that works better for FM.  I know because I did a side-by-side comparison between the Terk and my homebrew dipole...the dipole pulled in the station I wanted in stereo while the Terk antenna could only get me a noisy mono signal at any gain setting.  As a radio hobbyist (licensed ham radio operator), I am ashamed to admit that I fell for this one, so please don't tell anyone.
Does not work with palm easily. Did not work with my Palm T|C right away.I've not used this for any other purpose. I expect either Palm or SD to release proper software to have it work with Palm T|C
Horrible design!. Thank goodness for Apple they made a product designed well enough to get you just past a year (1-year warrenty) and then die. I would hate for them to have to replace all these horribly designed $100 dollar iPods.
Does not work correctly with Windows Media Center in Vista. The picture quality with this card is great.  It does a very good job encoding analog cable TV.  However, with Windows Media Center in Vista, the card cannot be configured for both analog cable and OTA HDTV.  Supposedly, a Microsoft hotfix should resolve this issue but it didn't work for me.  A Hauppage WinTV-HVR-1600 works fine for both analog cable and OTA HDTV, but it's analog picture quality is not as good
What a waste of money. We purchased our DVD player in June 2005 from HH Gregg for $140.  By December the screen would sometimes turn white so that we couldn't see the picture.  Within a few months the screen stayed white all of the time, so that now we cannot play dvds at all.  Audiovox wants $94 to fix it.  I'm sure thats the cost of replacing it. The sound quality was never great, but we endured it.  What a complete waste of money and theres no way I'm sending Audiovox another $100 for this or any other product.
Not Working Yet. I received and installed this card yesterday.  It was not recognized by Windows 2000.  Neither was the driver included on the CD.  Sabrent's site didn't have any driver for the card, either, but did have a wonderful FAQ link about it... Well, I'm assuming that it was wonderful, since the URL was broke.  I'm giving them a chance to respond before I send it back
Definitely stay away. Bought this about two months ago. Never liked it for two reasons:-The rubber cap is so easy to lose. (Guess that's why it comes with spares though.)-Utterly slow! This is what was most uncomfortable with the drive. Yeah it's slow only with groups of small files like everyone else said. Still, it's annoying to have to zip a bunch of small files everytime before you copy them over to the drive. Then unzip when you want to use/copy them. Not practical.And now, well, it just stopped working last week. I mean completely, for no reason. Just great. Like one day before I was going to sell it to someone else.Stay away from this one
Brother DR400 Replacement Drum Cartridge. I received the cartridge, however it was a bad one.  They said they would send postage to send it back, and when they received it they would send a new one.  I still have not received a new one and, I have not heard from the company. It has been quite a while. I will not be buying products from this company again
Unit will NOT function in all auto CD players (Err's/ejects). I have both a '97 Chevrolet(GM) pickup and a '98 Jeep(Chrysler Corp.) and specifically purchased the unit to clean the laser lens in the Jeep.  IT WILL NOT OPERATE IN THE CHRYSLER CORPORATION CD PLAYER as it immediately displays an "ERROR" message and ejects the MAXELL lens cleaner disk.It DOES function in the GM player, however. I have noticed that the Chrysler CD player is 'finiky' about playing some CD disks that always play on the GM unit.  It is obvious that my GM unit is superior to my Chrysler unit, but the fact remains...  THE MAXELL DISK WILL NOT FUNCTION in my '98 Jeep's CD player
Great if you like being on the receiving end of a hot poker. Seriously, this is great ink if you have a Lexmark printer - especially since nothing else will work (in my printer anyway). Lexmark has a reputation that seems deserved from my limited (one year) experience. Basically they are known to sell cheap printers (they do) and charge high prices for ink for those printers (which of course you need great quantities of). Moreover this ink does not last very long. Ok, that's just my experience, decide for yourself, and if you are already owned by Lexmark (I mean you own a Lexmark printer) then you have to buy this ink, so there you go. Enjoy it, it's fine ink
Output of the adapter states as 5 - 12 V !!!. I am not sure what protection an Ipod has, but difference between standard 5V USB and potential 12V is huge. Only the IPOD cable is useful from all this package. And do not be fooled by the low marked price. Sales will charge "handling and shipping" so the bottom price will not be cheap.If anyone in San Francisco area wants the wall adapter without the USB cable - it is yours for free, but you will have to pick it up :
Exactly the same as the regular Intuos2 Pen. but 20 dollars more and hideous. I have a platinum Intuos2 tablet (a high school graduation present from 2004), and when I broke the pen, I ordered the regular intuos2 pen due to it's being slightly cheaper on Wacom's site. Here, the platinum is 20 dollars more (and in my opinion, much uglier). I recommend buying the classic intuos2 pen
Battery cover blues. My Zen Nano's battery cover broke within 1 month of purchase date. The construction is very flimsy, and if you do your research before purchasing you will find that this is not an uncommon problem. I wish I would have researched a little more before I spent my money on it! :-(I wouldn't recommend this product to anyone.
Good for business, bad for home. I purchased this projector to watch movies at home and have not been pleased with its performance.  Our DVD inventory includes both 4x3 and 16x9 formats.  As this is a dedicated 3x4 projector, DVDs that are 16x9 will have black bars at the top and bottom of the screen.  If you have a dedicated 16x9 screen, like I have, this will not work if you like a clean image at the edge of the screen.  If I mount the projector to fill the screen, then the 4x3 DVD image is projected above and below the screen.  Perhaps I don't have it setup correctly, but that was the best I could do.  Specs say this projector has component video inputs, which it does.  However, they are part of the monitor input jack and you have to spend another $20.00 for an adapter to connect to them.  Our family room is 12 X 23 and the fan is too loud when you have the bulb in high setting - you do get a great picture, though.  We could barely hear the fan in low setting but the room has to be VERY dark to get a decent picture.  Projector comes with a CD that has the manual and a neat screen size calculator that figures the distance from the screen the projector should be located
Didn't work with my LinkSys wireless router. I couldn't get this product to work with my existing equipment.  The Netgear extender had a default IP address of 192.168.0.101.  Linksys routers serve IP addresses in the 192.168.1.x range.  I couldn't get beyond this incompatibility.  My search of the Internet for a solution only found more people reporting the same problem.  I finally returned the Netgear extender for an equivalent Linksys product which I had no problem getting to work.
Perfect for tunnels. it's a super idea, but i cannot say it works well. getting a free station is a real challenge, even in the underdeveloped Italy. and if you get one, but you are driving, within 5 minutes (or 5 miles) you lose the signal... however the sound is perfect when you enter into a tunnel.is not good for cars, but works at home, connecting it to the radio. it needs to be improved
Same. I had the same problem as the 1st poster, very dissapointing and quite aggrivating because I really needed this yesterda
it hums!. Alas, it makes a very noticeable hum even when it's OFF! I have to unplug it if I want the noise to stop. Very disappointing.But if size matters to you, it's worth mentioning that it's surprisingly small, especially in comparison to other portable stereos. It is easy to carry and fits anywhere.(edit dec08.2006: and now it's incredibly fickle, frequently interrupting a cd with "ERR" or not even playing it at all. i want to replace it, but where are all the red cd players?
Cheap quality, no exact length. I ordered this cable a few weeks ago. Although I must say that it does work fine, the cable looks cheap (in fact, it is very thin) and its length is less than 6 feet. As you may agree, length does matter so you do not want to fall short when it comes to that. So for $20 (including shipping), I think it was not exactly a good deal
Not for me. This case is too large for general carrying of a DVD player. There were too many velcro straps included without instructions or ideas on how to use them. Pictures were on the package, however I couldn't figure most of them out.
Very missleadingly named cable. I finally realize why they don't include this with the pro sling box.  Because the value it adds is practically 0.The resulting picture is actually worse than the component output.  I have an HD cable box that outputs converted signals and downsampled picture was actually better than the straight resampled HD signal that this cable outputs.The picture is small and it is not noticably better than the component output.  In hindsight the pro box is really not necessary since the HD cable does not add its advertised value
Worked for a while... I have a Dell Inspiron 8000 with failing fans, so I decided to get a chillhub to try to relieve the pc fans.  I am just trying to keep everything working for a few more months, as I will be buying a new pc.  I liked the chillhub at first, cannot really tell if they kept things cooler, as I do not have any temperature software loaded.I only give this two stars because the fans are now making a loud grinding noise that is unbearable.  I use my pc every day for 6-8 hours, so maybe I burned it out.I think I am just going to buy a $10 desktop fan and shoot it at the side of the laptop and not get another one of these
Broke down in 3 weeks. Product just quit working 3 weeks after I got it.  Sent it back to manufacturer (Garmin) who said they would have it fixed on a priority and over-nighted back to me.  That was almost two weeks ago and have not gotten it back yet.  Still waiting
Waste of money. Don't waste your money on this "second room" wireless speaker.  The signal barely reached into the second room and then it was weak and flickered on and off.  I tried to return it but Panasonic wouldn't take it back.
Not for use with radios. I recently purchased this item along with a Sony ICF-M410V radio for which it is listed by Sony as an accessory.  Don't buy this item for use with any radio, Sony or other, as it produces static at lower frequencies and a steady signal-obliterating loud hum at higher frequencies. When I called Sony about this, the person with whom I spoke indicated an awareness of the problem.  The recommended adaptor is an AC-E45HG, but it is not available in the US!  It is listed on the Sony Style Canada site, but they will not ship to the US.  Catch 22 completed
JUNK. I read another review on here complaining about the "sticky buttons" on the Audio Source EQ 200. After reading another review saying their unit worked fine with no button problems, I decided to take a chance, hoping that the other reviewer's button problem was an isolated incident. Wishful thinking. I've had the EQ 200 for about a week and the same problem showed up on mine. I was listening to an old album on my turntable when one of the stereo channels just cut out. At first I thought it might be a loose cable, or worse, a problem with the cartridge on my turntable. Then I remembered the review about the "sticky buttons." Sure enough, I went to the EQ and jiggled the buttons, and the sound cut in and out as I did so. After jiggling them a few times the problem went away for a while, then it out of nowhere started acting up again. It's not so much that they "stick," as it is that they just plain don't work properly. The have a "cheap" feel to them; all the switches appear to be mounted to a single flimsy bracket. When you press one switch you can see the adjacent ones move. Besides the fact they don't work, they are confusing and limited the way they are formatted. They don't let you monitor the tape deck's output when recording; something that should be a standard feature of an EQ. The buttons on my old Radio Shack/Optimus EQ made a lot more sense in how they operated for dubbing/monitoring. There are a couple other annoyances on the Audio Source, too. The analyzer display has no sensitivity adjustment; when I play my CD player, the display is just maxed out. You can adjust the display by turning down the input level knobs, but I only want to turn down the display, NOT the volume! The "0" line on the EQ should be a different color for easily identifying the relative position of the sliders, but it is simply white like all the lines, which makes it difficult to easily identify the center line. If I were keeping the unit, I would take care of this problem with a magic marker. There are also no scale markings on the input level control knobs, leaving you to guess as to when you have the left and right balanced. The sound quality seems decent when it works, but what good is a stereo component if the sound cuts out while you're listening to your music? The illuminated sliders and spectrum analyzer look neat, but hey, I don't buy a stereo component just for looks. Seeing as other people have complained of the same button issue, I'm sure Audio Source has to be aware of the problem. Obviously, they are not going to invest the resources to correct the problem on something as obsolete as a graphic equalizer. It's too bad, since this model seems to be pretty much the only EQ left on the market for a home stereo. The only other EQ I found other than professional models for rack-mount systems, was a TEAC model which doesn't have as many inputs as the Audio Source. I am returning the Audio Source for a full refund; no sense having them send me another one when undoubtedly it will have the same defect. I guess I will try my luck with the TEAC, either that or put up with the muddy sound my stereo has without an EQ. I will just have to do the old cable swapping routine if I want to do any dubbing with the TEAC
be forewarned, if your thinking of using this with Airport Express. This Amazon listing also suggests buying the Soundsticks along with Airport Express.If you're thinking of connecting them to the USB port of Express, Apple says it won't work.(Apple Airport Express FAQs
No Vista Support. Unlike many people writing reviews of the product I haven't even been able to install the software as it doesn't support Windows Vista
Telezapper. Worked great for about a week, then i seemed to get an average of 12 telemarketing calls a da
My roommate's broke, then mine broke!. My roommate's mouse broke (she had the older L shaped receiver)... and I thought it was because she's bad with technology. But I'm a computer junkie who knows how to take care of her technical equipment... and even mine broke (a few months later, I had a straight receiver). It just gave up on me. Not a battery issue. More like a connection issue.Now I read all these reviews about it breaking on people. Well, I'll write back when my other roommate's break, and when my cousin's break.Don't get me wrong... but it was great while it lasted. Less than half a year. Gonna go back to my Logitech. That never broke on me
If it won't print, what good is it?. My printing problems began two months after warranty expiration. I tried every troubleshoot I could find, three times. What a beautiful machine. It does everything very well. It even looks great sitting there on the desk. But what if it stops printing, then what good is it? I finally gave up and bought something else
Lots of issues. This item has a lot of flaws, the only reason I got it was the price was quite less and it was a nice techy stocking stuffer of sorts. I have listed some of the issues i have seen with this product here:1. Battery case - this is a flimsy piece of plastic and the finger that enables the cover to click shut will break with the slightest pressue. I totally agree with the other people who commented on this issue. Yes you can prevent it from breaking if you are willing to spend 5-10 minutes to slowly change the batteries but once you tend to hurry up with this process the end is inevitable!2. Power off - the power off si the same as play or power on. If you want to power it off you got to press until you see the unit display switch off else it will stay powered on and playing and drain the battery or probably if in recording more might use up your entire storage space.3. Chord - comes with  chord to hang the unit around the neck while listening to stuff but unfortunately just like the battery case, the groove on the unit into which you are supposed to slip the chord and fasten it, is flimsy as well. It might break off if you have it caught somewhere and try to pull it free instead of patiently working it.4. UI is bad - the IPOD click wheel is very simple and so is the Zune UI. This one is simple cos there is just one way to use it but its not easy to use.Go for a IPOD Nano if you will. This one is not worth the investment
Hub Not Recognized. My Dell Laptop D600 running Windows XP, didn't recognize the device when I plugged it into either USB port.  I contacted Targus support and they stated that it should have worked and that I should try it on another PC.  If it doesn't work on this laptop, I have no use for it.  There is no CD ROM for support drivers and Targus support stated that I shouldn't need any drivers.  Went to Microsoft website for compatibility and the device wasn't listed.  I should have researched this before the purchase.  I would not recommend anyone purchasing it.
YAMAHA. YAMAHA(it's a japanese company) makes many products, for example, ICs, pianos, keyboards, audio products.The YAMAHA's best audio product is NS-1000M, a book-shelf speaker.NS-1000M is the best speaker made in Japan in the history.Unfortunately, NS-1000M is not sold now.And more unfortunately, YAMAHA now has become a trivial maker.NS-333 is only one of low cost speakers. or
Don't waste your money. There's a reason this thing is only 6 bucks.  It's absolute junk.  I put it into the cassette player in my car, and the sounds were completely distorted.  The voice constantly skips, and the casette sometimes clicks.  The quality of sound in my car is usually amazing, and basically there was no bass sound coming through my speakers using this device.  I've tried both sides, but still no avail.  I plan on returning it if shipping doesn't cost more than the product itself
Would be great if it worked... In theory it would be a great product, except that my first iPod of this model had its hard drive go bad only a few months after I got it.  Apple replaced it, great process, but now the replacement has gone bad after less than a year. And of course now the warranty has passed.  Poorly built, dodgy model.  Don't waste your money.
disappointed by Timex. I've had a very difficult time finding an alarm clock with the bright indiglo light. So I was happy to find this one. However, with my first "Eagle" the alarm didn't go off. Amazon was great about the exchange for a new one (kudos). My repacement is a disappointment in that sometimes the backlight won't light up and I have to hit the clock on the bottom to get the light to go on. I second the others raters who have complained about the bad viewing angle. The loud alarm almost gave me and my wife a heart attack the first morning, but I put a piece of scotch tape over it and that seem to tame it enough.
Canon Paper. On the package it says 3 X 5 postcard size paper.  We thought it was describing the size of the paper which we wanted for prints.  However, it was 3 X 5 postcard stock which was a little deceiving.  WE will use it but it is not what we wanted
I Would Never Recommend this Product to Anyone. I've only got this thing to work for about 3 hours and that is not in a row.  I've spent hours with this product on several machines and I can now say the hardware sucks.
So - So. This charger does not seem to charge the batteries fully. I thought that my rechargable batteries were "out of life", but discovered that it was just a case of this charger failing to recharge them fully. My Daughter brought home a cheap Sakar overnight charger when visiting. I popped in a set of batteries I thought were done for, and found them to be just fine using her Sakar charger. What happens on my charger is that the lights (indicating that the batteries have been fully charged) all go off, and the batteries are "cool to the touch" (indicating that they have been fully recharged). Nope! Only about half way recharged
Nothing but problems. From the time this unit was removed from the box, it has been a nightmare. This main problem is each and every record, both 45s & lps, skips at the end on the last track. My records, friends and even neighbors.I returned the unit to Teac, and the seemed quite good about the turn around with the repair, in which they claimed to have replaced the enter turntable assy.But, it is doing the same thing again, right out of the box.I would not recommend this monste
Died an early death. We bought this TV after reading glowing reviews only to find out that the picture quality is poor when viewed from slight angles.  Also, after 13 months of use ours has now died.  Sound works but picture is gone.  Cycling power on/off might bring back a partial picture for a few minutes but then it is gone again.  Another expensive lesson
iHome is a disappointment. So when I first got the iHome for Christmas, I loved it. Well, I loved it in spite of the glaring bright light, that even at its lowest setting has to be blocked for me to get to sleep. However, after awhile the iHome will not register my iPods existence at all. Today I was able to enjoy thirty seconds of a song before it fell into disgrace again. I would not recommend this product if you want something that lasts. This device has become nothing more than a nuisance that won't even pick up radio stations. So, the alarm can only be set to a vaguely annoying beep when these functions are disabled. Useless
Incompatible with my burner. This media did not work on my brand new asus burner, even after updating the firmware
Not worth the time or money. This picturemate has been a total disaster.  After printing just a few pictures the color on the photo turns to pink and yellow.  Put in a new cartridge and it will work for a few photos and then the color turns funny again. Not only does it not print many photos with a true color image, but it is slow and the cartridge runs out of ink after a couple dozen photos.  DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS PRODUCT
Very poor reception. I bought this TV to pick up Armed Forces Network signals at my base in Iraq (transmitted from ON the base, BTW), and all I get is a very poor picture and sound I can barely hear.  The reception is worthless in my opinion, so I packaged it up and sent it to my son back home...thanks Axion, I had to go out and buy a regular TV for $99, which works perfectly with the enclosed rabbit ears
The good, the bad, and the ... really bad. I've often wondered how many people review things on amazon when they first buy them. Had I done so, i'd have posted only the good, and would have forgotten by the time it got really bad.The good:When I first purchased 2 of these, my first run to a customer went fantastically well. I copied the files via windows explorer to the drive, which showed up in My Computer under windows, as you'd expect, and presto, no problems.The bad:- Sometimes the drive won't turn off by the power button on the front. Sometimes it will. It's like my 2 year old child. It's got an unreasonable and emotionally uncontrollable reaction to what you do.- Customer support is crazy. Crazy! I spent a long long time explaining my problem, what i'd done to solve it, the steps I took and provided a screen shot - only to wait a day and get an automated response - which had nothing to do with the problem, and i'd already reviewed prior to submitting the question because they force you to - and the "person" who responded proceeded to provide feedback and steps that did not address the issue, solve the problem or leave me with the impression that he understood what he was doing.- The first backup performed with their software took overnight - that's fine, it really was 300GB of uncompressed data on a windows drive - but when it was done, it wasn't - their backup software puts it's own "restore" binaries in the directory you created at backup time - and for this one, it didn't. It seems the backup software is unable to backup when you input over 50GB of data at a go. The workaround, though, is to break it up into smaller chunks. PITA when you have a system for "filing" within your windows directories, but livable considering the bigger PITA to backup to DVD :)- The drive makes not so nice sounds when shutting down. Yes, it's a known "issue" - they say it's not an issue, but when you shell out a lot of money on your drive, your heart stops for a moment when you hear a painful clicking sound. You know, the sound your drive makes a day or two before it stops working. Yup, it's that one. For what it's worth, i've had the drives on for roughly a month without a problem - but you should be aware that it'll be a little strange the first time you hear it.The really bad:- The backup software refuses to work. The problem I have is that it wasn't predictable in how it chose to .. stop working. I installed the drive, did a backup. That overnight backup. Which failed. The next morning I did the backup in smaller chunks and when i came back from work, sure enough it was fine. Great. I performed more backups over the course of a week. No problems. Last week I launched the software, selected the folders i wanted to backup, even selected the files - and the software insists on telling me "Please select the files to be backed up". Nothing changes this message. I'd removed the drivers/software, rebooted, reinstalled, uninstalled just the backup software, reinstalled - it doesn't matter - it just simply refuses to work.- The diagnostic tool that their website and their techical support people will tell you to use is useless. When you launch it, it does a SmartScan - which, if things are fine, it says "Pass" and you think "great". The problem is when it says "Info unavailable" - what does that mean? You check the help files, right? There's nothing in there that mentions what it means - or mentions it at all. So I reviewed the responses I got from technical support - which provided me a link - and the information in the link simply reiterated their software help info - which was useless. I'm a self service junkie. I don't want to call you. I don't want to email you. If I have a problem, I want to read the manual, or your website, or your forum. While I don't really believe i'm the first to have a problem with their backup software, I absolutely refuse to believe i must have been the first one to ask what "info unavailable" means. Help me help you help me! :)I think for me the issue is now trust. I think the data on the HD is fine - but considering the application stopped working out of the blue - who's to say the application in each directory I made a backup of on this drive won't stop working too? It works today, but there's no telling if it'll work tomorrow. Yes, I could manually copy the files - but when you're backing up 2TB of data, incremental backups really are the way to go. Another potential workaround is to purchase another vendor's backup software. Which i've done, and not yet tried - but this is wholly not the point. Don't shlep cheap and buggy software off, charge $25 more than the version of the product without it, and market it as "backup software that provides the world in gold" - that's just wrong. And frustrating.As a result, I won't be buying this drive again. I highly recommend you don't either. There are plenty of competing products on the market already, and if you're going to buy someone else's backup software - you might as well buy a hard drive from a vendor that invests in competent online and software support. After all, as of today, what were you spending that extra $25 on
Defect CF card I purchased. How can I get replacement?. I have had a Canon G2 since 2002. I used to use Viking 128 MB CF cards and had no problem. In October 2004, I bought one Viking CF512M 512MB CF card from Amazon. I did not use it until this summer. After I had taken 20 more photos and reviewed, I immediately found a few images corrupted. No matter how I tried, e.g. format the CF before use, there were alway corrupted images.I wonder if I can return the defect CF card and get a replacement from Amazon or from manufacturer?SherwoodL.A. count
Good Product. This is a good product. Not as good as an MP3 player with internal memory, as it is bulkier. But, it is great for the price. The only drawback is, it is somewhat larger than a player with internal memory. Running with it can be uncomfortable at times...if you are a runner, you may prefer a smaller mp3 player, one you can put in your shorts pocket...
Save your money. I loved my previous Microsoft keyboard -- this one doesn't work.  I've spent more than 4 hours on the phone (not including waiting time) with Microsoft tech reps somewhere in India.  Finally I was told, If I was not satisfied I should return the keyboard -- they'd run out of ideas.  I'm running a dual core processor Dell computer with Windows Vista Ultimate.  I'm still finding it hard to believe that Microsoft's own hardware, designed for Vista, cannot be made to work!!  I suggest Logitech
Lost Budapest Photos. I was in the middle of my second day of a long awaited trip to Budapest when this card died. I was using my new Canon Rebel XT, which had no problems with my 1 GB cards throughout my 17 day trip. I lost an entire day of photos. I would not recommend this product to anyone
Waste of money. I bought 3 of those to present to someone as a gift but I am really disappointed with this item. Not clear reception with too much of static. Do not waste yoour money in this item
Handset sound volume issues during conversation. I really wanted to like this phone from all the good reviews, but received one with issues, returned it and received another with the same issues; so it must be the phone model.The below items do not involve using the handset speakerphone feature which requires a "wait for you" "wait for me" behavior; just normal handset.-When you first answer an incoming call, you usually have to wait a few seconds for the phone to make available 2 way converstion; otherwise, you can say hello and the caller can't hear you and you can't hear them.-During a call using normal handset, background noise and even regular conversation can cause the phone to block the volume of the caller as though you are using the speakerphone feature when you're actually not. After a few seconds the volume will become audible again. This issue causes bits and pieces of the conversation to go unheard. This happens more on long distance calls than on local calls
Excellent PRODUCT!. One of the reviewers graded this product way down, based on cost of shipping.  Good warning for other buyers, but not entirely fair to the product itself.I bought this screen protector based on other product reviews, and I'm glad I did.  The Palm T|X screen appears to be a bit fragile (at least that's how it seems to me).  The ClearTouch Crystal Screen Protector retains the sensitivity -- as far as I can tell so far -- but appears to provide a much more resistant writing/tapping surface.From the product descriptions, I wondered if it would be tricky to install.  It's NOT.  Goes on like a charm.  Do clean the original screen carefully first, and use compressed-gas duster to get the last dust particles off.  Otherwise, a breeze to install
loading paper. I had to return it because it would never load the paper. Very poo
Lots of bad burns. I had so many bad burns with my first spindle that I had to ask for an exchange.  The new spindle had at least 5 bad burns too.  Also, the edge of the disc wasn't rounded but had a sharp lip on the underside.  Never again will I buy Memorex discs DVD, CD or otherwise
Product Has Bugs, Customer Service Won't Help!!!. I purchased the 8GB Creative Zen V Plus player during the first week in February.  I am returning it and this is why:The package arrived from Amazon.  I loaded up the software on my computer, then hooked up the player through the usb cord.  I let it charge for 6 hours like the instructions state.   Then I proceeded to load some of my music onto the player.  So after the music was loaded, I disconnected the player from the usb cable and started to listen to the music.  The sound quality was good, the player is easy to navigate in the menus, etc...  The problem was about half the music I uploaded was not on the player.  I could see the folder and menu option for the artist or genre but the actual file was not there.  So I plugged the player back into the usb cord, and pulled up the file location on the player through the computer.  The file was there and I could play it just fine through Windows Media Player.  I tried to access it again through the player and it was not there.  Then I accessed through the computer just fine.All my songs, all 4,500 of them, are in MP3 format from 56kps for my audio books to 192kps for the songs I ripped from cd's.  The player just wouldn't read about half my songs.  There was really no rhyme or reason on whish songs it would recognize.  I would load an entire album of 15 songs and I could only play 6 or 7 tracks.  This happened with my entire music collection.So I thought maybe the firmware was out of date so I uploaded all the updates from creative which did include a firmware update.  It did not solve the problem.  I then uploaded some of the same songs that would not play on the Zen V Plus onto my 3 year old Rio and original Ipod Shuffle and they played just fine.  I was frustrated at this point so I called the Creative Customer Service.  It is strange because they do not post the number for there company anywhere on there website and now I understand why.  They have the worst customer service/tech department of any computer/electronic company I have ever spoke with.  After three calls, never speaking to someone who I could fully understand as English was definitely not a first language, more like a 3rd or 4th language, I arrived nowhere.  They kept telling me they were emailing document to me on how to resolve the problem.  No email ever came, checked the junk folder and every other possible place.  So I tried a fourth call.  This guy basically called me stupid from what I could understand, saying "I can't believe you Americans" and then mumbled something in another language.   I asked for a supervisor. He told me that he would escalate my call and someone would call me in 2-3 days.  Then he hung up.I was really amazed that a company would treat its customers in this nature.  They really have to respect for there customers and do not want to help them in any way.  So I am returning the Creative Zen V Plus player and I also don't plan on buying anything from Creative again.By the way, after all this, the problem never was fixed.Also, when doing research on this product, I came across a couple articles and reviews that stated this player would play DIVX files.  This is not true.  This player will not play any files without being converted first.  I took an AVI video that was 100MB and it converted it into a 1.2GB file.  The format they use is absolutely a waste of space.  If you want to upload an entire movie on MPEG or AVI format, it will end up taking the entire 8GB of space if not more.  I converted the movie Cars for my son on a short road trip thinking I could have my music plus his movie.  I was wrong, the movie took up 7.1GB after being converted.I would not recommend this product to anyone.  As much as I don't like the IPod, I would recommend it over the Zen V Plus because:  1. It plays all my music 2.  They have a customer service/tech support that helps you and cares about its customers.I hope this helps anyone looking at this player.Jeff
Very Unsatisfactory I'm returning. Loud HISS all the time. The sound comes and goes all the time. Works 10 mins. then stops. Have to turn volume up loud to get it back. When working sounds ok. But will not continue working. I have a pretty new Sony TV and am only 12 feet away but the unit just does not work. Shame, I liked it when it worked
That's why I hate apple. Never seen a worse, less intuitive, inconvenient to use and worsely documented software that iTunes. Apples is up to it's usual standard. That's precisely why I prefer not to mess with it
Cheap is the word. If you want cheap speaker stands - these are the ones to buy. However,if you expect to move them reguarly - like to vacuum around them - I'davoid them. The spikes break off easily, leaving you with a cockeyedspeaker
Incompatible with other vendors; poor signal quality. This is my second disappointment with Linksys products.I have purchased this AP to use in AP client mode connected to my Netgear WGR614 wireless router. The product comes with no user manual or technical specifications sheet. After spending some time trying to set up connection I  have found user manual on Linksys web site, and discovered that AP client (as well as AP repeater) modes are supported only with another Linksys Access Point. It's not compatible with other vendor's products.When I tried to use it in Access Point mode, the signal was 2-3 times weaker then my old Netgear's.I am getting Very Good to Excellent signal quality from Netgear WGR614 (36-54 Mbps) and Good to Very Good (11 to 24 Mbps) from WAP54G..
Don't buy them!!!. I have gone through 4 pairs in 4 months because they keep breaking, one thing after another.   Either one ear stops or they both stop in the same Hour!!!  I wouldn't dare unless you can return them easy
So so..... been using the product for 6 months now - battery time isnt great - I constantly need to recharge the battery.  People always complain of an echo
P.O.S.!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  Crashes, have to restart, can't find router. I have a Netgear router and this wireless USB adapter.  I used the router WGT624 for several months just as a firewall directly hooked into my computer and never had any problems.  A few days ago however I moved my computer and decided to use this USB card and have had nothing but problems since.  Half the time on start up my computer will not be connected so I have to reboot. Sometimes multiple reboots and then it still doesn't work and I have to unhook everything, router, cable modem, etc.  I don't know how or why this happens but it seems to make everything stuck and nothing can communicate again until I do this.  This has happened several times so I am not imagining this.  I try various things but ultimately I have to shut everything down and actually unplug the modem from the power source for a few seconds then start everything back up.  I have cable and this is a procedure they have you do sometimes if things get locked up, usually when you have a bad connection.  I didn't have to do this when it was just hooked into the router, but with this USB P.O.S. I am doing it every day, sometimes several times a day.  Then it shows a connection of like 55% and the router is in the very next room.  That is with the door open, not 20 feet away.  Even now as I sit here writing this the little computer on the task bar showing my connection has dropped to yellow.  At least it hasn't changed red...........crap, just did, not #%^%$ kidding!  .....................Okay, back on line.  This is an absolute P.O.S. which I would take back except I got it in a package deal with the router and I bought it a long time ago but never used it till now.  When it does work it is quick.  But WHEN is the key word there.  Do yourself a favor, BUY SOMETHING ELSE!  Don't corporations test this crap before they mass market it?!?
Hate the thing. The picture is outstanding, but lately it has been crashing on me.  It will just stop at a random point.  Brand new discs even stop and give me an error code; then, I have to go around back and unplug the player just to get the disc out.  Going to return it and hope for the best, but from what I've read, other people are experiencing similar problems.
Great if you want neck pain. This product takes too much space and raises the notebook too high. the mechanism of holding the notebook is also rather flimsy. Its only use is as a USB hub and it is far too expensive for it. If you have so much space , it is simpler to get a normal USB keyboard for much less. The ideal solution is of course a docking station. Yet another innovative but overpriced and poorly designed logitech product
Too small for most computers. I would not recommend this unit for most computers as the battery is too small to provide reasonable runtime.  Under a 200W load it only lasted 3 minutes while the Back-UPS ES 500 lasted almost 12 minutes.  The ES 500 is only slightly more expensive but provides much longer runtime.  In my opinion this UPS is only good for very small loads (less than the average computer)
Update: Password can't be registered. Read my initial review below which was on July 27.  On August 11, Kensington told me that they do not know when the password registration process will be working, and they strongly urged me to send the product back for a refund.On July 27 I wrote:This should be a great item at a great price.  And as far as I can tell, it works fine.  Kensington has some serious technical problems, however.   The encryption installs and becomes fully-functional before you can register your USB key and password.  Registration is essential in case you lose the key or forget your password.  This is a BIG problem, because as of July 26, 2006,  Kensington's registration utility was down and not expected to be working until 6-10 days(current estimate).  Worse, the message I got when attempting to register my key the first two days was "Authentication Failed" which told me nothing.  Even worse, their overseas technical support person did not know about the problem. So he also thought I had a defective key, and we wasted a lot of time discussing replacement and timing (I'm about to leave on a trip and really wanted this protection for the trip).  When I finally realized that I would not receive a new key before I left, I asked whether I should uninstall the product or whether I could register the key verbally in case the key was lost on the trip (I figured the answer was no but I was getting desperate).  He went away for a long time, then he reported that he would have to call me back (that took 40 minutes) and finally he reported that probably my key was fine, it's the registration that was offline.  And no, there is no other way to register - that's part of the security.So the encryption is in place, the laptop boots and runs fine, but I have two days to decide whether to risk taking my laptop and losing the physical key, which means I would have to wipe my hard drive, or risk uninstalling the encryption and having the laptop stolen, in which case I still lose all my data AND sensitive data is exposed.  The laptop will be at risk in hotel rooms, and the key will be at risk on my person as I will be swimming and snorkeling. Kensington claims the thing is waterproof - maybe I'll just buy one of those little waterproof capsules and keep it around my neck.
Horrible PDA dictionary. My main annoyance was all of the screens I had to go through just to look up a word! It vexed me terribly. When it finally broke, it gave me the excuse to buy another dictionary... but certainly not this one!  I chose Handmark's Oxford dictionary, which I am pleased with
DO NOT BUY THIS-READ MY REVIEW FIRST!!. I bought one for my son at Christmas and it broke after a month.  It just suddenly wouldn't turn on.  Amazon was great with sending a replacement in just two days, before even getting the original back.  But the replacement model "froze up" after just 4 days and this time I am getting a refund.  To quote an e-mail from Amazon regarding this product "As it seems that the problem with this item is more widespread thanwe originally thought, we are not able to send another replacement."  So, DO NOT order one!
The other reviews are correct. I've purchased and attempted to install three of these adapters. One of them was on an older Dell laptop,installed without any problems at all and connected seamlessly to a Linksys WRT54G router with WAP encryption.The problems really started showing when I tried to install the second and third adapters, both on desktop computers running Windows XP SP2. The software installation was a breeze, but when I plugged in the adapter - nothing happened. Connect to network...which network? Scan..who? What?It looks like this adapter has a very, very short range and doesn't work very well a wall or two in between the routers. It would see the router and connect - to drop the connection and not find one. But then it would find it again, and on and off.Never really worked as expected on the desktops, so I've given up. I've had to disconnect them and reconnect them multiple times. Downloaded the updated software from Belkin's site, and still have connection issues with the desktops. The laptop works fine as long as I don't take it one room away from the router.Avoid at all costs please. I've used other wireless devices with the same router that I'm trying to connect and they work fine - a few rooms away and all.Spend a few more dollars and get something worth the money spent. Spend less time troubleshooting and more time surfing.Good luck
Chip failed, maker replaced. After I had shot and unloaded a few hundred photos, it got so I couldn't shoot without getting either corrupted images or a refusal message from the camera. I contacted Kingston and they replaced the chip at no cost (including postage). Meanwhile I bought a 1 Gb SanDisk chip that has given no trouble, and so far I haven't tested the new 500 Mb Kingston chip
save your money, get something else. this is one lousy expensive player.  as one of the reviewer mentioned, the hinge on the battery unit will break.  i had the unit replaced by the manufacturer as part of the warranty.  but, after a few weeks, it broke again, at exactly the same spot.  AudioVox refused to have it replaced again because the 90 day warranty period is over.  Also, it constantly freezes playing home made DVD movies, regardless of the format of the DVD disc, not to mention I can hardly read subtitle text.  i wish they had a money back guarantee
Not what expected. My 25" NEC tube TV of 18 years went on the blink again.  I've had it reparied a few times for $150.00 here $200.00 there and pondered replacing it with another tube TV like 27" Sony Trinitron or Samsung for $379.00.  But then I saw this Sylvania 26" HDTV for $499.00 and thought it was time to move up to high tech for a few dollars more.  I ordered it and received great service with quick 2 day delivery.  However, I was immediately dissapointed with the picture quality, much worse then my old TV of 18 years, but I still had hope because I was still waiting for my HD cable box.  After 10 days I got my HD cable box installed and while I saw a big improvement it was still not the quality picture I expected.  So from about a $200.00 repair of my old TV to $379.00 new tube TV to $499.00 HDTV I returned the Sylvania 26 HDTV and ordered a 32" Samsung HDTV LNS3251S form Amazon and am VERY pleased with this new TV.   Great picture in HD and digital plus happier with the larger screen
Not Worth It. I bought mine at Wal-Mart for $20, followed the instructions with two scratched DVD's from the library (one badly scratched, the other still playable) - and saw almost no change in the scratches or playability.  It's going back in the morning.This model relies on an aluminum oxide paste (superfine liquid sandpaper) to sand off the scratches.  I think I'll see better performance from one of the products that actually fills in the scratches rather than sanding down the rest of the disc.For cleaning, just get one of the inexpensive manual cleaners with the little bottle of denatured alcohol - they work just fine
Virgin's VM-500 5GB MP3 Player is not worth it. I purchased this item a a reputable retailer in New York, NY (B&H Photo).  You couldn't beat the price of $139.95 plus tax for a 5GB mp3 player with FM tuner and speakers.I had a problem with the set up.  I was not able to install the music management program to get my music onto the player.The player did not come with any CD so I installed the software as instructed by Virgin's "customer support."  and as per the quick start manual.  I also updated the player with the latest firmware as per the instructions of customer support.  I still could not transfer my songs.I've e-mailed them twice within 24 hours detailing my situation but all they wrote back was to do the same thing all over again as I explained abve.  They kept referring me to the web site but there is no link for the management software.  It only have the firmware updates and the player desktop update which does not contain the music management software.  The only thing that works is the FM tuner.The player along with the speakers is a great deal for the money.  However, given the fact that I cannot put my music on it doesn't make it worth it
What happened to the region code free setting??? HELP!. Hi! I bought my Cyberhome 300 in April 2006, and was able to set the region code to "0" to watch all DVD's.After not using the DVD Player for a few weeks (and unplugging it), the region code has automatically set back to "1" and I cannot change it anymore! What happened?? When I try to change it now I can only choose between the settings "1" and "-". Anyone who has the same problem? Thank yo
Trash !!  Dont buy this one !!  the 2wire dsl filter is much better. I have the 2wire dsl filter and it is much better than this southwestern bell one.  The 2wire is much smaller and sleeker and does a perfect job filtering out the noise unlike the southwestern bell s6086
DO NOT USE AS BOOT DRIVE. I recently purchased this item, and I was extremely disappointed.  It was a horrible experience trying to install this item.  The instructions for the drive did not match the type of drive, and on the western digital website, it didn't even list this drive to get instructions for.  So, I followed the instructions that came with it to a T, to install the drive as a boot drive, copying all my information from my current drive, which was about to fail.  It seemed to copy the files just fine and work ok as a slave drive, but then my original hard drive failed, and I moved this supposidly boot drive to be the single drive on my machine it would not work.  Upon calling customer service to find out what was wrong, I was asked, did you make the boot drive through windows or dos?  I told her I just popped in the disk they gave me and ran it, and followed the instructions, click on "I want to make a boot drive" and not on "I want to make a drive for additional service."  She said that it sounds like I did it through windows mode, and it won't make a boot drive in windows mode, only if I was in dos mode.  I asked her why this was not explained in the instructions, and now I had no original boot drive to try to do it again.  She told me to run windows recovery.  I asked if she could help me do that, because I couldn't figure it out, and she said no, windows isn't our product so we won't help you with that.  I said, but if this is what I need to install this drive, it says you are supposed to offer me free installation help for 30 days, why won't you help me.  Then I was spoken to as if I was a problem customer - you know, "MAAM, I TOLD YOU I CAN'T HELP YOU" in a nasty tone.I ended up going out, buying another hard drive to use as my primary and then installing windows from scratch, and having to reinstall all the drivers and programs I had on this new drive and I kept the western digital drive for a backup.All in all,  I thought this was a waste of money, a waste of hours upon hours of time, and a terrible experience.  I would never recommend purchasing this product
More development work to be done by Pharos. Yes, it's inexpensive when compared to some alternatives, but the devil is in the details.  These suppliers all differentiate themselves on the software and feature set since the underlying chips tend to be common, so this is where you will want to focus when comparing.Things I like about this system:1.	The hardware is well done, though the cable to the receiver could be a little longer.2. 	The option to view satellite positions in their software is really neat.3. 	Integration with contacts for route planning is nice.However, I just returned my Pharos system for the following reasons:1.	It crashes my Dell Axim X5 PDA, and this is apparently a known issue.  On investigation, the vendor's web site has a FAQ on what to do in this situation.  Unfortunately this is not a rare occurrence, and it is clearly a software bug.2.	Another bug in the navigation software showed my distance (as a bird flies) increasing to the destination while I was actually headed towards it on the interstate prescribed by the routing software.  After about 45 minutes of this, it abruptly fixed itself as if nothing had ever gone wrong.3.	The route calculation is so slow as to be unusable, and this is on a 400MHz Dell Axim X5 with a ton of memory- a very highest performance device.4.	Map inaccuracies are such that it occasionally indicates the user is off-route while on a major highway or the interstate.  I think that this is a case where map position coordinates for the roadway are at least 50 to 100 feet in error.5.	Maps have to be manually loaded from region to region.  Even if present in the memory, the user has to instruct the software to use it.  This is a big hassle, and one that is not tolerable while driving.6.	Generated routes are terrible in town and out, and I found myself using a paper map for the sake of efficiency instead of this system.  As an example of how ridiculous things can be, the device instructed me to exit Interstate 20 in the middle of nowhere then immediately get back on the highway.  This was not related to a map inaccuracy; the exit ramp, stop sign, and entrance ramp were exactly where they were indicated to be but the instructions made no sense.There are also a number of product features and tweaks that should be addressed (in my opinion):1.	A route builder tool is needed where the user is presented with route options, or can constrain the routing engine to use a certain highway or road set.  Without real time traffic information, school zone locations, etc, this would be necessary even if the routing engine were good.  And wile not a panacea, this would also speed the calculations up as a side effect.2.	The display should auto center when one zooms.  Drawing a zoom box on the screen only instructs the unit what scale you wish to see rather than zooming in on a specific region.3.	The map view tool is weak, making the process of transferring maps to your PC and Pocket PC slow and tedious.4.	There should be an option to adjust the amount of detail shown on the map: low, medium, high.  I saw situations at both extremes that I would have liked to adjust (actually needed to in one case).5.	It would also be nice to have basic trip computer features like ETA at destination as well as waypoints or road changes, average speed, a speed profile, etc.6.	The unit should be able to store and upload actual detailed routes to Pharos' web site for analysis.  This would allow them to tweak their routing engine to a point of usability, and perhaps generate rules or algorithms that would allow it to finish calculating before you arrive.Conclusion: At its current stage of development, this is a toy at best.  I don't what alternative to suggest yet, but would like to hear from you if you have a good one.Best Regards,Ro
Frustrating. On the surface, this is a slick mouse. It's cute, small, full-featured, and stowing the receiver in the mouse is great.But after using this for a week and a half, I'm ready to throw it out.Let's see:1) It refuses to turn back on after being stored. I'll pull it out of my laptop bag, plug-in the receiver, and... no juice. The mouse doesn't turn on, even though it's automatically supposed to turn after you unstow the receiver. I have to open the mouse up and reseat the batteries.2) Sometimes when I plug the receiver into my laptop, it doesn't get recognized. I try multiple ports and nothing. Once I reboot, it's ok.3) The absolutel LAST STRAW: as of last night, the mouse motion will suddenly freeze. You'll be mousing around and the mouse will suddenly lock  up. The buttons will click, the mousewheel will still scroll the page - but the cursor will be frozen. It only becomes "unstuck" when you scroll the wheel. It's absolutely aggravating to be working on my design work only to get stuck mid-movement, scroll the wheel, move the mouse, figure out where my cursor has now gone (it places it randomly), and then go back to work - only to repeat the process all over again 30-60 seconds later.I'm really disappointed. I've bought a few other Wenger products and never had a problem. I honestly didn't think twice when I was looking for a wireless mobile optical and saw this one with the Wenger logo. It's actually more expensive than the one I was originally looking at, but I thought "Hey, it's a Wenger."I'll be thinking twice from now on. Piece of crap
don't waste your money and time. The screen is too small. if you want to watch it in your car, you have to cover it because the back light is too week.
Horrible!!. Waste of time. Software had some bugs but more importantly performance was horrible.  I wouldn't pay 10 dollars for this product- yes it is that bad.  Accuracy rate was about 25% and the mistakes were beyond spell check.  They look like some new form of reformed egyption. Don't buy!
Returned it after 1hour. I bought the unit from best buy. When I got home, the unit would not play any of my mp4's (h264 format unprotected). In addition, it was extremely choppy when playing uncompressed vob files wirelessly. The remote was horrible, and FF/RW was useless.I would not buy this product if anyone wants to use h264 (supersmall size videos: ~900mb per movie)
EIGHTEEN MONTHS AND ITS GONE TO THE DUMP. I bought this DVD Player 18 months ago and after rarely using it, it has stopped working.  It will load the DVD but will not read or play anything.  What more can I say?  Its Junk
Usless brick!. I tried it on 4 laptops, and none of them was able to sustain the signal. It kept on dropping out! Mind you, two of the internal cards did a much better job than it.
My wife says they don't last. I got these for my wife who listens to AM radio on her portable Sony radio while commuting on the bus and train, 5 days a week.  She would run through a ton of regular alkaline AAA batteries so rechargeables made sense.She has a pair of the Energizer's and a pair of Duracell's that are of the same capacity and she says that the Energizer's are terrible and hardly hold a charge.  We use a MAHA MH-C401FS charger which charges each battery independently so they don't get overcharged.  What else can you say about rechargeables?  Either they last long or they don't.  These Energizer's DO NOT.  We recently got a pair of Sony AAA's and they seem to be even better than the Duracell's
pre-review. I cannot review this item because it cannot be used.  It was shipped with the wrong power supply and a software disk that won't work.I have been delayed in my response because my wife died and my daughter has just been released from the hospital with the same ailment.  Since this has caused me to go over the time limit, what can I do about it now
Just like Kelly I can't properly review this item. My wait has been 17 weeks and I received my monthly email today pushing out the delivery date another 30 days.  ONE BIG DIFFERENCE!!!!  THE ITEM IS NOW LISTED AS AVAILABLE BUT FOR  MORE MONEY THAN I AGREED TO PAY BACK IN NOVEMBER.  IF THIS IS AMAZON'S WAY OF MAKING ME TAKE A WALK AND GIVE CIRCUIT CITY MY $$$, IT WORKED
RIP-OFF: Doesn't advertise that you need an AC adaptor. I would like to believe that this hub works well- but I wouldn't know.  I bought it to reduce clutter on my desk from all my devices hooking into my powermac.  I hooked up my printer, ipod and digital camera and nothing happened.  I called Targus and they said I needed an a/c adaptor.  It doesn't come with one and doesn't say anything about one in the manual or instructions, or their website.  They said I could get it at radio shack and gave me the info (5 volt, 2.1 amp, center positive).  I've been to two radio shacks and online- they don't carry it.  I'm upset.  Any advice
Nah. You can get a 4 pack of Emerging Power 2100 mAH batteries for 9.95 on this very site.   I did.  They work great.  Why would anyone pay almost 30 bucks just for the batteries.  Ridiculous
Very disappointing. I have always been a big Epson fan.  However, I have been extremely disappointed with this printer.  First of all, it burns through ink cartridges, which gets expensive.  Secondly, I am constantly having to clean the nozzle heads to prevent gaps (which uses even more ink) so that the text on my documents is legible. It's so bad I have to clean them before almost every print job, and even then I rarely get a page to print out cleanly.  Also, the printer has major problems with the paper feed - mostly when trying to print double-sided.  After *every* page I have to push the paper feed button.  Very annoying for large documents.  Finally, when printing photos or anything that has a lot of ink coverage the colors are terrible.  It's been so frustrating I am thinking of forking over for a laser printer.  Avoid buying this printer
Goes to Goodwill. (Don't throw out your old tv yet!). I have no clue what this little thing is about. Dummy me thought I bought a nice little tv, but it reminds me of those little cards you'd get with chewing gum and every time you moved it in your hand, the image changed. That's what you experience when you move around in the room and still want to follow a show. You cannot watch this thing with somebody else seated, say, 15 feet away from you. The other person (or you) gets a foggy image, or just dark shapes. Up close you see hardly anything.Buyers beware: this is not a working tv.One star for the batteries in the remote...
The Worst Palm I have ever had. I have owned a Palm since they were first produced by US Robotics. This is by far the worst for reliability. I never had any problems with prior models (Palm 500, Palm III, Palm IIIxe). This is the second T5 I have had. I returned the first one because it constantly locked up (just like an old windows PC), and when it was working, the hot-sync would fail a lot of the time. I am ready to send the replacement they sent me back because the battery lasts about 2 DAYS even when I am not using it. Then I have a hard time getting it to turn on. I usually have to leave it plugged in for an extended period of time until it finally decides to turn itself on. What a waste of money. I wish I still had my Palm IIIxe
Don't waste your money; you don't need a tool to open a CD easily!. As a musician who's dealt w/ opening many CD packages for many years, let me save you some money.  You don't need a special tool to open CDs.  Just run the bottom edge of the CD against any solid, rough surface (like a sidewalk or concrete wall) a couple of times.  The plastic wrapping will break up easy as pie, allowing you to take it off effortlessly.Getting that pesky sticker that seals the top of the CD off is easy, too.  Again, no tools required.  You'll notice that the CD cover is "hinged" at the top & bottom in such a way that you can easily slide the front cover off the back.  It just pops in & out, held in place by a little bump on one piece that fits in a hole in the other.   Gently pull the front cover out of its sockets at the top & bottom, then bend the whole thing back, toward the top of the CD case where the sticker is affixed, so that the sticker becomes straightened out.  This will let you easily pull off the sticker in one piece.  (Try peeling the front cover off the sticker, rather than vice versa.)  And you're done!  All you have to do now is just pop the front cover back into its hinges and enjoy.The whole process takes under a minute, and you'll still have the money in your pocket that you didn't spend on an iffy CD opening tool, to buy another CD with
Slower and full of problems!. I had the sportrak color for about a year and loved it before I lost it. I got the Explorist 500 as a replacement. At first, I didn't like it because they took away alot of the menus and I was afraid of having a proprietary rechargeable battery. Then I got used to it although it navigates/zooms more slowly than my Sportrak did. What I liked the least was the compass didn't correct itself when I turned without walking like the Sportrak did - the Sportrak moved like a real compass! I kind of got used to that but after about 8 months of use it started giving me "Invalid Basemap" errors when starting up most of the time. I have tried the online support with Magellan and they have been very slow and haven't helped at all. I will be calling them shortly to see if I get any help there. There are a few other minor things I dislike such as not being able to modify geocaching waypoints without connecting to my pc. I am considering a Garmin replacement if Magellan can't help me resolve this issue
JVC used to be reliable - not any more :(. Pros: it's prettyCons: it's garbageSure wished I had checked here at Amazaon before I bought this - I can't believe JVC put out such garbage!  So many of these CD players have broken that they can't keep up with the replacement parts (5 week wait?!!)I guess I was one of the luckier ones - mine lasted almost 2 months before it died.Bottom line: if you haven't bought yet, look elsewhere.  If you have, keep your receipt and warranty handy..
Poor range. I bought the C. Crane FM transmitter expecting to broadcast from my computer and listen to it on an FM tuner with headsets as I worked around the house and yard.  It broadcast 5 or 6 feet, max, out of the box.  I performed the power boosting "fix" and now it broadcasts 10-20 feet, if I'm lucky, before static overpowers the signal.  This was a disappointing purchase directly from C. Crane that in no way met my expectations.  If it requires setting the transmitter on a grounded metal plate and lengthening the antenna in order to bring transmission up to whole house and yard capabilities, build it that way from the get-go or state the limitations of this transmitter forthrightly.I kept the transmitter because I wanted one for the car.  It's physically well built and works fine for that.  I also use it to play my Ipod through a radio...but, understand, the radio is sitting right next to the transmitter.If you want to transmit throughout your house and yard, look elsewhere
really crummy software interface. Transferring the first album to my PC took roughly 5 hours. The second took 3.5 hours, the third about 2 hours and the fourth about 1.5 hours.Learning the software interface took an inordinate amount of time, even though I've been an interface programmer.After learning the software, it appears every album will cost about an hour to record, mark the songs, name the songs and write the songs as MP3. If I want to edit out song parts or eliminate pops/clicks, it will take longer.It's really time consuming and the software doesn't make it simple or intuitive.The turntable is of reasonable quality. It's just a regular turntable with a built-in pre-amp. You turn the pre-amp `on' when recording to your PC, turn if `off' if you want to use the turntable with your regular stereo
2 Flaws in Excel. everything works fine except for two flaws in Excel: on the numpad, the minus key actually toggles shift and the slash key acts as the alt key.  this is unacceptable, i had a logitech keyboard also with all sorts of annoying little flaws which surfaced when playing games.  logitech has some great ideas and sleek looking products, but they are plagued with small yet crucial technical shortcomings.  i will never buy logitech again
Awful. The fidelity is not very good. I din't expect all that much, but the real problem is that the cord is too long to work well with an Ipod. The cord tangles like crazy and the offset lengths to accomodate the volume control make the headset clumsy. I just quit using the headphones in favor of the stock ipod ones
very disappointing for a cisco product or linksys. most of the claims made on the description require a service. so the service costs a fortune compared to the camera.  the basic management software that came with it is bad.  its old and no updates available. many features are unavailable and if you actuate the drive space limitation the whole setup is trashed and you have to start over in setting up again.  Some of the features that dont work are the ablilty to name cameras and it sometimes just misses one of the 4 cameras for no apparent reason.  The hard sold "feature" of emailed info from a motion sensor and being able to check vids from the internet is the service. Shame on the maker for selling a partly disabled product and then asking a monthly fee to make it work
Don't buy it. The SonicStage is really a disaster. I have been using MZ-RH910 for a year, and I use it for recording music lessons. When I upload my files to computer to back them up, I alway have some recordings (about 15%)unreadable by SonicStage, even though I can listen to them with the MiniDV. What can I do with those recordings? I can only leave them in the MD walkman. If my MZ-RH910 is broken, I have to buy another one in order to listen to those recordings. Obviously I will never buy Sony's recorder again.
Do not work as well as promised. I live in Washington DC, so I generally get a signal when outdoors.  Using these headphones did not yield an increased signal for me
DO NOT BUY THIS JUNK!!!. My drive FAIL after one year and a half...!!! This company really suck BIG TIME....I lost all of my data ...!!! ALL OFF IT...!!! THIS IS THE THIRD ONE THAT FAIL OUT OF FOUR OF THEM I PURCHASED LAST YEAR!!!  Total JUNK...!!! NEVER buy a LACIE AGAIN FOR SURE....MAXTOR EXTERNAL IS THE BEST!!
MADE IN CHINA: Look elsewhere. The highest volume setting is barely audible.The options are limited.More profit for an American company at the expense of Americans.
Read All Reviews Before Purchasing This Card. I, along with many others, have experienced "sound lock-ups", squeals and computer lock-ups with this card and the others in this series.  My sound issues have occurred mostly during games.Sound quality is excellent in Windows and when the card is working properly in games.Most of the issues appear to involve some kind of hardware conflict as most afflicted users have high-end computer systems running SLI, although the problems are not exclusive to these configurations.I am currently working with CL to resolve the issue, but I'm not sure they know what is causing it as this issue has been around since Aug 06.I am not saying "don't buy", just be sure you have fully investigated all the issues before making the purchase as I doubt your installation and use with be trouble free
Nice projector but bad odor. I recently bought this projector (not through Amazon) and ended up having to return it.  It has a persistent burning odor.  I thought it would go away after an hour or two, but three days later and many hours, it was just as bad.  It was so bad that my wife opened up the windows in our house and it was in the 20s outside.I liked everything else about the projector.  It was light and fairly small.  The fan was quite and the picture was bright.  If it didn't smell so bad, I would have kept it
Bogus review request. I've replied to this request three times. The product was returned to vendor and cc charges were reversed
Not everything. Read the plan carefully.  Not everything is covered under this plan.  They will use any excuse they can to say that the product broke under unusual circumstances so they don't have to pay.  Too many exclusions for an "everything is covered policy"  Don't waste your mone
Another Fuse... It came with the stickers all peeling off. Used it for about a month and the item failed on me. Then the bad news, it blew the fuses in my car and all my electronics stopped working. Tried it on a friends car and I blew his fuses (car and person). Look for something else. Seems to be a common problem.UPDATE: Linksys replaced this product instantly. Works but a little worried it will fail again.UPDATE ON UPDATE: Died again...
Don't waste your money... In general I've been happy with Belkin accessories, but this cable is the pits. It lasted less than a month! I used it to connect my HD/DVR cable box to my receiver. No crimps, kinks, or undue stress on it, but within 30 days my audio went from spotty to noticeable gaps to nonexistent.I don't like to support the Monster Cable hype, but because of their lifetime warranty I bought their cable to replace this one. So far no problems
I like the "un-improved" ones better. The old Koskin design is great. I have 5 and just logged on to order one for a friend and am quite disappointed to see the changes, so... my friend will be getting something else. The way the old handle was attached was very cool, a selling point. Plus the mesh in the handle made orderly labeling easy and attractive. The "OLD' Koskin material was pretty cool too. If all this has changed - find something else - no reason to stick with Case Logic for average stuff. You can get no-name discount junk everywhere. Hope Case Logic reads this.
Poor quality control, even worse Sharp customer service. I ordered this television with high hopes, knowing that despite reports of firmware problems and other defects that I would luck out and save a bundle.  But you get what you pay for.  Every Sharp Aquos LCD TV manufactured before April 1, 2006 shipped with bad firmware.  What does this mean to you?For me, it meant that 15 minutes after unpacking the TV and turning it on, it turned itself off and never turned back on again.  Resets, system resets, power cycling, unplugging components didn't help.  My TV was completely bricked.  A search turned up threads on websites like AVS Forum with other owners of Sharp TVs in the D4U and D6U series all reporting similar power management problems almost immediately after purchase.  For them, the fix was a visit to a Sharp authorized service center to either have the firmware replaced or a physical replacement of boards inside the TV.  I say a "visit" because Sharp does not cover in-house technician visits for TVs under 32", a fact they could have informed me of before letting me wait 1 week for a tech visit that would ultimately be canceled.So here I am, 10 days later and hundreds of dollars poorer with no TV to show for it.  Instead, it sits at the authorized service center (because Sharp obviously does not vet its service centers to make sure you get good service from them either).I'm willing to bet all of the inventory of D6Us that TigerDirect is selling at fire sale prices were produced before 4/1/2006.  Check the serial number on your TV if you do order one.  If it begins with a 501-512, 601, 602 or 603, immediately demand a firmware upgrade from Sharp (1-800-BE-SHARP), regardless of whether or not you're experiencing these issues; you will eventually, and hopefully while Sharp's warranty is still in effect for you.
I never recieved it. I dont know if I like it because I never recieved i
Gets rid of dust and fingerprints, but leaves a mess. The other two reviewers got it mostly right.  But let me make it clear: this lightly moistened wipes can indeed remove fingerprints and dust -- and even prevent dust build-up for a few days.  The problem is, when the cleaning liquid dries, it leaves ugly fog-like marks on your LCD screen.  I've found out that after it dries, using a lint-free soft cloth to lightly polish the screen helps clean up the screen completely.  But then, I could have just used the cloth to remove cust and fingerprints.I think these wipes can be helpful when you have serious fingerprints or dirt (not just dust) on your LCD screen.  Otherwise, for most people, this is just a waste of money and can actually make you frustrated
Didn't help a bit. I bought this to extend the range of my access point in my 1500 sq ft flat.  I had my access point at the far end of the house from where I wanted to connect some of the time.  This antenna made no difference.  I ended up moving my access point to resolve the problem
remote woes. It is to hard to set up with other TVS other then Sony TV
Not for use on Treadmill. I bought these headphones to watch TV while on the treadmill. They don't work at all for that purpose. Interference from the motor causes them to cut-out. They work great when I stop the treadmill
It won't work!!. I have a corded USB wireless antenna from Linksys that keeps falling off the table, so I thought I'd give this 'great new wireless' card a shot.I got it today and all the things the other reviewers said is happening to me also.It connects and then automatically disconnects.I tried NOT using their driver disc and letting Windows (XP) set it up (like the Linksys one did) and it forces me to use their driver, which won't work.I'm sending it back
Did not see any difference. I did not see any picture quality improvement using this high priced Monster cable. I get the same quality pictures from my $ 8.00 cable bought from biglots. So purchased a HDMI cable. But believe me. The picture quality from my cheap component cable is still good( eventhough HDMI pictures are little better) when I compared with the pictures from HDMI cable
No Good For Students. I am a student in a technology high school, and when I saw that this bag would fit my laptop, and what looked like room for my books, I was in for a shock.Initially, it was fine, but after a month or so of use, a small hole began to form, which recently formed into a large hole. Now, the whole handle part of the bag is coming off.It is a good bag, but it is poorly designed for any student, in my opinion, who needs to carry both a laptop and a large number of text books
Buyers! Beware of Lexar's rebate claims. I bought two Lexar thumbdrives, over other brands, partially based on their rebate offers. Despite my methodical record keeping and submission, I simply got post cards saying that I did not "meet" the rebate requirements (in place of the rebate checks).  The first time it happened, I thought it was, oh well, my fault, But the same identical thing happened on my second rebate submission. This is simply frank fraud by Lexar, on a smaller scale, therefore not worth customers' time to file a complaint or to pursue it further. I hope the recent fines associated bogus rebates woke up these small time thieves and deterred them from deceiving and conning their customers again
Junk!. Replaced first spindle and still junk. Will always stick with Verbatim from now on
Throw-away player. Bought it. Played a DVD on it for 2 hours and the unit failed.  Other DVD players in the house have had no problems at all and have worked non-stop for years.Save yourself time and money.  Purchase a quality item instead of this throw-away player
Great service if you never plan on canceling. I have been a subscriber for 4 years.  Back in November my account was turned off due to a billing issue. The week prior to it being turned off I started receiving 3 calls a day for payment.  I advised one of the reps to wait a week for the payment, payment was made.  Calls stopped for another week.  The radio was then turned off and the 3 calls a day started up again.  I explained to the bill collectors I owed nothing and when offered to reactivate the radio I told them not to bother, at this point I wanted nothing more to do with XM.  They offered me 3 months of free service to come back, anyone who cancels can get this by the way, and I refused.  The 3 calls a day continued for the next week, I was informed that it simply takes a week for your name to fall out of their automated system....2 more months go by and then I start receiving a bill saying that I reactivated my radio and owe for 2 months of service and all the late fees that go with that.  40 dollars.  I call in and state I never reactivated my radio, thus I don't owe for reactivating my radio and the 2 months of service that would have followed.  The customer service rep told me that it would be taken cared of, 2 weeks later I get another bill.  I call back and the rep tells me the same thing and apologizes for my inconveniences.  I even called back the next day just to make sure it was finally resolved, and that rep confirmed that I no longer owed anything.  So then last month I start receiving COLLECTIONS NOTICES. YOU HAVE ONE MONTH TO PAY THIS BEFORE IT GOES TO COLLECTIONS.  I called in and was promised they would look into it and call me back.  This apparently has taken care of the issue, though I never received the call back.  This week I called 6 times, 3 of which I was promptly hung up on for no reason, and was told each time that it had been resolved.  So hopefully this time it really is...  To anyone considering XM I suggest you just get an MP3 player
I drops. This product was useless. I was trying to fix my screen and all it did was make things worse. I got a microfiber cloth and everything and nothing seemed to happen. It's not worth the money.
Expensive, not good quality. I bought it and used it for two days, returned it on the third day.  Very expensive for what you get.  The system does not come with an amplifier where you can adjust the sound.  The surround sound is non-existant and for 499 you don't get that much.Returned it and changed for a Sony DAV-DX375 which totally rocks !!Don't buy this, you will be very dissapointed
BEWARE SAMSUNG DLP DESIGN FLAWS!!!. Consumers should be aware of serious design flaws which exist in Samsung DLP televisions.  Cooling fans and color wheels are highly susceptible to failing.  (As a non-techniocal person I should have no idea what these parts are, but alas, I bought a Samsung DLP)  Expect these to fail within 1-2 years.  Expect to pay approx $400 to replace the color wheel and $200 to replace the colling fan.  That is, if your service technician can find them in stock anywhere.  These parts are commonly in a national backorder because of the very high failure rates.You should also expect the lamp to fail sooner than advertized.  Many people need to purchase a new lamp between 1-2 years, and some more often than that.  The lamp costs approx $150-$250 depending on your model, but you should be able to replace it yourself without too much difficulty.  This cost will be in addition to replacement costs for the color wheel and colling fan.  Please remember that these maintenance costs are recurring, and you will have to fix them again in another 1-2 years.While I was very satisfied with the quality and performance of my DLP, my color wheel failed very early.  I called tech support to report a grinding noise, and was told to "turn it off", wait 15 minutes, and turn it back on like this would fix the problem.  After doing this for a while, the color wheel finally failed, actually shattered!  Now I am out of warranty, and Samsung wants nothing to do with me.  I have even tried ordering the part myself from two different online vendors, and they are both backordered indefinitely!  It has been 6 weeks and they have no estimate for when this part will be available.  Samsung cannot even give me an estimate when the supply of replacement parts is expected to meet demand.  I have had my TV for 18 months, and apparently there is a national epidemic of them breaking at the same time!I have a 42" Samsung Plasma which is a beautiful set along with a 26" CRT.  Both are wonderful products, but Samsung is selling DLP LEMONS and will not stand behind them.  DLP is a great bargain up front, but a maintenance NIGHTMARE!  You will pay in the long run, and by the long run I mean every 2 years.  If you still want to purchase a DLP television, PLEASE BUY THE EXTENDED WARRANTY!  IT WILL SAVE YOU A TON, BUT YOU WILL STILL HAVE TO WAIT FOR THE CIRCUIT CITY TECH TO FIND PARTS WHICH MAY TAKE MONTHS!I expect Samsung to abandon their design flaw riddled DLP sector, and focus on their beautiful plasma line.  Expect DLP prices to drop even further, but please...LOOK BEFORE YOU LEAP
Don't Bother. This product is useless. I purchased it because I have the new Ipod video player- which is a little more fragile then the previous.. well- I see this product which I thought would be great. but- It most certainly is not! Its awful. There were air pockets all over- and no matter how much I tried, my brother tried- or my friends- the air pockets would not go away. If you want air pockets all over your viewing screen then get this.. if not- I would suggest somthing different! This is horrible and a waste of money!!!
I am unable to verify its ultra high performance. ~I bought the MVSV3-1m cable and put it between my Pioneer V555 DVD player and SONY WEGA tv KV-27FS12, I was unable to see with my naked eyes any improvement regading the visual quality, color, sharpness. Same as the result as I used the composite cable came with the box. I really don't know why. I have to say, my TV is a good one and the picture quality is already satisfactory even I don't use DVD player. Unfortunately my DVD player does not have component jack to let me try the next level video~~ experience. I don't want to say this expensive cable is a poor one, I was just unable to verify its alledged ultra high performance. we just don't have a benchmark to evaluate it.
I paid it but I never received it. Dear Amazon, I paid for this but until today I did not received it, I wrote to the supplier and until today I did not received any answer from him
A portable device IDEAL for NON PORTABLE computers. Looks sleek, runs fast on my dual opteron with Suse 10.1.Reformatted to ext3 very well.Unfortunately, it will not work on my Dell Precision M50, not enough power on the USB port I guess. I wish it had an optional connector for a power supply. Now I will have to hack the cable. Waste of time :(
Better options out there... This battery has 1800mah while the Sony has 2100mah... go for the Sony
Overpriced. As for digital technology, monster cable has once again ruined the marketplace by greatly over estimating what their products are worth.  The great difference with the digital output/inpt devices compared to analog is simple.  If the digital signal reaches the device it needs to it can't be any more or less clear.  Because your digital signal is comprised of "0's" and "1's" if you can see your TV or hear the music then what ever cable you use works-  There is no distortation across digital signals, so don't pay the extra money- In fact you shouldn't need to spend more than around $30-50.
Does not work with large SD cards. Buyer beware.  This reader does not work with large SD cards.  I could not get it to work with a new 4 GB SD card.  My 1 GB cards work fine, but anything over that will probably not work.  I confirmed with with Lexar technical support as they have not tested this yet
Was not needed. Based on my research for the Logitech Harmony 890 remote, I thought I needed the extender.  That is not the case.  The extender comes with the remote.  The return process was a nightmare, because of Amazon's third party retailers.  Beware when purchasing throught the third party retailers, the rules of return and customer satisfaction change!  EVENTUALLY, Amazon resolved all issues, but it didn't happen in their normally easy manner
Unacceptable. This model was intended as a replacement for my not-very-old and yet quite functional Panasonic PM-series stereo.  This is the kind of thing that happens when you browse Amazon while drunk late at night.Unfortunately, with the exception of a very slight advantage in audio quality, the Sony is in all respects inferior; ergonomics, appearance, and above all, FM reception, which is laughably poor.  Do not buy this stereo if you expect a quality receiver.  Hiss abounds, several local stations I heard previously are now unreachable, and to top it off, Sony has stuck with their time-honored habit of using proprietary connectors, so when I went to plug in an after-market antenna to get better reception, I found a weird little plug that I hadn't noticed when I put the damned thing together.  Grrr.  So now I'm going to sell this thing and buy a nice new Panasonic with the proceeds.  Death to Sony
Fellow Brand Shredders. I purchased a Fellowes Shredder and felt it shredding money right out of my wallet. If you ever disasmbled a Fellow shredder, you would come to see that they use cheap plastic parts where sturdy mechanical parts made of metal are needed, this is why most of their products fail and their customer service is as good as their cheap parts.  I took mine apart as it was useless and time consuming to deal with returns and their customer service.There are many other brands of shredders out there and Fellowes is the worst, so save your money and buy another brand.  Fellows is sure no fellow
Very flaky, contrary to Viking's reputation for quality. I've owned various Viking branded memory cards in the past and have always been pleased with their performance, until I purchased this 2 GB CompactFlash card.It's possible that this card works well in other uses, but I found its performance unacceptable as storage for RAW images shot with my Canon Digital Rebel SLR.  Anywhere from 1/5 to 1/10 of the images were corrupted, particularly bad in continuous shooting mode.  Contrast with my Lexar Media 512 MB and 1 GB cards, which were able to shoot reliably with no corrupt images under the same conditions, and without as much of a lag time as the Viking card (often left waiting 15+ seconds after shooting as few as 3 continuous images while the card to "recovers")
They denied the rebate request, what a rip-off!. Your rebate submission has been received.Unfortunately your rebate is denied for the following reasons:REQUEST POSTMARKED AFTER CLOSE OF PROGRAM DEADLINEREQUIRED POSTMARK BEFORE 09/10/04; ACTUAL POSTMARK 09/13/04***********************************************There was absolutely no cut-off submission deadline given, except the purchase by date and submit within a certain time after receiving purchase.All were followed to the "T".I submitted the rebate immediately after I received the merchandise from Amazon.Give me a break, I'll never touch another thing from viking except with a 10' pole.If it was not so piddling an amount, this would be worth reporting to FCC, but the state of customer protection in this country make you jump through even more hoops, probably for nothing, more heartache.Just forego rebates, send Viking back to the boat and purchase another brand
Could NOT Get This Remote to Work. I bought this remote to use with my Ipod 20G with Clickwheel and, despite installing as instructed, I could not get this to operate. It fit the Ipod very well, so I figured I would not have a problem.  I have also used Maxell products in the past and also haven't had any problems. The remote lit up, but it would not operate any of the functions when I pointed it at my Ipod.  Maybe this is a great product and I did something wrong, but it is easy to install and mine would not work.  I returned the remote to Amazon as defective and received a refund for it.  Again, this might be a great product, but I wanted to write a review to warn other customers that I had problems with it
Too buggy. I have a Linksys wrt54g wireless router with 5 notebooks, a printer, and 2 desktops all working without problem through Comcast cable. I use WEP and MAC address filtering. Linksys support very kindly spent about two hours trying to help me get this supposedly compatible phone to work, but it can not connect to the wireless router. I think they rushed this to market before it was ready
Confortable but the sound is poor. I don't recommend you to buy this item, its sound is poor, and there is a static noise when the car engine is on.
CruzerSynch Doesn't Work--No Support. As a dumb hard drive this is 1GB for more money than you need to spend. The "U3 CruzerSynch" preloaded application has never been able to transfer the Contact list from my Outlook Express, it crashes...everytime. It's also better to use SyncToy from MS because CruzerSynch only synchs (deletes files deleted from the HD) while SyncToy has a "Contribute" option that never deletes from the destination drive. I contacted "support" I sent them the requested copy of my wab; they've been "working" on it for weeks, I never expect to hear from them. CruzerSynch also, without warning, deleted my address book (Contacts) from my HD. Not good
Great but Hard to get use to. The Z-Board is great. But If you are playing Battlefield 2 and then switch to the ZBoard you are in a fix. The controls are totally different and very hard to get use to. If you start with it, it might be alright but I think the regular keyboard will be just fine
wrong item. The item is fine.  It was the wrong DC adaptor for the Garmin unit purchased.  It was listed along the Garmin unit as the correct one for the unit.  It was for another Garmin line of products.  I'm sure it worked well on the correct product
don't buy this!. When I first got this camera, I was satisfied.  It is complicated to use (definitely not intuitive) because it does so much with so few buttons that you need to scroll through endless screens at time sto do what you want.  However, it took pretty good pictures.  However, soon after the warranty expired, it began to overexpose pictures and we couldn't stop it from doing that.  We tried to contact Fuji but have gotten no response.  My wife found that this is a common problem (overeposure and lack of response from Fuji), which is probably why they have a lot of refurbished ones to sell.  Hopefully, they have fixed the problem but I wouldn't bet my money on it.  This camera has given us more frustration than it is worth
Almost impossible to use with large-capacity iPods. I have this cable installed on a CDA-9856 deck, using a 60GB iPod Photo. The interface completely circumvents everything that is good about the interface on the iPod itself.1. The controls and display on the iPod are disabled when connected the head unit. You MUST use the head unit to control the iPod, and you cannot see information about the currently playing track on the iPod.2. When searching through artists, albums, songs, or playlists on the deck, only one item is viewable at a time (contrasted with 5 or 6 items viewable on the iPod screen itself). This makes it extremely dangerous to browse through your music while driving if you don't already know exactly what you want to listen to.3. One "tick" of the control knob on the deck scrolls through 1 item (artist/album/song/playlist) on the iPod. Scrolling does not speed up as you continue to turn the knob. If you want to scroll through 200+ artists, expect to spend fully 2 minutes or more twiddling the knob. While driving. I can't even begin to describe how frustrating this is.4. There is absolutely no way to speed up the process: there is no fast scrolling mode that skips through 10+ artists at a time, there is no way to scroll by letter of the alphabet, no nothing.5. When scrolling through items, the menu returns to the beginning of the list each time you pull it up. If you spend 90 seconds scrolling to "New Order", then next you want to listen to something by Nirvana, have fun scrolling for another 90 seconds.It's as if Alpine didn't bother to user test this system AT ALL with large-capacity iPods. It's a complete embarassment and I will be returning it as soon as possible
You get what you pay for. These are $10 headphones. There's nothing amazing about them in my opinion.  I bought them to use with my ipod when I'm out, or at work.Right out of the box, I was disappointed with the fit, and I know everyone is going to be different, but for me they just aren't comfortable.The sound quality is clear, but very thin and lacking bass. Even when I'm pressing them into my ears to get the best possible fit, the bass just isn't good. EQ settings to boost the bass don't help either, and often reduce sound quality even more.The ear clips don't really seem to do that much either.  They kind of keep them on your ears but don't really hold them IN your ears at all.  The ear pieces tend to get tangled together easily as well.In summary, I wouldn't recommend these for music, but if you want a cheap pair of headphones for listening to audio books or some other kind of spoken word, they might be good-IF you can tolerate them in your ears for that long
the ability to pause during recording?. Am I missing something, or does this unit NOT allow you to pause during a recording? When I try to use the pause button during recording (using DVD-R to record a program), a message pops up saying "That function prohibited during record mode." And when I check the user manual, the only thing it says regarding the "Pause" button on the remote is that it is used to "pause during playback." A recorder with NO PAUSE feature for editing on the fly? What if you want to edit commercials while recording? What if you're dubbing from home videos and you want to pause to edit out unwanted segments? Seems to me that's either really bad design or a rather remarkable oversight.
Good printer when it works. First, the print quality is very good.  When it does work, it seems to work very well.  I was pleased with the print quality and features, and the print speed is excellent.But the real problem is the extremely unstable software.  More than half the time, I could not start a scanning operation without it failing.  And when it fails, it really fails, and the only way to get it back working again is to pull the plug on the printer (that's right - the power button won't turn off the printer power when this happens), AND restart the computer which was the target of the scan output.   Since I normally do a fair amount of scanning, this meant most days having to reboot both printer and computer, just to do a simple scanning job.The printing software was also iffy, although not nearly the problem as was the scanner software.   Probably 10% of the time, a print job would not complete.The HP Image software which came with the printer was a very useful and straight-forward photo-processing tool, which I would recommend for the most part.  HP chose, however, to ignore all the normal Windows software conventions, (like having a File and Edit menu at the top of the screen), so you are always having to hunt around on-screen for what you want to do.Bottom line:  I hate playing the "print/scan lottery", wondering whether my print or scan job will actually work, each time I try to print or scan something.   This is not a finished product, and I strongly recommend buying something else
Great idea, bad product. Big disappointment. The product does not work in my view. I have to review every card and have to manually correct the extracted information in 95% of the cases. It is not much different than entering the information manually. The character recognition software has a long way to go to be effective. Does not even recognize that "wireless" is the mobile phone number. One would think that they would get it right after all these versions and years. The only good thing is once you scan the cards, you can throw them away, but still have to spend the same amount time entering the information by hand.
Charger is fine, Transmitter is awful. There is absolutley nothing wrong with the car charger.  It works fine.  However the fm transmitter has 2 problems for me.  1 -- The connector is not long enough to connect through many of the protective cases made for Zune so you have to take it out of the case.  2 -- The signal is VERY WEAK and did not work for me in either of my cars.  I ended up buyin a cassette adapter which worked much better and there was a 100% better sound quality
Construction quality below expected. I've bought one of the 12c platinum because I needed a calculator in my office. I don't do financial calculations, so probably I'll use the calculator only to make elemental arithmetics, but I like RPN and the programmable features.Build quality is below expected: intro key responsiveness is different than other keys', the soft case finnish is bad and the support pieces are not well adjusted, so the calculator is slightly unstable.With the tag price this machine has you expect to get a perfectly assembled piece.Disappointed
decent sound but zero comfort. I bought this headset from retailer (offline), and returned it the next day. First off, I have to make it clear that I had NO problems with sound. Even though the speakers could have been just a tiny bit bigger (they use 40mm drivers), the sound quality of the headset was just fine.However, when it comes to wearing these headphones, the only words that come to mind are "uncomfortable as sin". The awkward squarish shape of the cups made it hard to get any kind of decent seal around the ears (and a bad seal on closed-back headphones ultimately leads to poor sound isolation). Also, I have no idea what material they used for the cup pads, but it is nowhere near soft enough... in fact, I litterally couldn't wear these things for more than five minutes without my ears turning red (flush) from discomfort. Mind you, I also own a cheap pair of Koss headphones I can keep on for hours at a time, so my ears are definitely no stranger to being cupped in speakers either... but these things, they just plain hurt to wear after a very short period of time, which isn't good at all. Discomfort and being unable to obtain a good seal around the ears were ultimately the main reasons for the return.If your ears are tough, you should have no problem with this headset. The sound quality is decent and it should work just fine for you. However, if you're looking for comfort and good sound isolation, you'll want to look elsewhere..
Did not charge. I purchased the Garmin Forerunner 201 but when I received the watch it would charge so I have not been able to use it and now it is back with the manufacturer.  Garmin warranty is for 1 year so everthing should work out but I have not received it back yet so I do not have too much to say.
Beware if buying this in S.F. Bay Area, and you use Comcast. The reason is, this product isn't listed in the Comcast list of TV's that they can program their remote to.  What that means is you have to use two remotes, and if this isn't bad enough - when you call comcast up to get a signal, they won't/can't do it.  So here's where I am now - and I've had the TV for about two weeks now:  No picture, after watching a DVD, I'm unable to switch it back to TV mode.  Because there's no companion remote to do it on.  After several long minutes with the Comcast tech, trying to get her to just send me a signal, I couldn't take it anymore.  I asked for a tech to come to the house, and got an appointment for 11/7.  So another week goes by with no picture.  The screen tells me "No Signal."  After a few seconds of this message it flashes to ""Please  Scan Channels."
outrageous price for sb5100. the average going price for this product is $50.-$60.  the price quoted herein of $600. is so far beyond what might be considerable reasonable it's ludicrous.  doesn't Amazon have any standards for their third party vendors?  whether or not you disclaim responsibility for third party suppliers, they do appear on Amazon's web site, and nothing will prevent Amazon from being associated with such chicanery. allowing such postings is unworthy of Amazon.  for a number of years i have held an equity position in Amazon, and fully understand, and generally approve of using additional sources for products your customers want, and i do understand the meaning of caveat emptor, but this is an embarrassment
lousy sound quality, even at $43.99. I have returned this item to Amazon; I paid $43.99 when they had it in stock. The audio out on this dock is a stereo mini (1/8") jack, the connection is terrible from then getgo, with low volume, distortion, and noise when the jack is jiggled.I would highly recommend the dock they're currently selling at Radio Shack for $29.99. It has RCA outputs on the back and excellent sound quality, it charges, and the remote has a menu button
That's it?  A $6 dollar cable and a $14 cable?. I was very disappointed when I received this to see that it was simply a package of two cables.  Cables that you can pick up at Radio Shack for MUCH cheaper.  Just ridiculous.  The Airport Express itself is fantastic, but skip this accessory and go to your local Radio Shack for the mini-RCA cable, and a quick search online for the optical to mini
A $10 toy piano has better sound than this. For the price ($80) I expected much better sound.  Should spend a little more and get a Shoenhut or for $10 you could get a toy piano that sounds better than this one.  Very tinny sound, completely out of tune (why do they bother even assigning a note to the keys?), and lid is attached with screws AND glue so the only way to get to the metal rods to attempt to tune it, even after the screws are removed, will be to crack the wood casing getting past the glue
Don't buy.  Terrible terrible product. Like so many others in these reviews (I should have read them first!), I can categorically say that this is one of the worst software/hardware products I've ever bought.  It does not work, tech support is useless, and you should not even try to make it work. I am a computer expert with a great computer, and there is ABSOUTELY NOTHING I can do to make this work.  Don't buy.
Needs Improvement. I bought one of these and returned it a couple days later (from an electronics store - much more expensive than @ Amazon).  While it had many qualities I was looking for, like the thick, protected connector for the ipod instead of a dangling wire, this unit just didn't do a good job of holding a charge.  I followed all the instructions, charge it overnight, etc. but still it would only give and extra hour or so battery life to my 40 gig ipod.  As tempting as this one is, I'd say pass and find one with proven ability to hold a charge
I whish I'd received written conformation!. I paid for it and got an e-mail link but have yet to receive the written conformation. Called the 1800#. It's been a month. If it's this hard to get the plan I wonder how it will be if I need to replace my product
do not buy 2 of these!!. I bought 2 for 2 to race, but only one 'rumbles". I have called Logitech tech support and they said, "oh,well,that's the way it was designed". Nowhere on the box or the instructions does it say that and it is very illogical. I will not buy Logitech gaming products again
Wouldn't work on my computer. The hook up and downloading the software was very simple.  There was a error problem with the drivers.  My computer is fairly new with windows xp.  I called there support and was told to try it on another computer. I install it on my neighbors computer and the same happened. I sent it back to Amazon and credit my account, and bought an other brand.  Amazon is so great about handling returns.
MISREPRESENTED KEYBOARD. I am under the impression that I have been swindled:   Microsoft on its packaging, and Amazon in its web writeup, announce this as a "REMOTE KEYBOARD FOR WINDOWS XP MEDIA CENTER EDITION".I have both a VAIO Laptop with XP Media Center Edition, and a PC with MS Media Center Edition, but neither will work with this Keyboard.The small print inside the box says I have to buy a 'MEDIA CENTER PC EQUIPPED WITH THE PROPER MS RECEIVER...!"  for this to connect to.  Absolutely preposterous.   Nowhere outside the box, nor in Amazon's desciption, is there a warning that this SEVERE limitation exists.So what do I do with this keyboard now?Can somebody supply me with a receiver I can connect to my PC?Or have I really been swindled
Unit keeps reporting Incorrect password. Dispite having a confirmed that I have working Skype account (tested via a computer and USB phone)... the CIT400 (which has been correctly set up as per all included instructions), keeps returning an "incorect password" message every time I try to log into Skype with it..(no, I am not trying to log in when my PC is logged into Skype and yes I am sure that I've keyed in the correct Skype name and password into the phone).Linksys outsourced tech support is USELESS...They can do no more then rundown the same checklist that you can find yourself...it all comes down to reset the phone, reset the base station...and it DOES NOT WORK.I'm sure that there has to be an identifiable reason for this to be happening but I'll be returning the phone if Skype tech support (who I hope just might have a clue) can offer no suggestions.
Cheap, Not Inexpensive. The principal benefit of this product is in the valuable lesson it teaches not to buy the lowest price item without first taking a good look at the product reviews. I was never able to get the card to do anything. I tried removing and reinstalling the drivers. I tried getting assistance through the web site. I tried contacting the manufacturer and they never returned my phone call. I've decided to cut my losses and buy a different card
Seems a good idea, but poorly put togeter. I purchased 16 of the Allsop 26625 DVD/VHS Organizers. After I had 4 or 5 of them on the floor, loaded with DVDs, I was going to move them to load the next batch. But, when I picked them up off the floor, two of them came apart, dropping the DVDs on the floor. Knowing they were weak, I tried to hold the next one together, but pressed a little too hard on opposite corners; the other two corners gave way, and my hands came together, scattering DVDs all over the floor.Looking at the pieces that came apart, I saw that hooks were molded into the plastic and were supposed to snap over ridges on the next piece. But the hooks were too shallow to hold against the strain of holding them with the DVDs facing upward, and they were the same on all 16 boxes.I emailed the manufacturer (from whom I had bought 12 of the boxes) and asked, since it would be time-consuming for me to send them back, and costly for them, what would they offer me if I just kept them and glued the corners together. I had absolutely no response.I ended up spending two evenings snapping the boxes apart, glueing the 112 attachment points and reassembling them. I think they will be OK, now, but I would not have purchased them if I knew they were so poorly manufactured. And, I do not have any good thoughts about Allsop's customer service
Good idea; lousy execution... I have mixed feelings about this product.  The idea behind it is fine--keep all of your CDs/DVDs in one place, away from too much handling.  The problem is that the Sony implementation is mediocre at best.  The user interface is *terrible*; so bad you almost can't believe that they'd release a product like this.  You need a keyboard to do anything reasonable, and the "Load info from DVD" feature barely works.  And when it does, it's wrong and uneditable.  The remote control is so poorly laid out that it's almost comical.  The most important button, to get a list of your DVDs, is labeled "Folders" and is tiny and in a bad location.  Plus once all your DVDs are loaded, then what?  You only can support one TV...I have other TVs and a DVD player in the car, so I either have to unload them (and the device forgets everything), or have to copy all the DVDs that I need to use on multiple machines.If you are not sure whether to get this, I'd consider buying your movies from iTunes and using an AppleTV, or some other similar model.  You might also consider any fair use provisions that let you keep a copy of the DVDs you rightfully own for permanent insertion into this device (although the interface is still absolutely horrible).If the remote and user interface were actually functional and elegant, I'd probably feel differently about this product
Linux Users Beware. I purchased this card after borrowing a card with an identical product number from a friend. My friend's card worked out of the box with my version of Ubuntu Linux.When I received my card, it simply did not work. After doing some research, I found that I had a card with a different version number, and a different chipset. My friend's card had a chipset made by Atheros, which worked out of the box. The card that I purchased had a Broadcom chipset, which is notorious for being incompatible with Linux. Even after going to the forums, I was unable to make the card work.Belkin is dishonest, in that it makes changes to the chipset without changing the product number, only the version number, which the consumer is not made aware of. Had I been aware that the card had a different chipset, I would not have ordered it
This stopped working after about a week. When I was christmas shopping, I thought this looked really cute, and I figured, "Hey, it's cheap, and looks good."  So I bought it.  It worked pretty well for the first couple of days, and then the CD playing system on it just decided to stop working.  I checked all things that I might have possibly done wrong, but I didn't find any.  When you try to load the CD, it doesn't let you play anything.  I would not recomend this product for whoever wants to buy it, because it did not work like I wanted it to, and it made a pretty lousy Christmas present after I found out it had broken.  DON'T BUY THIS
caution-device may be responsible for phone line noise. In retrospect, I am not sure how well this worked. As another reviewer stated below, after a couple of years, when using my cordless phone, I started to hear static, then eventually, I heard a very loud, annoying pulse tone which the person I called also heard.Assuming the line noise was due to my phone/DSL line, I called my telephone service provider to check the line. I was thinking of changing my DSL line filters or buying a new phone (assuming some problem with my Panasonic 2.6 GHz phone). When I figured out this device was responsible, the Zapper went immediately into the garbage.Not sure what started the problems (bad battery?, latent defect?). In the end, am not sure how effective this device is as I still received plenty of unsolicited calls. In any case, this device was not worth the trouble and cost.
no radio reception. sound is fine for Ipod music. The radio stations do not come in. One local station tunes to all.  Our $20 Boom box gets better reception
I'd rate a "0" if I could. If there was more detail from Amazon, I would have never bought this item. To me, the whole point of buying a docking station is so I don't have to lug around the power pack in and out of my laptop case. This docking station didn't come with a power pack!!! A USB port hub will almost be as good as this docking station - with the exception of a place to hook the monitor. I tried to go generic - but at the end of the day, but a docking station that is made for your specific laptop by your laptop manufacturer. You will be much happier in the long run
BEWARE READ THIS BEFORE YOU BUY. This adapter will not work with certain drivers goto pharos website for details.  I bought this product fought it for 8 hours before I figured this out and had to return it
Did not deliver. I purchased for about $8 the 1-year Replacement Plan for Electronics Products on 07-06-2006 and after one call on about 08-06-2006 to the seller I still have *not* received anything. --John
Coasters!. I wish they had a rating for zero stars.  I bought the fifty pack and had 12 good burns and 38 coasters.  That's a 24% success rate.  I subsequently bought verbatim data life and have burned 14 so far with no coasters.  Memorex has really gone downhill.
BEWARE of Kingston REBATES!. Beware of KINGSTON rebates!Of course, I hope your experience would differ, if you were to buy Kingston product(s), but mine was terrible.I bought a Kingston CompactFlash card that offered a $50 mail-in rebate.  I promptly (as in, the day AFTER I received the item delivery) went to photocopy my rebate certificate and UPC code and sales receipt; then sent it all on its merry way.  Yes, I was well within the rebate period, both for the purchase AND for the postmark date.  My purchase was a valid retailer (think HUGE online e-tailer).The rebate REQUIRED sending THE ENTIRE ORIGINAL UPC label, which was like the entire outside package for my CF card, about the size of 1  business cards when flattened.  No problem.About TWO MONTHS later, I get a letter saying "your rebate request was denied because you failed to furnish the appropriate ORIGINAL UPC code as required by the rebate offer."Well, now  WHAT?  I can't RE-SEND the original (it was already in their possession).  I called, and they insisted on repeating what the letter said.  I re-sent my PHOTOCOPIES and they said a photocopy is invalid proof of purchase.After another 6 weeks of pursuing this, I figured this is their scam.  They simply wouldn't honor the rebate.  And without the ORIGINAL UPC in my possession, I couldn't really submit to their requirements.If you're looking for a RAM upgrade, I'd suggest you look at a quality company like OCZ (the BEST!), or Patriot, Geil, or Corsair.  If you're looking for a value Flash Memory Card, I might suggest SanDisk.For one, Kingston does NOT make the best products, they are VALUE-driven products.Two, there are competitors to Kingston with just as good or better value-to-performance ratios at the same prices.Three, Kingston will not stand behind their customer as I have experienced.I urge you to, please, be cautious of Kingston and their rebate scams
Are you kidding???  Good sound from a $5 pair of headphones???. Com'on folks...let's be real here.  The Coby CV-H42 headphones may have decent sound for a pair of cheap headphones, but com'on...they're only $5 or less.  I've tried them on a non-amplified computer monitior at work, and they sound decent.  The bass is average at best.  If these have a 40mm driver, then I'd hate to hear what a smaller one in a Coby set would sound like.I've also tried them on my at-home 5.1 amplified PC set-up and they distort way too easily.  The bass distorts at almost the slightest bit of bass.And I concur with those who say that it's a roll of the dice to get a good working pair, as the left-speaker in my set is a bit weak.I mean let's face it...these are some pretty cheap headphones...if you want a cheap, but great sounding pair of headphones, you better look to a set in the $15+ range.  Take for instance the KOSS KTX-PRO 1 Titaniums for $18 here on Amazon.  They're sold for upwards of $45 at retailers like Radio Shack.  And from all the glowing reviews, they're a hellava set of headphones.I gave this set 2-stars only because they're decent for a cheap pair, but for audiophiles, stear clear
Ear Piercing. The drive has great capacity and works fast enough. However, after seeking it makes a very high pitched noise. It is not even that loud and yet I can't stand it at all. Would not recommend based on this if you have any kind of sensitive hearing. Additionally the drive has no means to set it to run slower but with less noise unlike other drives
They work, but they are painful to wear. They are decent headphones sound quality wise. I have very complaints in that department. However, even after a few minutes, they can become very painful to wear. I suppose you get what you pay for, but usually Philips is better than this. Needless to say, I plan on returning them.Also, just a side note, the current picture featured in this product listing is not what the headphones look like. I'm not sure what model those headphones are, but the actual SHP2500 look nothing like that. Hopefully Amazon will fix that soon.-Edit: Amazon has updated this product listing now. The picture now matches what the headphones actually look like
Save your money. Let me come straight to the point. This stuff is garbage. Please save your hard earned cash, and purchase something different. This does nothing to remove or repair scratches. If you want to waste 10 dollars, you can rip up a 10 dollar bill and flush it down the toilet. If I could rate this item as zero stars, then I would.
Great, but... My friend has this cord to connect his iPod to his stereo, and it works great, great sound, good ease of use etc. I wanted one so I went to Bestbuy today and got one by RCA that sounds just as good for $7.99
JUNK!. This is an extremely cheap product (poor grade of plastic) and sound quality is...for the lack of a better word...gross! The earbuds that came with my ipod are 10 times better! It's on it's way back! STAY AWAY
DON' T BUY!!! Very poor quality!! On my 3rd Set. I originally purchased this HDTV back in September but it had to be replaced because the digital tuner(ATSC) was defective and the ATSC would crash while i was watching digital TV so the picture would freeze and i would have to restart the TV to watch digital TV.Olevia replaced that defective tv with a new tv same model and it worked fine for about 2 months now it has an unsightly thin vertical blue line going threw the middle of the screen. So now olevia has to replace my tv for a second time in 6 months. I've never experienced such poor quality electronics in my life and I will never buy another product from olervia-syntax. I would give this product 0 stars if i could. DONT buy this (...).
dont buy not worth a cent. got it at walmart can't even remove a scuff. i give it -100 good thing i could return it
a few key pointers to read before purchasing. okay. Your first pointer: Do Not Buy. I have been plaing the guitar for 1.5 years but I will tell you I did not start out on this guitar. My neighbors have one and somtimes i'll try to tune it but it dosn't matter because they never play it. the strings never stay tuned and they are horrible quality strings. I own a Gibson Les Paul Epephone. It is my third guiar. Do not even buy your child a guitar unless they are interested. A way you can tell is, How creative are they? How often do they use thier right brain? If they are interested you have to spend atleast $115 for a nice guitar. My eleven year old self hopes that this helped you/ Thank you very much.
Good Light, Short Life. This is a very well designed light and works very well. You have better control of the light vs. snake neck light types. The quailty of light put out is good and is not so bright as to create glare. There is one major flaw in this light. It has a very short life span. It died after only two months
Buy a laser fax instead. I was suprised and dismayed to learn that this Brother FAX-575 is among the most popular fax machines Amazon sells.  The print and copy quality are inadequate, the machine shrieks in an especially tiresome manner, and the overpriced ribbons need frequent replacement.  Even at the highest resolution setting, recipients of my faxes complain about not being able to make out even typed text.  The dusty old laser fax I paid five dollars for at a garage sale takes much longer-lasting toner cartridges and completely outclasses the FAX-575.  The 575 is, however, a surprisingly adequate phone, with exceptional volume and voice quality.  Go figure
Good audio, lousy handset interface. Once again, a consumer electronics hardware maker proves that they can't develop a good software interface for their device. In terms of physical design, this is one of the best cordless phones out there. The sound quality is also quite good, and the DECT technology works on a band that keeps it free of WiFi interference. However, I had to return this phone right away because the interface is so awful. First of all, Philips really shortchanged this device by putting in a cheap LCD display that can only display 8 letters on caller ID, and then they are letters formed in barely legible block-style on the numerical display. I mean, how much more would if have cost them to put in a modern LCD display with enough pixels to show real letters? But the clincher is the poor design of this phone's Caller ID interface. Call it Caller Confusion. If you have Caller ID with Name service from your phone company, with this phone you can only see the name -- and only the first 8 letters of it! While the phone call is coming in, there is no way to scroll the display to show the phone number. You can only see that AFTER the phone has stopped ringing. What use is that? If the incoming phone call actually has a name from the phone company, this is barely OK, but for the many calls that have no name, this phone will show "CELL PHO" or "UNKNOWN" or "800 SERV". There is no way to get it to show the actual number while the phone is still ringing. If you're trying to screen calls, it's essentially useless. Whoever designed this interface just doesn't get what Caller ID is for in the first place. I would have loved to like this phone, because I think the phones from Panasonic, VTech, Motorola and others are horribly ugly, and my previous Panasonic had the worst audio quality imagnable. But this phone doesn't cut it as well. Why is the cordless phone market so devoid of good products
HMMMMMMMM................. Well... first off let me say that I don't usually write review's. But, I had to on this product.. and not because it is great.... ITS HORRIBLE.. the reception is awful.... I hooked it up and tried every station possible... but to no avail. I had to turn the volume up extremely high... and the background noise is torture to the ears !! With all the crackling and static... I am very disappointed.... very !! I am just going to burn all my songs to disc's...  or buy a plug and play receiver... I wish it didn't have to come to this  ... darn it.
absolute junk. I have had nothing but trouble with this product. no matter how many times i have dowload new, or older, drivers, the installation is never complete. their help desk neither has been able to provide with any help to this problem (though they have tried).i will not spend money on another dlink product
TomTom needs to find a new day job. I hate this unit with a passion and I sell the things. Its cheap, 299.99 at most retail place right now and that's what you are getting. The One died in 24 hours, while plugged in and never turned back on. It also directed us to a road that was headed into the Pacific Ocean, there is no road across in the pacific last time I checked. It acquired Satelites ONCE and then never acquired them again. And good luck talking to customer service, both I talked to didn't speak english...A dreadful unit, maybe TomTom could go work at Walmar
WGX102 Prone to Hardware Failure. I purchased a WGX102 about 18 months ago. The first unit I purchased failed after a few months. NetGear replaced it, because it was under warranty. The replacement unit worked nicely for about 15 months, then it failed too, with pretty much the same symptoms. The unit only has a one year warranty, so NetGear told me I would have to buy another. I'm not going to do that, because the units don't seem to last, and I don't want to have to buy another one every 18 months or so.I've seen a number of reviews on various sites by other customers who have had the same experience. Be warned
Audio Quality is a Disappointment. I've been using Sony's ECM-MS907 for more than 5 years now and have loved it; so two weeks ago I ordered the Sony ECM-CS10 to use for audio journal keeping while on the road.  When it arrived just a few days ago, I compared the audio quality of its recordings to that of my existing Sony microphone.  In spite of its pleasing aesthetics, I found it to be a sad disappointment!!!  The ECM-CS10 is a very noisy microphone with an audio quality far inferior of what I would expect from a Sony mic.  (I wonder whether this is because it is a plug-in-power mic).Frankly, I think I'm probably going to return it and look for something else.  I've purchased a number of microphones on eBay and have only been satisfied with one other type of compact mic.  Microsound makes it; and its a mic with a cable lead about three inches long.  I'm not in any way affiliated with them, but I would recommend their product.With all of this said, I think I still might spring for Sony's top-of-the-line lapel microphone, just to see whether it's any good
Far too uncomfortable. I'm a gamer.  I play for hours a day and currently use a simple MS intellimouse optical.  Well I was looking for something a little more pro, and in my searching I saw the Razer line of gaming mice.  I uncharacteristly ordered one based on the specs without trying one out, only to find that it is far too bulky and uncomfortable to play with.It's got large rubber triming down each side, so it is cumbersome to get to the left side buttons.  I only say the left side because the right side buttons are so miserably place you will NEVER, EVER, be able to reach them during game play.  It also feels too long and flat, so the scroll wheel is note easily reached, and your hand does not rest comfortably.Yeah, it looks great, and I'm sure it's doing an amazing job a moving precisely.  However, I can't get it to move correctly in my hand due to its horrible shape, so for gaming, it's rather worthless.
Extremely poor choice. Connecting the server was easy. Installation of the utility software no sweat, too. Although, when it came to setup, the server control panel repeatedly asked for a password. Since I didn't set one, it must have been set by factory. Calling the Tech Support did not resolve the matter. Returning to the seller
No quality, just speed. While this scanner is quite fast at running documents through, I found that it could not come close to getting any of them properly aligned. I spent more time de-skewing scans than it would have taken to do it on a flatbed scanner. It is plenty good for having 'good enough' images for record keeping, but useless if you are trying to keep higher quality digital records of paper documents
Cheap Price, Cheap Quality. This Elgin remake of the original Timex 3400T is nothing like the original.    (I like the original so much I was hoping to buy another.)  Sadly, the quality of this clock is very, very poor.  This new design of the 3400T is completely different (worse) -- they should have changed the part number.I liked the ability to quickly and quietly set a "nap" time in the original.  No more!  The updated version is much more difficult to set and it beeps loudly every time you press a button.I am very disappointed.  I'd gladly pay three times the price to get a 3400T of the original Timex design
Runs hot, short life. I installed this power supply as a replacement from Gateway. From the moment I installed it, it did not cool sufficiently. Within a year it had failed completely
Unable to install, despite reaching D-Link technical support. From looking at the D-Link website and talking to five tech support staff, it appears that there are countless versions of this card, each with different driver software. The one I got came with a CD with the wrong drivers. With tech support, I finally found the 8 mb driver file I was supposed to download. However, they did not provide any instructions on how to install the new driver. The normal "automatic" approach did not work. And their instructions did not match the screens I was getting on Windows XP SP 2.So I called back again. And again. And again.Despite being given a case file, each time I was asked the same questions, including what, exactly, is wrong. And each time I was told to do the same thing: Install from the CD. Reboot. Remove the program. Reboot. Install from the new driver. Reboot. Remove the program. Talk to a senior tech support person.Install from CD. Reboot. etc.It would have been easier to send the card with the right files on the CD. A clearly designed website would be second best. And tech support that knows what they're doing and speaks intelligble English would be a nice last resort.I spent three hours calling D-Link technical support and speaking to five people, and they could not tell me how to install the software for this card!I am not alone in this experience; see cnet's web site user reviews of the DWL-G650.Another reviewer reports that this software damaged his operating system. I believe he is right. It appears to have damaged my screen font for Windows message boxes. I have been unable to repair it. The DWL-G650 is bad news.I give them two stars cause they actually have tech support, though in this case it was utterly worthless.Back it goes
Only slightly better than aluminum foil... I had aluminum foil attached via coaxial cable to my T.V. before I purchased this antenna.  After hooking the antenna up, I noticed only marginal improvements.  Also, if you want to change between lesser reception channels, you have to completely reposition the antenna.  I would return it, but I would get barely half of what I paid for it, since I would still have to pay for return shipping as well as the original shipping cost
Shipping and handling. You charge too much for shipping and handling. I would have been better off going to a Retail Store
Targus Port Replicator Glorified USB Hub. This item was ordered as a christmas present and arrived without incident.  It also arrived in a plastic bag with out any software or even a label saying what it was.  After installing this item and beginning use with it, it became evident that the video portion of the device didn't work correctly.  The monitor hooked up displayed the same thing as my laptop but on a 5 second delay and the mouse and everything else appears to trail.  We updated all necessary drivers and sought technical support from Targus.  It took them a long time to respond and once they did, there advice was to hook the monitor directly up to the laptop, defeating the purpose of having a docking station.  So, with that said, if you are looking for a USB hub, this will work, but if you are looking for a Docking Station with Video (as this device/company claim) I would strongly recommend you purchase something from a company other than Targus.
A Waste Of Money!. This is without fail the most difficult to use software I have ever seen. I have way better luck using MS Publisher and even Word for making tray liners. I found this product to be a time consuming waste of money. The more time you invest in loearning this software the more you lose. Who wrote this program anyway? Fire them
The worst DVDs I have tried so far. I have used three other brands of 16x DVD-Rs and none of them have been problematic with my new (Tivo) dvd burner. This is the first brand that just hasn't worked. These discs were a waste of time shopping for, they were a waste of time dealing with failed burns, and they were a waste of money. I am not even going to attempt to sell the unopened package in the Amazon marketplace since it wouldn't be fair to other buyers. For your information, I have had no problem with Sony, Fuji, and Verbatim
Maybe OK for a Smaller Room. I found this unit to be unacceptable for my (large) living room. It failed at about 20 feet or so and I had to return it. Panasonic claims 33 feet range
Please don't Buy a Zune. I bought the Zune around Christmas time of 2006. I used it on a daily basis and was happy with it. Early in April, it stopped working. After spending three (3) hours on the phone with four (4) technicians, Microsoft accepted my return for repair and sent me a box to ship it to their repair facility. Two (2) weeks later, I received the Zune back with a note that the Zune was not repaired because the problem it had was not within the warranty limitations. They did not tell me what the problem was - only that they did not fix it. I was more then dismayed. I had spent almost $300.00 with tax and shipping to buy this product. I did not abuse it in any way. Please think twice before buying this product. If and when it breaks - Microsoft will not fix it and you will be stuck with a $300.00 paperweight.
Good print quality lousy ink usage. Recently I bought an Epson R260, to replace my Epson R200, big mistake, after only 20 or so prints 4/6, the printer ran out of ink, I mean all six cartridges were almost empty, black was totally out, first I thought, well maybe the cartridges, that came with the original packaging were not totally full, I went out and got me a new set of six cartridges, 100+ dolars. After 26 prints, again out of ink. I used to get about 175 / 200 with the old R200. It is ridiculous, you actually see the ink level go down as you print.Excelent print quality lousy ink usage.Did I mention that I was using the lowest possible setting for the quality of prints.When I contacted Epson, the answer was, GET THE CONTINUOS FLOW INK SYSTEM.Nice answer
Where has quality gone?. Works fine, looks and feels "cheap."  Very few cordless phones with speaker on handset that are wall mountable?  Why?
A niche product that falls short of expectations. Unfortunately, I found the Nexus to be a very niche product. I'm sure anyone who is researching this product knows by now that it does not allow you to listen to live XM content on the go. Fair enough, since it never claimed to. However, the idea of this being such a small player only for use of MP3 content and recorded XM content did not impress me.The screen is incredibly small. Of course, this isn't a problem if you are using this player hand held, or in a situation where you don't want to see the display anyway. However, listening to live XM content is entirely different. Don't expect to have this receiver docked in the home kit a yard away from you, and still have the ability to read the screen.This also becomes a problem in the car. I drive a small compact two-door car, and had the receiver mounted at eye level on the dash. I could see the display okay. Not perfect, but okay. My passengers, however, could not see the display at all. Before you have the chance to think of any bad eyesight jokes, I have had both an XM Roady 2 receiver and a Sirius Audiovox PNP3 receiver mounted in this same position, and never got any complaints. Adjusting the brightness and contrast didn't do much good. The artist text is easier to see than the title text, as it is in bold letters. Having a black and white screen did not help.To record live XM content, you must begin the recording within 45 seconds of the start in order to get the entire selection. This may be great when you hear the first notes of a song you know, love, and want to record, but it's a huge flaw for discovering new music. How many of us can decide within the first 45 seconds of a song whether it is or isn't a song we'll want to hear again? Since XM boasts of having the largest play lists on Satellite Radio, how can you assume that song you just heard on Deep Tracks will be a song you will ever hear again on XM?Wait, you could've just add it to your TuneSelect, so it will notify you next time it is played and you can record it then, right? Nope. The Nexus does not include a TuneSelect. Nor does it even include a memory option, where you can store the artist and song title. There is an option titled "Bookmark" though, where the Nexus and the included Napster software will make it easier for you to find and purchase any song you "Bookmark" when you have the Nexus connected to your PC. However, I could find no way to see what songs I bookmarked without using the included Napster software.The User Interface on the Nexus could use a lot of help. There are way too many buttons to press to find your way around the unit. Simply going from Live XM to Recorded/MP3 content can take a while. Be prepared to wander around aimlessly with this receiver for at least the first few hours.Of course, this receiver does not have the 1-10 presets that other satellite radio receivers do. I did find switching between stations more challenging while driving due to this. You can set up a "favorites" category list on the Nexus, but I would have liked more options for customization with this category.Both the Nexus Home Kit (included with the receiver) and the Car Kit come with remotes. I found the remotes to be pointless though. The remotes could have offered an easier way of getting to your favorite channels, but there was no such option. The number keys on the remote only guided you in accessing a channel if you knew the channel number. If you could dock your Nexus across the room and see the display clear enough, the remotes may have been of more use.As for MP3s, you are able to search by artist or song title, but not album. You just transfered the entire Led Zeppelin II album onto your Nexus, and you want to play it from start to finish? Well, if you have some other Led Zeppelin songs on your Nexus, you'll have to find "Whole Lotta Love" and begin playing there. The album title will not be displayed on the Nexus screen though, and the track number won't be either. I'm not expecting the Nexus to be an iPod, but I did find this to be an extreme annoyance.Note that the Nexus can be partitioned to store either 50% XM content and 50% Personal content, or 100% XM content. Don't expect to fill 1GB of your own MP3 collection.The Nexus also contains a new technology for XM known as the Passport. The passport is a small chip that is docked directly behind the Nexus in the home or car kit. It is not and cannot be physically connected to the Nexus. The passport is only required for Live XM content. If you purchase a Nexus and activate it with XM, you are not actually activating the Nexus. You are activating the XM passport. Essentially, you can purchase as many Passport enabled receivers as you desire and only pay one subscription fee, assuming you will only want to listen to live XM content on one receiver at a time. Of course, this is a plus side to the Passport technology. If you only have the desire to own one Nexus, it can be a real pain to have to carry around and dock both the Nexus and the Passport with you every time you go from the car to home. The Passport's small size could make it much easier to be lost or misplaced as well.I have heard that satellite radio companies make it hard for thieves to get away with stealing equipment. The victim of the theft just needs to contact the company, and they will blacklist the ID of the receiver so it cannot be reactivated. The Passport makes the Nexus an easier target, since it is impossible for the receiver to be blacklisted, due to the ID coming from the Passport.Although I am well aware that the car kit is sold separately, I feel the need to mention in this review that I was not comfortable with the cosmetics of the car dock. The bright silver color of it made it very easy to see, regardless of the time of the day or the amount of light coming into my car. Needless to say, I was concerned that this would be a huge theft magnet. Most satellite radio receivers and mp3 player car docks are much more low profile, and for good reason.Although I'm sure this is the result of stricter FCC guidelines, FM Modulation is only an option with the car kit. Unlike previous satellite radio receivers I have owned, you can use any FM frequency you desire with the Nexus. One thing to note is that the FM Modulation will not work if you have anything plugged into the "Line Out" of the car kit, such as a cassette adapter or axillary cables. I was very disappointed that no FM Modulator is included with the home kit.I can't say there is nothing positive about the Nexus though...Loading your personal music collection onto the Nexus is very simple. You can even simply do a copy/paste or drag and drop though Windows. I used Rhapsody instead of Napster to load some of my songs onto the Nexus, and it worked perfectly.I also liked that there was an equalizer included. Of course this is an expected feature of an MP3 player, but it also works with live XM content.It doesn't play only MP3s either. I have all of my music library encoded with iTunes AAC, with a VBR of 128Kbps. I had no problems with playback of these files.Overall, the Nexus does what it is advertised to do. I feel the receiver comes short on many features and with it's portability though. I noticed the price of these have already gone down substantially since the holidays, and some retailers have already stopped carrying them. It should be interesting to see if Samsung and XM continuing with this design. Hopefully they will address some issues and create a receiver worth while.
Cheap made phone. It works and plays well but not made great. Some buttons you have to press twice to make it work. Call Id works fine
Poor sound quality destroys a good idea. I bought the wireless base with 5 handsets to replace a VTEC 2.4GHz  setup that was being stepped on by my wireless network.  Quite frankly, I regret it.  Sound quality on the Motorola units is extremely poor...sometimes.  And it is not predictable.  I have tried moving the base unit and even sitting next to the base unit when the sound quality is poor and there is little correlation to distance from the base.  The range is vastly inferior to the VTEC 2.4 GHz units.  I can talk on the VTECHs up to 400 ft away from the base and I can't even use the Motorolas in the next room.  It's too bad because Motorola did a good job with the features and functions.  I especially like the blinking light on each hand unit to notify of a waiting message.  The ability to have a local and global phone book is also a very good feature.  Despite the good choice of features, what good is a phone that breaks up and clicks while in use?  Don't buy these unit
what's the point of 96 sleeves? I CAN'T CLOSE THE CASE!!. I got in on this deal for a great price, but when i put 90 cd's in, I couldn't even come close to closing the case, now I have to transfer them all back to the other case!!!
Useless piece of trash. This mouse is designed horribly bad !! It opens fine when it is new, but as soon as you put in the batteries, it refuses to open. I suspect that the designers of this mouse did not think about trying to open it when the batteries are in .. I would not recommend it to anyone, unless you want a use and throw mouse.I thought Kensington was a good company. Did not expect this from them. I will stay away from their products henceforth
Bad Choice. One star is being generous. I bought this router to replace my worn out (5 year old) Linksys router. Seemed like a good deal (cheap). The TRENDnet router was deemed defective after spending two hours on the phone with an (outsourced) TRENDnet tech who seemed to have less of an idea than I did on how to get it going. DON'T BUY ONE. I went to the local electronics store and bought another Linksys. It set-up perfectly the first try minutes after I got it home
Too complicated/small for us. We ordered this case/auto mount for our Philips PET710 7" Widescreen Portable DVD Player because it was the one recommended by Amazon.  I needed the auto mount for long car rides with my toddler.  I eventually got this thing to work (failure was not an option if you get my drift), but it has a number of drawbacks.-In order to mount it, you have to remove the top half(huh?).  Having two parts makes it harder to install and easier to lose.  I accidentally left the top part on the top of the car when I drove away.-It's too small.  The Philips portable DVD player is too long for the case and the headphones and car/ac converters also pull the player out of the case.  Plus (and this is really amazing), it does not have enough space to hold the most basic accessories that came with the DVD player.  I have to carry the headphones and sleaved DVDs seperately!I chose my last DVD player b/c it came with an auto mount case, and even though I like the Philips DVD player, I'd do that again if I had it to do over.  Having the right case/mount for your DVD player is that key
dont store valuables on this. Both of my  LaCie Big Disk Extremes have been returned to manufacturer within a year of purchase due to power issues. In each case I have lost time and valuable data (they reformat the drive after repair as stardard operating procedure). Lacie makes decent drives so this surprised me. Later models may have fixed the problem, but the LaCie Big Disk Extreme has issues.
More trouble than it's worth. This is a gadget with more promise than delivery. It was a retirement gift to me and I'm sure glad that not a penny from my pocket went toward the purchase. Difficult to operate and the end product is not worth the trouble. You have been warned
will not work. I purchased one that never worked.  I had it replaced and it still didn't work.  I followed directions explicitly, and tried 3 different locations on the fm band that had no signal present.  Not a sound.  Didn't matter which volume control was turned up or if they were both up.  Nothing.  Therefore, I have no idea about performance
Junk. After reading the reviews, I realized there were varied results from those who had purchased the Adesso Cyber-tablet 6400. Since my daughter was going to use the pen and tablet in MS Paint, I thought it should work fine. Was I wrong! The wireless mouse was irratic and the the pen worked about 50% of the time. When the pen did work, it responded well after her mation started. Our computer is an average P-III Dell with plenty of memory. For the price, I expeced more.Adesso, find a another line of work!Shopper, buy another product.
Terrible Reception. Forget using the antenna for air reception.....its almost useless.  Lots of video noise and no sound on weak channels (no fine tuning possible).  The only saving factor of this item is its cable connection....works fine.  But if you have cable connection available, why hook it up to this small screen player?
Don't buy the Audiovox D1750T, it WILL break!. Hello, this is my first Amazon review, actually my first anywhere review.  I normally depend on reading reviews but was never so affected by a product, positive or negative, that I felt a need to write a review.  My experience with Audiovox's D1750T DVD player has changed that.I'll put it as plainly as this:  If you buy this product, it WILL break.  That is a fact.That says it all, and the rest may get long winded, but read on if you want to know how/why it will break.  I purchased this product 6 months ago.  After 2 months the hinge on the battery that allows you to set the unit on a tabletop and watch hands-free broke.  I thought it was a fluke but was able to get a replacement.  Now my second battery has broken in the exact same place, the exact same way, and that's after the fact that I did my best to handle the unit with the utmost care, since I thought it might have been my fault the first time.It is now clear to me that this is a manufacturing error, one in fact that Audiovox's Customer Service representative acknowledged yet refused to do anything about since I was outside the 90 days warranty.  Unfortunately I've only found one other person online who's written about it (epinions.com) but that's out of maybe 6 total reviews I've found anywhere online.The player gets 2 stars from me because battery issues aside, it's a decent player at a decent price.  The resolution and sound without headphones leave something to be desired, but if you can pick it up for $200 or less it would be a good player as far as screen size and general quality goes.  But this battery issue and subsequent customer service issue is unacceptable.  People need to be warned when they're buying something that is flawed in its manufacturing and will break.Another warning is that the paint(?) or whatever it is that makes the sides of the unit black has started to flake so now the unit's good looking design is marred.... insult to injury I tell ya!  Bottom line, I say don't buy it, but if you'll be using it in such a way that you won't use the battery's stand (btw, there's a stand that flips off the back if you're using the unit with external power.  I've never had a use for it.), then I guess it's a decent player.  I'll bet there's better ones out there for the money though.P.S. I finally managed to strongarm a higher-up at Audiovox into replacing the battery for free.... this time.  Fingers crossed THIS one doesn't break too...
Annoying and Frustrating...Not What I expected from HP. I started my own business and purchased this item because of my past experiences with HP laser jets.  One year later, I'm about to throw it out the window and buy a new printer.Why?  First of all, even when printing in black and white, the device uses color ink.  Approximately 97% of my printing is black and white, yet the color ink cartridge levels are consistently depleted.  As a result, I have to purchase (what a surprise) HP color inks even though I don't ever use them.  I estimate that's cost me about $150-200 over the last year.The second reason I despise this machine relates to its annoying warning message pop-up boxes.  When ink is running low in any cartridge, a pop-up appears.  They cannot be disabled.  They appear until the ink cartridge is completely empty.  Since the machine depletes color inks at such minute levels, these messages can appear for days (or until you replace it with another expensive HP ink cartridge).Lastly, the machine will not operate if any of the ink cartridges are empty.  I can't tell you how many times I've wanted to print a simple black and white document but could not because the machine was out of pink or yellow ink.Clearly HP has decided that the best way to make money is through ink sales.  If they'd focused more on the customer's ultimate experience, they'd have secured me as a repeat, long-term customer
poor compatibility. while the verbatim has burned well in 100% of my recordings they fail to operate in at least 24 different dvd players
Card slot cover broke 1st day....... The cover to the slot for the card broke the 1st day, very weak hinges and door is in an area that is most likely to get grabbed when using it.
My roommate's broke, then mine broke!. My roommate's mouse broke (she had the older L shaped receiver)... and I thought it was because she's bad with technology. But I'm a computer junkie who knows how to take care of her technical equipment... and even mine broke (a few months later, I had a straight receiver). It just gave up on me. Not a battery issue. More like a connection issue.Now I read all these reviews about it breaking on people. Well, I'll write back when my other roommate's break, and when my cousin's break.Don't get me wrong... but it was great while it lasted. Less than half a year. Gonna go back to my Logitech. That never broke on me
Positively HORRIBLE; don't waste your funds. To say that I've wanted to throw this *smartdeck* out of my car window countless times may be a strong indication of how poorly it works.Never have I encountered a product that works so poorly. Don't even CONSIDER owning this accessory if you live in an area of the country that dips below 60 degrees; it seems the product works even worse in the cold!Upon pluggin my iPod into the smartdeck, the adapter makes my iPod jump, from song to song, playing the first 1/2 a second of each. It's rare that I'm able to get the adapter to play the iPod normally.I will no doubt be shopping around the competition for a stronger, more reliable piece of equipment for my iPod
not worth the trouble or money!!!. This product is not worth the money or trouble.  I also had problem with bubbles forming and also the sides curing up as my notebook warmed up.  It was too much bother to keep trying to smooth out the bubbles and press down the sides after curling back up.  Save your money and don't buy this. This would actually qualify for a zero star rating
Too quirky. After purchasing these earbuds for a bargain price a few days ago, I was ecstatic with the initial quality I heard from the tracks I was playing on my Zen, but for all the package's hype (including a tag proclaiming some kind of award the earbuds had won in 2004) the Philips Surround Sound Earbuds aren't all they're cracked up to be.  After the somewhat promising initial tests, it took me only a couple more uses to realize that the EQ and frequency response on these puppies was way out of whack to say the least.  The product specs on the package claimed the earbuds to have a maximum frequency pick-up of 22kHz, which is interesting considering the human ear can only hear to just below that level.  So, theoretically these earbuds can deliver any and all sound the media dishes out, right?Not only did I notice significant attenuation on the higher frequencies when the volume of my Zen was turned up barely past the halfway mark, but also a complete domineering of the low-end sounds in whatever media happened to be playing.  Just try playing some ambient music with these things to get an idea of the frustration I felt trying to enjoy some relaxing vibes amidst all the jarring distortion and ringing I was hearing.  There doesn't seem to be a feasible solution to this, either, as the earbuds seemed completely oblivious to my efforts of adjusting the EQ output on my player.  Additionally, the assymetrical cord design seems a bit of a silly concept considering the undue amount of pull and tug it places on the left earbud, causing it to fall out a little too easily.  Ranting aside, though, those of you seeking out something better than the stock earbuds your portable music player has provided you with should probably keep searching
Won't work with Philips Jackrabbit CD-Rewriter. I tried using these CD's with the Philips Jackrabbit CD-Rewriter and they don't work
Scratched my Macbook. As long as its on, it will prevent scratches, but its tough to get off, and that act can scratch your laptop.  It scratched my Macbook when I pried it off.  The guy at the Apple Store who snapped it on a Macbook beause I requested a "demo", couldn't pry it off, and after 10 embarassing minutes, he called a colleague over, and they pried it off together.  And, to be honest, this makes the MB look ugly - kinda like putting a veil on a supermodel.  ;--
P.I.T.A to get working, Poor Tech Support. It took me 3+ days to get this thing to work with my notebook.  Cannot get it to work with my desktop.  Tech support was no help at all.  They just had me retrying things I already did.  If your not a networking wizard do not buy this router.  Newer models don't need the manual setup of this one
When It Works, It's the Best Available Tape Adapter.  But... I've read many of the reviews of the sorely disappointed, and I understand their complaints since I've also experienced many of the same problems.  There are, however, some workarounds that might help some of the stuckees...Regarding too-high-gain leading to static, I've learned through trial and error that the not-so-SmartDeck volume is fairly random due to variations in mechanical position of its head relative to the tape deck head.  If  the volume is set too high (or low), try plugging the SmartDeck in and out a few times, or reach your finger in and see if you can jiggle its position.  Picking an especially loud song while you do this will help you to know when you have successfully adjusted to a good volume.  Unfortunately, this workaround doesn't work for all iPods... although I can always successfully find a good position with my 4th generation 40GB iPod, I've noticed that the output from the iPod mini is significantly louder, and therefore, much harder to adjust this way.Regarding the tapedeck-spits-out-SmartDeck problem, I've noticed that I only get this problem when the SmartDeck is cold, usually first thing in the morning (clearly, this is the tape deck thinking the SmartDeck is a jammed tape).  Try warming the SmartDeck by blowing warm breath into the hole where the fake "tape" is, then put it back in.  In cold weather, the deck itself is also going to be cold, so you may have to do this several times until the entire car warms up.  It seems to me that this problem has become less pronounced over time -- I rarely have to do this more than once nowadays.Unfortunately, I don't have a workaround for the intermittent track-skip/FF problem.  I have seen that once or twice, though in general, that feature tends to work for me (both track skip, and track FF/Rewind).  I have a suspicion that this is another cold weather problem and a side effect of the spits-out-tape problem, but now that I have a workaround for the latter problem, I've not seen this problem in over a year.Ironically, if you manage to avoid all these warts, the SmartDeck is the best-sounding adapter I've ever heard.  Plus, the auto-on/off feature is much more valuable than you might think (and no one seems to complain that this feature is broken). With the four other adapters I've tried -- two cassette, and two FM transmitter -- I cannot tell you how many times I forgot to turn my iPod off when I exited the car, then came back to a dead iPod.  Nevertheless, the warts are pretty obnoxious, therefore I must deduct 3 stars from this otherwise 5-star product
Sony CD400 CDP-CX400. Had this model above for 5 years. Started skipping during playing any CD ..not scratched. My CX300 model is 8 years old, and works great. When you check the sony site for service, if not under warranty, it's about 195 bucks for an exchange, and 122 for service.I sure would like to know what's the problem with these? Don't exchange! Buy a new one for about 220, and smash the old one....make sure you video it and post on YouTube
Panasonic CD player is not continuous. The Panasonic CD player has a good sound quality, but does not automatically change from one CD to the next. It requires manual switching via the remote control to change from one CD to another. This feature was not explicitly stated in the specifications, and is misleading to a buyer who is seeking continuous playing of all five CD's
What a waste... First off, the ipod jiggles no matter what you do, secondly, it doesn't stay straight on the power plug, it constantly tilts(the whole thing)...not worth $10
Performance is good but lacks accesories. I purchased the Creative nano 1GB at Christmas and was impressed with performance and accesories that were included for the price. I then purchased the muvo v100 which is almost identical to the nano but a little larger and has a direct USB plug-in. For essentially the same price, I did not get any accesories(a armband,skin, or belt clip) I had to purchase an armband from Creative for about what the player cost, because was not availiable anywhere else. Creative also charged my card wrong for the armband. So use caution when dealing with this
Terrible Product. I had to continue to send back this product because it wouldn't work. I ended up going through 4 before I gave up entirely. This product is NOT reliable and I didn't even want to give it 1 star
Not Vista Compatible. I was disappointed to learn this card won't work with Windows Vista.  I bought the router + card together in hopes of getting broader coverage even though it isn't fully standards-compliant ("Pre-N").  I contacted support about the issue and they sent me instructions that didn't work out.  Might be a good product for WindowsXP, but for my purposes I rate it 1 star
Destroyed my CD--I wanna give this product  minus 5 stars. Before the repair process there was one bad track on my CD.  After the "repair" process the entire disk was unplayable.  Took it back for a refund. With billions of CDs in the world, is this the best that the 21st century has to offer?
Don't buy this loser. For $99 this should be a much better remote.  If you watch movies in the dark, you have to use the glow button, guess what, you will have to replace the batteries once a month at least.  Also, Logitech has over simplifed the remote.  You can't program individual buttons you have to use their program that only allows you to program devices and not the remote directly.  If you have to go into the device menu  a lot you will not be able to control the volume unless you switch to the device that controls volume.  Why not have an option to program each button period...  But the remote is useless now because of the low battery life.  Do not buy this unless you want to buy batteries every month.  Ridiculous.  Only remote I have ever had like this
Junk. This product is aweful.  The gear strips, the pad is staionary while the disk spins and this leads to circular scratches on the disk. Compared to the Disk Washer product that I had used for 15 years, this product is junk.AVOID IT
Stops working after 3 months. This DVD player does play all types of DVDs no matter how you burn it.  But like other reviews, it stopped working after 3-6 months.  In my case, it was 3 months.  It just doesn't turn on anymore.  I unplugged everything and replugged it but it just went dead.  I don't watch DVDs much, so it's not like I overused it. Go with another model.  This one has problems.  I thought mines would be the exception, but I guess not.  And now I can't return it because it's been over 30 days.
Unfortunately Doesn't Last. I bought a 700 series iRiver to use at the gym, which came with this Armband, at first it was great, but it didn't last, there are two clasps which don't sta attcked well, and the pocket that holds the mp3 player itself is held together with a glue that comes undone after a few weeks of daily use
Not glow in the dark  keys. In february 28 I purchased this remote control,mainly for his feature that the keys glows in the dark.Well thats not true!In the add for this product clearly says that, even in the Sony"sWeb page also appear that information.I read 3 times the manual instruction booklet and...nothing about it.!What is this? It isa lie? or a last time chages in the specifications? I am verydissapointing
Decent, but not as advertised on Amazon.com. Pros:  solid construction, good feel, excellent sound quality, works with power outCons:  keypad isn't backlit, caller ID isn't backlit (contradicts advertising as of 9/19/2004!), if on table then caller ID visible only when looking down at phoneNeutral:  caller ID and programmable buttons (3 of them) dependent on 3 AA batteriesI've been on a quest for the perfect corded phone.  I wanted something with a cord so that there's at least one working phone in the event of a power outage, and I wanted caller ID since I enjoy knowing who I'm going to be stuck talking to when I pick up the phone.  One of my requirements for caller ID is that it have a backlit display so I wouldn't have to turn on the light in the middle of the night if I got a call.  I tried the AT&T 210 trimline paired up with the GE 29096 caller ID box, but that didn't work well since the box wasn't backlit and it kept clicking on the line as if it were trying to flash it.So you can imagine my delight after having read the specs on the AT&T 240 corded phone.  According to the information on Amazon.com, it had the trimline profile that I like, a heavier weight to the handset so it doesn't feel flimsy, and a backlit caller ID unit built into the back of the handset.  Plus, it was inexpensive.  I bought one immediately.  When I unboxed it, I was happy with the weight and design of the phone, even though it doesn't have a backlit keypad like the trimline phones of old do, like the AT&T 210 that I was using.  A pity, since that's a nice feature and one for which I would have been glad to pay more.So anyway, I hooked it up and tested it out.  The phone had a good feel to it, comfortable to hold as well as cradle between ear and shoulder.  The quality of the sound was excellent, both clear and without the tinny sound that can result from the audio compression in cordless phones.  I only had one complaint, but it was a major one:  the caller ID wasn't backlit.  Moreover, there was nothing in the instruction manual indicating that it was supposed to be, either.  This was a big gripe since the real feature of this phone for me was the backlit caller ID that Amazon.com advertises.A possible problem for others considering the 240 as a telephone would be the orientation of the caller ID window.  As it's on the top of the handset, you have to be looking down at the phone if you decide to rest it on a table or nightstand, i.e., there is no accessory to clip on the back to give it an angled elevation nor, due to the location and style of the rubber feet, can an impromptu one be constructed.  This essentially means that if you rest the phone on a table then the caller ID window is viewable only if you stand up, lean over, or pick up the entire phone along with the base and look at it.  Of course, if you don't care who's calling then you can pick up the phone and just take your chances; to me, however, this defeats my main reason for caller ID -- not having to talk to people I don't want to.  If you just use it as a phonebook of recent callers, then this isn't a problem.  Also, if you wall mount the telephone then this isn't an issue at all.  I use this telephone in my bedroom but have it wall-mounted next to the bed so I can see the caller ID just fine...in the light, that is.So, in conclusion, the AT&T 240 is a corded phone with great sound quality and a good feel to it.  I wish that the keypad were backlit and I'm quite unhappy that the caller ID window isn't backlit.  This is a good corded phone that, with a longer cord, could be a great wall-mounted kitchen phone.  I would not recommend it for a location where the lights may be out or the area could be dimly lit.  I am presently using it for a bedroom phone, but if I find another corded phone in a trimline model that has a real backlit caller ID then I will probably switch and move this phone to the kitchen or in a spare drawer for storage.
sucks!. Bought new around $80.  CD player and LCD CLOCK stopped working within 6 months--now nap function and radio are all that works--if only I could find the damn receipt!!!
Linksys CIT310 Dual-Mode Cordless Phone for Yahoo! Messenger. This product didn't work like it said it would. I think it Sucks!!!Maybe it will work better in the USA. I'm currently in Iraq. Yahoo! Messenger with voice online works Great for me. I thought buying the phone would work good too, but I was wrong!If your deployed, don't waste your money! Use Yahoo! Messenger with voice but make sure you have a web cam build in your laptop or PC.I would have gave the phone no Stars but it would not let me!
I should have believed the other reviewers... Even after reading the bad reviews this product received from other reviewers I still purchased it.  It is pretty easy to set up, but once connected to my PC it had very inconsistent behavior.The device would lose connection to the server after a being idle for 1-2 hours and require a reset.The video performance was awful with the included software.  Tversity freeware media server made video performance better, but fast forward and rewind wouldn't work do to some video conversion routines being run by Tversity.Music files would play, and sounded good, but navigating through my music selection was nearly impossible because the music search feature doesn't work.  Really...  Doesn't work at all.I upgraded firmware and played all sorts of games to try and get the device to work.  Finally I gave up and shipped it back to Amazon.  The thing was just more trouble than it was worth.FYI:  Amazon returns were great.
WARNING: Why o' why do aliens n' non-humans try to cheat us?. SELLER'S: For an honest review go to the CORRECT page for the Bose 321 Graphite w/ Accoustimass 3rd module and two satellite speakers.  That will have the correct retail rate and draw the true end-buyers/purchasers.  This price of $700 is for the 2 speaker satellite system so you would be losing a bit selling here.  I hope this helped you in your endeavors and I look forward to honestly/fairly competing with you in the future!BUYER'S: Buy as many of these as you can and report any loss or "mistakes" on the sellers' part in contractual agreements to Amazon customer service.  Because if this ad by that company/seller is being honest and selling a 3 speaker system (2 satellite and 1 lrg Acoustimass) you are in for a steal! literally, so get a goin! LolDisclaimer: this review is an anti-review posted to make aware the disparity between price and item description (which is it?? 2 speakers or 3???) in this advertisement for above mentioned product.  Why isn't BOSE listed as a seller?! DOH  No slander or libel has ever been implied or attempted unless it was true
good product - fatal software upgrade - very, very poor "service". Initially my Tomtom One was excellent. Then I made the fatal mistake of allowing Tomtom Home to automatically upgrade the software. The device never worked again because it could no longer find any satellites! (My computer has the maximum security offered by Windows XP and Norton Internet Security so it seems unlikely that the process was contaminated in any way.)On 11 Feb - I contacted Customer Service - nice courteous responses but no solution. Finally, on their advice, I returned it to the retailer on 27 Feb. It finally arrived at Tomtom Service on 8th March. That was the last I have heard of it!!!I rang Tomtom Customer service on 2nd April and they could not trace the unit. Over the following 2.5 weeks I tried a series of faxes and online service queries but have received absolutely no human intervention or assistance.In summary - I bought a "good" product, the online software stuffed it up and, over the following two months, Tomtom service achieved nothing except for apparently loosing my Tomtom!!!Postscript:  Finally, almost two months after seeking replacement of the faulty item, I have been advised that it is to be replaced. No apology or expression of regret from Tomtom but at least I will have a GPS.Even though I vowed never to tangle with Tomtom Customer "Service" again, and I am free to choose the replacement model and manufacturer, I have found that Tomtom One still offers the best performance/price balance for my purposes.I just hope that my new Tomtom runs well so that I will not have to be "serviced" again by Tomtom
Basic functions OK, put caution on PS/2 ports. I acquired this unit about a week ago to serve as a docking station for a new laptop computer that does not have any of the traditional ports on it.  You must install the software that comes with it to use the serial or parallel ports, and I had to reboot my computer to get the parallel port working.  (Note that the serial port appears on a non-standard setting, mine is COM4, so any software must be directed to that location.)  I have not tried the serial port, but the USB and parallel ports appear to work fine.  However, beware that the PS/2 ports on the unit do not work the same way as built-in PS/2 ports.  A keyboard and mouse plugged into them will perform their basic functions. But, if you have an advanced mouse or keyboard with extra keys or other options, they will not function through the docking station.  It appears that the PS/2 ports on the docking station are wired to always appear to the operating system as some form of generic Human Interface Device mouse and keyboard, rather than recognizing whatever form of keyboard is plugged in -- as happens with built-in PS/2 ports.  Because of that, I could not find a way to get the computer to match the special mouse and keyboard drivers required for the advanced functions to those devices when connected to the docking station.  Kensington support ignored my first two requests for help on this issue, and then suggested I contact the keyboard and mouse vendors -- which does not make any sense because the devices work fine any time except when they are connected through the PS/2 ports on the docking station. I had to find another way to bridge my keyboard and mouse into a USB port to get them to work.  For that reason, I probably would not have purchased this unit if I had known about this issue.  However, if  you only need a parallel and serial port, as well as two USB ports, this unit will work fine.
quick shippment, user unfriendly, lost reception from time to time. i don't recommend this produc
I did not receive what I bought. I bought a XD to CF adapter, as per the picture on the page. Instead I received, as others did, a PMCIA adapter which is not what I wanted or needed. For the first time, I felt cheated by Amazon and don't know what to do. Hope to receive some explanation
SONY = Stops Operating Next Year. This unit looks nice and plays nice, until it doesn't anymore.This piece of crap worked for only 3 months and was turned on about 10x only, as it stood in my bedroom where I only seldom listen to music. It went dead all of a sudden, and Sony doesn't honor the limited warranty !!Apparently, what I have (a short circuit, that prevents me from turning the unit on) is a common defect and it's even MENTIONED in the owner's manual (ie if you get standy flashing, you're in trouble!).I had several bad experiences with Sony, this will be my last. My advice is stay with Panasonics, they're way way way better.
Great for women... but what about men?. Prior to my Zen V Plus, I had a Creative MuVo TX FM which came with an armband and belt clip in the box. It was a very comfortable and easy to use until it was stolen. As a replacement, I thought I would upgrade to the Zen. Unfortunately the armband for the Zen V Plus had to be purchased separately; I chose to go with the Creative branded band based on my previous experience. To my surprise, the Creative armband is too small for me. Now, I'm 6'2", but I'm not much of a weight lifter, so my biceps are only 14". However, the available strap length is less than that, so I cannot get a comfortable fit. It fits too tightly and tends to pops open as I try to secure it due to lack of slack.  I looked online and found that the average male bicep is 13" in circumference - about the same as the armband's strap. As previous reviewers have stated, the included silicon skin is nice, but it seems that this unit was designed for women, children, and smaller than average men. So guys, unless you have a 12" bicep or smaller, I would look elsewhere for an armband to use while you work out
doesn't work, tech support not good, manual not good. i just received this unit yesterday to serve as a bridge to my Belkin wireless router (the router manual specifies this AP).  Cannot get it to talk wirelessly to the Belkin router. I've spent a good deal of time with it including 30 minutes with Belkin tech support, which consisted of someone reading a script to me, arguing about trivial things, and then ringing off before the issue was resolved. Frustrating to say the least. I'm also not impressed with the lack of logging, as well as the wide-open browser access (your SSID and security settings are displayed to anyone without logging in).The manual is sadly out of date and does not match the firmware nor the physical product, which would make setup difficult for an inexperienced user. Belkin would like to have us believe that this is a plug and play product, but this is not the case.generally, this is pretty much a piece of cr*p. I'm tring to get Belkin to RMA it and either replace it or refund. Overall, I'm more impressed with Linksys/Cisco products than Belkin, even in this price range
HP 6310 has awful software. I installed this machine on a home office network via Ethernet.  The install took awhile, and changed registry settings without asking.  Uninstall did NOT restore the system to it's original state; only hours of manual resetting did that.  How many users can restore the registry?Further, the software/drivers do not like the printer turned off or missing.  If you install this on a road laptop, you can expect a program, HPZinw12.exe, to search for the missing printer every 100 seconds or so using all available CPU time.  If you are unlucky enough to be in the middle of a client presentation, the chances are good that you have just lost the job.If you turn off the printer in the office, your office systems will also search for the printer and display an unclosable dialog asking you to switch to an unknown program while using most of their available CPU time. (Please note that 6 hidden dlls are also running at all times.)  This software is totally equivalent to a virus except for duplication.I returned this system and will never buy another HP product
mismailed TomTom One Charger. I love the Tom Tom One and very highly recommend it.  However, the extra electrical charger I ordered does not adapt to the Tom tom One.  As I am 3,000 miles away from home the electric charger is a disappointment.  But the Tom Tom One is terriffic.  It makes adjustments to my wrong turns and keeps me on track. I'm thinking seriously of buying a second one for my wife as soon as I get back home
They denied the rebate request, what a rip-off!. Your rebate submission has been received.Unfortunately your rebate is denied for the following reasons:REQUEST POSTMARKED AFTER CLOSE OF PROGRAM DEADLINEREQUIRED POSTMARK BEFORE 09/10/04; ACTUAL POSTMARK 09/13/04***********************************************There was absolutely no cut-off submission deadline given, except the purchase by date and submit within a certain time after receiving purchase.All were followed to the "T".I submitted the rebate immediately after I received the merchandise from Amazon.Give me a break, I'll never touch another thing from viking except with a 10' pole.If it was not so piddling an amount, this would be worth reporting to FCC, but the state of customer protection in this country make you jump through even more hoops, probably for nothing, more heartache.Just forego rebates, send Viking back to the boat and purchase another brand
stay away!!!. Terrible! The CD-ROM didn't even have any data on it. I am in the process of returing this junk for a refund
Too Bulky. Not for a Sony Vaio. I bought this case for a Sony Vaio SZ140 after seeing a spotlight review saying that the Vaio would fit perfectly inside. I ended up returning the bag for a refund for two reasons:1. My Vaio (13.3" screen) was just slightly too big to fit in the case. The case itself is very well padded with thick foam. I probably could have forced it in, but it would definitely have taken some forcing. I'd guess a Macbook would fit better.2. The case itself is just too bulky. I bought it looking for a sleeve that would protect my notebook while carrying it in a backpack or messenger bag. This case is very large for a sleeve and would barely fit in my bags. True, it comes with a shoulder strap, but if you're going to use that you might as well go with a regular-sized bag so you can carry your power cords and other accessories.This case seems to have trouble making up its mind whether it's a sleeve or a regular notebook bag, doing a poor job at either. It's too big for a sleeve and too small for a bag
Didn't work out of the box. Connected the TV which would stay on for a max of 5 min then would turn itself off. I called Samsung to schedule service and it took them a week to come out and see the TV. I still don't have the TV back... Once it works, I might review this differently but extremely disappointed
Didn't work for me..... I spent hours trying to get this to work, and I am pretty good with computers. Spent hours on the phone with linksys and finally got someone who said if my wireless router isnt Linksys it probably wont work. I bought this to use with my multifunction printer, will return
Price is right, but that's all. I thought because these are "gumy" headphones they would be comfortable but they are not.  They hurt my ears as much as any other.  If ear pain is your problem when you wear ear-buds, then don't get these.
Poor reception. I bought this at CompUSA.  I live in rural Vermont.  The AutoSearch works fairly well.  The static when connected is acceptable. A big problem is that suddenly you'll get blasted by static when the FM signal is interfered with.   I'm bringing it back for refund. I agree with the previous reviewer - it's NOT worth it. My wife's old 8 station Monster works much better.I'm going to try going back to my old Belkin charge which connects to a cassette
iConcepts Hotsync Charger. Not impressed. Charged fine but the adapter to my iPAQ was not secure at all. Any slight motion of the cable and the pda lost connection to my computer. So, unless you plan on not bumping your cable or ipaq EVER while syncing, i'd steer away from this. Also ran into power issues with the iConcepts cradle
garbage. I bought this card because I had heard it works well with linux. Well I didn't get that far with card because when it arrived it was DOA and doesn't work at all. So now I have to either pay shipping to send it back to amazon or contact dlink and try to get them to send me a replacement :
don't waste your money. This is by far the worst detector I have ever had.Does not detect even close signals.  Had it in for repair twice, still does not work properly.Gives great false signals and makes a fine [although expensive]door stop
Not powerful enough. I needed an antenna that provided a power boost to amplify the signal.  I bought this antenna based on the review of others.  If I had realized it didn't amplify the signal, I would have looked elsewhere.  Oh well, my bad!  I live 20-25 miles from the signal I'm trying to capture, and this antenna didn't do it for me.
Unreliable.  Cute Design.  Bad Engineering.  Poor Quality Control. My shuffle suffered the blinking green-orange lights so I took it into the Apple store. A salesman took 15 minutes to figure out that he couldn't do anything, and said I would have to sign up for a appointment at the "Genius" bar. At that appointment, the "genius" said he couldn't fix it, and because he said he didn't know anything about engineering he couldn't say whether the shuffle was not working because of a software or a hardware problem or both. Apparently being an Apple "genius" doesn't involve understanding how things work, though it does appear to require having a trendy haircut. The 'genius" then offered a $10 discount on the purchase of a new shuffle - but couldn't answer the question of why anyone would want to waste money on such a poorly designed thing.Perhaps it should be retitled the "idiot bar.
Dont' buy this junk. I purchased my 500 in September, it's now January and it has never worked correctly at all. It would say that I am in Russia, then lock up (I live in NJ USA). The first time that I sent it it, my expense, Magellan support sent it back to me within 24 hours; and it was not fixed. It still said that I was in Russia and would lock up. The second time that I sent it to them, they sent me a shipping label via email. They had it in their paws for about 2 weeks. It came back said that I was in Peru and then lock up. I have an old Lowrance and never had a problem receiving a signal, it always locked on to my location (albeit a little slow), and it worked.I've been trying to get a new shipping label for this piece of junck now for one month. First they said that they sent it to me via email, but they said that because I have anti-spyware sw on my pc that my Outlook is rejecting the label. But, I use web based email. Then they said that they will send a label to me via regular mail. It's been two and a half weeks and I have not yet received that label. They told me that they sent it out 3 days before Christmas and that I didn't receive the label because of the delays in mail due to Christmas and New Year's. But it's now January. Who knows, maybe I'll be lucky and receive the label before 2008.It's clear to me that they have no intention of fixing this piece of junk. It was a mistake to buy it; don't you make the same mistake.
Works - almost. I am using this thing with a Toshiba laptop, and a Microsoft mouse and keyboard. It installed as advertised and seemed great - until:-Generation of random mouse clicks. Seems to do this in all programs and it is very annoying. Imaging editing in Word and having the cursor jump to the mouse cursor location, or just having random right clicks.-Synchronization and random behavior of the CAP's lock. CAP's lock turns off and on randomly and then will not sychronize with the laptop keyboard. The only remedy I have found is a reboot.Maybe I got a lemon, but based on other review on other sites, I cannot recommend this device
Piece of Garbage. Created HW Probs on D-Link router. I attached this antenna to a D-Link DI-624 wireless router to try to expand the range then all of the wired ethernet ports started dropping connectivity and I was getting "hardware error" reports from the network monitor.Took the antenna off and it all worked fine again. You would think D-Link would have at least tested this with their own product
Doesnt Play HD only outputs in HD - Good Standard Player. Bought this product to stream HD media from PC/USB Storage. All though advertised on the box and website  it does not play the HD media. I tried to play the media from all 3 available inputs (802.11(wireless), Ethernet, and USB HD) and several formats that are supported (avi,mpeg2,ts,mp4). The HD movies were choppy at best. Plays all other non HD videos without a problem. Divx videos as well(even though it doesn't say it plays them on the box). Worked well with 500GB USB Drive but not needed. Would not recommend because HD feature is useless. Dlink technical support said to take it back to the store. There technical support grade is D- .
Poor Item. The only reason I even gave it one star was that it did turn on.  The battery lasts about 1 hour fully charged, which is just sad.  I could not communicate with a vessel that was 1 mile from me, which again is sad.  Spend a little more money and get a better product.
Did not work. I plugged this cable into my TV, and the TV did not recognize the source, I'm not sure it the TV needs to be digital.
great while it worked - broke after 13 months. Really liked it.   Would have rated it 4-star.But last night it suddenly stopped working and would not turnon anymore. Only the clock works.Just one month out of warranty.From other reviews, this seems to be a common problem
AcAdaptor for Cobra. I ordered the unit twice, and twice I received a Carrying Case. not the adapter.  I returned both and ordered direct from Cobra.When I had called customer support for Amazon the second time, I got connected to India of course and was informed that a lot of their codes are wrong.  I guess they are trained to agree with anything the customer says.
Bad bad bad. Waste of time and money. If I could give this device a review of less than one star I would. An MP3 player is nothing more than a usb memory stick with a player wrapped around it. It should just work. However I've run into the following while attempting to set it up.1. Unrecognized device. Uninstall USB device and try again...2. Device malfunctioned. Uninstall broken device from device manager and try again.3. Recognized device but says there are two removable disks that are both zero bytes in size.4. Links in tech support page all give 404 errors5. Device driver download from coby, only downloads a font file. No driver.It's too late in the evening to call support, it was a christmas gift for my son from out of state. No reciept, can't return.It might make a good item to throw at the neighbors cats when they get in my yard.Other companies have figured out how to make a portable music player "just work" with my computer, why can't these guys?My time is much more valuable than the time I spent to not get it working
